<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4060</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIIBPAB1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920909
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  09 SEP 92 / Leading Article: Nordic paths diverge
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
COHABITATION WITH Germany inside the Exchange Rate Mechanism when the D-mark
is prone to powerful upward lurches against the dollar is no picnic. Living
outside the ERM while trying to abide by its rules is even worse, to judge
by the maelstrom that has consumed the Nordic economies.
Yesterday the Finns reluctantly concluded, with Oscar Wilde, that
consistency is one of the seven deadly virtues. Having busily activated
their swap accords with the Bundesbank over the past week to defend the
currency, they suddenly abandoned the attempt to maintain a fixed parity
with the Ecu. The markka saw an instant de facto devaluation of about 13 per
cent - its second devaluation in less than a year.
The Swedish central bank, meantime, was forced to raise its key marginal
lending rate by no less than 8 points to 24 per cent in order to cope with
the currency market pressure that followed the neighbouring country's
decision to float. Yet the two countries confront remarkably similar
economic problems, among them, debt deflation, negative growth and rising
unemployment. It follows that their respective exchange rate policies are
unlikely both to be right.
The striking feature of the Swedish response to recent economic events is
that it looks like a re-run of the 1930s in reverse. Then, Sweden escaped
from recession, as did Britain, through a policy of competitive devaluation.
It built on its success in the post-war period by developing a welfare state
that came to be regarded as the key component of a model social democracy.
Yet its present plight derives from having too much of these two good
things.
In the 1970s and 1980s public expenditure took a disproportionately large
share of gross domestic product, while devaluation failed to solve problems
of declining competitiveness. Subsequent difficulties have been compounded
by the 1980s credit boom which caused a property bubble.
Today Sweden shares with its Nordic neighbours the highest real rates of
interest in Europe and a lower rate of inflation than Germany. It is trying
to reduce a budget deficit now approaching 8 per cent of GDP. Yet the
present disinflationary policy of shadowing the Ecu is ill-designed to
permit a significant transfer of resources into the tradeable goods sector,
without which the economic growth that will make the public finances
manageable is unlikely to be forthcoming.
Against a background of debt deflation and weak labour markets, the
inflationary consequences of devaluation should not be too threatening,
provided a firm grip is kept on public spending. In the case of Finland,
which last year suffered a 6 1/2 per cent fall in GDP largely because of the
loss of trade with the former Soviet Union, higher prices will help in
distributing the resulting real income losses. Even if the Swedish
authorities are able to make modest reductions in nominal interest rates
before too long, it is hard to see how the deflationary impact of continuing
high real rates of interest will provide an escape from economic stagnation.
Nor will it do much to re-establish the credibility of the currency.
No doubt Sweden wishes to keep its options open in relation to the European
Community. But the cost is high and the message for others discouraging. The
flight from the krona after the Finnish float gives some indication of what
might hit sterling if the Italian Lira is the subject of a unilateral
downward realignment. And the failure of competitive disinflation to deliver
economic growth in Sweden is something that the British Treasury might also
ponder with profit.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4061</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIIBPAB0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920909
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  09 SEP 92 / Personal View: Not so super-unions
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By TONY COOPER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Membership of unions affiliated to the Trades Union Congress has fallen by
just over a third since 1979. The number of affiliated unions has fallen by
a slightly lower proportion. So the decline in the number of unions has not
quite kept pace with the decline in membership and is not the result of any
out-of-the-ordinary merger activity.
This position is about to change. With the creation of Unison from Nalgo,
Cohse and Nupe, the amalgamation of the AEU and Eetpu, and the rumours of an
eventual merger of the GMB and the TGWU, four union conglomerates - the
three mentioned plus MSF, the general technical union - would contain
two-thirds of the whole TUC-affiliated membership.
The assumption is that the remainder would then have little choice but to
join one of the big four, or amalgamate to create one or two further
super-unions or union federations. Is this inevitable or even desirable?
The added benefits to members claimed by super-union enthusiasts include
increased power and/or influence derived from numerical strength; economies
of scale; and the vague but important concept of industrial logic.
Power, in the sense of industrial muscle, has not been related to crude
numerical strength since the ban on secondary action. There may, however, be
a potential benefit in a more integrated membership within any one company
or industry. Trade union influence is more closely related to specific
industry expertise and the level of membership participation than to the
union's size.
Economies of scale are in theory possible in administration, negotiation,
and negotiation support such as research. The main potential administrative
benefit is often thought to be in membership records and distribution
systems. Rarely, however, is the capital outlay needed to bring together
different systems, hardware and software justified. Negotiation resources
can only be rationalised if there is considerable common membership within
industries and companies. Support services such as research consume a fairly
small proportion of union resources.
Economies of scale therefore may be small and largely dependent on the
concept of 'industrial logic'. Conversely, there may be significant losses
of benefit owing to increased size.
The essential difficulty is how to allocate resources efficiently, which is
a central, top-down function, while retaining democratic accountability,
which by its nature is bottom up. The universal response to this problem in
union mergers is the creation of a new set of organisational and committee
structures, the servicing of which may consume more resources than the
economies of scale realise. It is often particularly wasteful of scarce lay
representatives' time, leading to a concentration on internal debate rather
than talking to management or members.
There are three components to the concept of industrial logic: the existing
union interface within companies and industries; a similarity of interest
among members; and a similar union culture. It is, for instance, appallingly
difficult to bring together a union with a strong central organisation and
one with a loose federal structure.
The philosophy and strategy behind the creation of huge general unions
simply ignores all three of these components. This means that any economies
of scale are difficult to realise; may be swallowed by extra bureaucratic
costs in an attempt to reconcile the irreconcilable; and may lead to
alienation if members perceive themselves as small fish in a large pond that
they suspect is not relevant to themselves. Membership loyalty is likely to
be eroded, further diminishing any theoretical economies of scale.
If the decline in trade union membership is to be reversed, unions have to
be perceived by potential members as relevant and expert. This is more
likely to be achieved by specialist unions which, by nature of their
specialism, are seen to be relevant; can allocate resources both
democratically and rapidly because of limited competition for those
resources; do not expend too high a proportion of their resources on
internal bureaucracy; and can maintain a high level of professional,
industry-related expertise.
This is not to condemn union mergers, but to deny that they are inevitable
or desirable - unless clear criteria of industrial logic are met.
The author is general secretary of the Engineers' and Managers' Association.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4062</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIIBPABZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920909
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  09 SEP 92 / Leading Article: CBI economics
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
BEHIND the tough talk and smooth delivery, Mr Howard Davies had little new
to say to yesterday's session of the Trades Union Congress. As a leader of
the Confederation of British Industry, Mr Davies has made an energetic start
and it was a constructive move to visit Blackpool yesterday. But his speech
revealed that he has not entirely dispensed with the muddled economic ideas
which have weakened CBI pronouncements in recent years.
His predecessor's mistake was to argue from the general to the particular.
Yes, a country can afford to pay itself what it earns in increased
productivity. No, this is not a rule of thumb that individual companies
should follow. If they try, high productivity companies will merely force up
the overall rate of wage inflation, as they did in the late 1980s.
Mr Davies has taken the opposite route, from the particular to the general.
Yes, few British industrialists and exporters complain about the level of
the exchange rate. No, this does not prove that Britain is free of 'a
fundamental exchange rate problem', as Mr Davies claimed.
One reason exporters tend not to complain about the exchange rate is that
they are still in business. But there are too few of them left, as Mr Davies
himself pointed out. 'Manufacturing industry is now leaner and fitter than
it was a decade ago . . . but there isn't enough of it.'
That is why Britain still has a competitiveness problem. British employees,
be they workers, managers or directors, have been paying themselves too much
for decades. UK productivity growth outstripped the European competition in
the 1980s, but so did real wage growth. And British industry remains less
productive and less profitable than its competitors . . . as Mr Davies might
well have reminded the TUC.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4063</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIIBPABYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920909
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  09 SEP 92 / Foreign Affairs: The dangers of disorder - European
stability depends on integrating the east into a federal union built around
the EC
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By EDWARD MORTIMER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
It will not, we are told, be the end of the world if the French vote No to
European union. That is presumably true. But it is also true that the idea
of European union was not dreamt up for the fun of it. The Maastricht treaty
is an attempt to respond to the new situation in Europe created by the end
of the cold war - a situation full of hope, but also of unfamiliar danger.
The treaty is far from perfect, but no alternative has yet been offered. And
if Europe fails to respond at all, the results could be grim indeed.
In the former Yugoslavia the end of the cold war has already allowed the
outbreak of hot war, with thousands killed and some 2m people driven from
their homes. As Mr Jacques Attali, president of the European Bank for
Reconstruction and Development, warned on Monday, this 'may only be the
beginning' of ethnic wars throughout eastern Europe, unless western Europe
lives up to its responsibilities.
For centuries the main fear of European statesmen has been the deliberate
use of force by one state against another - especially by one powerful state
to establish domination over the rest. Now suddenly that threat has almost
disappeared. In its place has come the danger of a complete breakdown of
order on western Europe's periphery - an almost continuous zone of
instability stretching from the Arctic circle through eastern Europe, the
Balkans, the Middle East and along the Mediterranean's southern shore.
Why does anarchy on its borders threaten the comfortable existence of
western Europe? Perhaps the most direct threat is that of nuclear or
chemical fall-out, if unconventional weapons are used in the former Soviet
Union, or if the collapse of social discipline and political control leads
to a second Chernobyl.
More indirectly, the disintegration of the Red Army and of the Soviet
defence industries has greatly increased the danger of weapons
proliferation. It is putting more dangerous arms into the hands of dictators
or terrorist groups in the Middle East, and perhaps soon in the Balkans.
Next, in both eastern Europe and the Maghreb lack of security is pushing
more and more people to migrate westward or northward. Western Europe could
perhaps absorb them economically, making up for the decline in its own birth
rate, but not without straining its social and political structures to the
breaking point.
Finally, there is the risk that western powers may get sucked into other
people's quarrels, as former national frontiers dissolve and coalitions
spring up based on ethnic solidarity or on the old adage that 'my enemy's
enemy is my friend'. Already Greece and Turkey, both Nato members, have
formed axes with opposite sides in the Yugoslav conflict, with Greece
backing the Serbs and Turkey supporting the Albanians and Bosnian Moslems.
That is not an argument for west Europeans to turn their backs on Balkan
problems. It does mean they need to be very careful about the form of their
intervention. The worst mistake would be for different west European states
to identify with opposite sides in a local conflict - as nearly happened
with Germany backing the Croats and France the Serbs in the second half of
1991. That is precisely why the leaders of the European Community, at
Maastricht, felt it necessary to create a 'European Union' (EU), with a
common foreign and security policy (CFSP).
A new European security system will take years to assume a clear shape.
Europe faces a wide variety of security problems, and will have to deal with
them through a variety of institutions. At best there will be, in the words
of Nato's Rome Declaration last November, 'a framework of interlocking
institutions', in which Nato, the Conference on Security and Co-operation in
Europe (CSCE), the EC, the Western European Union (WEU) and the Council of
Europe will complement each other.
But Nato will continue to be seen, both by its members and from outside, as
a 'hard security' organisation, concerned mainly with defence against the
old type of threat. In the absence of a renewed east-west conflict it is
therefore unlikely to acquire a broader political role - unless it can
overcome its inhibitions about admitting new members, and thus extend its
security zone into eastern Europe, where it is most needed. If it does do
that, it could come to provide the hard security dimension which the CSCE
would otherwise lack.
The CSCE will be the main forum for discussing security concerns common to
Europe as a whole, with the participation of both the US and Russia. It has
come to represent the aspiration of the continent to achieve that 'just and
lasting peaceful order' (the official objective of Nato from 1967 onwards)
with the understanding - which since 1989 has become a consensus - that such
an order must be based on shared norms of democracy and human rights. For
the CSCE to help achieve this aim, it would need to improve and strengthen
its machinery not only for verifying arms control agreements but also for
the peaceful settlement of disputes, the protection of national minority
rights, the humane treatment of migrants and asylum-seekers, and possibly
also the provision of peacekeeping forces.
The establishment of such a stable and peaceful order in Europe presupposes
that Russia and the states associated with it must find their rightful place
in the wider world community. But those central and east European countries
which have no organic or permanent connection with Russia will inevitably
look westward for investment, markets, and political support. Germany, as
the country nearest them and the strongest economy in Europe, will be best
placed to provide all three. If only for historical reasons, it is much
preferable that these countries be associated with Germany in the context of
an integrated European union, rather than becoming mere satellites of a
dominant nation-state.
Such an integrated union can only be built around the EC. If the process of
west European integration continues, the EU, based on the present EC, should
emerge as the main political entity standing between the US and Russia. It
is likely to have a multi-tier or at least a multi-speed structure, with
initially only a hard core of members belonging to its monetary and defence
institutions - the latter being derived from the WEU.
A prime function of such a union, while consolidating the unity between its
original members, would be to facilitate the gradual integration of eastern
and central European countries into the west European market. This means, as
Mr Attali said, that the west European market must be opened now. A
secondary but important function would be to seek a more harmonious
relationship between its members and their southern neighbours, notably the
Maghreb countries.
In order to carry out both those functions effectively the EU would need,
among other things, a common immigration policy, based on the requirements
of its internal labour market and backed by appropriate housing and social
policies. A common immigration policy is unworkable unless it includes a
common policy on asylum for political refugees. The EU would, in any case,
need to co-ordinate the policing of its external frontiers.
Will a union capable of undertaking such a central role in European security
come about? It is far from certain. Even if the Maastricht treaty is
ratified, few people believe that it provides a definitive constitution for
a Community which now faces successive waves of enlargement. The union it
creates is a hybrid affair - part federal superstate, part intergovernmental
organisation. The problem of the 'democratic deficit' remains unsolved,
since many decisions are left in the hands of ministers or heads of
government who are accountable individually to their national parliaments
and electorates, but collectively to no body representing the European
electorate.
A common foreign policy is proclaimed, but the procedure set forth -
unanimity for deciding on 'joint action' and qualified majority voting for
follow-up decisions - seems designed to produce the maximum number of
conflicts of interpretation. More seriously, implementation of the policy is
left to the rotating presidency, 'assisted if need be by the previous and
next member state to hold the presidency'.
The European Commission - which already represents the EC in trade
negotiations, administers its foreign aid programmes, and maintains
'embassies' in a number of foreign capitals - is supposed to be 'fully
associated' in the tasks arising from the CFSP. But it is unlikely to be
given either the mandate or the staff to play the part of a foreign
ministry. A coherent foreign policy is not likely to emerge from this
mish-mash of disparate procedures and rival bureaucracies.
A credible European union, able to make the contribution to European
security outlined above, would need a more coherent structure. It is hard to
see how that structure can be other than federal in form, but this should
not mean that the union would inevitably encroach on the powers of its
member states in every domain. On the contrary, a federal constitution would
be one in which the powers of the union would be defined and circumscribed,
and those of the states protected by judicial power. The constitution would
be amendable only by a predetermined procedure requiring a very broad
consensus.
This is essential, because without it, the central power is liable to expand
until the peoples of Europe revolt against it, with the danger that they
would pull down the entire edifice in the process.
If no European union capable of responding to these challenges comes into
existence, nation-states would have to cope with them separately and will
almost inevitably come into conflict with each other. Among those
nation-states Germany would be the strongest, and the only way for other
states to avoid falling under Germany hegemony would be to band together, in
time-honoured fashion, as an anti-Germany alliance. But if Britain and
France formed such as alliance, it is hard to imagine that Germany would
long allow them the monopoly of nuclear weapons. Thus Europe would
experience, at best, a new balance of terror or, at worst, a downward slide
towards a new world war.
Edward Mortimer's Adelphi Paper, European Security after the Cold War, will
be published on Friday September 18, by Brassey's for the International
Institute of Strategic Studies. Pounds 9.50.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4064</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIIBPABXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920909
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  09 SEP 92 / Arts: Today's Television
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTOPHER DUNKLEY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Today's 'ScreenPlay', Continental Drift (9.00 BBC2) is, unusually, a
portmanteau production: three 20-minute dramas by new writers and directors,
all of them about the new Europe.
In 'Springing Lenin' Geraldine McEwan stars as an eccentric Scottish
spinster who hauls an unwanted statue of Lenin across the continent.
'Business With Friends' finds two members of the British extreme right
hob-nobbing with the German neo-Nazis.
'Can't Stop Me Dreaming' seems to have something to do with George Formby
and England's northern club circuit.
The story of the RAF aircrew shot down in their fighter-bomber over Iraq is
told in detail for the first time on television in Tornado Down (9.00 C4).
For a couple of days during the Gulf War, the bruised faces of John Peters
and John Nichol became the most familiar images in the world. Here they tell
their own story.
BBC1's documentary series Inside Story begins another run with an account of
a My-Lai type massacre said to have been carried out by the Scots Guards in
the Malayan jungle in 1948. (9.30 BBC1).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 17
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4065</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIIBPABWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920909
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  09 SEP 92 / Arts: Einstein on the Beach
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW CLARK
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
VERY 1970s, very American, very long and very different: Einstein on the
Beach is back on the road. This is the five-hour multi-media work which
established the international reputations of Philip Glass and Robert Wilson
after its premiere at the Avignon Festival in 1976.
It was revived with modified lighting and choreography at the Brooklyn
Academy of Music in 1984, and commercially recorded. It has now returned to
Europe at the start of a world tour, beginning with four performances at the
Frankfurt Opera House. There is still no sign of a British stage premiere.
The best that can be said of Einstein on the Beach is that it is an original
piece of theatre. Populist in appeal, polyglot in its sources and postmodern
in its quaintly experimental conservatism, it has been described by its
authors as an opera - but it is no such thing. There is no story or drama,
and no solo singing (apart from one short, wordless offstage soprano). It is
more a carefully-wrought collage of pantomimes, dream-associations, nonsense
recitations and meditations - all variations on the theme of Einstein,
father of the atom bomb.
The work is divided into four acts, each framed by a 'knee-play' (which you
or I would be content to call a mimed interlude or point of junction).
Einstein is pictured as a boy observing a steam locomotive, as a young man
compulsively writing scientific formulas, on honeymoon with his wife and as
an isolated old man with the familiar shock of hair, gently playing his
violin.
Sometimes he is pictured simultaneously in more than one incarnation - but
always in the same braces, white shirt and baggy trousers.
There are surreal trial scenes which bring back the spectre of Galileo, and
two fluently-patterned ballets - apparently meant to represent Einstein's
'unified field' theory of physical forces.
Other images include clocks and watches, a spaceship and a nuclear cloud
signifying the holocaust. Then, before the final 'knee-play', we are left
with the sentimental picture of a couple declaring eternal love.
The piece depends as much on Wilson's trademark language of movement and
lighting as it does on Glass's music, which rates as little more than
background accompaniment, lulling the listener into a kind of stupor.
The principles of Glass's cell-like structures need no elucidation here: as
with the banal Supermarket Text in Act 3 (like a needle stuck in the
groove), they have a cumulative effect through repetition.
The score, played by seven members of Glass's own ensemble using amplified
sound, recalls 1970s rock in the louder synthesiser passages (echoes of King
Crimson and the Yes Album), and includes some haunting motifs, such as a
five-note sequence for electric organ.
As the evening advances, the music becomes marginally less constricted:
Einstein's violin is allowed a simple set of variations, and the saxophone
is unexpectedly expressive in the industrial laboratory scene of Act 4,
albeit against the background of a monotonous curdle.
Wilson's clear-cut representational decor, heavily stylised in the
comic-bizarre court scenes, is simple and attractive. The attention to
detail and quality of timing among a large cast of dancers, actors and
chorus-singers is impressive, especially in view of the unbroken time-span
of the performance.
The most engaging aspect of all is Lucinda Childs' elegant choreography, and
her own brilliantly controlled acting and declamation.
It is easy to see why Einstein appeals to a wide public: it does not require
preparation, understanding or concentration. During the performance, you can
slip out for a drink and a sandwich - the work actually encourages you to
switch off for a while - and when you return, there is a good chance you
will be watching the same sequence as when you left.
The Frankfurt audience entered into the spirit of the piece, but seemed not
quite bowled over at the end. Perhaps Einstein deserves to be seen in a less
traditional theatre. Perhaps its authors should have allowed scope for
improvisation or even audience participation. Perhaps it is already a little
dated. Certainly some of the claims made at its 1984 revival - likening it
to a Wagnerian Gesamtkunstwerk which 'defines the consciousness of an epoch'
 -seem overblown.
Einstein still has some novelty value, it may well be a seminal work for
late 20th century American culture, but it offers limited scope for
interpretation and smacks of pretentiousness. I found the time went by
quickly enough, but I won't be rushing back for more.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 17
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4066</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIIBPABVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920909
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  09 SEP 92 / Arts: Jacob's Pillow Dance Festival
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID VAUGHAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IN 1930 Ted Shawn, husband and partner of the modern dance pioneer Ruth St
Denis, bought an 18th century farm called Jacob's Pillow near Lee,
Massachusetts, as a summer home for his company of male dancers. After the
group disbanded in the early Forties, the Jacob's Pillow Dance Festival was
inaugurated there.
A barn on the property served both as studio and theatre. Antony Tudor
choreographed much of his great ballet Pillar of Fire in another barn. In
1952, a new theatre was built.
Under Shawn's direction, programmes typically used to consist of one ballet
number, one modern, and one 'ethnic', but whole evenings were often devoted
to important visiting companies, such as the group of soloists from the
Royal Danish Ballet and Ballet Rambert.
Under the direction of Liz Thompson from 1979 to 1990, and since then of
Samuel Miller, the festival and summer school have continued to expand.
Special courses and conferences are held; new dances have been commissioned
from leading choreographers; companies are invited to be in residence to
develop new works. Performances now take place in three different spaces and
the main theatre has been enlarged over the last two seasons.
Earlier this summer, I saw the Mark Morris Dance Group, regular visitors, in
substantially the same mixed bill as they presented at the Edinburgh
Festival.
On a more recent weekend, I saw a new ballet company, Ballet de Ville,
directed by Peter Anastos. At that stage it was an ad hoc group led by
dancers from other companies, with a corps de ballet that included advanced
students in the Pillow's Ballet Repertory Project, several of them from
Russia. The novelty in the programme was a recreation of The Awakening of
Flora, first choreographed by Marius Petipa and Lev Ivanov in the summer of
1893.
The ballet was a favourite of Anna Pavlova, who appeared as Aurora in the
first performance, succeeded Kshessinskaya in the title role in 1900, and
revived the piece several times with her own company.
Anastos's pastiche fell between the stools of the kind of parody he used to
choreograph for the Ballets Trockadero de Monte Carlo and a serious attempt
at reconstruction. His statements beforehand suggested the latter, but the
performance tended toward the former, though with less sense of style than
the Trocks had.
The uncertainty of tone may be the fault of the principals, who clearly did
not believe in the material, unlike Nina Avramenko, one of the Russian
coryphees, whose sweet soulfulness struck exactly the right note.
The following week, Garth Fagan Dance presented Fagan's Griot New York,
which opened at the Brooklyn Academy of Music's 'Next Wave' Festival in
December last year and has since been seen at the Vienna Festival, among
other places.
On the smaller stage of the Ted Shawn Theatre, the work loses none of its
power, though one misses the live music of Wynton Marsalis and his Septet,
heard here in a recording. The third collaborator is the distinguished
American sculptor Martin Puryear, whose sets, consisting of oversized
objects and implements and architectural forms in forced perspective, add
their own metaphorical weight to the piece.
'Griot' is a West African word meaning 'storyteller,' but this is not a
narrative piece. Rather, it is a series of pictures of life in the city
today, focusing now on individuals, now on the group. It begins with a dance
of courtship by Natalie Rogers and Norwood Pennewell, matching each other's
virtuosity step for step. A later duet by Pennewell and Valentina Alexander
translates a lovers' duet into interlocking arcs and angles.
There is a mysterious nocturne peopled by black-clad figures; the second
half begins with a Goyaesque scene of despair set in some modern bedlam. The
message is not all pessimistic; the piece ends with a joyous celebration of
irrepressible urban energy.
In a recurrent movement motif, the dancers balance with one foot drawn up to
the other knee, the torso arched back. Griot New York is thrillingly danced
by Fagan's superb company, whose commitment to the work is palpable and
deeply moving.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 17
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4067</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIIBPABUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920909
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  09 SEP 92 / Arts: Of clothes and shows - Television
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTOPHER DUNKLEY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
AMID the general passion for denigrating television, we should try to break
the habit of judging the medium solely in terms of its populist worst, while
judging other things - painting, music, landscape, the novel, clothing,
sculpture, virtually everything but television - by its best. When did you
last see an article heaping contempt upon the clothing industry because of
the poor style and shoddy materials of cheap mass-produced clothes? Never,
probably. Yet those are the clothes that sell in the largest numbers, which
get the biggest 'ratings'.
Whatever their popularity, we disregard them and talk among ourselves about
Barbour jackets, Cheaney shoes, and Keturah Brown knickers. Why are so many
people so ready to use Eldorado, You've Been Framed, and Treasure Hunt as
sticks with which to beat television, when they would never dream of using
Woolworth's trainers or Co-op jeans as sticks with which to beat the British
clothing business?
Suggest that it would be a crime not to repeat such magnificent programmes
as those in BBC2's 'Alan Bennett Season' - the final sequence of An
Englishman Abroad with Burgess striding across the bridge in his finery,
earning an incredulous double-take from a Russian sailor, while Gilbert and
Sullivan swell on the soundtrack, is near perfect, and Thora Hird's
performance in A Cream Cracker Under The Settee is so powerful, that when I
went to lay it down on tape and watched the first two minutes, I was hooked
until the end even though I had seen it before - and people will murmur
grudging agreement before harking back to Eldorado and the ghastliness of
Jeremy Beadle.
It is as though you were trying to talk about Burberrys while your
colleagues will only pour scorn upon tricel blouses from Tesco. But is the
analogy fair? Surely the proportion of good material on television is
nowhere near as great as the proportion of good products in the British
clothing industry?
This is, of course, a morass of subjectivity, but my guess is that the
proportions are just about the same, as they probably are in print or
prepared food. The point is, that with the amount of television now on
offer, and video recorders in almost 90 per cent of homes, there is, even in
the supposedly dreary depths of summer, more worthwhile television available
than any normal person could get through.
Have you been watching Video Diaries on BBC2? Admittedly this week's was an
embarrassing example of the excesses of America's Me Generation ('Enough
about me, let's talk about you; what do you think about me?'). However,
others in the series have been startlingly successful.
In particular the programme made by an Albanian doctor, Ylli Hasani, was
agonising, eye-opening, funny and utterly unforgettable. It seems
astonishing that an amateur using a borrowed video camera should be able to
reveal more about the true state of one of the former communist countries of
eastern Europe than all the professionals, but here was vivid proof.
It is odd to have to say so, but Hasani's picture was more appalling than
that presented by dramatist Andrew Davies and director David Tucker in A
Very Polish Practice which opened a new season of BBC1's 'Screen One' on
Sunday. Davies is of course the man who brought us that acid-laced cocktail
of humour and sly social observation, A Very Peculiar Practice. Having
married Dr Daker to 'nasty girl' Grete, and moved the two of them to Warsaw,
Davies transferred his beady eye to Poland and had terrible fun at the
expense of the old apparatchiks, the new entrepreneurs (mostly one and the
same) and, thank goodness, that monster of English xenophobia and reaction,
Bob Buzzard.
Perhaps some viewers imagine that drama as strong and idiosyncratic as this
crops up throughout world television; if so, they are wrong. It is similarly
rare in other countries to find documentaries as intensely felt as Ron
Peck's Fighters, a long and engrossing account of young boxers from London's
East End.
Like a remarkably large number of other recent non-fiction programmes, this
one clearly expressed the views of its maker; there was no 'on the one hand,
on the other hand' about this, no attempt to include the abolitionist line.
Here was a boxing programme by a boxing fan, and the sea change which seems
to be producing so many opinionated programmes of this sort is something we
shall need to return to in a later column.
That was on Channel 4, as is the series Nomads, which began last Thursday
with a memorable account of life among the Moors in the western Sahara. In
no other anthropological programme (except the magnificent Baka: People Of
The Rainforest where it played a small part, I seem to remember) has there
been such a fascinating illustration of the universal tendency for wives to
threaten to go home to mother if husbands don't buck their ideas up.
After years of watching television anthropologists treat their subjects like
Meissen china, it was heartening to find here the same sort of robust
attitude that you would expect if the subjects were Welsh miners.
Traveller, wine drinker and sometime cook, Keith Floyd, is now a familiar
figure, but Floyd On Spain on BBC2 on Tuesdays is probably his best series
yet. He seems to have resisted the temptation to become The Compleat TV
Show-off and is, so far as one can tell, being himself, as he enthuses over
fish, landscape, women, wine, or a marvellous cooking club for men. The gap
between this and Fanny Cradock's Kitchen Magic in 1955 feels like more than
a single generation. There is incomparably more entertainment in Floyd's
programmes.
Arts enthusiasts are being offered Live From The Proms on BBC2, which
recently showed not only Tchaikovsky's 'Manfred' symphony (you can spend a
long time in concert halls without hearing that), but also an elegant
interval film about the St Petersburg Philharmonic and how life has changed
for the musicians as Leningrad has reverted to its old name and the
'totalitarian' conductor Mransky has been succeeded by the 'democrat'
Temirkanov.
Better still, and also on BBC2, Dancemakers offered a profile of
choreographer Jonathan Burrows, whose work I should have known about but did
not. What we saw was almost all fast and vigorous (can he do slow and
lyrical?) but above all - and this point was virtually ignored by Ross
MacGibbon's programme, good though it was in other ways  - very funny. Funny
choreographers are rare enough, so it is good to be introduced to one by
television.
And there is more, much more. On Friday, BBC1 launched what looks like being
the best police series for years, Between The Lines, which has the
authenticity of The Bill, some of the fast action which has been missing
since The Sweeney, and that frisson that comes with the suspicion that a
series has a little devil in it. This time the devil appeals to the
widespread belief that police malpractice should be investigated by somebody
other than the police themselves, this series being about an internal
investigation unit.
Finally, on Tuesdays, BBC2 has a series which seems to be aimed straight at
FT readers: The John Bull Business, another current affairs series which
abandons the old fence-straddling posture in favour of a far more critical
stance which is both surprising and informative for a non-specialist. This,
too, we should perhaps return to.
Of course there is an awful lot of rubbish on television, just as there is
an awful lot of rubbish in every library and every supermarket. Yet we do
not perpetually condemn the entire world of books as 'Rubbish, not a thing
to read', nor the collective output of the food industry as 'Rubbish, not a
thing to eat'. So why are such different rules applied to television?
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 17
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4068</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIIBPABTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920909
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  09 SEP 92 / Management: Tying the knot in red tape - Top managers have
been queueing up for jobs in Britain's Civil Service
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN WILLMAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Who would want a top management job in the Civil Service? Long hours, poor
rewards, excessive red tape and always in the public eye. You get the blame
when things go wrong but ministers steal your thunder when it's a success.
The answer is - perhaps surprisingly - that top managers are queueing up to
run the new executive agencies which are responsible for key government
services such as the payment of social security benefits and high-tech
defence research.
Most of the 81 chief executive posts have been opened to outside
competition, and almost a third of the new agencies are headed by people
from outside the Civil Service.
It certainly is not the salary that attracts them. The highest-paid agency
chief executive is John Chisholm, head of the Defence Research Agency, who
earns Pounds 140,000 a year.
While this is rather more than the Pounds 108,940 earned by Sir Robin
Butler, the head of the Civil Service, it is in the lower division by the
standards of the electronics industry whence he came.
The rewards come in other forms: for Chisholm, it was the prospect of
'leaving my footsteps in the sand' which lured him away from the private
sector.
There he had built CAP Scientific from a standing start to a company
employing 1,200 staff which had then merged with the French company Sema
Metra to form a 7,500-strong European computing services group.
Addicted to change management, Chisholm was intrigued by the size of the
Defence Research Agency job, which involved merging four armed forces
research wings into a single 12,000-strong organisation capable of providing
scientific and technical services to the defence ministry.
He also cites the importance of the job: 'The defence of the nation depends
to an important extent on the services of the DRA, which makes it a very
different task from making confectionery.'
Recruits from the private sector such as Chisholm remain rare in the Civil
Service. More commonly, the new agency chiefs come from other parts of the
public sector.
Michael Bichard, for example, spent 21 years in local government before
becoming head of the Benefits Agency, responsible for paying out social
security benefits worth more than Pounds 52bn each year.
After six years as chief executive of the London borough of Brent and four
years running Gloucestershire county council, Bichard felt that his
experience of managing local council services gave him the skills to help
the Benefits Agency offer a better service to its 20m customers, many of
whom depended on it for survival.
He also had invaluable experience in dealing with politicians, not least
from his spell at Brent, a council closely associated with the epithet
'loony'.
'If you can survive in the politics of Brent, you can survive anywhere,'
says Bichard.
Working in a political environment requires skill, plus understanding of the
needs of politicians who face different pressures to those on managers.
'Many people think that the politics is a bit tacky. But the real fun of
working in the public sector is understanding the political process and what
makes politicians tick.'
Another source of new managerial talent has been the National Health
Service, which began its management revolution in the early 1980s.
Ros Hepplewhite, one of the first NHS general managers, is chief executive
of the Child Support Agency which from next year will ensure that
single-parent families are supported by their absent partners.
She also brings experience of the voluntary sector, having been director of
Mind, the National Association for Mental Health, before joining the new
agency.
Like Chisholm, Hepplewhite was attracted by the prospect of building
something new. Her agency next year takes over work on maintenance
previously done by the social security department, the courts and family
solicitors, with quasi-judicial functions in addition to its more
straightforward money transfer functions.
She must recruit 5,000 staff, set up three different computer systems, open
450 offices and establish new procedures. She places customer satisfaction
at the top of her priorities.
'Our aim is to achieve a result - an amount of money passing between two
adults for as long as 16 years. If we can establish a good relationship with
our customers, it will help us win their co-operation in what is a delicate
matter, without having always to resort to our powers.
'Only a third of lone parents receive support from the missing parent at
present. If we offer courteous, prompt and accurate customer service, that
proportion can be increased very rapidly.'
Bichard is also fluent in the language of customer satisfaction. He has
launched a programme to make the agency's 470 benefit offices more
customer-friendly and accessible. Front-desk staff now wear name badges and
the corporate uniform; they are also trained to give claimants information
on the whole range of benefits and even to advise them on which benefit to
go for.
Central to his strategy is empowering managers to create a 'bias for action'
 -a high-risk strategy in a sensitive area such as benefits payments: if
customers in one part of the country are treated differently from those in
another, the politicians will soon be breathing down the agency's neck.
Bichard sees it as an important element of his job to convince ministers
that the risk that something will go wrong - which is smaller than many fear
 -must be weighed against the greatly improved service which newly empowered
managers can offer to customers.
The Defence Research Agency may not have customers in the street in the same
way as the Benefits Agency.
But Chisholm is well aware that it must become much more responsive to the
civil servants in the Ministry of Defence who buy its advice and consultancy
and will soon be free to shop around.
That means moving the DRA away from the traditional Civil Service model of
rationing out services in line with priorities decided in Whitehall.
'When I came to the DRA, we were seen as being the organisation which said
no,' he says. 'The challenge is to turn the whole organisation upside down,
so that it is the customer who decides what is needed, and managers are
empowered to meet those needs.'
Chisholm has no regrets about his move into the Civil Service (though on his
last day in the private sector, he felt he was making the worst mistake of
his life as he signed 17 letters of resignation from various boards he sat
on).
Interestingly, he feels less constrained by outside pressures working in the
Civil Service than when he was at the head of a public company.
'In a plc, you are at the whim of two masters: the customers and the capital
markets.
'You are constrained by the expectations of the shareholders, with life
focused very much on the next half year's results, cash constraints as well
as what you can achieve in the market place. In an agency, the main priority
is to satisfy the customer.'
The biggest 'shock to the system' for Bichard was the number of generalists
in the Civil Service: the world of local government is dominated by
professionals such as lawyers, architects, educationalists and so on.
One of his early moves at the Benefits Agency was to bring in an accountant
as finance director, an estates manager and a training manager.
For Hepplewhite, it was the immense speed at which things must be done in
Whitehall that she noticed as the biggest change. 'Although I probably
worked longer hours in the voluntary sector, the pace was much less
intensive. But I am enjoying every moment at the Child Support Agency - it
is a wonderful opportunity to get it right,' she says.
And so long as the Civil Service can offer such benefits to its top
managers, it should have no difficulty in attracting excellent people from
outside its ranks.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 14
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4069</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIIBPABSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920909
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  09 SEP 92 / Management: What are you going to tell the troops? / A look
at the development of team briefings
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID GOODHART
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Do team briefings achieve anything? Briefings, one of the personnel
management fads of the 1980s, are supposed to inform employees of what is
happening in their companies in the hope of increasing their commitment.
Nobody knows how many UK employees are covered by team briefings - one
recent survey estimated that 55 per cent of UK companies practice briefing
employees while another put the figure at 36 per cent.
But it seems that the number (estimated at 4m in the late 1980s) is steadily
increasing, especially in financial services and retailing. The chances are
that if your local store opens half an hour later once a week for 'staff
training', the employees are in fact being briefed.
The Industrial Society was one of the pioneers of team briefings in the
early 1980s.
Its original team briefing advice described a top-downwards, face-to-face,
monthly communication session in which a manager addresses groups of four to
15 people for a maximum of 30 minutes.
The Society originally promoted the team briefing by saying it was a
technique modelled on the way the Roman army briefed troops before a battle.
That approach, according to consultant Andrew Lambert, is badly out of date.
Employees, he says, resent not being able to give their own views and often
find that the information they are being fed is irrelevant or old hat.
Lambert's own consultancy recently found that of 87 companies surveyed about
their team briefings, nearly 40 per cent had no 'feed-back' mechanism for
employees' views and only 29 per cent formally monitored the effectiveness
of their briefing system.
Recent survey evidence of employee attitudes also suggests that most are
left unmoved by team briefings.
A survey of 700 employees by the Manchester School of Management found that
81 per cent of respondents thought briefings either left unchanged (77 per
cent) or decreased (4 per cent) their commitment to the organisation.
Defenders of the system point to the fact that the same survey shows that 59
per cent of respondents at least felt better informed about their companies
as a result of briefings.
But that means briefings are still failing merely to inform more than a
third of employees.
The Industrial Society, and most other team briefing specialists, now say
that if briefings are to be of greater use, they should be less one-way,
both to satisfy employees' desire to complain or contribute and to use
employees' knowledge.
David Trevor, currently advising the Regional Railways division of British
Rail on its briefing system for 30,000 staff, says that the system has
recently been spreading most rapidly in the public sector and the privatised
utilities, partly to keep employees abreast of the huge changes these
organisations have been undergoing.
That, he believes, could encourage the trend towards more two-way briefing,
thanks to the relatively strong union traditions in the public sector and
the commitment to an employee voice.
The traditional, top-down briefing, is still dominant in manufacturing but
one of the UK models for two-way briefings is now the British Aerospace
military aircraft division.
Even British Aerospace has not yet gone as far as the US company which
conducts briefings by lap-top computer, and allows staff to make criticisms
or suggestions anonymously.
To make more mundane team briefings work better, the key, all the experts
agree, is for companies to be clear about what they want from the briefings.
Even if the aim is the limited one of simply informing staff of corporate
developments, the briefing must be well structured and relevant and must not
be beaten by the grapevine.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 14
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4070</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIIBPABRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920909
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  09 SEP 92 / Jobs: How to be an ever efficient worker - Evidence that
vocation does not mix well with vacation, nor even with intermediary
ingestion
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL DIXON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
'AM I contaminating you?', asked the Jobs column, just back at work from
four weeks' leave. 'H'm,' said its partner Bill Hall, without looking up. 'I
ask in the cause of serious scientific inquiry,' I persisted. 'H'm,' he
replied, continuing to peer at his screen.
What prompted my query was Diane Summers's report in last Thursday's FT on
research by the Cedar International consultancy into the way holidays affect
productivity. The broad finding - that the effects are dire - will of course
be no surprise to anybody. But how dire they are came as a bit of an
eye-opener.
The productivity-dip is evidently so bad that for every working day we have
off, our employer in effect loses two. Moreover, while it startled me, that
estimate seemed perfectly plausible to psychologist Cary Cooper of
University of Manchester Institute of Science and Technology. 'There's a
sort of holiday infection that contaminates everyone around the person who
has been away,' he explained.
Hence my question to my partner. After all, if I was contaminating him, the
best way to reduce the productivity damage would surely be for me to go on
holiday again until his next break was due. Alas to judge by the response,
far from being infected, he hadn't even registered that I was back.
Whereupon I lapsed into silent contemplation of another of Professor
Cooper's ideas. It's that we would do well to stop having a long holiday
once a year and instead take shorter breaks more often. The result, he
thinks, would be less preoccupation with preparations beforehand and less
rustiness afterwards. So the cost in lost productivity to our employers
would be lower while we'd be just as well recuperated.
Well, while that's perhaps so in broad terms, personal experience again
rebuts it. Whatever lengths of holiday the Jobs column has taken - ranging
from three days to six weeks - the productivity losses have been much the
same, and the recuperative effects barely if at all detectable.
But, as a one-man sample is no test of any hypothesis, I raked through the
paper mountain that used to be my desk seeking research on shorter holidays.
Unfortunately, the only example I could find concerns an extremely short one
(although some make it last far longer than others): namely, the
lunch-break.
It crops up in an article by Peter Wright of Edinburgh University in the
British Psychological Society's latest journal. Here is Dr Wright's account
of various researchers' findings on the effects of lunch-breaks on
productivity.
'Errors of shift workers show a sharp increase at 2pm as do instances of
falling asleep at the driving wheel and other measures of driving efficiency
. . . . Blake (1971) reported a performance de-crement after lunch on a wide
range of tasks - signal detection in a vigilance task, mental arithmetic,
disjunctive reaction time, and card sorting.'
Then, for good measure, he adds a stomach-churner (which I've italicised):
'Craig (1986) found a clear post-lunch dip in efficiency of detecting
sensory events, but no change in performance when food was not consumed.'
So it seems that, if efficiency's the aim, we should not only take shorter
holidays, but stop eating between work-stints to boot.
HAPPILY another kind of hunger - the jobs-famine - is at least slightly
eased by a post in Abu Dhabi offered by recruiter Andrew Duncan for an
international investment concern. Being unable to name it, he promises to
abide by any applicant's request not to be identified to his client at this
stage.
He seeks an information technology specialist to take charge of systems
development. So candidates need management skills besides full technical
knowledge of IT applications outside as well as in the investment field.
Salary about Pounds 75,000 tax-free. Family housing among other typical
expatriate perks.
Inquiries to Andrew Duncan Associates, Oxford House, Oxford Rd East,
Windsor, Berkshire SL4 1EF; telephone 0753 832144, fax 0753 832166.
NOW to the underlying table giving a selection of the latest indicators of
world-wide living costs compiled by P-E International management
consultants. Anyone wanting the full survey, which covers many more places
than the 60 I've included and costs Pounds 310, should contact P-E's Simon
McBride at Park House, Wick Rd, Egham, Surrey TW20 0HW; tel 0784 434411, fax
0784 471404.
The cost indices all refer to specific cities instead of countries as a
whole, and are based on prices in London at 100. Alas, owing to problems in
devising an internationally consistent measure of housing costs, they are
omitted.
Another snag is that, since such surveys are time-consuming exercises, the
findings are not bang up to date. The price-levels reflected by the index
figures are those which prevailed last April. Even so, the inflation rates
are the latest available, and the indices are calculated at the exchange
rates in force on August 31.
To update for subsequent changes, take the exchange rate in the table,
divide it by the later rate, and multiply the result by the table's index
figure.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 11
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4071</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIIBPABQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920909
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  09 SEP 92 / Pounding home a Euro-message: Scottish views of monetary
union
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID MARSH
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE SCOTS are providing a special stimulus to the increasingly stormy debate
about Europe's future.
The Royal Bank of Scotland, one of the three Scottish note-issuing banks,
will produce a special European issue of 2m Pounds 1 banknotes to coincide
with the EC's summit in Edinburgh on December 8.
The banknotes, adorned with the EC's 12-star symbol and depicting the Palace
of Holyroodhouse where the summit will be held, are aimed at familiarising
people with the idea of a European currency in their pockets.
The Royal Bank hopes uncertainty about the plan for economic and monetary
union (Emu) will be swept away by a 'yes' vote in this month's French
referendum on the Maastricht treaty.
If all goes well by the time of the December summit a few of the
lower-numbered notes - starting with EC 0000001 - are likely to end up as
commemorative gifts for visiting EC heads of government.
Lord Younger, the Royal Bank chairman, has been dipping into the history
books to make a separate point about the design of European banknotes if Emu
one day became a reality.
For about a century after political and monetary union between England and
Scotland in 1707 one pound sterling banknotes north of the border carried
the inscription that they were equivalent to 12 pounds Scots.
Lord Younger has been presenting EC Commissioners with facsimiles of
200-year-old Scottish banknotes to show how future European notes could
carry the names both of the prospective single European currency and of the
old national units.
If the Community really wanted to ease popular misgivings about the
abandonment of francs, pounds and D-Marks then, the Royal Bank chairman
suggests, it could copy this ancient example.
Scottish history since 1707 explains why the Scots' perspective on Emu is
different from that of the English. Scottish interest rates have been set
for nearly three centuries to meet the economic conditions of the south-east
of England, so Scottish people have far fewer reservations about monetary
sovereignty.
Scots bankers and academics often express surprise at English reluctance to
see the powers of the Treasury and Bank of England transferred to an
independent European central bank. 'Why do the English regard an
inflation-ridden currency like the pound as such a symbol of national
sovereignty?' is a commonly-heard question.
But, being possessed of almost Bundesbank-like hard-headedness, they are
likely to add a stricture on the difficulties lying along the route to a
single European currency.
Prof Donald MacKay of Pieda, the Edinburgh economic consultants, draws
parallels between the 1707 monetary union and the one being considered today
for the whole of Europe.
In both cases, he says, a primary economic motivation was to seek access to
growing markets. But Prof MacKay also sees a notable difference.
In Scotland's monetary and political union with England loss of Scottish
economic policy sovereignty was balanced by access to British tax revenues.
Europe's monetary union proposals contain no matching plans for political
union.
This means there is no corresponding means for redistributing revenues from
richer to poorer countries, a mechanism which, Prof MacKay says, would be
necessary to compensate lower-productivity countries for the loss of
economic flexibility caused by irrevocably fixing exchange rates.
Since the EC is unlikely to be able to agree a method for channelling funds
from German taxpayers to the rest of Europe, Prof MacKay believes plans for
Emu face 'a big political problem'.
This, of course, is exactly the conclusion drawn by the Bundesbank.
A visitor to Edinburgh's banking parlours hears much talk about Emu. But a
more pressing Euro-topic is whether the country will inevitably lose as a
result of a shift to the south and east in the Community's gravitational
centre.
Until four months ago many moderate Scots could support the idea of a
Scottish parliament dealing directly with a strengthened European executive
in Brussels at the centre of an enlarged Community. The general election
result on April 9 ruled this out.
As Prof William Paterson of Edinburgh University's Europa Institute points
out, two scenarios in vogue at the beginning of the year - Scottish
devolution and Maastricht-style European federation - have 'taken a pretty
hard knock on the head'.
Mr Robin Angus, a director at stockbrokers County NatWest Securities in
Edinburgh and an SNP supporter, says the issue of Scottish independence is
'dead for a generation'.
Mr Hamish Morrison, chief executive of the Scottish Council Development and
Industry, an independent organisation which has been promoting Scottish
industrial development for 60 years, says it is 'inevitable' that Scotland's
share of total foreign investment in Europe will fall in coming years.
The Scottish Council has been suggesting ways of attracting more EC regional
funds to compensate for the country's peripheral position.
The council would like to exploit the UK's present enthusiasm for
'subsidiarity' - decision-making at the lowest level of government - by
persuading London to give Scottish institutions more say in distributing EC
funds.
While affirming his opposition to full-scale devolution, Mr John Major has
recently promised to 'take stock' of greater pressures for self-government
in Scotland.
Mr Major does not have it within his power to distribute Europeanised pound
notes. But if he was looking for ways of boosting his popularity north of
the border, he might be well advised to listen to the Scottish Council's
proposals in the run up to the Edinburgh summit.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4072</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIIBPABPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920909
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  09 SEP 92 / Escort re-launched after only two years
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN GRIFFITHS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
FORD will today unveil heavily-revised versions of its Escort/Orion car
range just two years after the previous generation was launched at a cost of
Pounds 1bn.
The exercise, which Ford acknowledged yesterday involved further
'substantial' investment, follows sharp criticism - mainly in the UK - of
the styling and other aspects of the cars at their orig-inal launch in
October 1990.
Mr Ian McAllister, chairman of Ford of Britain, said: 'We listened to what
was being said about the last versions of the cars, married these comments
with our own on-going (development) programme and introduced changes.'
Ford insisted that the most extensive - and expensive - changes involved
re-engineering to improve crash protection and other beneath-the-skin
specifications.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4073</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIIBPABOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920909
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  09 SEP 92 / Toyota opens engine plant
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KEVIN DONE, Motor Industry Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
TOYOTA of Japan yesterday started production at its Pounds 140m engine plant
at Deeside, north Wales - the first of a wave of Japanese automotive plants
due to be commissioned in Europe by the end of the year.
Toyota is building up to a production rate of 200,000 engines a year at
Deeside - its first wholly-owned production plant in Europe - by the second
half of the 1990s. Output in the first phase is set to reach 100,000 a year
by 1995.
The engines will be supplied to the company's Pounds 700m car assembly plant
at Burnaston, near Derby, which starts production in December.
Toyota said the 1,500 engines to be produced at Deeside by the end of this
year would be shipped to Japan for cars being exported to Europe.
Output of 25,000 1.6 litre petrol engines is planned at Deeside next year
for supply to the Burnaston car plant. A 2-litre petrol engine is expected
to be added in the second phase.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4074</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIIBPABNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920909
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  09 SEP 92 / Sales of commercial vehicles rise 9.5%
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KEVIN DONE, Motor Industry Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
UK SALES of new commercial vehicles were 9.5 per cent higher in August
compared with August last year, halting the decline that has seen the
commercial vehicle sector suffer its steepest slide into recession in the
post-war period.
New commercial vehicle registrations rose to 31,704 from 28,946 in August
1991, according to figures from the Society of Motor and Manufacturers and
Traders.
This was the second monthly year-on-year increase in the last three months.
The tentative sign of recovery from a very low level follows a period in
which demand weakened for 32 consecutive months up to the end of May.
Higher sales than a year ago were achieved in all the main sectors of the
industry last month for the first time since the steep decline started in
the last quarter of 1989.
New truck registrations (above 3.5 tonnes gross vehicle weight) rose 7.3 per
cent in August to 4,097. Sales of medium vans, such as the Ford Transit and
the Volkswagen Transporter, rose 22 per cent year-on-year to 15,156.
Sales of small vans, such as the Ford Escort and Vauxhall Astra car-derived
vans, showed a 1.2 per cent rise, while registrations of buses and coaches
rose 12.9 per cent to 184.
Truck sales were higher than a year ago for the second successive month,
following a year-on-year increase of 6.7 per cent in July. The truck sector
has been hardest hit during the recession with sales at the lowest level
since 1954.
Commercial vehicle sales of 142,098 in the first eight months of the year
were still 6 per cent below the very depressed level of a year ago.
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
         UK COMMERCIAL VEHICLE REGISTRATIONS JANUARY-AUGUST 1992
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
                              Volume   Volume     Share (%)  Share (%)
                             (Units) Change (%)  Jan-Aug 92  Jan-Aug 91
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Total Market*                142,098    -6.0        100.0      100.0
Imports                       50,960    -5.3         35.9       35.6
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Small vans (up to 1.8 tonnes)
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Total                         44,812    -7.5        100.0      100.0
Imports                        9,971   +15.7         22.3       17.8
Ford                          19,355    -9.3         43.2       44.1
Vauxhall (General Motors)     14,820    +9.6         33.1       27.9
Rover (British Aerospace)      3,288   -40.7          7.3       11.4
Peugeot incl. Citroen          2,468    -5.3          5.5        5.4
Renault                        1,992    +6.4          4.5        3.9
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Medium vans &amp; pick-ups (1.81-3.5 tonnes)
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Total                         64,314    -4.1        100.0      100.0
Imports                       25,182    -9.8         39.2       41.6
Ford                          29,383    -0.9         45.7       44.2
Leyland DAF (DAF)              9,656    +5.4         15.0       13.7
Volkswagen                     4,040   +15.3          6.3        5.2
Renault***                     3,521    -7.8          5.5        5.7
Mercedes-Benz (Daimler-Benz)   3,221   -13.3          5.0        5.6
Peugeot incl. Citroen &amp; Talbot 3,154   -16.8          4.9        5.7
Nissan                         3,022    +6.9          4.7        4.2
Vauxhall (GM)                  2,618   -20.9          4.1        4.9
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Trucks (over 3.5 tonnes)
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Total                         20,633    -6.0        100.0      100.0
Imports                        8,240    -6.2         39.9       40.1
Iveco group** (Fiat)           5,089    -5.4         24.7       24.5
Leyland DAF (DAF)              5,016    -2.5         24.3       23.4
Mercedes-Benz (Daimler-Benz)   3,280    -5.9         15.9       15.9
Volvo ***                      2,287    +7.1         11.1        9.7
Renault ***                      866   -34.6          4.2        6.0
MAN                              762   -20.0          3.7        4.3
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Of which Heavy Trucks (over 15 tonnes)
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Total                         10,588    -0.7        100.0      100.0
Leyland DAF (DAF)              2,218   -10.8         21.0       23.3
Volvo ***                      1,988    +8.5         18.8       17.2
Iveco group** (Fiat)           1,404    -4.5         13.3       13.8
Mercedes-Benz (Daimler-Benz)   1,300   +12.0         12.3       10.9
Scania (Investor)              1,209    +4.9         11.4       10.8
ERF                            1,121    +9.9         10.6        9.6
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
(names in brackets indicate ownership)
*includes buses and light four wheel drive utility vehicles.
**includes Iveco Ford and Seddon Atkinson.
***Renault and Volvo are linked through minority cross-shareholdings.
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Source: Society of Motor Manufacturers and Traders and industry
estimates.
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4075</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIIBPABMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920909
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  09 SEP 92 / Inquiry into medical fees: Senior figure to head team
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW JACK
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MR PETER DEAN, a deputy chairman of the Monopolies and Mergers Commission,
will chair the inquiry into the supply of private medical services.
Mr Dean, aged 53, is a freelance business consultant and was an executive
director of RTZ, the mining group, from 1974 to 1985.
He is a solicitor and a non-executive director of Associated British Ports
Holdings and Liberty Life Assurance Company.
He became a member of the MMC in 1982 and was also a member of the British
Transport Docks Board in 1980-82. His recreations in Who's Who are listed as
choral singing and skiing.
He was unable to comment on his appointment yesterday because he was
recovering from an eye operation.
A further group of between three and six people will be chosen later this
week to run the investigation.
They will gather written information, and also invite oral representation to
a series of hearings.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4076</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIIBPABLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920909
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  09 SEP 92 / Inquiry into medical fees: Carsberg referral attacks heart
of private practice
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW JACK, ANDREW ADONIS and RICHARD DONKIN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BRITAIN'S consultants might have been forgiven if they collectively missed a
heartbeat yesterday when Sir Bryan Carsberg, the director general of fair
trading, announced that he was referring the fee rates charged for supply of
private medical services to the Monopolies and Mergers Commission.
In the last two years there has been a sharp rise in fees for private
medical work in the guidelines published by the British Medical Association,
the professional body for doctors and consultants in the UK. The guidelines
reflect the average rates for private work charged by consultants around the
country.
The referral comes at a highly sensitive time for the private health sector.
Increases in insurance premiums - which finance the bulk of activity - have
continued to outpace inflation dramatically during the recession. Some
insurers have, amid growing fears that private health could price itself out
of the reach of many of its customers, accused hospital operators of doing
too little to contain rising costs.
The BMA insists it simply issues guidelines, and does not set recommended
fee rates as stated by the OFT yesterday. But a number of medical
professionals say private consultants' fees have crept up from below the BMA
guidelines, which have become a baseline in the three years since they were
published.
The guideline fees went up by about 10.5 per cent in the 1990 BMA review,
and by about 16 per cent on many operations in the latest review published
last week.
Under the guidelines patients seeking private health treatment in the UK
might pay as little as Pounds 35 for minor ear surgery and more than Pounds
8,000 for a liver transplant involving hours of work. The schedule stresses:
'Consultants must always decide themselves on the appropriate fee for the
service provided.'
The 54-page list of guideline prices for about 1,500 medical procedures was
first produced in 1989, after several years of study by the fees working
party, created in 1985 on the instructions of its annual meeting and led by
Mr John Chawner, now chairman of the BMA consultants' committee.
Previously consultants had been guided by the list of payments approved by
BUPA, but they now appear to be increasingly guided by the BMA schedule,
which typically has higher rates.
The MMC will discover that there is little information publicly available on
how much doctors earn from private practice. BUPA - which, as one of the
largest private medical insurers, has a substantial amount of information on
the fees charged by doctors - refused to comment on the details of the
inquiry, but pledged to co-operate fully with the inquiry.
A study by the King's Fund health care think tank earlier this year
estimated that consultants in London received Pounds 175m in private
practice fees in 1989-90 - more than the Pounds 153m spent by NHS health
authorities on consultant services in the capital.
Mr William Laing, director of Laing and Buisson, a specialist medical
publisher and consultant, estimated that 12,000 of Britain's 19,000
consultants carried out private work in a market with an annual turnover of
about Pounds 500m. 'On average they earn as much from private practice in a
day as they do for the rest of the week in the NHS,' he said.
Private health care insurers have complained about the BMA guidelines since
their introduction because of the effect of increasing medical rates and
reducing fee competition. That message had filtered through to the OFT by
early this year.
Mr Roy Forman, chief executive of Private Patients Planning Group, said many
doctors had historically charged below the guideline rates and a small
number had charged more - but rates were now converging towards those in the
BMA schedule.
Mr Tim Baker, business development manager with Norwich Union Health Care,
said: 'There have been problems within the medical profession about setting
prices for a long time. And there has been pressure from medical insurers.'
Behind the OFT's referral lies a concern to contain private health charges
familiar in the US and other European countries, where insurance-based
systems have sent costs spiralling for decades.
The Office of Health Economics estimates that private health care
expenditure per head in the UK in 1990 was Pounds 88. In the US it was
Pounds 827, in Germany Pounds 290 and in France Pounds 270. The US devotes
twice as big a share of its national income to health as Britain.
Wherever healthcare is paid for by patients who claim the cost back from
insurance companies, there is an absence of downward pressure on costs. The
patient, after all, will pay any bill within reason and is unlikely to
question medical charges if the cost can be passed straight on to the
insurer.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4077</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIIBPABKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920909
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  09 SEP 92 / Inquiry into medical fees: Little hope of end to rise in
premiums
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN AUTHERS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
RISING medical bills have helped to fuel sharply higher premiums for private
medical insurance in the last two years.
Several figures in the industry attribute this in part to the introduction
of standard charges and believe the monopolies inquiry announced yesterday
may help to bring down the costs borne by insurers. But the current high
rate of claims means that this may not lead to significant reductions in
premiums.
Variations in policies make it difficult to assess the rise in premiums
accurately. The latest survey of premiums by Wyatt, the management
consultancy group, says 41 per cent of companies faced a premiums rise of
more than 25 per cent in 1990. Premiums more than doubled for 3.2 per cent.
According to Mr Bob Bycroft, of Medical Insurance Agency, premium rises this
year have been running at 30 per cent to 50 per cent, but he believes
pressure on premiums came more from increased claims than from higher costs.
He said the industry believed that to arise from the recession. 'As the bulk
of medical insurance is provided by employers for their staffs, the staff
may be claiming on their policies before they get their notice of
redundancy.'
Rising premiums also put the industry under greater pressure because they
provide a stronger incentive for customers to discontinue policies.
Mr Arthur Large, managing director of health insurance for Bupa, which
accounts for 47 per cent of the UK private health insurance market,
estimates that health care cost inflation is running at 14 per cent or 15
per cent a year.
He said: 'People cannot afford a product which is constantly growing at a
compound rate of 14 per cent or 15 per cent per annum. We are looking to
take what actions we can to contain rises in health costs.'
In April Private Patients Plan, the second-largest private health provider,
reported that last year costs on its most popular plan increased by 36 per
cent.
 ------------------------------------------------------
          BUPA TABLE OF BENEFITS (POUNDS)
 ------------------------------------------------------
                           Surgeon        Anaesthetist
Minor                       90-165            up to 70
Intermediate               205-390              85-140
Major                      445-510             150-225
Major plus                 555-770             255-440
Complex major            825-2,000             515-940
 ------------------------------------------------------
 ---------------------------------------------------------------
             SELECTED PROCEDURES FROM BMA GUIDELINES
 ---------------------------------------------------------------
                                   Procedure      Anaesthetist
 ---------------------------------------------------------------
Emergency appendicectomy             500               200
Primary repair of femoral hernia     320               140
Liver transplant                   5,825             3,320
Bypass of aorta                    1,225               685
Repair of pulmonary artery         1,800               700
 ---------------------------------------------------------------
 ---------------------------------------------------------------
       INCREASE IN UK PRIVATE MEDICAL INSURANCE (1991)
 ---------------------------------------------------------------
Annual Rise (percent)         Companies Affected (Percent)
 ---------------------------------------------------------------
  0                                       3.1
  1 -  10                                19.6
 11 -  25                                33.7
 26 -  50                                29.4
 51 -  75                                 8.6
 76 - 100                                 2.4
101 - 200                                 2.0
200+                                      1.2
 ---------------------------------------------------------------
Source: Wyatt Survey
 ---------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4078</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIIBPABJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920909
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  09 SEP 92 / Mandela urges removal of Ciskei leader
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PATTI WALDMEIR
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   JOHANNESBURG
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
MR Nelson Mandela, president of the African National Congress (ANC),
yesterday called on the South African government to remove Brigadier Oupa
Gqozo, the military leader of the Ciskei 'homeland', from power as a
condition for resuming talks on South Africa's political future.
Mr Mandela was speaking after laying a wreath at the site where at least 23
people were shot dead on Monday by Ciskei security forces. The massacre has
provoked a serious crisis in relations between the ANC and the government,
and could threaten early resumption of talks on a post-apartheid
constitution.
Britain condemned the killings and expressed fear that recent massacres
threaten prospects for peaceful change. Mr Douglas Hurd, foreign secretary,
called on the Pretoria government to 'exert control over the security forces
in the Ciskei and other homelands.'
While Mr Mandela said the incident was a 'serious stumbling block' to
resuming negotiations, his tone was far less confrontational than statements
issued by more radical members of the ANC leadership, including Mr Cyril
Ramaphosa, its powerful secretary general.
Mr Ramaphosa led Monday's march on the Ciskei capital Bisho, along with Mr
Chris Hani and Mr Ronnie Kasrils of the South African Communist party, who
are also ANC officials. They have been widely criticised for pursuing the
march after warnings that it would lead to violence.
Church leaders, including Archbishop Desmond Tutu, spent most of yesterday
in talks with Brig Gqozo aimed at defusing the crisis. Church sources said
they had proposed that Brig Gqozo hold a referendum to test his support
among the homeland's 800,000 population, but he later rejected this.
Mr Mandela made clear that the ANC's target was not only Ciskei, but also
other black homelands where the ANC is prevented from mobilising political
support by conservative leaders. 'A climate of free political activity
throughout the whole country, including the bantustans (homelands), is an
important condition for a return to negotiations,' he told a press
conference.
The South African cabinet was expected to meet later today to seek ways of
dealing with the crisis, while officials of the government and ruling
National party continued to attack the ANC publicly for using violence to
further its political aims.
About 1,000 ANC supporters who had remained close to the scene of the
shooting, the border between Ciskei and South Africa, for much of the day,
later left the area to attend an address delivered by Mr Mandela in a nearby
sports stadium.
Editorial Comment, Page 18
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4079</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIIBPABIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920909
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  09 SEP 92 / Malaysia makes a pitch for off-shore financial haven: Kieran
Cooke visits Labuan, Mahathir's dream of an East Asian equivalent of the
'Eldorados' off the US and Europe
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KIERAN COOKE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BUSINESS is brisk at the Casanova Bar in downtown Labuan. Girls from the
Philippines, some recently working the bars round the now closing US
military bases, have drifted south into Malaysian waters. The drink is
cheap. The air conditioning is turned high against the tropical heat. A man
from nearby officially-dry Brunei is knocking back doubles of top-shelf
whisky.
Labuan is a 92-sq-km island in the South China Sea, about 10km off the west
coast of the island of Borneo. To some it is as remote a place as is
possible to find. But to the Malaysian government it is the new financial
Eldorado, set to join the list of leading international offshore financial
centres round the world. A high-powered roadshow, led by Mr Anwar Ibrahim,
Malaysia's minister of finance, is due this month to explain the attractions
of Labuan to financiers in Los Angeles, Chicago and New York. Similar events
are planned in Europe.
The idea of making Labuan an IOFC (the Malaysian authorities studiously
avoid the term tax haven) was first mooted by Dr Mahathir Mohamad,
Malaysia's prime minister, in 1989.
The rationale behind the project was straightforward. The bulk of the
world's offshore financial centres are either off the coast of the US, in
the Caribbean or clustered round Europe. East Asia is the most dynamic
economic region in the world yet only Hong Kong and Singapore have any IOFC
status.
The Malaysian government felt that enough financial business was being
generated in the region to justify the existence of another centre. Malaysia
alone, with an economy growing at more than 8 per cent a year, needed the
facilities of an IOFC. A growing need was perceived to develop Malaysia's
financial services industry: in the process the aim was to encourage
progress in East Malaysia, one of the country's least developed regions.
Some Malaysians had to reach for the maps to locate Labuan. The sceptics
were in full cry. 'Who would want set up shop in such a place?' they said.
Yet plenty have - to date 57 offshore companies have established operations
on Labuan. Bank Negara, Malaysia's central bank, has issued seven offshore
banking licences and two offshore insurance licences. A number of trust
companies, law firms and accounting practices have also been established on
the island.
Even experienced offshore operators in Singapore have been surprised at the
speed at which business has developed on Labuan. Since the island was
officially declared open for offshore activities in October 1990 funds
deposited with offshore banks are estimated at well over Dollars 500m
(Pounds 251m) with loans issued more than Dollars 400m.
While such figures hardly compare with the estimated Dollars 200bn of
offshore funds deposited in Singapore, most concede that Labuan has made a
good start. 'We always knew it would take time to develop business,' says Mr
Mainor Awang, manager of the Labuan Development Authority, 'But so far we
are very encouraged by the interest shown.'
The ideas of Dr Mahathir, considered by many to be the principal architect
of Malaysia's economic success, are not treated lightly. Labuan has been
pump-primed with official funding and many hours of ministerial attention.
The government puts great emphasis on Labuan's minimal regulatory framework
and the IOFC's strict provisions on secrecy and confidentiality, though it
has also said all applications for licences will be 'carefully screened' to
exclude money laundering operations.
The government says Labuan's tax package is among the most attractive of any
IOFC. Offshore trading companies can elect to pay either 3 per cent of net
profits or a maximum of MDollars 20,000 (Pounds 4,020) on their operations.
Hong Kong has a 16.5 per cent corporate tax rate; Singapore has a 31
corporate tax rate though many offshore activities are taxed at a lower
level.
Mr Kamari Zaman, Bank Negara's manager on Labuan, says it is likely that
more Hong Kong money will be attracted to Labuan in the run-up to 1997, when
Hong Kong reverts to Chinese rule. There is also a great deal of Japanese
interest, in particular from Japanese banks lending to companies investing
in Malaysia. 'Some might think we are remote but Labuan is strategically
placed, right in the middle of an expanding region' says Mr Kamari.
But Labuan faces several problems. Most financial operations on the island
are still Malaysia-related. If it is to succeed it needs the presence of big
foreign banks and other financial institutions. Seducing the big players to
set up on Labuan will not be easy. Many other IOFC's have developed their
operations in tandem with tourism. Though the government has poured millions
into Labuan, infrastructure is limited. With only one direct Kuala Lumpur
flight per day, most connections have to be made through long flights via
East Malaysia.
Another problem the potential Labuan inhabitant faces is staff. There are
only about 40,000 people on Labuan, a large portion of them immigrants from
the Philippines and Indonesia. Skills are limited. Financial institutions
will have to offer attractive benefits packages to staff: Malaysia has
serious labour shortages and workers will be reluctant to move from urban
centres to an outpost such as Labuan. While Labuan's corporate tax rate is
low, personal tax rates are higher than either Hong Kong or Singapore.
Over the years Labuan has been known as a haven for smugglers. Now it wants
to be a home to financiers. The Casanova bar is looking forward to a new
clientele.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4080</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIIBPABHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920909
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  09 SEP 92 / Angolan rivals accept proposal for a coalition
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JULIAN OZANNE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ANGOLA'S ruling MPLA party and the former rebel movement Unita have accepted
a proposal to form a coalition government after this month's elections.
The announcement was made in Luanda by senior officials from Portugal,
Russia and the US - the countries monitoring the peace process - after two
days of meetings with Angolan President Jose Eduardo Dos Santos, who also
heads the MPLA, and Mr Jonas Savimbi, leader of Unita.
'The observers are pleased to report the willingness of President Eduardo
dos Santos and Jonas Savimbi to form a government which will ensure the
viability of a project of national reconciliation and reconstruction, taking
into account the results of the elections,' the statement said.
The Portuguese secretary of state for co-operation, Mr Jose Manuel Durao
Barroso, made it clear in remarks from Luanda to Portuguese state television
that the future government would reflect proportionately the results of the
elections.
'The idea is that a future government, whoever it is, whatever the results
of the elections, will obviously have to reflect the dominant political
force,' Mr Durao Barroso said.
'But it will try to integrate other forces according to their electoral
representation in order to guaranteee a sufficient base of support for
national reconciliation,' he said, adding that both sides had accepted the
proposal.
A power sharing deal would significantly reduce prospects for widespread
election violence in Angola's first free polls on September 29 and 30.
Without a coalition agreement observers have been predicting that neither
side would accept defeat but would incite ethnic violence over election
results. Unita has its stronghold in the southern Ovimbundu tribe, which
accounts for 35-40 per cent of the population and the MPLA draws its support
from the Mbundu, who form a quarter of the population.
If the agreement is formally ratified before polling day it could mark a
fundamental turning point for an economy which could be one of Africa's
economic power houses. A reform programme aimed at tackling the effects of
years of mismanagement, a Dollars 9bn (Pounds 4.5bn) external debt and an
overvalued currency have been overshadowed by the political tensions of the
transition to democracy.
Little divides the two parties on economic policy. Both subscribe to the
free market structural adjustment polices set out by the International
Monetary Fund and the World Bank - although Unita can point to a
long-standing commitment to capitalism in contrast to the MPLA's relatively
recent conversion from Marxism.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4081</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIIBPABGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920909
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  09 SEP 92 / HK hopes rise China will approve airport: Beijing still
fears it will be saddled with debt
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SIMON DAVIES
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   HONG KONG
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE joint Sino-British committee trying to break the five-month deadlock
over financing for Hong Kong's multi-billion dollar airport project meets
today amid growing local optimism that China is preparing to settle the
dispute.
The meeting, between Chinese and British diplomats and senior Hong Kong
officials, is the first since July. It is unlikely to lead to any immediate
resolution, with the Chinese set to put forward new proposals which will
have to be studied by the British team.
But the Chinese decision to to return to the negotiations is seen as a
hopeful sign. This is in part based on a prevalent local assumption that
approval has been postponed to give the Chinese leverage ahead of an
important policy speech to be given by Governor Chris Patten on October 7.
Chen Zuo'er, deputy director of Hong Kong and Macao Affairs Office, said on
Monday that the Chinese concerns remain focused on the cost-effectiveness of
the airport and whether the post-1997 government will be saddled with any
debt.
Mainland officials have suggested the estimated Dollars 21bn proceeds from
the sale of land development rights for five sites along the airport railway
should be used to provide direct government financing for the project. This
is likely to form the core of the new proposals to the British side of the
negotiation.
Chen said he approved of the idea of diverting funds from the land sales.
But he was quick to deny suggestions of official leaking, saying that the
idea had emerged from the people of Hong Kong rather than Beijing.
The British remain cautious in their expectations for the latest meeting.
The leader of Britain's negotiating team, Mr Anthony Galsworthy, said
yesterday the British group would need time to consider any new Chinese
proposals, before any conclusion could be drawn and discussed at a later
date.
But Mr William Purves, chairman of HSBC Holdings, said recently he was
confident an agreement would be reached shortly; and he is in a good
position to know, as a member of the executive council, the governor's
equivalent of a cabinet.
The deadlock started in mid-April, after the Chinese were presented with the
finance package for the airport and related projects, which are expected to
cost Dollars HK175bn (Pounds 11.35bn).
The Chinese expressed concern over a Dollars HK20bn in 'callable equity'
which the government has guaranteed to cover over-runs as a result of delay
or other contingencies.
Another problem was escalating cost of the airport's rail-link. Chinese
sources say there is no opposition to the project itself, but only to the
financing.
Meanwhile, work on the airport is proceeding. On November 31 the offer
closes from the Nishimatsu consortium, which was awarded the Dollars 9bn
airport site preparation contract.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4082</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIIBPABFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920909
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  09 SEP 92 / Contest to host Apec
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER UNGPHAKORN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BANGKOK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
INTENSE COMPETITION has developed this week between Thailand and Singapore
over the proposed siting of a secretariat for the 15-nation Asia Pacific
Economic Co-operation group (Apec).
The two countries hope the secretariat could mean international prestige and
future material benefits if Apec, which includes the US, Japan, China and
Australia, develops as planned. The organisation so far has amounted to
little more than a loose series of meetings.
Thailand is also seeking international endorsement that it has returned to
normal politically after the crackdown on pro-democracy protests. Jakarta
and Seoul are also candidates, but they are considered outsiders.
Apec accounts for half the world's gross domestic product and 40 per cent of
international trade. It includes some of thr world's fastest-growing
economies. Its members are: the US, Canada, Japan, South Korea, China, Hong
Kong, Taiwan, Australia, New Zealand and the six members of the Association
of South East Asian Nations (Asean), Brunei, Indonesia, Malaysia, the
Philippines, Singapore and Thailand.
Since its launch in Canberra in November 1989, the group has held regular
consultations on trade and economic issues.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4083</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIIBPABEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920909
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  09 SEP 92 / Australia sees skirmish over corporate crime
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   SYDNEY
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
AUSTRALIA'S corporate watchdog is embroiled in a public brawl with the
country's top prosecutor over its record of bringing white collar criminals
to justice, Reuter reports from Sydney.
Australian Securities Commission (ASC) chairman, Mr Tony Hartnell, was
yesterday forced to defend his organisation against claims by the Director
of Public Prosecutions (DPP) that it was going soft on corporate crime.
'There must not be special rules for corporate criminals simply because they
wear white shirts and carry briefcases,' the DPP, Mr Michael Rozenes, told a
parliamentary committee on Monday.
He said the ASC appeared to prefer civil rather than criminal action in
corporate crimes and accused Mr Hartnell of using one rule for the rich and
another for the poor. 'What the corporate criminal is really afraid of is
going to prison,' Mr Rozenes said.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4084</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIIBPABDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920909
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  09 SEP 92 / Flat market
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By STEVEN BUTLER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
New apartments put on sale in the Tokyo area during August fell to a record
low of 860 for the month, 8.2 per cent below a year ago, the Japan Real
Estate Economy Institute said yesterday, Steven Butler reports. Sales,
however, failed to keep up with a sluggish demand, with contracts being
agreed on only 60.1 per cent of the new flats on the market.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4085</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIIBPABCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920909
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  09 SEP 92 / Japan fixes size of UN force
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By STEVEN BUTLER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TOKYO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE Japanese government yesterday announced it would send more than 1,800
troops to join United Nations peacekeeping operations in Cambodia over the
next year, in the first overseas deployment of Japanese ground forces since
the second world war.
The dispatch of troops from Japan's Self Defense Force, while still
controversial, is a centre-piece of Japan's efforts to play a more active
role in world affairs.
After nearly two years of bitter debate in the Japanese Diet, the government
in June succeeded in obtaining passage of a bill authorising overseas
dispatch of Japanese troops to join international peace keeping operations,
under limited circumstances.
One condition is that a ceasefire must be in place. Opposition forces have
argued that the refusal of the Khmer Rouge faction in Cambodia to lay down
its arms made it impossible for the government to send troops to Cambodia.
The government says however that the Khmer Rouge has still not rejected the
ceasefire.
The decision to dispatch troops followed a formal request last week from Mr
Boutros Boutros-Ghali, the UN secretary general.
Japan is to send eight soldiers as ceasefire monitors on September 17. They
will be followed in mid-October by 600 army engineers, who will repair roads
and bridges, and 75 civilian police officers. A total of 1,811 personnel are
to be deployed during the year.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4086</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIIBPABBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920909
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  09 SEP 92 / Armed UN troops for Somalia
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JULIAN OZANNE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE first armed United Nations troops are due to arrive in the Somali
capital Mogadishu on Saturday to start the most dangerous UN intervention in
Africa since the Katanga crisis in Zaire in the 1960s.
In Mogadishu Brig Gen Shaheen, leader of the UN force, said 60 Pakistani
troops would fly to Mogadishu on Saturday and the rest of the 500-strong
force would arrive the following weekend. Aid workers and western
politicians say deployment of troops is critical to ensure distribution of
food to Somalia's starving in a country rife with banditry.
Gen Shaheen said the 60 troop vanguard would set up a camp at the airport
and take control of it.
The announcement came as concerns grew about foreign companies turning
Somalia into a dumping ground for toxic waste. In Nairobi officials of the
UN Environmental Programme (UNEP) said foreign companies were exploiting the
anarchy in the country to dump toxic waste offshore.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4087</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIIBPABAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920909
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  09 SEP 92 / India urged to stick to reform
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By STEFAN WAGSTYL
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW DELHI
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE Reserve Bank of India says India must stay on the path of economic
reform despite persistent inflation, slow growth and the recent Bombay stock
market scandal.
The far-reaching liberalisation programme, which started a year ago in
response to a balance-of-payments crisis, should be completed as quickly as
possible, says the central bank in its annual report published this week.
The bank gives credit to the measures taken by the government of Mr P V
Narasimha Rao, saying that recent macro-economic reforms have been managed
satisfactorily.
But, echoing a concern frequently voiced in recent months, the reserve bank
urges the government not to allow the reform programme to run out of steam.
It says: 'There is still a hiatus between policy formulation and
implementation at ground level.'
The reserve bank is particularly worried that the Bombay scandal, which
involves alleged attempts by banks and brokers to circumvent investment
rules, should not upset further financial deregulation.
'It is important that the recent episode, though an unfortunate one, does
not put back the clock of reforms.'
The bank admits that the economic recovery in the 1992-93 financial year
will be weaker than expected. It says that after falling in the year to June
to 2.5 per cent, the real economic growth rate should rise to around 3.5 per
cent. This is well short of the 5.6 per cent figure achieved in 1990-91. The
rapid growth of the 1980s is now only a memory.
Growth has been held back by a fall in exports, including sales to former
communist countries, and a government-imposed squeeze on imports, put in
place last year to conserve foreign exchange.
To create conditions for sustainable growth, inflation has to be cut from
last year's 13.6 per cent to 8-9 per cent this financial year.
Also, the government deficit has to be reduced, says the bank, calling for
wholesale reform including a law which would establish a ceiling for public
sector borrowing. It puts the country's total external debt at Dollars 70bn
at the end of March.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4088</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIIBPAA9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920909
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  09 SEP 92 / Hizbollah and allies sweep to victory in south Lebanon
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROGER MATTHEWS, Middle East Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
HIZBOLLAH, the Iranian-backed Shia Moslem group and Amal, its Syrian
supported ally, yesterday completed their electoral triumph in Lebanon,
virtually sweeping the 23 seats contested in the third round of voting held
in the south of the country.
After strong showings in both the east of Lebanon and in Beirut, the 22
candidates of Hizbollah and Amal on the so-called 'Liberation List' were
elected along with a solitary Sunni Moslem independent from Sidon.
Mr Nabih Berri, Amal movement leader, Sunni Moslem Bahiya Hariri and two
Hizbollah (party of God) candidates topped the list of parliamentarians
elected in what was the final phase of the first general election for 20
years.
The victory for the 'Liberation List', which campaigned on a platform of
toppling south Lebanon's traditional leaders, was made easier by the refusal
by the Christian communities to take part in the poll.
Moslem fundamentalists appear certain to be the largest ideologically
coherent group in the new parliament and their success reflects similar
trends elsewhere in the Middle East, most notably in Algeria.
The Christian minority, which had until the civil war dominated the country
politically, boycotted the election claiming that it could not be fair while
Syrian troops remained in Lebanon. They subsequently charged that the voting
in each round had been rigged. Under the reformed constitution the Moslem
and Christian communities were due to share the seats equally in the
legislature.
However, the size of the victory of the Shia parties confirms what had been
increasingly obvious since the outbreak of the civil war in 1975: that a
redrawing of the Lebanese political map would inevitably give greater weight
to the under-represented south and the urban poor.
Israel and the US attempted individually and jointly to stem the political
tide by shoring up the Christian Maronite minority during the first half of
the 1980s, without success. With Lebanon participating in the Middle East
peace process due to resume in Washington next week, the political
complexion of the parliament becomes of greater importance should there be
significant progress in the separate talks between Israel, the Palestinians
and Syria.
Israel insists that it has no territorial claim to any part of Lebanon, but
is unlikely to withdraw from the swathe of land it controls in the south
until it has reached broad agreement with Syria on the Golan Heights.
If Israel is to withdraw from Golan, or a large part of it, it would clearly
hope to negotiate a parallel withdrawal of Syria troops from eastern
Lebanon.
Although the success of Hizbollah and Amal might fairly reflect the mood of
the most deprived section of Lebanon's population, there are also fears that
it could spark a renewed burst of extremism.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4089</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIIBPAA8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920909
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  09 SEP 92 / Argentine justice minister dismissed: Hopes for independent
legal system set back
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN BARHAM
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BUENOS AIRES
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
ARGENTINE President Carlos Menem yesterday sacked his justice minister for
objecting to the president's decision to interfere in the appointment of 235
new judges.
Mr Leon Arslanian complained that some of his candidates were replaced by
others chosen for political reasons rather than their performance.
Officials said the minister, who served as an appeals court judge before
entering government last year, would be replaced by the president's legal
affairs secretary, Mr Jorge Maiorano.
Although he was admired for his record as one of the judges who tried
Argentina's generals during the 1980s for human rights offences, Mr
Arslanian lacked the political skill to manoeuvre in Mr Menem's cabinet and
failed to defend his reforms.
The minister said he resigned because the judiciary's independence was at
stake.
The president's decision not to back Mr Arslanian is a setback for attempts
to create an independent legal system. The judiciary is widely seen as
submissive to the government; shortly after taking office in 1989 Mr Menem
packed the Supreme Court with his supporters.
Mr Arslanian's fate is also a vivid example of Mr Menem's style of
government, in which efficient policymaking is frequently reduced to battles
between rival factions or disputes between ministers carried out through the
media.
The dismissal came a day after important reforms in legal procedures were
implemented, in which traditional written trials were replaced by public
trial for criminal cases. The changes should make trials faster and fairer,
improving Argentina's slow, corrupt and secretive judiciary.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4090</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIIBPAA7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920909
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  09 SEP 92 / Democrats revive Iran-Contra affair
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JUREK MARTIN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   WASHINGTON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE Democratic party, seeking to fight fire with fire, yesterday urged
closer scrutiny of President George Bush's role in the Iran-Contra affair.
Senator George Mitchell, the majority leader, said on television there were
questions about 'the completeness and accuracy' of Mr Bush's statements
that, as vice-president, he was mostly unaware of the White House operation
to sell arms to Iran and use the proceeds to assist the Nicaraguan Contras.
Pre-trial court documents in the case of Mr Caspar Weinberger have suggested
the former defence secretary and Mr George Shultz, then secretary of state,
believed Mr Bush was supportive of the clandestine scheme organised by Lt
Col Oliver North.
Mr Mitchell was picking up on Monday's counterattack by Mr Bill Clinton, the
Democratic presidential candidate. Apparently frustrated by insistent
questions about his avoidance of military service in the late 1960s, Mr
Clinton suggested that the media devote comparable energies to exploring Mr
Bush's role in the Iran-Contra scandal.
Yesterday morning during campaigning in Connecticut Mr Clinton tried to
return to what he considers to be his strongest electoral suit - the parlous
state of the economy and the need to create new jobs in manufacturing. Like
Mr Bush, he claimed to be the real reincarnation of President Harry Truman,
who has become the icon for both sides in this campaign.
But the Bush campaign, under the direction of Mr James Baker, is now more
intent on questioning Mr Clinton's personal qualities, including his
courage, than in offering specific economic policy remedies.
On Monday the president indirectly contrasted his own military record with
his opponent's lack of one. More pointedly, a small light aircraft flew over
Clinton rallies, trailing a banner that read: 'No draft dodgers.'
In a speech to ex-servicemen two weeks ago Mr Clinton tried to lay the draft
bogey to rest. But it has been subsequently reported that a now dead uncle
had tried to secure him an extra deferment in 1969.
Mr Clinton initially denied all knowledge of this, but later admitted he had
become aware of his uncle's efforts earlier this year.
This has lent some fuel to the Republican effort to portray him as someone
who shades the truth, and has induced the media to pick up the same cudgel.
Mr Clinton responded on Monday by accusing reporters of engaging in 'a
feeding frenzy about something that even if it's true doesn't amount to a
hill of beans.' He then raised the Iran-Contra issue.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4091</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIIBPAA6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920909
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  09 SEP 92 / US ends IMF stand on Swiss
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By GEORGE GRAHAM
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SWITZERLAND has won an executive directorship at the International Monetary
Fund, after the US dropped its objections to enlarging the Fund's board to
24 members, writes George Graham.
The US, among others, had originally argued against the addition of a ninth
European board member after Switzerland joined the IMF this year.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4092</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIIBPAA5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920909
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  09 SEP 92 / Baseball troubles boil over as chief throws in mitt
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JUREK MARTIN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE resignation on Monday night of Mr Fay Vincent as Commissioner of
Baseball threatens to turn America's national sport into an industrial
relations battlefield in the months ahead, even to the point of putting at
risk next year's season.
He was ousted by the owners of the 28 leading league teams, who saw him as
too independent. They voted last week by 18-9, with one abstention, to ask
him to go.
Mr Vincent resisted voluntary departure for a few days before issuing a
statement noting that 'sometimes decisions have to be made that are not in
the interest of some owners'.
Baseball's problems, real in spite of its great popularity, are complex and
rooted in labour relations law, which over 20 years has generally given the
players greater rights over their own destiny.
One consequence, however, has been escalating salaries, which this season
for the first time exceeded Dollars 1m (Pounds 502,500) a player. Most clubs
are not publicly quoted companies but it is said that half are now operating
at a loss.
From the owners' perspective, Mr Vincent's mistake was to intervene in the
1990 pre-season contractual dispute. Mr Tom Glavine, the Atlanta pitcher and
player representative, said Mr Vincent ended the lock-out and 'that was to
our benefit'. Mr Richie Phillips, head of the umpires' union, predicted that
the owners would seek a pretext for another confrontation and would close
the sport down 'for a very long time'.
The owners are a disparate lot. Their ringleader in disposing of Mr Vincent
was Mr Jerry Reinsdorf, who owns the Chicago White Sox, the Chicago Bulls
basketball team and the Chicago Tribune media group. Mr Reinsdorf had made
it clear in countless interviews that he faulted the commissioner for not
taking on the players' union.
Mr Vincent, a corporate lawyer with a long involvement in baseball, had been
appointed with the necessary consent of the owners in 1989.
He saw his job as representing all baseball's various elements - the owners,
the players, the umpires and the fans. In this respect he was acting in the
tradition of the first commissioner, Judge Kenesaw Mountain Landis, who was
brought in to clean up baseball after the Chicago White Sox gambling scandal
more than 70 years ago.
Mr Vincent also irked Mr Reinsdorf, whose Tribune group owns a super-station
beaming games across the country, by insisting that television revenues be
shared among all clubs, including those with poor local markets. He upset
others by decreeing that the Chicago Cubs should move to the western
division of the National League, a decision now rendered moot.
The image of Mr Reinsdorf and some of his more powerful colleagues conjured
up by the US press yesterday was that of 19th century mill owners.
Their choice for a permanent replacement will not be easy, although some
powerful candidates for what has always been a high profile job have been
mentioned. Among them are Mr James Baker, now White House chief of staff who
would be out of a job if President George Bush loses the election race in
November, and Mr Ron Brown, chairman of the Democratic party and a friend of
Mr Reinsdorf.
However, if the owners want to curb the independence of the commissioner
they may have to appoint a lesser luminary, perhaps Mr Lee Macphail, a
former head of the American League.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4093</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIIBPAA4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920909
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  09 SEP 92 / OECD suggests reforms to lift Canadian productivity
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BERNARD SIMON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TORONTO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE CANADIAN economy requires further structural reforms to reverse the
slide in its international competitiveness over the past two decades, the
Organisation for Economic Co-operation and Development says in its latest
report on the country.
While the OECD gives credit for some initiatives since the mid-1980s, it
concludes that 'improvement of Canadian productivity performance remains
elusive'. Greater attention should be given to education and training
policies, research and development, and to removal of remaining domestic and
external trade barriers.
The report notes that recent progress in lowering inflation and maintaining
fiscal discipline has set the stage for the next economic recovery. But it
cautions that the upturn will be sluggish.
Gross domestic product, which contracted by 1.7 per cent in 1991, is
forecast to rise by 2.3 per cent this year, accelerating to 4.3 per cent in
1993. Exports and housing are expected to be the mainsprings of the
recovery.
Despite the upturn in demand, considerable slack will remain in goods and
labour markets.
The OECD expects Canada's inflation rate, currently the lowest among leading
industrial countries, will be about 2 per cent both this year and next,
easily beating targets set by the government last year.
But it cautions that expectations of lower inflation, in the form of more
moderate wage demands, have yet to be firmly established.
'The private sector probably needs to see the targets achieved before
putting full faith in them when forming its inflation expectations,' the
report says.
The OECD notes that the impact of Canada's sliding productivity is evident
in the deteriorating trade balance and historically low profit margins.
It suggests that improvements in the much-criticised education and R&amp;D
effort require a reallocation of existing resources, rather than additional
spending.
The report says that although a further decline in the Canadian dollar,
which had fallen by yesterday morning to below 83 US cents from 89 cents
last November, may ease competitive pressures in the short term, 'exchange
rate depreciation is not a viable solution in the longer run.
'Indeed, as the economy recovers, a rapid downward adjustment of the
exchange rate might reignite inflation expectations, with the risk of
undermining the price performance achieved so far and, consequently, the
credibility of policies.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4094</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIIBPAA3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920909
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  09 SEP 92 / Bush seeks Dollars 7.6bn after hurricane
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By GEORGE GRAHAM
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   WASHINGTON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
PRESIDENT George Bush yesterday asked Congress for Dollars 7.6bn (Pounds
3.81bn) in emergency aid to help clean up after Hurricane Andrew, which left
an estimated 250,000 people homeless in Florida and Louisiana last month,
writes George Graham in Washington.
Mr Bush said he was confident there would be no 'gridlock' between him and
Congress over the aid package.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4095</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIIBPAA2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920909
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  09 SEP 92 / Mexican trade deficit widens
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAMIAN FRASER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MEXICO CITY
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
MEXICO'S trade deficit deteriorated sharply in the first half of this year
to Dollars 9.4bn (Pounds 4.72bn), more than double that in the same period
last year, according to the Finance Ministry, writes Damian Fraser in Mexico
City. The deficit including revenues from in-bond plants was Dollars 7.1bn.
Mr Geoffrey Dennis, chief international economist at James Capel, said the
deficit was 'widening at a disturbing rate'. He expects the trade deficit
this year to be about Dollars 18bn, and the current account to be near
Dollars 21bn. The government had forecast a current account deficit for 1992
of Dollars 13bn.
The deficit was pushed up by rapid growth in imports, which reached Dollars
23bn in the first half, 30 per cent more than in the period last year.
Intermediate and capital goods made up Dollars 19.3bn of total imports, or
84 per cent of the total.
The government has argued the growth in such imports is linked to the
restructuring of Mexican industry, and will lead to higher exports in the
future.
Exports excluding in-bond plants (maquiladoras) reached Dollars 13.7bn, down
slightly on the same period last year, according to the finance ministry's
bulletins.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4096</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIIBPAA1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920909
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  09 SEP 92 / Athens strikers clash with police
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KERIN HOPE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   ATHENS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
POLICE and striking workers clashed outside parliament in Athens yesterday a
few hours before the introduction of a law reforming the state pension
system.
Bystanders fled as police fired tear gas at the strikers, but there was
little chance of escaping the fumes. A traffic jam, the result of a traffic
light failure across central Athens, added to the chaos in the city centre.
A two-week strike by electricity workers, demanding to be excluded from the
pension reform, has led to twice daily power cuts in the capital. Transport,
banking and postal services are also affected by intermittent walk-outs.
The new pension law, to be debated over the next week, is seen as the
severest test yet of Prime Minister Constantine Mitsotakis's resolve to
carry through the toughest economic programme since the second world war.
With state pension payments this year forecast to reach Dr2,172bn (Pounds
6.3bn), equivalent to almost 40 per cent of government spending, the system
is in dire need of an overhaul.
In addition, the government must cover an expected Dr250bn shortfall in
contributions to the National Welfare Foundation, the main state pension
organisation, as well as servicing its accumulated debts of Dr205bn.
Reducing pension obligations is seen as an important part of attempts to cut
government borrowing from almost 14 per cent of gross domestic product last
year to the Maastricht requirement of 3 per cent.
The new law calls for increasing contributions, cutting special allowances
and gradually raising the retirement age to 65. Under present rules, Greek
workers are eligible for a full pension after 35 years, while women can
retire after only 15 years.
The strikes seem set to continue, partly because resentment has been fuelled
by austerity measures in the summer. These included price rises and the
firing of 8,000 Athens bus company workers when the government decided to
privatise the bus service after walk-outs by drivers.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4097</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIIBPAA0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920909
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  09 SEP 92 / Two peacekeepers die in Sarajevo convoy ambush
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By Our Foreign Staff
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
TWO French soldiers were killed when machine gun fire raked a United Nations
convoy bringing food and other supplies into the Bosnian capital of Sarajevo
last night.
The convoy of 35-40 trucks, which had travelled from Belgrade, came under
fire as it approached the airport on the western edge of the besieged city,
a UN official said. At least two other soldiers with the convoy were
wounded.
'We do not know at this point which side attacked the convoy,' the UN
official said. Both Serb irregulars and Bosnian government forces are
entrenched in positions near the airport.
It is the second time in five days that UN forces have mourned colleagues
lost in Bosnia. On Thursday UN relief flights were suspended after an
Italian plane carrying humanitarian aid to Sarajevo was apparently downed in
mountains, killing the four crew.
Two other UN peacekeepers, both Ukrainian soldiers, were killed earlier and
48 have been wounded.
The latest convoy was bringing in relief supplies for the UN peacekeeping
mission in Sarajevo.
Earlier yesterday the UN High Commissioner for Refugees said food stocks in
Sarajevo were dwindling rapidly and the city could run out of supplies by
the end of the week. But UN officials warned that international relief
flights were unlikely to be resumed in the next few days.
Last night's incident came as the UNHCR stepped up road convoys to Sarajevo
from Split in Croatia to offset the airlift suspension. But a shortage of
trucks and drivers means the city is getting only half its daily food needs
of 190 tonnes. Ms Sylvana Foa, for the UNHCR, said yesterday only 100 tonnes
of flour and 90 tonnes of rice remained in its Sarajevo warehouses.
Representatives of the three warring factions in Bosnia-Hercegovina will
today give UN officials in Geneva their response to proposals to improve the
security of humanitarian flights. These include a ban on military flights.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4098</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIIBPAAZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920909
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  09 SEP 92 / Competitive disadvantage of east underlined
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By QUENTIN PEEL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
REAL gross domestic product (GDP) in the former East Germany fell by 11.4
per cent between the second half of 1990 and the same period of 1991,
according to the first official statistics recalculated on a comparable
basis with the rest of Germany.
During the same period, the number employed fell faster - by 18.7 per cent -
so that labour productivity actually rose by 9 per cent over the year,
according to the Federal Bureau of Statistics.
Even so, labour productivity in eastern Germany only stood at 32 per cent of
the level in western Germany in the second half of 1991, underlining the
severe competitive disadvantage of industry in the east.
Gross wages per employee increased from DM1,290 per month to DM2,220 (Pounds
795) during the 12-month period, an increase of 52.9 per cent, in contrast
to the absolute decline in economic activity.
The statistics, still described as preliminary, nonetheless represent the
first to be recalculated on a comparable basis with the rest of Germany.
They show how essential public-sector spending has been in preventing an
even more drastic fall in economic activity, and how the economy appears to
have bottomed out in the first quarter of 1991.
Thus the GDP fell from DM58.4bn in the third quarter of 1990 to DM43.8bn in
the first quarter of 1991 - a drop of more than 27 per cent in six months.
Between then and the last quarter of 1991, it recovered to DM50.1bn. In the
same period private consumption fell from DM47.7bn to DM40.9bn in the first
quarter of 1991 and recovered to DM50.4bn at the end of the year, fuelled by
unemployment pay, the conversion of savings accounts into D-Marks and
consumer credit.
In contrast, public sector spending rose sharply from DM17.9bn to DM27.8bn
between the third and fourth quarters of 1990, fell back to DM17.7bn in the
first quarter of 1991 (probably as a result of sheer spending limitations in
the collapsed public sector) and recovered steadily to reach DM25.6bn in the
last quarter of the year.
Exports, traditionally to eastern Europe and the Soviet Union, were totally
stagnant: starting at DM16.5bn in the third quarter of 1990, they were
marginally down at DM16.4bn at the end of the period.
Imports, on the other hand, soared from DM35.6bn at the start of the period
(the first quarter after economic and monetary union between the two halves
of Germany) to DM61.4bn at the end.
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
                       EAST GERMAN GROWTH AND WAGES
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
                             1990                       1991
                      3rd     4th      1st      2nd      3rd      4th
                   quarter  quarter  quarter  quarter  quarter  quarter
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Gross domestic
    product (DMbn)*   58.4     53.1    42.5      44.9     48.7     50.1
GDP per person
    employed (in DM) 6,700    6,600   5,500     6,100    7,000    7,500
Gross monthly
    wages (DM)       1,290    1,430   1,500     1,650    1,930    2,220
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
* 1991 prices.
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4099</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIIBPAAYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920909
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  09 SEP 92 / World Trade News: The mist on Russia's window - St
Petersburg's port is uneasy with enhanced role
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN THORNHILL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ST PETERSBURG was built as Russia's 'window on Europe'. Three centuries
later the city still serves that purpose but the window is in danger of
jamming half-shut and the panes are misting up.
The importance of St Petersburg as Russia's maritime gateway to Europe has
increased since the dissolution of the Soviet Union deprived the country of
direct access to most of its warm-water ports. But the city's ability to
rise to the challenge has been limited by capacity constraints and a dearth
of development finance for expansion.
For centuries Russia's statesmen fought wars to ensure the country retained
access to ports which did not ice up. But this strategic goal was reversed
almost overnight by the break-up of the Soviet Union.
A study prepared by the St Petersburg-based Baltic Shipping Company found
that Russia had lost direct access to almost half of the 37 ports serving
the European part of the Soviet Union. Just at the time when Russia was
attempting to re-integrate itself in the world economy, its goods-handling
capacity was cut from 381.8m tonnes to 148.9m tonnes a year.
It might be argued that this would not matter greatly if Russia were able to
rely upon open trading relationships with its newly independent neighbours.
But such has been the bitterness accompanying the collapse of the Soviet
Union that the Baltic states, in particular, have been quick to exploit
their new leverage by attaching onerous terms of trade.
Russia's pride has been pricked by such actions and its newspapers have
argued that the country's future as a great world power is at stake. Grand
schemes for extending Russia's port capacity have been proposed. One,
devised by the Baltic Shipping Company, envisages the creation of a
180m-tonne 'super-port' in the Gulf of Finland although the proposals have
run into a storm of ecological protests.
Mr Grigoriy Filimonov, who has been entrusted with developing the plans for
the BSC, believes the bulk of the Dollars 19bn financing costs could be
provided by joint venture arrangements between western importers and Russian
exporters.
But Mr Anatoly Bilichenko, the director of the commercial sea port,
ridicules such concepts. Sitting in his smart office still decorated with
portraits of Marx and Lenin, he says: 'This is a typical example of our old
way of thinking. It is communist-style gigantism. Any new money should be
invested in improving the capacity of the existing port rather than sinking
it into a new location.'
Mr Bilichenko argues that the most sensible way forward is to expand the
port's facilities and update its outmoded infrastructure. He says that a
Dollars 150m investment would enable the port to expand capacity from its
current 13m tonnes to 20m tonnes.
The World Bank is keen to help develop the port and is likely to earmark
part of the Dollars 600m it has available to fund infrastructure development
projects. 'The port is a very high priority but how much money it is
allocated depends on the Russian government's list of financing requests
later this year,' it says.
Mr Bilichenko believes that up to Dollars 50m may be forthcoming from the
World Bank and the European Community; other funds could be raised from
Russian enterprises and private western bank loans.
Although the fate of St Petersburg's port is as yet far from clear, the
debate about its future provides a fine illustration of the pluralistic
pressure group politics that is evolving in Russia. At one time all such
investment decisions would have been taken by Moscow ministries with scant
regard for local considerations.
Now, government officials have to pay heed to the views of local politicians
and citizens, journalists and foreign bankers as well as a vociferous green
movement.
Radioactive sediment, still lying on the floor of the Gulf of Finland after
the Chernobyl nuclear plant disaster of 1986, would be stirred up by new
building work, the greens claim. They also fear that any accident at the
proposed new oil terminal might endanger the cooling systems of the nearby
Sosnovyi Bor nuclear power station.
But it seems likely that national strategic imperatives are likely to
overrule such ecological concerns. Russia's politicians attach high
importance to the port's development - Mr Boris Yeltsin, Russia's president,
has lent his support to the project while Mr Anatoly Sobchak, the city's
mayor, has campaigned vigorously for a string of new port developments. 'We
remain Russia's single window on Europe and we must fulfil this function in
full measure,' he told the St Petersburg press in June.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4100</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIIBPAAXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920909
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  09 SEP 92 / World Trade News: Sikorsky aims to set up European HQ in
Italy - Farnborough Air Show
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL BETTS, Aerospace Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SIKORSKY of the US, the world's biggest helicopter maker, is aiming to boost
its European market presence by setting up a new European headquarters in
Italy.
The company has also linked with Mitsubishi of Japan to study jointly the
possible launch at the end of this year of a new 19-passenger helicopter,
the S-92.
Mr Eugene Buckley, Sikorsky president, said his company intended to boost
its marketing and sales operations in Europe through its new European
organisation which later, could include direct manufacturing there.
The move is a challenge to Eurocopter, the joint venture between
Aerospatiale of France and Deutsche Aerospace of Germany, the world's second
largest helicopter group after Sikorsky.
Eurocopter is part of French-led efforts for a strong European helicopter
industry which was at the heart of a UK cabinet crisis in 1986 over the
future of Westland, the British helicopter maker. The crisis led to a
partnership between Westland and Sikorsky, with the US group's parent
company, United Technologies, taking a 7 per cent stake in Westland.
Westland has since resisted overtures from Eurocopter and intends to keep up
its links with Sikorsky and Agusta, the Italian helicopter maker which is
Westland's partner in developing the new EH101 naval and transport
helicopter.
Mr Jean Francois Bigay, Eurocopter chairman, warned yesterday that if
Sikorsky reinforced itself in Europe, his group would hit back with an
alliance with another manufacturer. Mr Bigay and Mr Buckley said the
helicopter business was going through an unstable time; they expected
further compression in the industry.
Mr Buckley said Sikorsky had 26 per cent of world helicopter sales, with a
Dollars 2.1bn (Pounds 1.05bn) turnover last year. Sikorsky also said Japan
had chosen its S-76C rescue helicopter for the Japanese Maritime Safety
Agency in a deal for up to 24, worth about Dollars 150m.
In Japan, Sikorsky and Mitsubishi are conducting marketing studies for the
possible launch of a new large transport helicopter, the S-92. Mr Buckley
said a decision was due at the end of this year. He declined to discuss the
possibility of Sikorsky acquiring McDonnell Douglas' helicopter activities.
Mr Buckley said he was keen to maintain a strong relationship with Westland.
Speculation is growing that Agusta may want stronger links with Sikorsky.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4101</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIIBPAAWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920909
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  09 SEP 92 / World Trade News: Italians considering alternative to EFA
Farnborough Air Show
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID WHITE, Defence Correspondent and JOSEPH MANN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   CARACAS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
ITALY has begun considering a possible alternative to the European Fighter
Aircraft (EFA), raising doubts on its commitment to the Pounds 20bn
collaborative project.
Rome recently requested information about the McDonnell Douglas F/A-18
Hornet, Mr George Hibbard, a senior executive of the US manufacturer, said
yesterday.
Britain has been counting on Italy as its most solid ally in the EFA
programme, the subject of reviews by both defence staffs and aircraft makers
of the four countries involved. The multi-role F/A-18 has long been
considered a principal rival to the EFA.
Germany's decision this year to pull out of production plans for the EFA in
its current form and seek European collaboration on a cheaper aircraft is
widely expected to lead to further delays in the programme. Some observers
believe the future of the EFA project will not become fully clear before the
German elections of 1994.
Italy urgently needs a new fighter to replace its ageing fleet of US F-104
Starfighters, increasingly costly to maintain. Spain, by contrast, has
little pressing need, as it already possesses 72 F/A-18s ordered in the
early 1980s.
Washington backed a promotion campaign four years ago for a new version of
the F/A-18 to be made in collaboration with European partners. Mr Hibbard
said that campaign 'helped to bring the EFA consortium together', and that
McDonnell Douglas was anxious to avoid making the same mistake now.
Joseph Mann reports from Caracas: The Venezuelan Air Force is studying
buying 10 Spanish-made Caza-212 passenger aircraft for about Dollars 31m
(Pounds 15.5m), Gen Eutimio Fuguet Borregales, air force chief, said.
Each can carry up to 25 passengers and cargo, land on short runways, and
would be used to help develop Venezuela's border regions.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4102</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIIBPAAVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920909
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  09 SEP 92 / World Trade News: BMW Rolls-Royce in Dollars 500m deal -
Farnborough Air Show
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL BETTS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE NEW Anglo-German aero-engine consortium between Rolls-Royce and BMW has
clinched its first big order worth over Dollars 500m (Pounds 251.2m) for 200
engines to power the new Gulfstream GV business jet aircraft. The order
announced by the BMW Rolls-Royce joint venture at Farnborough, launches the
group's new BR700 series of medium-thrust jet engines to power business and
regional jet liners of 60-140 seats.
The venture, formed two years ago, marks the return of the German carmaker
to the aero-engine business. It reflects Rolls-Royce's efforts to extend its
collaborating ventures into new niche markets. The venture is building a
plant near Berlin. BMW owns 50.5 per cent, with Rolls-Royce holding 49.5. It
is capitalised at DM200m (Pounds 71.6m).
Turnover last year was DM231m and the group employs over 1,100. The private
venture aims to produce a new family of engines ranging between 10,000 and
22,000 lbs of thrust for civil aircraft.
Gulfstream announced the development of its new twin-engine top-of-the-line
GV business jet at Farnborough to meet the need for an aircraft capable of
flying non-stop from New York to Tokyo, or London to Singapore. The first
flight of the new business jet is due in late 1995.
The selection by the US company of the Anglo-German engine was described
yesterday as 'the first and most significant breakthrough' for the new
organisation by Mr Albert Schneider, chairman of BMW Rolls-Royce.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4103</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIIBPAAUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920909
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  09 SEP 92 / Waigel sets out plan to aid industry: Germany's finance
minister gives details of enterprise tax reform
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By QUENTIN PEEL
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BONN
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
MR Theo Waigel, the German finance minister, yesterday spelt out details of
an enterprise tax reform designed to improve the competitiveness of German
industry, while giving a gloomy prognosis of economic prospects.
He announced plans to cut the rate of corporate income tax from 53 to 44 per
cent, and of corporation tax from 50 to 44 per cent, to be financed by
reducing depreciation allowances. Although neutral in its effect on state
revenues, the move was welcomed by German industry yesterday as the one
piece of good news in an otherwise downbeat budget, relying on strict
savings in state spending to finance the continuing subsidy needs of the
east German economy.
For the first time in the past two years, Mr Waigel refused to give any
assurances on future tax increases, declaring that any open-ended commitment
to a tax freeze would be unrealistic, and limit his room for manoeuvre.
Despite his insistence that the government's austerity measures, limiting
budget spending growth to just 2.5 per cent next year, 'correspond to the
expectations of our partners,' Mr Waigel was attacked by the opposition
Social Democrats for failing to make adequate allowances for eastern
Germany, and failing to curb the growth in the state debt.
The finance minister warned of the continuing gloomy international economic
outlook, with no sign of a lasting upturn in the US, and no significant
improvement in Britain, France or Italy. While sticking to his forecast of a
1.5 per cent real growth rate in the west German economy, and 2 per cent for
the whole country, he said it would be wrong to base tax revenue forecasts
on any possible improvement.
He also warned that any further weakening of the dollar would have adverse
effects on Germany's exports, hitherto seen as the principal motor of
economic recovery.
The enterprise taxation reform Mr Waigel announced has been long awaited and
will help to bring basic German enterprise taxation down towards the levels
of other European Community member states. He said the cost of the
concession would be some DM8.8bn, (Pounds 3.2bn) which would be financed by
reductions in depreciation allowances on movable assets (down from 30 to 25
per cent), and on fixed property.
The main focus of the budget debate, however, remains on the cost of
financing German unification, and in particular the burden of debt on the
state in the coming years.
Mr Waigel suggested that a special fund be established to repay the debts
inherited from the former East Germany, including some DM100bn in state
debts, and an estimated DM250bn from the Treuhand privatisation agency.
Ms Ingrid Matthaus-Maier, the deputy leader of the opposition Social
Democrats, said the budget glossed over chaos in the planning of state
finances. The public sector debt currently stood at DM1.6bn, and would rise
to DM2.3bn by 1996, the end of the minister's medium-term plan.
She accused Mr Waigel of being 'the greatest creator of debt in the history
of the republic'.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4104</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIIBPAATFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920909
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  09 SEP 92 / Insurance pay claim under fire
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID WALLER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   FRANKFURT
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE UNION representing 220,000 employees in the western German insurance
industry yesterday signalled its reluctance to exercise wage restraint and
demanded a pay rise of 7.5 per cent for 1992-93.
The Bonn-based insurance employers' association said the claim was too high,
given difficult conditions prevailing both in the insurance sector and the
German economy as a whole. The Bundesbank is urging settlements of around 3
per cent for next year.
Mr Gerhard Renner of DAG, the white collar union representing private sector
insurance workers, said the claim was justified in the light of rising
business volume in the insurance industry, which would eventually feed its
way into profits, and because of rising material burdens faced by employees.
The claim does not cover insurance employees working in eastern Germany, who
at present get 75 per cent of the wages paid to colleagues in the west.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4105</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIIBPAASFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920909
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  09 SEP 92 / World Trade News: Nokia launches digital hand-held phone
today
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHIYO NAKAMOTO
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   HELSINKI
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
NOKIA, the Finnish electronics group, today launches a digital hand-portable
phone based on the European GSM standard. The move is expected to take
Europe closer to its goal of a pan-European digital mobile communications
system, allowing the phones to be used in any of the 15 European countries
which have agreed to adopt the standard.
The launch comes as countries in Europe have been investing in their GSM
infrastructure; Nokia expects to have handsets available within a few weeks.
As Europe's largest cellular phone maker, it sees the GSM network in Europe
sufficiently widespread by next summer for the system to take off.
Digital phones are costlier to develop and therefore more costly to
consumers, but reception quality is much higher than analog systems, with
greater security against intrusion. The market is expected to grow to Pounds
400m by 1995.
 -------------------------------------------------------------------
                       OECD EXPORT CREDIT RATES
 -------------------------------------------------------------------
Minimum interest rates for officially supported export credits (%)
 -------------------------------------------------------------------
                               Sept 15-        Aug 15-
                                Oct 14         Sept 14
DMark                             9.45            9.54
Ecu                               9.47            9.89
French franc                     10.54           10.30
Guilder*                          9.60            9.55
Guilder****                       9.45            9.50
Guilder**                         9.30            9.35
Italian lira                     13.48           13.49
Yen                               5.50            5.90
Peseta                           13.73           13.26
Sterling                         10.56           10.16
Swiss franc                       8.08            8.09
US dollar*                        5.72            5.91
US dollar****                     6.60            6.84
US dollar**                       7.12            7.36
 -------------------------------------------------------------------
*Up to 5 years.
****Five to 8 1/2 years.
**More than 8 1/2 years.
 -------------------------------------------------------------------
These rates are published monthly by the Financial Times, normally
around the middle of each month. A premium of 0.2 per cent is to be
added to the credit rates when fixing at bid. Interest rates may not
be fixed for longer than 120 days. SDR-based rates of interest are
the same for all currencies. The SDR-based rate was changed on
February 15.  It will be subject to change on January 15, 1993.
 -------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4106</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIIBPAARFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920909
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  09 SEP 92 / The French Referendum: Great resigner raises banner of
nationalism - David Buchan in Paris talks to maverick Socialist politician
Jean-Pierre Chevenement
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID BUCHAN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   PARIS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
'IF the Noes win, the political landscape will change considerably in
France,' says Mr Jean-Pierre Chevenement hopefully. And the French Socialist
party's leading maverick is already positioning himself to take advantage of
any such change.
He has now raised the banner of left-wing nationalism in that part of the
political spectrum vacated by the mainstream of the Socialist party.
Mr Chevenement is one of France's great resigners. He quit as industry
minister in 1983 in protest at his party's rightward economic lurch,
abandoned the Defence Ministry in early 1990 rather than lead France into
combat against Iraq, and in July resigned from the Socialist party executive
to be free to wage war against Maastricht. Since then, he has founded the
Mouvement des Citoyens, dedicated to overthrowing the European union pact.
Will he try to turn this movement into a proper political party, taking on
the Socialists themselves? At this point Mr Chevenement, interviewed
yesterday in his office in Paris' 16th arrondissement, hesitates with
uncharacteristic caution. 'We will see what happens on September 20,' he
says, hinting that the turning point could come at a second convention
scheduled for his Mouvement des Citoyens later this year.
He has few supporters in the parliamentary Socialist party; seven deputies
in the national assembly and two senators joined him in voting against
altering France's constitution to accommodate Maastricht. 'But in the
electorate, there are thousands and thousands of voters who have been
disinherited,' he says. 'Among the broad left, from the extreme left to
centre-left, there is perhaps one third, and according to some opinion polls
as much as 40 per cent, who are ready to vote against Maastricht.'
Some of these come from communist supporters of Mr Philippe Herzog and of Mr
Charles Fiterman, with whom Mr Chevenement was in government in the early
1980s. 'But the Mouvement des Citoyens has also attracted left-wing
Gaullists, while most of its supporters have no fixed political commitment,'
Mr Chevenement claims.
One would have thought Maastricht's defence provisions would have attracted
this nationalist ex-defence minister, precisely because they have aroused
such suspicion across the Atlantic. Not a bit.
'In the Maastricht treaty, there is the part - economic and monetary union
(Emu) - which is written in ink, and the rest, including defence, is written
in pencil and is destined to disappear'.
'One cannot have a strong European defence with feeble policies to put it
into practice,' says Mr Chevenement, citing the general decline in European
defence spending and the apparent crumbling of European collaborative
defence projects to the probable gain of US military contractors.
The key to Maastricht is 'monetary union, and the deflationary criteria for
it, which will force a number of EC countries to pursue austerity at one and
the same time. Italy, the UK, Spain, even the Netherlands and Germany will
have to submit to a totally unreasonable degree of discipline'.
There is, Mr Chevenement says, 'a certain masochism in this treaty'. If
Maastricht-style austerity closes French export markets in the rest of the
EC, 'the only motor which keeps the French economy going these days will
stop'.
The former minister denounces the outdated vision of l'Europe des
retroviseurs (Europe through the rear mirror) enshrined in Maastricht and
urges a new 'pan-European initiative for growth' encompassing
newly-liberated but unstable eastern Europe.
This region needs open markets in western Europe. But with Maastricht, low
growth in the EC will make that impossible. Like almost all French
politicians, Mr Chevenement believes the EC should open up to industrial
rather than agricultural goods from the east.
Does not part of his political opposition to Maastricht lie in the economic
difficulties of his own region around Belfort, near the Swiss border? He
does not deny the impact of steady local job losses in the car and computer
factories of Peugeot and Bull, and his frustration in trying to remedy this.
Last year he pleaded for EC approval to get a French investment premium for
the Belfort region. 'We were told we couldn't have this, because our GDP per
capita was above the EC average. Of course it is. We produce high-value
goods. Who made up this rule? Not any parliament, but just a bunch of
bureaucrats.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4107</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIIBPAAQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920909
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  09 SEP 92 / The French Referendum: Mixed bag of voters say No to treaty
 -William Dawkins discusses the French campaign against the Maastricht
agreement and, right, profiles some leading lights
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By WILLIAM DAWKINS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THERE is no single campaign against European monetary and political union in
France, rather a rag-bag of campaigns led by diverse and sometimes
conflicting special interest groups.
They stretch from extreme right to extreme left, to farmers, truckers, some
company directors, through the aristocracy to the bourgeois and working
class. They include most of the Communist party and the extreme right-wing
National Front, a majority of Gaullists, some of the UDF centre-right and a
small minority of the ruling Socialists.
Such fragmentation is both a strength and a weakness for the anti-Maastricht
lobby. It indicates that the No vote reaches many corners of society and so
could be hard to turn back. At the same time the No campaign sometimes looks
incoherent.
This impression is reinforced by prophecies that the treaty will create
horrors that cannot actually be traced to details of the text, like the
National Front's warnings that European union will unleash hordes of
immigrants to steal French jobs.
If there is a single thread linking the No protagonists, it is that many
represent constituencies or sectors that have suffered economically from
foreign competition, the decline of traditional industries or slow
development. For them, the Maastricht campaign is a catalyst for general
unhappiness about France.
Lately, it has looked as if the No campaigners may be succumbing to their
weaknesses, as the Yes vote revived to 54-59 per cent, but polls yesterday
showed the race was still close.
Broadly, the No campaign splits into the following camps.
The intellectually respectable campaigners, like Mr Philippe Seguin, the
Gaullist former minister, and his Gaullist colleague Mr Charles Pasqua, or
Mr Jean-Pierre Chevenement, the rebel former Socialist defence minister,
probably represent the core of the No vote.
They stick to actual consequences of Maastricht, such as the economic
rigours of monetary union, powers of a European central bank, and the risk
of French foreign policy being steamrollered by its European partners. They
have, on the whole, kept Mr Mitterrand's record out of their campaigns,
which could add to their moral respectability in voters' eyes.
Also in the intellectually respectable corner is an important minority of
the business lobby, such as Mr Jacques Calvet, chairman of Peugeot car
maker, and Mr Pierre Suard, chairman of Alcatel Alsthom, the
telecommunications and engineering group.
Then there is the populist section of the No camp, which plays on fears that
France is losing its importance in Europe - appealing more to general
nationalist sentiment than to the precise consequences of the Maastricht
project. The anti-immigrant Mr Jean-Marie Le Pen, National Front leader,
with his Wagnerian oratory is the prime example, although Mr Philippe de
Villiers, a rebel UDF member of parliament, has also made a vivid impression
on the hustings.
Outside party politics are the special interest groups. Anti-European
feeling was part of the truckers' summer demonstrations against tough new
driving regulations - which have nothing to do with the EC, let alone the
treaty - while hunting lobby groups have complained that Maastricht will
curb their right to shoot turtle doves.
The start of the official media campaign earlier this week could help to
focus electors' minds on the real issues. But a significant proportion of
the electorate may still be mulling over the wrong questions.
Tomorrow: the Yes campaign
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4108</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIIBPAAPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920909
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  09 SEP 92 / The French Referendum: How unity sentiment hits the bond
markets
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SARA WEBB
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IN THE run-up to the French referendum on the Maastricht Treaty, the
Financial Times will show the impact of political developments on the
French, German, Italian and UK government bond markets by tracking the
movements in bond yields, writes Sara Webb.
Denmark's rejection of the treaty in June dealt a blow to Europe's
government bond markets by casting doubt on prospects for European union.
Until then, investors had hoped to benefit from the convergence in European
inflation rates and interest rates: they had invested in the higher-yielding
bond markets, such as Spain and Italy, assuming that as Spanish and Italian
interest rates converged with those in Germany they would make a profit on
their bond holdings.
Denmark's rejection of the treaty made them wary of the high-yielding
markets - a reaction accentuated by fears about the French vote.
If France looks like backing the treaty, the high-yielding markets such as
Italy - and to a lesser extent, France and the UK - are likely to benefit
and show a fall in bond yields. If France looks set to reject Maastricht,
these markets will see a rise in yields (corresponding to a fall in bond
prices), while German bonds are likely to gain as investors seek the safety
of the D-Mark.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4109</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIIBPAAOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920909
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  09 SEP 92 / The French Referendum: Top Communist under pressure
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Mr Georges Marchais, secretary general of the Communist party.
THE 72-year-old Mr Marchais has led what must be one of the last bastions of
Stalinist orthodoxy in the world for the past 20 years.
The Maastricht treaty's emphasis on economic liberalism and its social
democratic values go against all his beliefs. His party supporters, who
represent less than 10 per cent of the national vote, follow that line
loyally.
Even if there is no significant split on Maastricht among the Communists, Mr
Marchais is under constant pressure from the growing minority in his party
who want to update its creaking ideologies. He created turmoil in the ranks
last month by admitting, on his first trip to the US, that the theory of
democratic centralism might have had its day.
But apart from that, Mr Marchais has played his anti-Maastricht campaign
true to form, warning that the treaty will add to unemployment. He has urged
voters to keep domestic politics out of the debate, if only because Mr
Marchais knows that it is not in the Communists' interests to provoke a
general election. Their popularity has suffered badly since the last
legislative poll in 1988.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4110</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIIBPAANFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920909
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  09 SEP 92 / The French Referendum: Le Pen aims to sway moderates
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Mr Jean-Marie Le Pen, president of the National Front.
THE defence of national sovereignty against immigrants, Eurocrats and
'federasts' is the stock-in-trade of 64-year-old Mr Jean-Marie Le Pen, head
of Europe's largest extreme right-wing party.
So far, Mr Le Pen has conducted a surprisingly moderate campaign by his own
bombastic standards, perhaps in an attempt to draw support from the large
proportion of undecided voters, many of whom are probably moderates.
He argues that Maastricht is preparing for a federal Europe 'in a sly and
undemocratic manner', an 'absurd' project at a time when other federations
across the world are breaking up. He accuses the government of treason in
signing the treaty.
Traditionally, the National Front appeals to a wide section of the working
class, who feel most threatened by immigration. Yet the party also has
bourgeois roots: Mr Le Pen started his political career in the 1950s with
the Poujadists, the shopkeepers' party. Geographically, however, Mr Le Pen's
appeal is far wider. His party won nearly 14 per cent of the vote in last
March's regional elections and is the second most powerful in the three
largest regional councils.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4111</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIIBPAAMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920909
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  09 SEP 92 / The French Referendum: Old suspicion of bureaucracies
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Le Vicomte Philippe Le Jolis de Villiers de Saintignon, UDF member of
parliament for the Vendee.
THE aristocratic Mr Philippe de Villiers, 43, comes from a traditionally
Catholic corner of France, which has been conservative for hundreds of
years.
The Vendee fought against the French revolution and has ever since been
suspicious of centralising bureaucracies, whether in Paris or in Brussels.
Mr de Villiers plays on this tradition to the full and fulminated against
Brussels 'technocrats' in the Figaro newspaper yesterday.
Although he is a member of the centre-right UDF, Mr de Villiers is closer to
the far right wing of the Gaullist party and campaigns for a Europe of
loosely co-ordinating sovereign states, based on 'moral, religious and
family values.'
A former junior culture minister in the 1986-1988 Gaullist government, Mr de
Villiers is also out for President Francois Mitterrand's blood. He has
irritated even his own party leaders by calling on voters to use the
referendum to oust the president, as they did when General Charles de Gaulle
called a referendum on decentralisation in 1969.
His style is aggressive and enemies accuse Mr de Villiers of using the
campaign as much to further his political ambitions as to oppose Maastricht.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4112</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIIBPAALFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920909
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  09 SEP 92 / The French Referendum: Gonzalez move rejected
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER BRUCE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MADRID
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE Spanish parliament yesterday turned down an attempt by Prime Minister
Felipe Gonzalez and his government to ratify the Maastricht Treaty before
the French referendum on the Treaty on September 20.
The move robs Mr Gonzalez, who has already intervened personally in the
French debate, of a further opportunity to signal Spain's enthusiasm for
Maastricht to French voters.
However, the Spanish parliament had not been expected to agree to hasty
ratification. Although the Socialists have half the seats in the parliament,
the parliamentary party saw little to be gained by forcing an early vote.
Spanish ratification is a virtual certainty, as there is little opposition
to Maastricht. A first step was taken this summer when parliament voted to
adapt the constitution to the treaty by agreeing to allow foreigners to vote
in local elections.
The only difficulty in allowing ratification to take longer is that
parliamentary debate could be delayed until next year and become embroiled
in electioneering. Mr Gonzalez has to hold a general election by October
1993 and could call it next spring.
However, European union promises little trouble politically for the
government. Practically all the parties and the main union leaders support
the EC treaty changes agreed last December.
Opposition parties and the trades unions are having difficulty turning Mr
Gonzalez' support for Maastricht, and his contribution to President Francois
Mitterrand's campaign, to their advantage. Their best effort has been to
attack him for being 'undemocratic' because of his refusal to call a
referendum, thereby denying Spaniards the opportunity to vote Yes.
The government has no intention of calling a referendum. Facing quite severe
economic trouble, it fears a referendum campaign would quickly turn into a
general election warm-up.
Mr Javier Solana, the foreign minister, said this week that Spain would
ratify Maastricht even if the French voted No this month.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4113</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIIBPAAKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920909
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  09 SEP 92 / The French Referendum: Milan share prices improve
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT GRAHAM
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   ROME
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
SHARES on the Milan stock exchange recovered slightly yesterday as dealers
reassessed the outcome of the French referendum on the Maastricht Treaty and
speculators' nerves steadied after the sharp falls in the past week.
Prices on average rose 1.6 per cent, clawing back part of the 3.02 per cent
fall on Monday triggered by concerns over the impact of last Friday's 1.75
point rise in the discount rate which in turn forced commercial banks to
raise their own prime rates.
The lira again reflected market sentiment about an eventual realignment and
fell back from Monday's fixing against the D-Mark of 763.40 to 764. Dealers
described the lira as having entered a phase of 'armed truce' against the
D-Mark, with the Italian authorities having made clear their determination
to defend the parity.
The precarious position of the lira and the need to regain international
confidence was emphasised yesterday by Mr Andrea Monorchio, comptroller
general of the public accounts.
He told a parliamentary commission yesterday that the Amato government had
to give a 'strong signal' and intimated that it had to consider even tougher
measures than had already being prepared in the 1993 budget to reduce the
public sector deficit. Each one percentage point rise in the discount rate,
he said, raised the government's needs by L15,000bn (Pounds 7bn) in a full
year.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4114</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIIBPAAJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920909
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  09 SEP 92 / The French Referendum: Opinion polls show race is still
close
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By WILLIAM DAWKINS and ROBERT MAUTHNER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   PARIS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
LEADING industrialists, academics and Catholic clerics yesterday joined the
French campaign in favour of European union, as the latest polls showed a
continuing close race between supporters and opponents of the Maastricht
treaty.
A survey by polling institute IFOP yesterday gave a mere 50.5 per cent
majority for Maastricht, a sharp retreat from recent results. Another poll
by Sofres put the majority at 53 per cent, but said nearly a fifth of voters
had not yet made up their minds.
Mr Pierre Beregovoy, the prime minister, acknowledged yesterday that the
result would be tight.
Mr Jack Lang, education and culture minister, who is in charge of the
official Yes campaign, admitted last night that French governments had made
a mistake in the past in failing to associate the public with the
development of the European Community.
Support for the treaty is strongest among the younger age groups, according
to another IFOP poll, showing a 57.5 per cent majority among 18-to-24 year
olds.
The heads of Saint-Gobain, the glass and pipes maker, Lafarge Coppee cement
group and BSN, France's largest food company, urged voters to support
monetary and political union in the September 20 referendum.
'If we say No, the D-Mark will be the major reserve currency. There won't be
a second chance,' said Mr Antoine Riboud, chairman of BSN. 'We can't go on
with the risk of a devaluation of the lira or the peseta.'
However, French business is almost as divided on Maastricht as the public
generally. Only 53 per cent of industrialists favour the treaty, according
to a poll in yesterday's Figaro.
The church entered the campaign for the first time yesterday, with an appeal
for a Yes in Le Monde newspaper by Mgr Joseph Duval, Archbishop of Rouen and
president of the Roman Catholic Bishops' Conference.
According to a BVA poll for the magazine Paris Match, only Britain among
France's main European Community partners would vote against European union.
British voters would reject European union by a 56 per cent majority in the
event of a referendum, said BVA. Italy would produce 76 per cent in favour
of the treaty, while 68 per cent of Spanish voters and 60 per cent of
Germans support European union.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4115</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIIBPAAIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920909
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  09 SEP 92 / MMC to examine medical fees: Private insurers worried that
BMA guidelines are driving up costs
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD DONKIN and ANDREW JACK
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
PRIVATE MEDICAL fees in the UK are to come under official scrutiny for the
first time in a widespread investigation by the Monopolies and Mergers
Commission.
Sir Bryan Carsberg, director-general of fair trading, yesterday asked the
MMC to investigate the way in which private medical fees are set by
consultants.
The inquiry has been prompted by concerns over guideline charges first
published by the British Medical Association in 1989. The OFT says these
'set recommended fee rates' for medical and surgical procedures, with
separate amounts for the contribution made by anaesthetists.
The BMA strongly rejected the OFT's assertion that it had laid down
recommended rates and said the guidelines reflected the average rate charged
by consultants for private work around the country. 'We have always acted in
the spirit of competition in producing these guidelines and our publication
serves the public interest,' it said.
The MMC will investigate whether a monopoly exists and, if so, whether any
aspect of the supply of these services operates against the public interest.
It now has 12 months to report to Mr Michael Heseltine, the trade and
industry secretary.
The referral to the MMC appears partly to have been spurred by complaints
from private medical insurers that increases in costs have been driven by
the BMA guidelines.
The OFT said yesterday that the inquiry had not arisen from any specific
complaints. The announcement carried the underlying suspicion that
consultants who carry out private work and the BMA, their professional
association, may have created a fee monopoly. Health service professionals
have noticed private fees, many of which were originally below the BMA
guidelines, creeping up to the levels of the published figures since they
were introduced three years ago.
The rising fees have particularly concerned big private medical insurers
which are under growing pressure from patients demanding their services.
They claim the guidelines will have the effect of increasing medical rates
and reducing competition.
Private health care has grown rapidly during the 1980s. More than 12 per
cent of the UK population now has medical insurance which pays the bulk of
the estimated Pounds 500m charged annually by private consultants.
The OFT said that, if adhered to by a significant proportion of consultant
doctors, the BMA scales 'may affect the nature of competition and the level
of fees in the market for the supply of private medical services'.
Mr Roy Forman, chief executive of Private Patients Planning Group, said:
'All through the period since these guidelines were established we have said
that they were not advisable.'
Mr Tim Baker, business development manager with Norwich Union Health Care,
said consultants had historically used rates published by Bupa, one of the
UK's largest private insurers.
He said the rates in the BMA guidelines had generally been above the levels
published by Bupa, and prices charged by consultants had risen to the BMA
rates as a result. 'A growing number of doctors are using the BMA schedule,'
he said. 'It is gaining weight within the profession.' Mr Baker added that
the prices charged reflected a period in the past when private treatment
represented a far smaller proportion of the work of doctors. 'There needs to
be a public debate on these issues,' he said.
The announcement came only days after the BMA had carried out its second
review of the guidelines first published in 1989.
Medical inquiry, Page 7
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4116</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIIBPAAHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920909
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  09 SEP 92 / World News In Brief: Cocaine haul
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Cocaine worth an estimated Pounds 6m was found by customs officers at
Sheerness, Kent, hidden in a trailer carrying a car owned by a top motor
racing team, Vic Lee Motorsport of Northfleet, Kent - holder of the British
Touring Car Championship title. Lee and three others were charged with the
illegal importation of drugs. Four other people were released on bail.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4117</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIIBPAAGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920909
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  09 SEP 92 / World News In Brief: Police smash crime network
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
A gang selling equipment for use in crimes was smashed by armed police in a
series of dawn raids across the country. Items seized included weapons,
explosives, stolen cars and more than Pounds 1.5m in counterfeit currency.
Fourteen people were charged with various offences and 13 others are still
in custody.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4118</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIIBPAAFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920909
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  09 SEP 92 / Nordic markets hit by financial turmoil in Europe
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT TAYLOR and KAREN FOSSLI
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   HELSINKI, OSLO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
EUROPEAN financial turbulence swept northwards yesterday as Finland allowed
the markka to be devalued and Sweden raised interest rates by 8 percentage
points to 24 per cent to support the krona.
Both moves were forced by lack of confidence on the foreign exchanges over
economic policies in Sweden and Finland.
The Finnish central bank's decision to end the markka's link to the European
currency unit and allow it to float freely led to an effective devaluation
of the markka by 13 per cent.
The Bank of Sweden's action to raise its key short-term lending rate to a
record level was an effort to forestall a further flight of speculative
capital out of the krona.
'Finland's decision does not alter Swedish exchange rate policy,' said Mr
Bengt Dennis, governor of the Bank of Sweden. The bank would use every means
at its disposal to defend the krona's exchange rate, he said.
The Swedish minority coalition government also reaffirmed its policy of
seeking further unpopular cuts in budget spending later this year. 'We are
standing firm behind our existing economic policies,' said Mrs Anne Wibble,
finance minister. She said that there were 'not any limits for how high the
interest rate should go to defend the krona. What needs to be done will be
done'.
The moves, the latest sign of international currency unrest sparked by the
weakness of the dollar and a surge of funds into the D-Mark, sparked
opposite reactions on the Swedish and Finnish stock markets.
The Helsinki stock exchange rose more than 5 per cent, buoyed by the relief
the lower markka will bring to hard-pressed exporters. In Stockholm, the
stock market fell 3 per cent as economists forecast that 1993 could bring a
third successive year of falling economic output.
Yesterday's action was accompanied by a sharp rise in interest rates in
Norway where the central bank stressed that the krone would stay tied to the
Ecu.
Norway's short-term interest rates leapt to a near four-year high, with
one-month rates up to 17.02 per cent from 13.44 per cent on Monday. Den
norske Bank, Norway's biggest bank, announced a 1 percentage point increase
in interest rates on commercial loans and deposits from September 23.
Yesterday's move by Finland seems likely to complicate its application to
join the European Community later in the 1990s. The European Commission in
Brussels said it 'regretted' the Finnish decision, noting that any candidate
to join the EC's planned economic and monetary union had to stick to
membership rules agreed at the Maastricht summit.
Finland admitted that its commitment to align its economy more closely with
the EC required it to restore a fixed exchange rate with other European
currencies when the economic situation permitted.
Mrs Sirkka Hamalainen, the Finnish central bank's governor, said she could
not say how long the markka would be allowed to float. 'We will take a
position on this issue when the financial markets have stabilised. It is
clear, however, that this will not be a matter of days or weeks.'
Background Page 3
Editorial Comment Page 18
Lex Page 20
Capital markets Page 29
Currencies Page 31
World stocks Page 37
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4119</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIIBPAAEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920909
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  09 SEP 92 / Lamont stands firm
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
MR Norman Lamont has defended his refusal to devalue the pound ahead of next
month's Tory conference where critical motions calling for early interest
rate cuts have been tabled.
Fears that there will be no short-term cut in interest rates led to new
falls in European stock markets. The FT-SE 100 index closed 34.5 down at
2,337.7. Sterling and the dollar weakened against the D-Mark.
Report, Page 20
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4120</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIIBPAADFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920909
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  09 SEP 92 / CBI chief outlines areas for joint action to TUC
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID GOODHART, Labour Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MR HOWARD DAVIES, direc-tor-general of the Confederation of British
Industry, yesterday outlined the terms for a closer working relationship
between the CBI and the Trades Union Congress, telling the TUC Congress in
Blackpool that 'my door will always be open'.
Mr Davies's speech, the first by a CBI leader to the TUC, was generally well
received, although about 50 delegates, led by Mr Arthur Scargill, the
leftwing miners' leader, walked out.
The CBI leader was unruffled by the reaction and attempted to allay the
suspicion of delegates by stressing his humble background and his love of
Manchester City football club.
He said later that a walk-out by Mr Scargill was 'like a rained-off cricket
match at Lord's, part of the British way of life'.
Mr Davies's speech was interrupted several times by shouts and jeers,
particularly when he repeated his view that the public sector pay bill
should not rise, but there were as many interruptions for applause, notably
when he urged more public investment in transport and training.
Mr Davies said the main areas for dialogue between the CBI and TUC were
manufacturing competitiveness, training and Europe. But he did not expect to
see joint approaches to government by the two organisations.
On Europe, Mr Davies said there could be Community regulations in which the
common interests between employers and employees were greater than the
differences.
Afterwards, Mr Bill Morris, the leader of the left-of-centre TGWU general
union, the biggest in Britain, said that 80 per cent of the speech could
have been written by any member of the TUC general council.
Points welcomed by union leaders included Mr Davies's commitment to the
public sector, his emphasis on 'social dialogue' between unions and
employers in Europe despite the UK's opt-out from the social chapter of the
Maastricht treaty and his view that 'senior management pay should be subject
to exactly the same market and profitability disciplines as that of the
workforce'.
He drew the wrath of the local government union Nalgo when he compared
changes in local government since 1979 unfavourably with those in the NHS.
He also took issue with the view, expressed by several union leaders
yesterday, that sterling was overvalued in relation to other European
currencies.
TUC reports, Page 8
Editorial Comment, Page 18
Not so super-unions, Page 18
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4121</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIIBPAACFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920909
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  09 SEP 92 / Stock &amp; Currency Markets
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
 -----------------------------------------------------
STOCK MARKET INDICES
 -----------------------------------------------------
FT-SE 100: 2,337.7 (-34.5)
Yield  5.18
FT-SE Eurotrack 100 1,029.38 (-2.90)
FT-A All-Share 1,106.46 (-1.3%)
FT-A World Index 143.23 (-0.5%)
Nikkei  18,282.42 (-157.76)
New York:
Dow Jones Ind Ave 3,260.59 (-21.34)
S&amp;P Composite 414.44 (-2.64)
 -----------------------------------------------------
US CLOSING RATES
 -----------------------------------------------------
Federal Funds: 3 1/8% (2 7/8%)
3-mo Treas Bills: Yld 2.951% (2.962%)
Long Bond 100 5/16 (99 9/16) Yield 7.219% (7.28%)
 -----------------------------------------------------
LONDON MONEY
 -----------------------------------------------------
3-mo Interbank 10 7/16% (10 5/16%)
Liffe long gilt future: Sep 96 17/32 (Sep 97 15/32)
 -----------------------------------------------------
NORTH SEA OIL (Argus)
 -----------------------------------------------------
Brent 15-day (Oct) Dollars 20.325 (20.275)
 -----------------------------------------------------
Gold
 -----------------------------------------------------
New York Comex (Sept) Dollars 342.5 (341.3)
London Dollars 342.4 (343.15)
 -----------------------------------------------------
STERLING
 -----------------------------------------------------
New York:
Dollars 2.0045 (1.996)
London:
Dollars 2.004 (1.993)
DM 2.7875 (2.795)
FFr 9.495 (9.5075)
SFr 2.47 (2.4925)
Y 246 (246.25)
Pounds Index 92.4 (same)
 -----------------------------------------------------
DOLLAR
 -----------------------------------------------------
New York:
DM 1.39405 (1.4017)
FFr 4.744 (4.7685)
SFr 1.2345 (1.2506)
Y 122.835 (123.125)
London:
DM 1.3915 (1.403)
FFr 4.7375 (4.77)
SFr 1.2325 (1.2505)
Y 122.7 (123.5)
Dollars Index 58.3 (58.6)
Tokyo open Y 122.62
 -----------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4122</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIIBPAABFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920909
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  09 SEP 92 / Tougher legislation on insider dealing planned
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT PESTON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE GOVERNMENT is to intro-duce tough legislation against insider dealing,
in an attempt to improve its poor prosecutions record against individuals
and companies which make huge dealing profits from the use of confidential
information.
The legislation, to be introduced in parliament next month as part of the
Criminal Justice Bill, includes some new offences and closes loopholes in
the existing law.
For the first time, dealing in gilt-edged stock on the basis of inside
information will be banned. According to a Treasury official, inside
information in such a case would include advance knowledge of a change in
government-controlled interest rates.
Advance knowledge of UK trade figures, however, would not be regarded as
inside information, because such information is too 'general' under the
terms of the act.
It will also become illegal for someone with inside information to encourage
someone else to deal in shares, even if that other person is not told the
information.
This is in part aimed at stamping out the 'broker's lunch', a venerable City
tradition, during which a director talks freely about his or her company's
prospects over a relaxed meal with brokers in the City.
If brokers subsequently encourage their clients or market makers to deal in
shares of that company, the brokers will be guilty of insider trading - even
if they do not pass on to clients or market makers information they have
been given by the director.
The definition of inside information will also be broadened to cover
information which affects a company's share price, even though the
information is not about that particular company. The current draft of the
new law defines inside information as information 'not only where it is
about the company but also where it may affect a company's business
prospects'.
The Treasury official gave an example: 'If someone discovered that a company
had closed down and then sold the shares of that company's competitor, that
would be insider trading.'
The British Merchant Banking Association is concerned that City firms'
traditional way of doing business will be threatened by the new law. It
fears that analysts will not be able to talk to any quoted companies - as
they do regularly now - without receiving inside information.
The Treasury said yesterday that analysts' research will have to be based on
publicly available information. It said it had 'bent over backwards' to
ensure that analysts would be able to publish research so long as this
research was the result of 'diligent digging' into publicly available
information.
It will also be illegal to deal on the basis of confidential information
relating to a 'class of issuers of securities', as well as information
relating to an individual issuer. Unpublished information relating to an
industry, rather than a single company, will become inside information.
The government was obliged to replace the Companies Securities (Insider
Dealing) Act so that UK law becomes consistent with a new European directive
on insider dealing.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4123</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIIBPAAAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920909
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  09 SEP 92 / World News in Brief: Gunman shot dead
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
A Jewish gunman was shot dead by police after he burst into a mental health
clinic in Jerusalem and killed four women staff members. Two other women
were wounded. The motive for the attack is unclear.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4124</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIJB4AG1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920909
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  09 SEP 92 / International Company News: Charges rise at Generale Bank
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BRUSSELS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
GENERALE BANK, Belgium's biggest bank, said 1992 first-half depreciation and
loan loss provisions rose from the first half of 1991, Reuter reports from
Brussels.
Depreciation, provisions and write-offs rose to BFr5.8bn (Dollars 200m) from
BFr5.2bn in the first half of 1991. Consolidated depreciation, provisions,
tax and minority interests rose to BFr7.7bn from BFr6.8bn in the same period
last year.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
International Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4125</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIJB4AG0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920909
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  09 SEP 92 / Malawi dissident bailed
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   LUSAKA
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
A MALAWI magistrates court yesterday charged dissident Chakufwa Chihana with
three counts of sedition and freed him on bail unconditionally, his lawyer
said, Reuter reports from Lusaka.
Mr Bazuka Mhango told Reuters that Mr Chihana, who attended the court in the
northern town of Zomba, was in good health and heading towards Malawi's
capital.
'He has been charged with three offences related to sedition but we applied
for bail and the magistrate ordered that he be released. He is now on his
way home,' Mr Mhango said.
The charges stem from statements Mr Chihana, 52, made in a July interview
with the BBC shortly after his release from detention on earlier sedition
charges.
He had said he would continue to mobilise popular support to end the
one-party rule of Mr Kamuzu Banda, self-declared life president who has held
power since 1964 independence from Britain.
Banda, accused last week of continued human rights abuses by Amnesty
International, says he still enjoys wide support.
Chihana is expected to appear in court on September 21 in connection with
the first sedition charges following his return to Malawi from meetings in
Lusaka with exiles last April.
He was re-arrested shortly after his release in July 10.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
International Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4126</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIJB4AGZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920909
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  09 SEP 92 / Austria tackles scrap cars problem
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By IAN RODGER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   VIENNA
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Austria has established a compulsory system for recycling all derelict cars,
writes Ian Rodger in Vienna. A voluntary agreement has been reached that
requires car dealers to take back an old car or van without charge when a
consumer buys another.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
International Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4127</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIJB4AGYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920909
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  09 SEP 92 / Contract to destroy chemical arms
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW FISHER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   FRANKFURT
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Two German companies have signed an agreement with Russia to destroy
chemical weapons of the former Soviet Union, writes Andrew Fisher in
Frankfurt. A joint venture will be formed between Metalchim Progress, a
Russian company, and Deutsche Aerospace and Lurgi (part of
Metallgesellschaft).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
International Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4128</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIJB4AGXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920909
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  09 SEP 92 / Multinationals organise in Hungary
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NICHOLAS DENTON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BUDAPEST
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Multinationals in Hungary are seeking to translate economic weight into
political influence by setting up a lobbying group, writes Nicholas Denton
in Budapest. The Hungarian subsidiaries of 15 companies, led by Philips,
General Electric and Ford, and representing Dollars 1.5bn of Dollars 4.2bn
in foreign investment, have founded the Hungarian Association of
International Companies.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
International Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4129</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIJB4AGWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920909
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  09 SEP 92 / Christian Democrats probe Calabria scandal
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT GRAHAM
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   ROME
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE Christian Democrat leadership has decided to send a senior
representative to Reggio Calabria to assess the consequences of the arrest
of 12 of its leading members on alleged corruption charges on Monday, writes
Robert Graham in Rome.
Those arrested include four ex-mayors of the southern city and two Christian
Democrat members of parliament, along with another Republican deputy. The
charges all bear similarity with those levelled in the Milan municipal
corruption scandal  - the concession of public works contracts in return for
kick-backs for illegal financing of political parties. Also allegedly
involved are two executives of construction companies, Mr Vincenzo
Lodigiani, head of his family company of the same name and Italy's second
largest constuction concern, and Mr Giorgio de Camillis, managing director
of Bonifica.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
International Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4130</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIJB4AGVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920909
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  09 SEP 92 / Yeltsin speeds up troop pull-out from Lithuania
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LEYLA BOULTON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MOSCOW
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
PRESIDENT Boris Yeltsin yesterday agreed to withdraw 20,500 troops stationed
in the Baltic republic of Lithuania by next August, writes Leyla Boulton in
Moscow. This is despite a shortage of housing for them back home.
An agreement signed yesterday follows persistent clamouring by the three
newly independent Baltic states for an instant withdrawal of former Red Army
troops on their territory. Lithuania which has been the most generous in its
treatment of Russian minorities on its soil is the first republic to win
such a promise. Estonia and Latvia, which have much bigger Russian
minorities, have placed tough restrictions on which Russians can acquire
local citizenship.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
International Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4131</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIJB4AGUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920909
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  09 SEP 92 / Russian offer to ex-Soviet states on debt
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LEYLA BOULTON and DMITRY VOLKOV
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MOSCOW
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
RUSSIA is pressing other republics to give up claims on assets of the former
Soviet Union in return for its full responsibility for a Dollars 70bn
foreign debt which it hopes to reschedule later this month.
Mr Alexander Shokhin, the deputy prime minister responsible for foreign
economic relations, said Belarus, Turkmenistan and Kyrgyzstan already agreed
to give up claims in bilateral agreements with Russia.
Mr Shokhin said that after the failure of the December agreement to assume
joint and several responsibility for the debt, Russia, which had so far been
carrying the debt burden alone, could only afford Dollars 2.5bn-Dollars 3bn
a year in debt repayments. The assets include embassies and gold reserves
but Mr Shokhin said that republics mistakenly believed that they were worth
more than the former Soviet Union's liabilities.
Debt repayments due before any of the debt deferrals which have already been
agreed, or any rescheduling which may be clinched in future, came to Dollars
20.5bn in 1992 and would be Dollars 16.5bn next year, according to a study
by a western banks advising the government.
Mr Shokhin, who will be discussing the debt issue with western finance
ministers at next week's annual session of the International Monetary Fund
and World Bank, said he hoped a rescheduling would be agreed by Paris Club
creditors when they meet in the French capital later this month.
He also charged that negligence by the central bank was partly responsible
for the recent sharp fall in the rouble.
A group of western and Russian experts funded by a Dollars 3.5m grant from
the World Bank is to help prepare textbooks and a programme of training in
market skills needed to operate a market economy in Russia, writes Dmitry
Volkov in Moscow. Professor Richard Layard, who also advises the Russian
government, said 'millions have to be trained in commercial skills' such as
accounting and banking.
The programme is aimed at giving short professional training courses of six
to seven months to Russian professionals who lose their jobs as a result of
the switch to a market economy, as well as to school leavers, and men who
retire early from the army.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
International Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4132</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIJB4AGTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920909
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  09 SEP 92 / Romanians chase paper profits from privatisation: Efforts to
bury suspicion of capitalism
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By VIRGINIA MARSH
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE pedlars in Bucharest's University Square have a new ware to hawk this
summer: privatisation vouchers.
Trade is brisk. Since June 1, when the National Privatisation Agency (NPA)
opened registration, more than 8.4m vouchers have been issued to the public.
The public is to receive vouchers for 30 per cent of all shares in 6,200
state-run enterprises up for privatisation.
'It doesn't matter that people are trading their vouchers straightaway. The
important thing is that for the first time in 40 years Romanians have a
financial asset they can dispose of freely and which cannot be retracted,'
says Mr Teodor Nicolaescu, the NPA'S director general.
Mr Nicolaescu says the past 12 months have produced noticeable results. For
instance, more than 5,000 small businesses, restaurants, shops and
factories, have been sold to the public.
About 5,500 small and medium-sized companies have been allocated to five
Private Ownership Funds into which domestic and foreign investors can buy
and sell. A State Ownership Fund has been set up to manage and hold the
equity of the commercial companies.
A pilot scheme was launched last month in an attempt to attract greater
public support for the privatisation process. This involved selling Vranco,
a clothes manufacturer, and Ursus, a brewery.
'We needed a success to increase public confidence,' said Mr Doru Tiberiu,
the NPA's general manager. 'Many politicians and sections of the media have
misrepresented what we have been doing. They are feeding fears that mass
privatisation equals mass unemployment and that the country is being sold
out to foreigners,' he added.
The pilot scheme involved splitting Vranco's equity. Incom SpA, an Italian
company, bought 51 per cent of the equity, while the remainder was divided
between the company's 3,800 employees. In addition, Incom guaranteed jobs
for two years, and undertook to invest Dollars 5m over five years.
Ursus, was privatised differently. The majority of its shares was sold via a
public offer, while the remaining 49 per cent is expected to be sold to one
or more strategic investors. The NPA hopes that the methods used to
privatise the two companies will serve as a blueprint for future sales.
Yet, despite these successes, the NPA admits the scheme, which involves 30
companies, is progressing slowly.
Roland Berger, the German management consultants who are assisting Romania's
privatisation through the the European Community's Phare programme,
attribute the delays in part to Romania's unpopularity with foreign
investors.
'It remains difficult to convince western companies to look at Romania when
they have other opportunities closer to home, and when the country's image
in the media has been one of political and social instability,' says Mr
Michael Nagel of Roland Berger. The consultants helped privatise Vranco and
hope to complete negotiations for Pantera, a shoe manufacturer, later this
month.
Significantly, companies specialising in textiles, leather and furniture
making, considered amongst Romania's most promising industries, have
attracted interest from German and Italian companies. This lingering, and
inherent public suspicion of foreigners is being eagerly tapped by the
country's political parties, which are in the middle of parliamentary and
presidential election campaigns. The outcome of the elections could well
determine the extent of any future foreign investment in Romania.
Political parties in the campaign are debating the pace and depth of reform
during the country's transition to a market economy. Indeed, Mr Adrian
Severin, head of the NPA, says the entire economic  - and political  -
reform programme could become unhinged, as nationalist opposition parties
regroup. These parties, such as the Vatra Romaneasca, are xenophobic and
critical of any foreign involvement in the country.
Some of the opposition to reforms also comes from the National Salvation
Front, which was catapulted into power following the overthrow of the
Ceausescu regime in December 1989. The irony is that one of its leading
members is Mr Severin.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
International Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4133</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIJB4AGSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920909
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  09 SEP 92 / IMF warning on burdens carried by Polish economy
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANTHONY ROBINSON and CHRISTOPHER BOBINSKI
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   WARSAW
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
A VISITING IMF team has warned that Poland's economic recovery is still
threatened by deteriorating public finances, the effects of this year's
severe drought and the low profitability and high debt of most state-owned
enterprises.
However, the team said it was encouraged by a sharp growth of industrial
production, lower inflation and rising exports and yesterday praised the
Polish government for putting together an 'impressive' package of economic
stabilisation measures. The package should lay the foundation for sustained
growth and restore financial equilibrium, said the IMF team which was
completing a week of talks.
The assessment clears the way for formal negotiations next month on a new
letter of intent.
The aim of the Polish government is to finalise a new 15- to 18-month IMF
loan agreement before the end of the year followed by a resumption of debt
reduction talks with commercial bank creditors represented by the London
Club.
Mr Michael Deppler, deputy director of the IMF's European Department who led
the mission, said the public finance adjustment problem reflected three
years of rising expenditure on pensions and other social programmes and
declining revenues.
Social spending rose from 11 to 21 per cent of GNP between 1989 and 1992
while state revenues fell from 36 per cent of GNP in 1989 to 26 per cent of
a lower GNP this year.
'The solution is to raise revenue and cut spending and that is what the
government plans to do,' he added.
The finance ministry plans to raise turnover taxes prior to the introduction
of a value added tax next year, impose a 10 per cent surcharge on 75 per
cent of Polish imports and allow inflation to erode the real value of tax
allowances and pensions.
The government also plans to improve the management of state enterprises,
speed up mass privatisation and restructure the finances of both banks and
enterprises.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
International Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4134</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAFOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Lib Dems demand schools reform
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW ADONIS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ABOLITION of England's local education authorities was proposed yesterday by
the Liberal Democrats, making theirs the first opposition party to accept
the end of the structure under which the schools system has been managed
since 1902.
The Liberal Democrats wish to see elected 'education departments' with
closely circumscribed responsibilities for monitoring standards, promoting
quality and strategic planning - and for arbitrating in disputes between
head teachers and school governors.
However, the party rejects the government's plan for a single national
education quango to oversee grant-maintained schools. Its departments would
be elected and based on local communities.
Mr Don Foster, the party's education spokesman, said: 'we want to increase
the independence of all schools, so that each can develop its own
distinctive ethos and style, liberated from the strictures of local
education authority control.'
The Liberal Democrats also advocate the replacement of A-levels with an
'English baccalaureate' bringing vocational and academic subjects together
in a single structure. Students at the post-16 level would study a
compulsory 'core' of English, maths, a science and a modern language.
Employers would be obliged to give all employees up to the age of 19 at
least two days a week off to study for national vocational qualifications.
A general teaching council would be established to promote the professional
status of teachers, oversee standards and advise the government.
The party calls for the school teachers' pay review body to assess
'realistically' the need for improved salaries, but rejects proposals to
link teacher appraisal to pay as the government proposes.
The party makes a commitment to increasing student numbers to 2m by the year
2000 while abolishing the student loans scheme.
Although it pledges to 'match the expansion with additional resources', the
funding implications of an increase of that order are not discussed in
detail.
Excellence for All, Liberal Democrats, 4 Cowley Street, London SW1. Pounds
4.25.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4135</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQABOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / American Express fined over death fall
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
AMERICAN Express was fined Pounds 1,500 in Poole, Dorset, yesterday after
magistrates heard that one of its executives had fallen to his death from an
unsafe third-floor window.
Mr Bernard Rogers, a compliance director, fell 60ft last November while
trying to open the window at the company's offices in High Street, Poole,
the court heard. Mr Rogers, of Bournemouth, died from multiple injuries.
An inquest jury later returned a verdict of accidental death after hearing
that restraints that would have prevented the centrally pivoted window from
opening fully were not in place at the time.
The company was prosecuted by Poole Borough Council under the Health and
Safety at Work Act 1974.
American Express admitted failing to discharge its duty by not ensuring the
safety of an employee.
Mr Shaun Ferris, for American Express, told the court that a colleague of Mr
Rogers noticed that the window restraints were not in place shortly before
the event, and planned to replace them later that day.
'The defendants have now well and truly put their house in order,' he said.
'They are not likely to re-offend or ever reappear before you again.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4136</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAGHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Survey of European Finance and Investment, The Netherlands
(7): International focus - Insurers are looking to foreign markets
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD LAPPER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
INSURANCE broker Cor Van den Bord regrets the fact that he cannot place big
ticket commercial risks business with his native Dutch companies.
'It is a pity that our companies have not followed Dutch industry abroad,'
says Mr Van den Bord, who works with Amsterdam-based Alexander Bekouw. 'It
would be nice to place business with Dutch insurers.'
The fact remains though that the Netherlands leading insurance companies
barely compete in the market for the larger industrial and commercial risks
business, leaving the field free for their larger French, Swiss and
especially German rivals.
German companies such as Gerling and Allianz handle as much as a third of
Dutch industrial risks business.
Dutch enthusiasm for the big margin and bigger risk business - the sort of
policies that the country's multinationals such as Shell or Phillips would
buy to protect their installations worldwide - has if anything been on the
wane in recent years.
Internationale Nederlanden Groep, the financial services holding group
formed when Nationale Nederlanden, the country's biggest insurer, merged
with NMB Postbank, looks set to slash its already limited involvement.
This follows heavy losses at its Nederlanden Reassurantie Groep reinsurance
and Orion subsidiaries in the London insurance market in recent years.
NRG has posted heavy losses as a result of reinsurance business underwritten
by Victory, a company it acquired in 1990 for Pounds 122m. The company is
suing its advisers who, it says, did not provide enough information about
the shortfall in Victory's reserves. It is also reviewing its long-term
commitment to reinsurance business.
Orion, which specialises in marine and aviation business in London, has made
losses in three consecutive years in London. In early September ING
announced it intended to close Orion's commercial risks operation and sell
off the company's UK personal health business.
Mr Willem Scherpenhuijsen Rom, chairman of ING, says that the volatility of
commercial lines business is leading him to favour personal lines and life
business which provide more stable earnings.
In addition, ING lacks the specialised risk management and engineering
staff. Mr Jaap Peters, chairman of Aegon, the Netherlands' second-biggest
company, takes a similar line.
His company underwrites a mixed book of general and life business in the
Netherlands but the accent is heavily on the lower-risk personal lines and
life business.
Yet although the country's large insurers have no intention of challenging
the world's leading industrial risks insurers, they have established
international operations.
In 1991, for example, ING earned 53 per cent of its Fl 27.3bn insurance
revenues from overseas operations, while in the same year Aegon earned 44
per cent of its insurance income from outside the Netherlands and more than
a third from the US, where it is the biggest overseas life insurance company
with a market share of 1.2 per cent in 1991.
ING and Aegon, as well as Amev, the country's third-largest private insurer,
have all built up relatively extensive international operations, focusing
their efforts on a selected number of international markets rather than
seeking to have a large share of every leading market.
Priority areas for expansion for all three groups have included neighbouring
Belgium, which Dutch insurers increasingly identify as part of an extended
domestic market.
Amev's merger with AG Groupe, to create the Fortis company, signalled a
general trend. ING has followed suit by acquiring an interest in the
Brussels-based Banque Bruxelles Lambert.
Dutch companies have long-standing interests in the UK but are highly
critical of British management which they see as partly responsible for the
UK market's heavy losses in 1990 and 1991, and they are relatively
unenthusiastic about further expansion.
Each of the three companies is excited by the prospects of rapid growth in
Spain and Portugal - ING has expanded relatively rapidly in the health
insurance field, for example. Dutch companies are also intensely interested
in expansion in newly emerging eastern European markets where they believe
long-term rewards could be substantial.
Aegon has led the way by acquiring Budapest-based Allami Biztosito, the
former state-owned general insurer.
Above all, Dutch insurers are enthusiastic about their participation in the
world's biggest insurance market - that of the US. For all three companies
the US is the biggest international market, accounting for more than a third
of Aegon's premium income and a quarter of ING's insurance earnings.
The Dutch companies have eschewed the top down, more centralised approach
favoured by UK and some other European companies in the 1960s and 1970s and
have not attempted to become 'national players', selling all types of
insurance in all areas of the US. Instead, they have focused on niche
markets, exploiting the open yet highly-fragmented character of the US
market.
US Aegon has focused exclusively on life and health business, acquiring a
string of regional life companies each with separate specialisations - in
particular, life assurance products - since it began its push into the US in
the late 1970s. It has avoided risky areas such as guaranteed investment
contracts and group health products.
Each of the 11 companies acquired by Aegon in this period has a significant
market share in its particular niche area. 'We decided not to go into
property and casualty insurance in the United States,' explains Mr Peters.
'If you make that decision you say goodbye to 50 per cent of the world's
premium income. But you just can't make money in US liability business. It
is so difficult to operate there.'
Mr Peters says that the key to his group's expansion has been the desire to
give the local management of each concern more responsibility. Mr Peters
visits each operation frequently and takes a close interest in performance.
'You have to decentralise and give responsibility to local people. You get
to know them and make them partners in the business. They have to feel that
they are Aegon people. You have to find the right kind of control.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page III
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4137</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAGGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Survey of European Finance and Investment, The Netherlands
(5): Important breakthrough on terminals - Electronic payments
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RONALD VAN DE KROL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
LEADING supermarkets and department stores in the Netherlands will soon be
bristling with electronic point-of-sale payment systems, in a development
which promises to help the country's banks lower their traditional losses on
payment transfers, cheque-cashing and cash withdrawals.
The banks' efforts to promote point-of-sale payments achieved an important
breakthrough in 1992 when the Netherlands' leading supermarket chain and its
biggest non-food retailer both agreed to install a large number of automatic
payment terminals in their outlets.
Albert Heijn, the biggest Dutch supermarket chain, and Vendex, the holding
company for a variety of stores, including its flagship department store
Vroom &amp; Dreesmann, have signed separate, landmark deals with BeaNet, an
electronic-payments company owned jointly by the Netherlands' banking
industry. Another grocery-store chain, Unigro, has also committed itself to
install electronic payment equipment in its shops.
Until now, large-scale penetration of point-of-sale equipment had been
limited to Dutch petrol stations and, more recently, to Ikea, the Swedish
furniture group, and to selected clothing retailers such as Peek &amp;
Cloppenburg.
The two latest deals are significant not only because they are expected to
set a trend which will bring many more Dutch companies into the BeaNet fold.
They are also noteworthy because Albert Heijn, which is operated by the
Ahold group, and Vendex have both pledged to generate 45m point-of-sale
transactions a year by 1995.
This guaranteed total of 90m transactions will put BeaNet well on the way to
reaching an operational break-even point of 150m transactions a year by
1995, compared with 23m in 1991. Thanks largely to the automatic payment
machines to be installed at Albert Heijn and various businesses within the
Vendex retail group, the number of electronic point-of-sale machines is set
to surge to 14,000 in 1994 from 6,500.
The sharp rise in point-of-sale systems looks likely to parallel the swift
advance in recent years of automatic teller machines (ATMs) on the walls of
Dutch banks and post offices as well as in public concourses, such as train
stations, during the 1980s. Mr Robertus Hazelhoff, chairman of ABN Amro
Bank, says: 'ATM withdrawals now account for 50 per cent of all cash
withdrawals compared with only eight years ago, when the percentage was
still zero.'
The Netherlands has roughly 4,000 ATMs in service, representing one machine
for every two bank branches and post offices in the country.
The use of ATMs is now so common and widespread in cash withdrawals that
Dutch consumers are expected to take easily to using the same bank card and
PIN (personal identity number) code to pay for their purchases in shops.
Credit cards are also becoming increasingly popular, with more than 1m in
circulation today compared with less than 300,000 in 1985.
In return for their guarantee on transaction levels, BeaNet agreed to give
Albert Heijn and Vendex a discount on costs-per-transaction. Specific
figures for the two deals have never been disclosed but industry analysts
estimate that Ahold will pay about Fl 0.13 or Fl 0.14 per transaction,
compared with the current minimum of Fl 0.15 for other BeaNet users.
BeaNet is just one of the banks' various initiatives to reduce the cost of
the Netherlands' payments system and, by extension, their own expenditure on
moving around their clients' money.
Mr Hazelhoff of ABN Amro, which estimates that it loses Fl 300m-Fl 400m a
year on payment transfers, says the fact that payments transfers for private
customers are 'free' masks the real costs which are required to move money
from one bank account to another.
Dutch banks have already moved to place restrictions on free services, such
as limiting the number of free Eurocheques per customer to 60 a year. They
are also considering introducing charges on current accounts to defray the
costs of transfers, following the introduction of charges for corporate
clients.
But the banks are proceeding cautiously in the light of the experience of
Rabobank, the big Dutch co-operative, which was forced in March to retract
its plan to levy an annual Fl 25 fee on its current-account holders. The fee
caused a large outflow of savings from Rabobank to its competitors,
particularly the Postbank which has vowed never to charge current-account
holders for basic banking services.
Rabobank is reconsidering its options and intends to launch a revised plan
in January. Rather than charging a flat Fl 25 fee, it will begin limiting
the free use of the most expensive types of transfer instructions,
particularly hand-written ones. But Rabobank says most clients will be able
to avoid paying charges by tailoring their payment pattern to emphasise the
cheapest types of transfers.
At industry level, the Dutch banking community as a whole has joined forces
with the retail industry and employer groups in a national campaign to
persuade consumers not to write out cheques for small amounts. The banks'
figures for 1991 show that the average cheque was made out for Fl 125, well
below the maximum allowable Fl 300. This average means that many cheques are
written out for relatively small amounts, exacerbating the banks' cost
problem.
To change this cheque-writing behaviour, the campaign, launched on August 24
under the motto 'Betaal op maat' (Pay to measure), aims to educate consumers
about the true cost of paying by cheque.
Through nation-wide advertisements and quiz games on an afternoon television
programme, the banks are seeking to encourage people to use cheques only for
larger purchases of Fl 100 or more. Cash is preferred for smaller
transactions, while electronic point-of-sale payments are desirable whenever
possible, as long as the purchase price is not so small as to make cash the
better option.
The banks say that by taking these steps, consumers could help save the
banks Fl 200m a year in payment transaction costs. The implication is that
if they do not, they can expect to start paying for current-account
facilities and payment transfers.
For all their apparent readiness to adopt bank cards with magnetic strips
and PIN codes, the Dutch are unlikely to take to 'smart cards' - or cards
which have a computer chip embedded in them, avoiding the need for on-line
computer connections - anytime soon.
After an experiment lasting more than two years in Woerden, a town near the
city of Utrecht, researchers found that only 3 per cent of transactions were
carried out by smart cards, far below an initial target of 15 per cent.
The experiment, the most comprehensive of its kind in the Netherlands,
involved 180 shopkeepers and nearly 8,000 smart card-holders, or about 25
per cent of the town's population, in the period 1989-1991.
Among shopkeepers, non-food retailers such as clothing shops tended to be
the most satisfied with the use of the new type of cards, while food
retailers and other purveyors of daily, household items were less
enthusiastic, which researchers put down to 'their relatively low
transaction amounts, their high number of cash purchases and heavy traffic
at the check-out counter.'
Commenting on the experiment's results, Mr Wim Kok, the Dutch finance
minister, told parliament earlier this year: 'It shows that other means of
payment, such as cash or cheques, are not easily supplanted by chip cards.'
Magnetic bank cards, however, look like becoming a permanent feature at the
check-outs of Dutch petrol stations, supermarkets and department stores.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page III
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4138</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAGFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Survey of European Finance and Investment, The Netherlands
(6): Cautious conservatives - Profiles of New chiefs take over at ING Group
and ABN Amro
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD LAPPER and RONALD VAN DE KROL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
TWO years after the mergers that gave rise to the creation of the two
biggest financial holding companies in the Netherlands, new men are taking
over at the top of ABN Amro and Internationale Nederlanden Groep (ING
Group).
Mr Robertus Hazelhoff, 61, in charge at ABN Amro, and Mr Willem
Scherpenhuijsen Rom, the 59-year-old banker who heads up ING Group, are both
typical of the cautious and conservative approach that runs through the
Dutch financial sector.
The changes in command at ABN Amro and ING Group symbolise the start of the
second phase of both mergers. The men who held the chairmanships in the
first phase have now retired according to schedule, leaving their successors
and former seconds-in-command to fine-tune the two biggest corporate tie-ups
in Dutch history.
At ING, a further step in creating a new corporate entity is scheduled to
take place tomorrow when NMB Bank - one of the constituent parts of the
banking and insurance merger and well known overseas for its leading role in
the trading of Third World debt - changes its name to ING Bank.
In a market increasingly vulnerable to competition from Europe, defensive
considerations were uppermost in the thinking behind the mergers of ABN and
Amro on the one hand and Nationale-Nederlanden and NMB Postbank on the
other.
The sort of cost savings potentially available through cuts in branch
networks which persuaded the UK's Lloyds Bank to bid for Midland Bank
earlier this year do not figure prominently in the strategic perspectives of
either Mr Hazelhoff or Mr Scherpenhuijsen Rom.
Neither merger was motivated primarily by cost-cutting considerations. At
ING, the desire to bring together banking and insurance sprang from the dual
attractions of using the bank's outlets to sell insurance and of encouraging
insurance agents to sell banking products.
At ABN Amro, the goal was to combine both banks' domestic strengths to focus
on retail and corporate business at home and to concentrate on trade
finance, capital markets and private banking abroad.
Early talk of ABN Amro's ambitions as a 'global player' raised investor
worries about a string of rapid, big, international acquisitions, but the
pace of expansion has been moderate, in keeping with innate Dutch caution.
'The worst thing a bank can do is to be fashionable,' says Mr Hazelhoff,
glancing up towards the portrait of King Willem I, who founded the
forerunner of ABN Bank in the beginning of the 19th century. 'He's glancing
over my shoulder and telling me not to do stupid things.'
But although they are both averse to taking risk, the two men differ sharply
over the 'allfinanz' principle, which has been a key element of the ING
merger and has also stimulated co-operation between other Dutch banks and
insurers.
Predictably, Mr Scherpenhuijsen Rom is a firm fan. He cites the financing of
a big urban development scheme in Rotterdam and tunnel projects in other
parts of the country as examples of contracts that NMB Postbank might not
have won had it not been linked to Nationale-Nederlanden, the Netherlands'
biggest insurer.
Moves to reduce costs are also beginning to bear fruit. The group is half
way towards achieving its goal of realising cost savings of Fl 100m a year.
And after a slow beginning Mr Scherpenhuijsen Rom is hopeful that by
accessing the loyal customer base of Postbank and NMB the group can boost
sales of both life and general insurance policies.
Mr Scherpenhuijsen Rom dismisses suggestions that banks and insurance
companies are entirely separate businesses which cannot be managed
adequately if they are part of the same organisation. 'Look at the number of
conglomerates in the world. This is simply another example in the financial
services industry. There are as many differences within the banking sector
as between banks and insurance companies.'
Although ABN Amro plans to set up its own life assurance subsidiary to sell
life policies via its own branch network, Mr Hazelhoff is a firm opponent of
any broader deal which would involve him in general insurance business.
'There is a difference between an insurer and a bank. I'm not interested at
all in non-life business. All that I have seen in the last 10 years is four
bad years and one good year and then the same all over again. They compete
so strongly with each other. One thing or another - if it is not hurricane
Hugo, it's agent orange or asbestos.
'There is more in it for insurance companies than for banks. The advantages
for us are questionable. Perhaps it gives us access to long-term money. It
could bring a certain amount of securities trading.'
Moreover, as a broker, ABN Amro already distributes the products of several
insurance companies from whom it earns commission income on insurance sales.
By linking with one insurance company, the bank could damage this network.
Through pure coincidence, the changes in command at ABN Amro and ING took
place within six weeks of each other this summer upon the scheduled
retirement of both companies' chairmen. But the sense of transition in the
upper echelons of the Dutch financial world was strengthened by the fact
that Mr Guus Zoutendijk, the chairman of Delta Lloyd, the big Dutch insurer
owned by Commercial Union of the UK, also retired at about the same time and
handed over the reins to his successor, Mr Hans-Eric Jansen.
It would be wrong to place too much emphasis on the arrival of a new
chairman at either ABN Amro or ING. Both Mr Hazelhoff and Mr Scherpenhuijsen
Rom served as vice-chairmen in the first phase of their respective
companies' merger, and the emphasis in both cases is on continuity rather
than on change.
However, because of ING's hybrid banking-and-insurance composition, it is
natural that people in the group's insurance arm will need to take a bit of
time getting used to the idea of the top man being a career banker rather
than an insurance executive.
This is all the more so because Mr Scherpenhuijsen Rom, a former army
officer and a chartered accountant by training, succeeded Mr Jaap van Rijn,
the gregarious former chairman of Nationale Nederlanden who for many years
was the public face of the Dutch insurance industry.
At ABN Amro, the transition is, at first glance, more straightforward. The
merger between ABN and Amro brought together the country's two most senior
bankers, Mr Roelof Nelissen of Amro and Mr Hazelhoff, who headed ABN, into a
single management team.
Mr Nelissen, a former politician and finance minister, retired as chairman
in May, leaving the job to Mr Hazelhoff, whose demeanour and fondness for
pipes leave the impression of a congenial classics professor rather than
that of the country's most powerful banker.
As they take their merged companies forward, Mr Scherpenhuijsen Rom and Mr
Hazelhoff will literally be able to keep an eye on each other's progress.
ABN Amro has recently announced that its new head office is to be built in
the Amsterdam neighbourhood of Buitenveldert, across the road and across the
railroad tracks from ING's new offices which are currently under
construction next to the city's World Trade Centre.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page III
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4139</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAGEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Survey of European Finance and Investment, The Netherlands
(4): A period of rapid change - Co-operatives
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD LAPPER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
VISITING the offices of Interpolis insurance in the bleak southern Dutch
town of Tilburg, the mutual company still seems provincial and close to its
roots as an insurer of Dutch farmers.
Receptionists do not speak English. Staff are unfamiliar with the names of
their counterparts at Rabobank, the giant Utrecht-based bank which took
virtually complete control of Interpolis nearly two years ago.
And senior executives still refer to their prospective merger partners,
Avero Centraal Beheer, based in the small northern town of Appeldoorn, as
coming from 'north of the rivers' - the largely urban area north of the
Rhine and the Moose.
But appearances prove to be deceiving. Like other Dutch mutual and
co-operative banks and insurers, Interpolis is undergoing a period of rapid
change.
For one thing the mutuals are embracing the fashion for mergers which has
take hold of the country's financial services sector since legal change in
1990.
Rabobank, the Netherlands' second-biggest bank, has linked up with
Interpolis, taking over control of the insurer two years ago.
In a further step, Interpolis will merge with Avero Centraal Beheer, which
is itself the product of a 1990 merger between Centraal Beheer and a group
of smaller mutuals.
Having agreed merger plans last November, in June Interpolis and AVCB agreed
to a share exchange, swapping 15 per cent holdings.
Interpolis and AVCB senior executives will exchange seats on each other's
supervisory and management boards.
Both Interpolis and Rabobank agreed to harmonise their information and
distribution systems.
Before the end of 1993 the two groups are planning a full merger, although
negotiations about the final shape of the new holding company and Rabobank's
share within it are still continuing.
In any event, the new insurance conglomerate, will be the country's
second-biggest, with annual premium income in the Netherlands of Fl 5.5bn,
while the broader financial holding will provide Internationale Nederlanden
Groepe, the country's biggest holding group, with its stiffest competition.
The logic of the merger is to bring together Rabobank's strength as a
distributor - its dense branch network and loyal customer base - with
Interpolis' expertise in administration.
The allocation of costs between the bank and insurer has evidently caused
some teething problems, especially taking into account the fact that
Rabobank's bank branches enjoy an unusual degree of autonomy.
'It will take some time before we can fully realise the synergies,' says Mr
Antonius van Bijsterveldt, of Interpolis. But both parties appear convinced
of the long-term strategic sense of the merger.
Already the Interpolis link-up with Rabobank has yielded fruit. Since 1990,
sales of single premium bonds in Rabobank's network of 2,500 branches have
boomed.
Interpolis doubled its income from sales of new life insurance premiums
between 1990 and 1991, increasing its share of the market for new life
business from 8 per cent to 14 per cent.
In other respects too, the mutual insurers are at the forefront of the
battle for distribution.
Centraal Beheer pioneered direct sales of motor and health insurance in the
Netherlands, selling direct to the public via a combination of media
advertising, telephone sales and the use of state-of-the-art expert systems.
In the mid-1980s, Centraal Beheer won 60 per cent of the private health
market by direct sales, halving the Dutch brokers' share of the market.
According to a recent study by Salomon Brothers, the share of the personal
lines insurance market enjoyed by Dutch direct writers - of about 20 per
cent - is higher than in any other European country.
AVCB is now the third-largest Dutch insurer with 13 per cent of the car and
group pensions market and 11 per cent of the annuity markets.
Dutch mutuals, like their publicly-quoted counterparts, are increasingly
turning their attention to the broader European market by linking up with
mutuals in other European countries.
Rabobank has links with France's Credit Agricole, Belgium's SERA and Spain's
Banco Popular.
Interpolis has lined up alongside Groupama of France, Assurantie Van
Belgische Boerenbond of Belgium, the Farmers Union of the UK and R&amp;V
Versicherungs of Germany.
It is AVCB, however, which has taken co-operation to its furthest extent.
Earlier this year, AVCB cemented a relationship with three northern European
companies to form the Eureko partnership in a deal which contains two
significant pointers for Dutch mutuals.
Firstly, the four partners - AVCB, Friends Provident of the UK, Wasa of
Sweden and Topdanmark of Denmark - have agreed to pool their interests
outside their own domestic markets into a common holding company, called
EUREKO.
Secondly, the link-up has brought AVCB into direct contact with two
companies that have chosen to change their de-mutualisation status. Both
Wasa and Topdanmark de-mutualised in order to gain easier access to capital
markets to finance future growth, following an example set by some of the
world's biggest mutual companies such as Mapfre of Spain.
Mr Van Bijsterveldt is cautious about the future course of the new merged
group's international co-operation. For the moment, Rabobank's cheap retail
deposit base provides a relatively cheap source of capital for the group as
a whole. 'Capital is not a problem with the banks behind us,' he says.
So, in the short term, Interpolis' more cautious approach seems likely to
set the tone.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4140</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAGDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Survey of European Finance and Investment, The Netherlands
(3): Competition is intensifying following removal of curbs - Savings
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD LAPPER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
COMPETITION in the Dutch savings market is hotting up following the removal
of barriers preventing banks and insurers from owning shares in each other.
While Dutch banks are linking up with insurers to sell life assurance
products, insurers without bank connections are selling traditional bank
products such as money market funds and savings deposits.
'Competition is getting tougher than before', says Mr Robertus Hazelhoff,
chairman of the Netherlands' biggest bank, ABN Amro. 'High interest rates
have made consumers more conscious of competition.'
As barriers to cross-border European trade in services are dismantled,
insurance companies and banks from neighbouring countries are also entering
the fray.
Meanwhile a slowdown in the Dutch economy and changes in tax rules, which
have reduced the tax advantages of a single premium bond, sales of which
boomed last year, have also increased the pressure.
The involvement of Dutch banks in insurance is not a new phenomenon. Indeed
in 1989, the year before deregulation, banks acting as agents for insurance
companies, sold 13 per cent of all insurance policies. But since 1990 there
has been a qualitative change.
So-called 'allfinanz' is best known in the Netherlands by virtue of the
merger which created Internationale Nederlanden Groepe, the biggest bank
insurance venture of its kind in Europe. The merger's early months,
following its agreement in March 1991, were not entirely trouble free. One
problem was a short boycott of ING products by brokers.
The issue remains a sensitive one in the ING boardroom and insurance sales
at NMB and Postbank branches are being only gradually increased The merger
is far from popular in the Dutch financial markets where analysts are
critical of the ING management's failure to reduce costs.
However, first-quarter 1992 figures show that the group is recovering from
these initial difficulties. Moreover, the performance of the Netherlands'
second- and third-largest allfinanz ventures, those linking Amev with VSB
Bank and Rabobank with Interpolis, has been much more impressive.
Amev's sales of life assurance products grew by 24 per cent in 1991 while in
1991 Interpolis, the Tilburg-based insurer, doubled its income from sales of
new life insurance premiums between 1990 and 1991, following its takeover by
Rabobank. Interpolis' share of the market for new life business grew from 8
per cent to 14 per cent.
Salomon Brothers, the US securities house, expects the trend to continue.
'Over the last 10 years, direct sales have grown and now account for between
20 and 25 per cent of total sales,' it said in a recent publication and it
predicted a doubling in market share by banks in the next few years.
Insurance companies without bank connections have hit back by launching
their own savings products. Aegon, the second-largest Dutch life assurance
company, has entered the market by setting up its own bank subsidiary.
At the end of 1991, Aegon's mortgage bank subsidiary, Friesch-Groningsche
Hypotheekbank, acquired a general banking license and has subsequently
marketed a deposit savings account which yields returns several basis points
higher than those available from mainstream banks.
The Dutch subsidiary of Equity &amp; Law, the UK life assurance company owned by
France's AXA group, and the French bank, Credit Lyonnaise have also entered
the savings market with similar high-yielding products.
The new entrants in the market are helped by their ability to use the
country' highly efficient payments and inter-bank clearing system, in which
payments for utilities such as gas, water and electricity can all be debited
directly without the use of cheques.
This has caused some consternation among bankers. 'We've built up the
infrastructure and now they are taking advantage of it,' complains a senior
executive at Rabobank.
'We don't like it very much but there is nothing we can do about it. From a
legal point of view it is very difficult to refuse them,' adds Mr Hazelhoff
of ABN Amro.
Meanwhile, there are also some indications that some life assurance savings
could be diverted into deposit accounts and money market funds.
The amount of a single premium bond investment which Dutch savers can reduce
from their income tax bills was reduced earlier this year.
Analysts identify the removal of the tax advantage as one of the reasons why
life assurance growth has appeared this year. Analysts are expecting
premiums to grow by between 8 and 10 per cent this year, compared with 15
per cent last year. 'There is absolutely no doubt about the slowdown,' says
Mr Herman J. van Everdingen, analyst with Van Meer James Capel in Amsterdam.
Van der Meer sees competition for life assurance products intensifying as
the acceptance of unit-linked policies, in which policyholders win greater
rewards and accept a greater share of the risk, becomes more widespread. 'In
the old days, premiums were calculated on the basis of a 4 per cent yield.
It was relatively easy to make a profit,' he says.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4141</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAGCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Survey of European Finance and Investment, The Netherlands
(2): Tougher times ahead - The economy
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RONALD VAN DE KROL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
CLOSE trading ties with Germany have so far enabled the Netherlands to stave
off the blow of recession which has struck most Anglo-Saxon economies.
Germany's own struggle to finance unification may have helped push up Dutch
interest rates and the cost of living but, on balance, the Netherlands has
fared well by the dismantling of the Berlin Wall, an event which has had the
important effect of making its biggest trading partner even bigger.
However, the Netherlands, like Germany, has not been able to bask in a
post-unification glow. After several years of enjoying Europe's lowest rate
of inflation and highest rate of job creation, the country faces harder
times ahead as the cost of living rises and the pace of economic growth
grows.
Official projections by the semi-official Central Planning Office show that
recession will be avoided but economic statistics make clear that the boom
years of the late 1980s are well and truly over.
At the same time, the Netherlands faces the formidable task of meeting the
convergence criteria for Economic and Monetary Union (Emu) which were
drafted at the Dutch-hosted Maastricht Summit of EC leaders in December
1991. Although the country's financing deficit is falling steadily, the
government's overall indebtedness remains well above Emu standards and
inflation continues to be a problem.
Dutch officials are confident that the Emu targets can be met but success
will depend ultimately on the government's ability to rein in spending.
The open, export-orientated nature of the Dutch economy also means that
developments in the Netherlands hinge crucially on the robustness - or
otherwise - of world trade.
The Netherlands exports a full 60 per cent of its gross domestic product
(GDP) in the form of goods and services. This percentage is rivalled only by
Belgium and is well ahead of the proportion of exports achieved by key
industrial countries such as the US, Japan and Germany, whose exports
account for between 10 and 30 per cent of GDP.
This reliance on exports can be a double-edged sword, causing difficulties
in times of stagnant world trade and bringing benefits when international
commerce is more buoyant. In 1991, in any case, exports were a boon to the
economy, accounting almost single-handedly for the overall economy's growth
at a time when domestic consumption was virtually flat.
Exports by volume (excluding oil, natural gas and other forms of energy)
rose by 5 per cent in 1991 and are forecast to show a further gain of 4.5
per cent this year. Overall economic performance was less strong, however,
with the rate of growth in GNP falling to 2 per cent from 4 per cent in
1990. Forecasts for 1992 vary, but most economists are projecting rates of
between 1 and 2 per cent.
The importance of Germany is reflected in the fact that exports to the
Netherlands' powerful eastern neighbour were up 12 per cent last year.
What's more, Germany accounted for an even larger percentage of Dutch
foreign trade than normal, absorbing 30 per cent of all Dutch exports
compared with 28 per cent the year before.
Some economists note that the 12 per cent rise in exports to Germany is
lower than that of, for example, Denmark (which had a 21 per cent rise) or
Italy (whose exports to Germany jumped by more than 15 per cent.) They also
argue that Dutch exports to Germany are heavy on horticulture and foodstuffs
but light on value-added industrial goods.
However, Mr Wim Duisenberg, president of the Dutch central bank, argues in
his 1991 annual report that 'The relatively lower rise in exports to Germany
does not imply that their effect on the overall economy was more limited
than in other countries. Because of the relatively large share of German
exports in (Dutch) GDP, this contribution to economic growth in 1990 and
1991 was bigger than all other EC countries with the exception of Belgium,
which saw a slightly higher contribution.'
Horticulture, the biggest single component of Dutch agricultural exports -
themselves a powerful motor behind the domestic economy - has indeed been
the main beneficiary of the tearing down of the Berlin Wall and the opening
up of East European markets.
Exports to Poland and other former Soviet bloc countries of Dutch
hothouse-grown products such as tomatoes have soared by nearly 1,000 per
cent from, admittedly, the very low levels seen in the communist era.
The union of former East and West Germany has meant that the enlarged
country now absorbs 52 per cent of all Dutch foreign horticulture sales, up
from 48 per cent in 1990.
Thanks in large part to the Netherlands' traditional role as the world's
third-biggest agricultural exporter after the US and France, the country
produced a Fl 18.5bn current account surplus in 1991 and economists forecast
further increases in 1992 and 1993.
The continued rosy picture of the Netherlands' external economic relations
is in sharp contrast to the state of the government's finances. Despite
steady progress in cutting the financing (or budget) deficit, the state's
overall indebtedness is still huge, putting it in the same league as Belgium
and Italy.
Total government debt is equivalent to 80 per cent of GDP, well above the
'Emu reference level' of a maximum 60 per cent. However, government
projections show that the indebtedness ratio will have fallen to 76.5 per
cent by 1994, enabling the Dutch to meet an alternate stipulation that debt
must be showing a sufficient decline to put it on target to reach the
reference level at 'a satisfactory pace'.
The Dutch financing deficit is less of a problem because it is forecast to
fall to 2.4 per cent of GDP by 1994, compared with 3.75 per cent in 1991,
enabling the Netherlands to fulfil the Emu norm of 3 per cent.
Dutch long-term interest rates, currently at around 8.75 per cent, are
comfortably within the EC range, but inflation is more problematic.
After boasting the lowest rate of inflation in the EC from 1987 to 1990, the
cost of living shot up to 3.9 per cent in 1991 and has exceeded 4.0 per cent
during most of 1992.
At these levels, Dutch cost of living increases do not meet the Emu
criterion that a country's cost of living may not be 1.5 points higher than
the three best-performing EC member states.
The rekindling of Dutch inflation is only partly the result of imported
inflation from Germany. In fact, about half of the recent increases can be
attributed to government policies such as increases in state-controlled
rents and higher environmental levies on fuel.
Mr Wim Kok, the Dutch finance minister, has undertaken to get inflation
below 3.5 per cent, putting the Netherlands within range of the Emu
criteria. His efforts will be bolstered in October by a planned one-point
reduction in the upper-band rate for value-added tax (VAT), to 17.5 per cent
from 18.5 per cent.
He has vowed that the reduction will have no effect on the 1993 budget,
scheduled to be unveiled on September 15.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page I
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4142</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAGBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Survey of European Finance and Investment, The Netherlands
(1): Tie-ups go on trial - As they fine-tune their new merged entities,
Dutch financial institutions are learning that size, while important, is not
everything, even in a small country such as the Netherlands. Fresh
challenges are looming
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RONALD VAN DE KROL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE wave of big mergers that washed over the Dutch banking and insurance
world over the past two years has now receded, leaving all the leading
institutions with either a new partner or with the conviction that they can
go it alone for the moment.
Although the frenzied merger activity of the early 1990s is not expected to
make an early return, the Dutch financial sector still faces a variety of
challenges and changes.
First and foremost, the three biggest players - ABN AMRO Bank;
Internationale Nederlanden Groep (ING Group), the banking-and-insurance
group; and Rabobank and its insurance partner Interpolis - must reap the
benefits which motivated the mergers in the first place.
At the same time, the large financial groups must satisfy themselves and the
financial community that they have erected sufficiently high and fortified
'Chinese walls' between their various operations, which range from merchant
banking to lending and from stockbroking to insurance.
Equally important, domestic banks and insurers will continue to face
pressure and competition from foreign institutions attracted to the
Netherlands' open market.
For the time being, however, no big mergers between the leading domestic
institutions are likely. Earlier this year, Mr Wim Duisenberg, president of
the Nederlandsche Bank, the Dutch central bank, said 'the pie has been
divided' as far as the large financial institutions are concerned,
indicating that the central bank would oppose any link-ups between the three
biggest players. Already, ABN Amro, ING and Rabobank have 80 per cent of the
Dutch banking market between them.
There is also another reason why further tie-ups at the very top of the
Dutch financial world are unlikely, especially between the biggest existing
banks and insurers.
Mr Robertus Hazelhoff, chairman of ABN Amro, which was created out of the
merger between ABN and Amro, the country's two largest banks, notes that
additional large-scale banking-and-insurance mergers are ruled out at
present 'for the simple reason that US law does not allow a company to be
active in banking and insurance.'
ABN Amro has a large presence in the US - principally in the state of
Illinois and on Long Island - as do the big Dutch insurers Aegon, Amev
(which is now part of Fortis, the Belgian-Dutch banking and insurance
company) and Delta Lloyd (whose UK parent company is also active in the US.)
For this reason, the merger in early 1991 between Nationale-Nederlanden, the
Netherlands' largest insurer, and NMB Postbank, the country's third-biggest
bank, to create ING was a good fit: although Nat-Ned has extensive US
insurance operations, NMB's US presence is relatively modest.
The US Federal Reserve Board has granted the merger partners an exemption
until 1995 from US laws limiting combinations of banks and insurers.
It is possible that US laws limiting link-ups between banks and insurers
will be relaxed in the meantime, and this could lead Dutch banks and
insurers to look again at further tie-ups.
At home, the mergers have run into no legal trouble, although it is clear
that any further concentration by the biggest institutions would cause
difficulties.
The spate of Dutch 'allfinanz' partnerships was made possible by a January
1990 decision by the finance ministry to repeal a 'gentleman's agreement'
barring big cross-shareholdings between the insurance and banking sectors.
This, in turn, reflected the blurring of distinctions between financial
products and distribution channels at the retail level, as banks and
insurers increasingly encroached on each other's territory to compete for
the savings of Dutch households.
Still, both the central bank and the finance ministry insist that the new
financial conglomerates must keep the operational sides of their banking and
insurance arms strictly separated, partly because the two industries
continue to be supervised by distinct regulatory bodies.
Officials are also keen to ensure that proper 'Chinese walls' are erected to
keep sensitive information about clients from flowing between the lending,
stockbroking, merchant banking and insurance sides of the country's
financial institutions. Mr Willem Scherpenhuijsen Rom, chairman of ING, says
it is made clear from the outset which 'counter' his group's clients are
talking to when they do business with the company. But at the board level,
management must have a complete overview of developments in both the
insurance and banking arms.
Because of their sheer size, ABN Amro and ING in particular often find
themselves at the centre of the debate on the power of the Netherlands'
financial institutions.
As the country's two top private-sector investors, they each hold equity
stakes in many Dutch bourse-listed companies of 5 per cent or more, enabling
them to take advantage of the 5 per cent threshold for tax exemptions on
dividend payments. Other institutional investors, including pension funds,
also tend to hold stakes of 5 per cent or more in a number of Dutch
companies.
But Dutch financial institutions say they have no intention to emulate their
German counterparts, which generally own even larger stakes in their
country's industrial companies and play a far more active role in policy
through their seats in corporate boardrooms.
Although the number of mergers among leading Dutch financial institutions
has declined since the surge of activity in 1990 and 1991, smaller deals and
transactions are still being done, and there is potential for more. In July,
for example, Delta Lloyd acquired Bank Cantrade, a small Dutch bank with a
balance sheet of Fl 715m, (Dollars 453m) from a unit of Union Bank of
Switzerland. Staal Bankiers, part of the Vendex International retail group,
is still up for sale, as are small banking institutions affiliated to the
Dutch trades union movement.
In the medium-sized banking market, speculation on the future of merchant
banks Pierson, Heldring &amp; Pierson and Bank Mees &amp; Hope has been rife since
their parent banks merged to form ABN Amro. But ABN Amro has consistently
and firmly denied any desire to sell, saying the two banks' activities do
not overlap. The sale of either merchant bank to an overseas competitor
would step up the pressure of foreign competition on the Netherlands'
already open financial market.
The coming together of ABN and Amro and their independently-run merchant
banks Pierson and Mees into one corporate entity has accelerated the trend
of bigger Dutch companies to seek out secondary banking relations with other
foreign and domestic institutions. Thus, although the process of
concentration has whittled down the number of domestic banks, it has not
ended up shutting out foreign rivals.
To the embarrassment of Dutch banks, foreign institutions such as Goldman
Sachs have managed to carve out a rich niche for themselves by carrying out
capital market transactions that domestic banks cannot or will not attempt.
When Elsevier wanted to divest its 33 per cent stake in fellow Dutch
publisher Wolters Kluwer in mid-1990, it sold its shares to Goldman Sachs
which used its placing power to sell the shares, worth more than Fl 700m, to
international institutional investors.
Dutch banks have so far shied away from leading this type of risky block
trading, thereby opening up opportunities for foreign rivals who have also
been called in to advise on mergers and acquisitions, including both the ABN
Amro and the ING deals. The opening of an Amsterdam office earlier this year
by S. G. Warburg indicates that there is still room for foreigners in the
Netherlands' consolidated banking market.
As they fine-tune their new merged entities, Dutch financial institutions
are learning that size, while important, is not everything, not even in a
small country like the Netherlands.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page I
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4143</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAGAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / International Company News: Boral cuts payout as profits
slip
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BRUCE JACQUES
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   SYDNEY
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE directors of Boral, the Australian building products and engineering
group, have been forced to cut the annual dividend to 16 cents a share from
20 cents, after a 28 per cent fall earnings for the year to June.
Net profits fell to ADollars 151.98m (USDollars 108.5m) from ADollars
211.37m on a 5 per cent fall in sales to ADollars 3.77bn from ADollars
3.98bn. The cut in dividend will avoid the company covering the payout from
reserves, which will fall to ADollars 148.5m from ADollars 179.4m.
Despite the lower result, the directors said there were signs of improvement
for the current year. They forecast a modest improvement in earnings,
despite the disappointing Australian and US economies.
The directors said the construction of non-domestic buildings in Australia
was likely to fall further and no early recovery was foreseen in the UK
building market. However, the company expected a bigger earnings
contribution from mainland Europe.
The company's north American and European subsidiaries incurred small losses
while pre-tax earnings in Australia fell to ADollars 359.9m from ADollars
472.8m.
A divisional breakdown showed the housing products area was the company's
best, lifting pre-tax earnings to ADollars 149.2m from ADollars 105.5m.
Construction materials profits fell to ADollars 134.4m from ADollars 205.8m.
The overall result showed net profits of ADollars 121.4m compared with
ADollars 122.2m. Depreciation rose to ADollars 186.2m from ADollars 177.8m
while interest expenses fell to ADollars 96.8m from ADollars 121.8m.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4144</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAF9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / International Company News: North Broken Hill posts 30% fall
for year
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BRUCE JACQUES
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
INDUSTRIAL problems helped to send North Broken Hill Peko, the Australian
mining and forestry group, to a 30 per cent fall in net earnings for the
year to June, although the annual dividend is being held at 11 cents a
share.
The company yesterday announced a fall in net profits to ADollars 84.2m
(USDollars 60.1m) from ADollars 119.9m, on a fall in sales to ADollars
1.54bn from ADollars 1.64bn.
The directors said about half the fall in earnings was attributable to
industrial action at the company's Burnie pulp mill in Tasmania which cost
about ADollars 12m before tax and abnormal losses of about ADollars 8.6m.
The balance of the fall in earnings reflected a slide to ADollars 161.7m
from ADollars 101.9m in the contribution from Energy Resources of Australia,
the company's 66 per cent controlled uranium mining operation.
The directors said the world recession would continue to affect results.
'Reduced steel production in Japan and Europe is expected to affect demand
and prices for iron ore, but this trend will be offset, at least in part, by
ongoing cost reduction at Robe River,' they said.
'Recovery in the uranium market is not likely until 1994 or later.'
The result was after tax of ADollars 67.8m compared with ADollars 53.9m,
while net interest took ADollars 66.9m against ADollars 86.1m.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4145</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAF8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / International Company News: Poseidon Gold unit in powerful
return to black
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BRUCE JACQUES
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
COMPANIES in the Poseidon Gold group, the Australian mining empire
controlled by Robert de Crespigny, have reported mixed results for the year
to June.
Poseidon Gold, the main group operating company, made a strong return to the
black after a big loss last year, mainly induced by a ADollars 194m asset
write-down. In the latest year, the company turned a ADollars 202.2m
(USDollars 144.40m) loss into a ADollars 49.2m profit on a 50 per cent
increase in sales to ADollars 675.1m from ADollars 449.2m. The annual
dividend has been raised to 9 cents a share from 5 cents.
The results were improved by the inclusion for the first time of results
from ACM Gold, acquired by Poseidon in April. Mr de Crespigny said the
result was achieved despite weakness in the gold price.
Poseidon's equity share of gold production more than doubled to 890,059oz
from 437,155oz. During the year the company raised its stake in Mt Leyshon
Gold Mines to 75.6 per cent from 44.6 per cent, but Mt Leyshon's earnings
fell to ADollars 17.6m from ADollars 30.2m.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4146</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAF7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / International Company News: Allied steps up strategy of
expansion in China
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SIMON DAVIES
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   HONG KONG
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
ALLIED Group, the Hong Kong conglomerate at the centre of a corporate fraud
investigation, is proceeding with its aggressive moves into China. It has
taken a 30 per cent stake in USDollars 30m resort development in Manchuria.
That follows news last week that Allied had placed out 10 per cent of the
company to the Fujian provincial government, despite the uncertainty
surrounding Mr Lee Ming Tee's group of companies.
In the latest acquisition, Allied has taken a stake in China International
Allied Yacht Club, a joint venture with a Mainland company which holds the
only licence for operating yacht clubs in China.
Initially concentrating on the Golden Stone Beach resort in Dalian, in the
northern province of Liaoning, the joint venture company will also examine
feasibility studies for resorts in Shinhuangdao, Qingdao, Xiamen and Zhuhai.
Mr Lee has said he intends to invest up to HKDollars 5bn (USDollars 646m) in
China within the next three years, so that more than 50 per cent of the
company's assets would be across the border.
A spokesman for Allied said the ongoing investigation into share dealings in
the Allied group and related companies did not affect the group's assets and
would not have any impact on its operations, or expansion plans.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4147</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAF6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / International Company News: Australian TV network ahead
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By AGENCIES
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   SYDNEY
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
NINE Network Australia, a television network controlled by Mr Kerry Packer,
the Australian businessman, through his Consolidated Press Holdings group,
yesterday reported a 101 per cent rise in net earnings to ADollars 60.5m
(USDollars 43.20m) for the 12 months to June 30, from ADollars 30.1m a year
earlier, agencies report from Sydney.
Sales were 10 per cent ahead at ADollars 519m, against ADollars 470.8m a
year earlier.
Earnings per share advanced to 19 cents from 3 cents, and although the
company is again not paying a dividend, it announced a one-for-20 bonus
issue which represents a payout of 17 cents a share. During the year the
company had a one-for-five share consolidation.
At the year-end, net tangible asset backing per share was ADollars 2.28
compared with ADollars 2.10.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4148</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAF5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / International Company News: Sasol advances 11%
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By AGENCIES
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   JOHNNESBURG
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
SASOL, the South African synthetic fuel and chemicals producer best known
for turning coal into oil, yesterday announced an 11 per cent rise in net
profits to R1.15bn (Dollars 410m) for the year to June 25, from R1.04bn a
year earlier, agencies report from Johannesburg.
Earnings per share advanced by 9.4 per cent to 202 cents from 184.7 cents
and the annual dividend is being raised by 9.1 per cent to 78.0 cents from
71.5 cents.
Turnover moved ahead by 3.8 per cent to R7.85bn from R7.56bn. Tax took
R359.7m compared with R470.1m.
The group yesterday said it hoped to at least maintain earnings in its
current year, while new projects should help it achieve real growth from
1993/94 onwards.
It said all divisions had embarked on a cost-cutting programme since no
significant growth contribution could be expected from commissioning new
projects in the current year and in view of possibly stagnant rand prices.
Since almost all the group's local and export prices were determined in US
dollars, the rise of the rand against the dollar recently was affecting
revenue and profits, it said.
International petrochemical prices would also influence results. 'Since
chemical prices have weakened to the point where many leading international
producers cannot fully recover cash costs, we do not expect prices to
deteriorate any further,' it said.
The group announced the go-ahead for three new projects worth R670m,
bringing the value of projects approved and not yet commissioned to R3.5bn.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4149</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAF4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / International Company News: Uneasy peace reigns at
Thailand's national airline - The fragile rehabilitation by technocrats of a
company accustomed to military control
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By VICTOR MALLET
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
With less than a week before Thailand's general election on Sunday, the
caretaker government yesterday wrested control of Thai Airways International
(Thai), the partially privatised national airline, from the air force and
installed its own nominees on the board.
An extraordinary shareholders' meeting at Thai headquarters yesterday proved
a victory for the technocrats who want the airline, capitalised USDollars
3.5bn, to be more professionally managed.
Stockbrokers and Thai executives believe it will take time to put the
troubled company back on a sure footing.
The vote, and subsequent board meeting, which elected Mr Pandit Bunyapana,
the finance ministry permanent secretary, chairman and Mr Chatrachai
Bunya-Ananta, Thai's marketing chief, president, followed a dramatic and
sometimes farcical few weeks of public resistance from the senior air force
officers who have made Thai their fiefdom.
Air Chief Marshal Weera Kitchathorn, the president ousted yesterday, had
signed a resignation letter prepared for him by the government and then
retracted it.
Air Chief Marshal Gun Pimarnthip, previous chairman of the board, had
infuriated the government by abruptly closing an earlier meeting designed to
replace the directors. Even yesterday's meeting faced a vain, last-minute
legal challenge from shareholders complaining that 14 days' notice had not
been given. Neither of the two air chief marshals attended.
When the general meeting ended yesterday, the shareholders crowding the
conference room applauded. The old board was voted out with 1.3bn shares in
favour of the move - most of them representing the finance ministry's 93 per
cent stake - and only 7,000 against.
Thai shares closed up Bt2.5 at Bt63 yesterday, having risen 22 per cent
during the past week, in response to government action against the air
force. That topped the Bt60 price at which the first 7 per cent tranche of
the company was sold to the public earlier this year.
Two clouds, however, hang over Thai's new board.
The first is that a coalition government emerging from next Sunday's general
election might be sympathetic to the military and yield to attempts by the
air force to regain control of the airline.
Air Chief Marshal Gun was quoted as saying last week that the air force
would bow to pressure for the moment, but 'we will change it later'.
Air force officers are also thought to be behind corruption charges which
have been levelled at Mr Chatrachai, the new president, and which will
weaken his authority until an investigation is concluded.
The second and more immediate worry is that the new board, however
professional, will find it difficult to return Thai to healthy
profitability.
Thai has previously massaged its profit figures by selling aircraft and
leasing them back, and stockbrokers suspect it was planning to do the same
this year. Such ploys make its figures difficult to interpret, but one
stockbroker estimates that net profits for the year to September 30 will
reach only Bt2.4bn, well below the company's forecast and the previous
year's Bt3.5bn (USDollars 139m).
Morale among the 18,000 employees has been affected by the crash in July of
a Thai Airbus bound for Kathmandu, in which all 113 passengers and crew were
killed, and by the disagreements between supporters and opponents of the air
force; most of the 500 pilots of Thai nationality are former air force
personnel.
At a news conference yesterday, Mr Pandit announced plans to tighten
financial controls at the company, to improve the airline's international
image, and make decisions more transparent. Unnecessary investments, he
said, would be postponed and the performance of various divisions closely
monitored.
Mr Pandit said all airlines had suffered in recent months, but insisted that
Thai was operating profitably.
Thai's performance, however, remains bound up with politics. Occupancy rates
plunged and flights were cancelled when troops shot dead at least 50
pro-democracy demonstrators on the streets of Bangkok in May and frightened
away thousands of tourists.
Air Chief Marshal Kaset Rojananil, then supreme military commander and
chairman of Thai by virtue of being the air force chief - in accordance with
the company's old articles of association - was widely held responsible for
the killings.
When an interim civilian government was appointed by royal decree in June to
defuse the political crisis, Mr Anand Panyarachun, prime minister, moved
quickly to reduce the military's influence in politics and business. That
included enterprises controlled by the state (such as the telecommunications
authorities) and Thai.
In theory, the finance ministry, as holder of most of the shares, could have
done what it wanted with the company at any time.
In practice, Thai was always controlled by air force officers with few
business qualifications, even if the day-to-day running of the company was
usually handled by professionals.
It was left to Mr Anand and Mr Nukul Prachuabmoh, his combative transport
and communications minister, to demilitarise Thai. They did so yesterday,
but until the airline is fully privatised, the risk remains that Thai may
again fall victim to greedy politicians and military men.
Asked what there was to stop a new government reversing the board revolution
at Thai yesterday, a senior executive said: 'Nothing.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4150</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAF3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / International Company News: Sime Darby lifted by Hong Kong
operations
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KIERAN COOKE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   KUALA LUMPUR
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
SIME Darby, the Malaysia based conglomerate that has grown into one of the
region's leading multinationals, has announced pre-tax profits for the year
to June 30 of MDollars 755.4m (USDollars 303m), an increase of 11 per cent
on the previous year's figure.
Turnover was also up 11 per cent at MDollars 6.19bn.
The group has recommended a final gross dividend payment of 14.5 sen per
share.
Once largely plantation based, Sime Darby has diversified not only into
other sectors of activity within Malaysia but has made substantial
investments in the region. Sime's biggest cash earner was its operations in
Hong Kong, where it is the main automotive and heavy equipment distributor.
The group's pre-tax profits in Hong Kong were MDollars 142m against MDollars
94m a year earlier. 'Sime Darby in Hong Kong benefited from the booming
economy in South China and became the highest profit earner in the group,'
the company said.
'In spite of the new airport project being further delayed, the mood and
business climate remains bullish.'
Sime's property division also performed strongly with pre-tax profits of
MDollars 112m against MDollars 93m. The group says the outlook in the
Malaysian housing sector remains good, although it is reviewing operations
in condominium projects, where there could be over-supply problems.
Pre-tax profits in plantations almost doubled to MDollars 51m mainly due to
an increase in the price of palm oil.
Sime, long known as one of the more conservatively run groups in Asia, has
benefited from the steady if unspectacular spread of its businesses
throughout the region.
It has gained from the 8 per cent plus growth rates of the economies of
Malaysia and Hong Kong, which has balanced out lower growth in Singapore,
the Philippines and Australia.
While analysts are still concerned about the under-utilisation of Sime's
large amounts of capital, they feel that the recent acquisition of the
Caterpillar Tractors franchise in Australia plus its tie-up with the Axa
group, one of the world's leading insurers, will lead to further growth in
the years ahead.
The Sime board's forecast was, however, couched in typical conservative
language. It said that as a world recovery was as yet barely visible and
remained a matter of conjecture, it was difficult to be too optimistic about
the future.
The board hoped the group would at least be able to maintain last year's
level of profitability, but it would be prudent not to expect too much in a
global situation still clouded by uncertainty.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4151</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAF2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / International Company News: Indonesian banks hit by capital
requirements
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By WILLIAM KEELING
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   JAKARTA
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
INDONESIA's quoted private banks have published generally poor half-year
results due partly to financial restructuring to meet higher capital
adequacy requirements.
In March the government enforced a capital adequacy requirement of 5 per
cent, to be raised to 7 per cent by next March and 8 per cent by December
1993, in accordance with Bank for International Settlements guidelines.
To meet the requirement last March, some banks moved substantial funds into
central bank certificates, which attract a zero capital adequacy weighting,
as against customer loans, which carry a 100 per cent weighting.
The result, however, has been a loss of interest income. Central bank
certificates offer interest at about 17 per cent, substantially below
customer lending rates of 25 per cent, and lower even than average deposit
rates of 19 per cent.
In the most extreme case, Bank Duta increased funds held with the central
bank 254 per cent to Rp292bn (USDollars 143m) on the year-earlier period and
showed an 11 per cent fall in interest income to Rp215bn.
Bank Duta's total loan portfolio contracted 11 per cent to Rp1,750bn over
the same period of 1991, although its cost of funds rose 6.4 per cent to
Rp198bn. It announced a fall in operating profits in the first six months to
Rp6.6bn from Rp13.7bn in the same period of 1991.
Brokers regard the interim operating profit as a better indication of
performance than the net profit figure, because most banks delay making
sufficient provision for bad and doubtful debts until the second half of the
year.
While profits have fallen, brokers note the higher capital adequacy
requirement will improve the long-term health of the banking sector.
Bank Danamon announced a fall in operating profit from Rp21bn to Rp18bn,
although it increased its loan portfolio 43 per cent year-on-year to
Rp3,105bn.
Bank Internasional Indonesia's operating profits dropped 16 per cent to
Rp56bn, although it increased its loan portfolio 28 per cent to Rp3,212bn
year-on-year. Brokers said it had provided for bad debt and were optimistic
on improved full-year figures.
Bank Niaga's operational profits for the half year to June fell to Rp2.3bn
from Rp13bn with the loan portfolio remaining static at Rp2,470bn.
Bank Bali bucked the trend by increasing operating profits 18 per cent to
Rp40bn, although brokers regard provision for bad debt at just 0.5 per cent
of the its loan portfolio as insufficient.
The World Bank has approved a Dollars 300m loan to provide new capital for
five of Indonesia's state-owned banks. The loan is to assist the banks in
reaching higher capital adequacy targets.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4152</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAF1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Survey of European Finance and Investment, The Netherlands
(8): Doors open for managers of non-domestic parentage - Pensions
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NORMA COHEN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE Netherlands, purportedly home to the world's oldest stock exchange, has
no shortage of fund management expertise. Indeed, the names of some of its
largest and oldest fund managers, such as ABN Amro and Rabobank, are
household names in other European capitals.
But now, changing appetites among fund managers' clients - pension funds in
particular - have opened the doors for an influx of non-domestic fund
managers into the Netherlands.
A list of the 25 largest fund managers in the Netherlands - a list compiled
by consulting actuaries William Mercer Fraser International - shows that 16
of them are non-Dutch.
Of these fund managers, six have a British parent, three a Japanese parent,
three an American parent and two have German parents.
The rise of foreign fund managers in a country which so clearly has
home-grown expertise suggests that tastes are indeed changing, according to
Ms Julia Hobart, senior consultant at Mercer Fraser.
It also suggests that unlike many of its European counterparts which have
been putting in place restrictions to prevent the encroachment of foreigners
in that industry, the Netherlands, like Britain, is a relatively open
market.
What has fueled the growth of Dutch fund management expertise in recent
years has been its pension laws. These have helped to build the largest pool
of funded pension schemes outside the UK.
An estimated Dollars 270bn lies in public and private sector funds. Of
these, ABP, with assets of nearly Fl160bn, is the world's second-largest
pension fund and PGGM, which covers hospital and medical care workers, is
also among the world's largest.
There are more than 80 industry-wide pools in the Netherlands, a development
which has concentrated relatively large amounts of pension money in the
hands of relatively few managers.
The Netherlands is also home to some of the biggest single-employer pension
schemes of such household names as Royal Dutch Shell and Phillips, the
electronics giant, and these are managed in-house.
'On the Continent, the big funds are much more involved in decisions on
asset allocation,' Ms Hobart said.
'This has opened the door to the use of specialist managers. The foreign
firms are rarely employed to do balanced portfolio management - it is almost
always specialist mandates.'
But despite the growth of foreign fund managers, pension funds are hardly
rushing to put their money abroad.
Data from InterSec Research, a firm specialising in international pension
research, notes that Dutch private sector pension funds increased their
foreign share ownership to 13.1 per cent of total portfolios in 1991 from
8.4 per cent in 1988.
However, the data suggests that some of this shift may have been at the
expense of investments in international bonds.
By 1991, non-Dutch bonds formed 4.7 per cent of Dutch portfolios, down from
5.9 per cent in 1988.
'Dutch pension funds are risk averse,' said a fund manager at one leading
Dutch bank.
Indeed, the latest data from the Dutch Central Bureau of Statistics shows
that the average of pension funds has some 75 per cent in fixed-interest
securities and the pension funds historically have been the primary
purchasers of government debt.
ABP alone holds roughly 20 per cent of the government's debt securities.
But ABP, partly because of its size, may be more adventurous than most of
its smaller counterparts.
In 1988, after strenuous efforts, it won the right to invest up to five per
cent of its assets abroad and has since then made several well-publicised
moves into the international property market.
Among professional fund management companies, ABN Amro, one of the
Netherlands' largest, has allocated 35 per cent of its average multi-asset
discretionary pool to international equities, another 5 per cent to domestic
equities and a relatively modest 37 per cent to domestic and foreign fixed
interest.
Cash, however, accounts for a further 17 per cent of assets.
Rotrusco, a division of the Robeco Group, has a somewhat more modest
weighting in domestic and international equities of 30 per cent in total and
a 55 per cent weighting in foreign and domestic bonds.
The non-Dutch fund managers which have made real inroads into the market are
almost exclusively doing so with specialist mandates for forays into
Japanese, US or Continental equities or for experimentation with
index-tracking and other quantitative management techniques.
That is not to say that Dutch fund managers themselves have failed to
exploit the increasing trend towards internationalisation or passive
management technique.
Henkelman, Pontier, Van Drie en Partners, based in Amsterdam, ranks 25th
among fund managers but has only been around for 10 years. It was founded as
an options brokerage firm and specialises in quantitative and
options-oriented products.
Meanwhile, analysts say that the influx of foreign firms reflects both the
general recognition of the size of the potential market there and the
generally profitable nature of the business.
Because fund managers are typically subsidiaries of banks who operate
brokerage arms as well, common practice calls for all share transactions to
be effected through the parent company.
'They all provide rationales for why this is done, but when you get right
down to it, they want the fee income,' said one analyst.
Nominal fees are typically no more than 0.1 to 0.3 per cent of funds under
management. 'The absolute fee level is lower than that of the UK and the US,
but the charge to the fund itself is higher,' said one industry analyst.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4153</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAF0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Survey of Mobile Communications (13): Confusion reigns -
Germany
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By HANS GUSBETH
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
COMPETITION is heating up in the multi-billion D-Mark market for mobile
communications in Germany. Two operators launched services based on the GSM
pan-European digital cellular radio standard on July 1. The aim is to have
6m to 7m GSM users by the turn of the century. But the delayed availability
of handsets has created confusion in the market. This has been exacerbated
by the announcement of new mobile services that could compete with GSM.
Cellular penetration in Germany, at less than 1 per cent of the population,
is much lower than in the UK, where it is over 2 per cent, or Scandinavia,
where it is over 5 per cent. This partly due to the inability of the present
analogue systems to handle satisfactorily calls to and from hand-portable
cellular telephones and also to the relatively high cost of mobile phones in
Germany.
But another reason has been lack of competition. Until recently, mobile
communications were under the monopoly of the country's national
telecommunications carrier, Deutsche Telekom.
It was hoped the introduction of GSM would address these problems. Between
them, the two GSM network operators, Deutsche Telekom and Mannesmann
Mobilfunk, have invested DM2bn in their networks and this is expected to be
topped up by another DM1.8bn by the end of next year.
But the delayed availability of suitable handsets has cost both operators
dearly. This has been particularly damaging to mobile communications
newcomer Mannesmann Mobilfunk, for whom the 12-month delay is estimated by
analysts to have cost about DM1m a day.
Service providers have also suffered from the delay. Having invested
millions of D-Marks to build infrastructures with 5,000 or more retail and
service outlets, the service providers have been forced to bridge the gap by
selling terminals for the current analogue mobile telephone system, Deutsche
Telekom's C-Netz.
Then, two weeks before Deutsche Telekom and Mannesmann Mobilfunk were able
to start the commercial operation of their networks with a supply of
approved handsets, the minister for post and telecommunications, Mr
Christian Schwarz-Schilling, announced the licensing procedure for a third
mobile telephone network operator using personal communications network
(PCN) technologies.
Deutsche Telekom and Mannesmann Mobilfunk were both excluded from bidding
and from any future bids for at least four years. The new operator will be
licensed to run a PCN at 1.8GHz using the same DCS1800 pan-European PCN
standard as is to be used in the UK.
Bidders that have so far revealed their identity are led by BMW, the luxury
car maker, MAN, the machine tool and truck manufacturer, Preussen Elektra, a
subsidiary of power utility holdings company VEBA, and McCaw, the US
cellular radio network operator.
Adding to the confusion of Germany's mobile communications sector, GSM and
PCN are not the only mobile communications opportunities in Germany.
The ministry is planning shortly to issue two national radiopaging licences
based on the European radio messaging (Ermes) standard. Some 28 public
automatic mobile radio networks have also recently been licensed and a
mobile data communications licence is due to be issued.
At the same time n ew suppliers are entering the German market: Deutsche
Telekom's legendary relationship with its house supplier Siemens is not as
close as it used to be. Sweden's Ericsson and Finland's Nokia are supplying
Deutsche Telekom with the radio technology for a wireless local loop
programme in eastern Germany. Mannesmann Mobilfunk has selected US
telecommunications giant AT&amp;T to supply parts of its cellular network.
Anxious to gain their share of what they expect to be the largest European
market, GSM handset manufacturers have made the German market their
priority. Sweden's Ericsson, Finland's Nokia, the US's Motorola, the UK's
Orbitel and Japan's Panasonic have all made their mark with prices about
DM1,000 cheaper than the equivalent analogue cellular phones in Germany.
Most of their initial orders have come from the two network operators,
anxious to see GSM handsets at last available to their subscribers.
'It is plain economic reasoning that operators must procure worldwide
wherever quality is best and prices are optimal,' says Mr Helmut Ricke,
Deutsche Telekom chairman.
By 2000, Deutsche Telekom intends to achieve market leadership with over 3m
subscribers to its GSM network. But so does Mannesmann Mobilfunk.
Now, however, the primary concern of both operators is simply to get their
digital mobile telephone networks rolling and to dispel some of the
confusion which surrounds Germany's mobile communications sector.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4154</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAFZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Survey of Mobile Communications (12): No bonanza - yet /
Eastern Europe
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN WILLIAMSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IN SPITE of the huge demand for telecommunications capacity central and
eastern Europe, experts do not anticipate that this will translate
immediately into a mobile communications bonanza for western hardware
vendors and service operators.
Motorola's reading of the situation is not untypical. 'Personally I don't
see that there are going to be large networks in the short term. The
economies are not strong enough to carry them,' says Mr David Hughes,
vice-president and general manager of the company's European cellular
infrastructure division.
Foreign-led mobile expansion will be constrained not only by weak economies,
by also by a shortage of available radio frequencies in the region, the
difficulty of repatriating profits and local unfamiliarity with western
business culture.
There are also hazards attached to mapping out unknown commercial terrain.
'There often isn't a body of information about the marketplace. You can't
turn to multi-client studies because there aren't any,' says Mr John
Carrington, Cable and Wireless director for mobile and new business.
Nevertheless, the regional mobile market is perceived as having potential in
the longer term and many equipment and service providers stress the
importance of establishing a position on the ground floor.
Motorola has already opened offices in Moscow, Budapest, Prague, Warsaw,
Sofia and Bucharest. In addition to staffing these with local nationals, for
two years the company has been hiring personnel throughout the region for
secondment to its western European operations prior to posting them back
east.
'It's more business practices we're schooling them in than engineering,'
says Mr Don Burns, vice-president and general manager of Motorola's cellular
subscriber division. 'We feel we'll be much more efficiently equipped then.'
So far, the Scandinavian NMT 450 analogue system has made the greatest
impact on eastern Europe's embryonic mobile markets. Systems of this type
have been switched on or are being constructed in Croatia, Czechoslovakia,
Estonia, Hungary, Latvia, Lithuania, Poland, Slovenia, Russia and the
Ukraine.
NMT 450 is an older, entry-level, analogue cellular system due to be
progressively phased out in some western European countries.
In the east, NMT 450 network operators report that the average monthly
airtime clocked up by each subscriber is around five times that in the west.
This is a clear indication, says Mr Burns, that cell phones are being used
in place of the inadequate wireline network rather than for their
specifically mobile attributes.
Since comprehensive expansion of wireline networks is a lengthy process, the
NMT 450 system is projected to have a longer shelf life inside eastern
Europe than in some locations outside. Moreover, the Hungarian NMT 450
operator Westel reckons that subsequent demand for mobility will take up any
slack as new wireline facilities are installed.
Measures are being taken to enhance the technical performance of the old
cellular system. Earlier this year at an industry meeting in Helsinki, it
was proposed to improve NMT 450 speech quality, lengthen the battery life of
its terminals, and introduce a greater range of hand-portable telephones.
Attention also focused on the need for new security measures, since
individual subscriber information from one NMT 450 terminal can be 'cloned'
on to another relatively easily, allowing fraudulent calls to be made at a
genuine subscriber's expense.
Although analogue systems are still a novelty in most eastern European
countries, operators already contemplate the introduction of follow-on
digital networks, the next rung on the cellular ladder.
Leading the field is Hungary, which is set to invite a tender for western
Europe's digital GSM after national authorities have completed their overall
telecommunications reforms.
Speaking in February at an IBC conference on digital cellular technology, Ms
Christina Callmer, market development manager at Ericsson Radio Systems,
predicted that 'there is a good chance that Hungary will be the first
central European country to operate a GSM system.'
Russia has also expressed an interest in licensing up to five GSM systems in
major metropolitan areas, and Czechoslovakia and Poland are also potential
candidates to switch on the system.
GSM could be the technology which drives the region's mobile business into
the big time. According to Motorola's Mr Burns, if obstacles to the export
of digital cellular can be surmounted, eastern European sales of all types
of cellular telephones could quickly rise to as much as 200,000 units.
Industry sources value a market of this size at around Dollars 200m.
The biggest stumbling blocks to the development of a large eastern European
GSM market are Cocom export limitations on digital radio systems in general
and restrictions on GSM's powerful message encryption capability in
particular. The UK government is understood to be concerned about where this
technology - dubbed A5 - ends up.
One solution being investigated by a GSM committee is to produce a version
of the system which has no encryption capability in its infrastructure
hardware. At the same time, thought is being given to the use of a
watered-down encryption technology. 'We are looking into a 'milder'
algorithm fit for export,' says Mr Arne Foxman, a senior executive with
Telecom Denmark and the previous chairman of the GSM committee.
As this initiative continues, radio paging and private mobile radio sales
are picking up in eastern Europe and a number of operators are investigating
the viability of cordless and personal communication services.
Tremendous local interest has been shown in new wireless solutions to the
chronic shortage of conventional loop wireline connections.
Some part of this stems from the fact that, while they are able to plug
gaps, normal mobile cellular systems are not ideal substitutes for the fixed
network. 'You can use cellular types of service but you soon run out of
capacity,' says Mr Rodney Stewart, director of the UK's Quotient
Communications consultancy. 'But other radio techniques can provide the
capacity.'
One such technique features in the Drahtlose Anschlussleitung (DAL) project
under way in the provinces which made up the former East Germany.
DAL uses 'immobilised' NMT 450 analogue cellular systems to provide fixed
radio access into the telephone network. Instead of the laborious business
of digging up streets or planting telephone poles to wire-in connections,
Deutsche Bundespost Telekom gives subscriber access to the network through
permanently installed radio boxes mounted on the walls of homes or business
premises. DAL allows subscribers to plug in and use normal telephones or
facsimile machines via a standard wall socket.
A decision on whether installation of the DAL system will be extended to
additional areas in Germany is expected later this month.
Motorola believes that the NMT 450 technology in DAL does not make the best
use of scarce radio spectrum. The company is about to mount a trial of its
own analogue wireless local loop system in St Petersburg.
Dubbed Will, for Wireless Local Loop, the new system can use any of the
analogue cellular systems currently produced by Motorola, and can readily
accommodate up to 50,000 subscribers using 5MHz of the radio spectrum.
The advantages claimed for Will are that, unlike wireline, its connection
cost per subscriber is independent of the distance separating the telephone
in question from the nearest local exchange, and it is much quicker to
implement. 'With a wireless system you can be on air earning revenue much
sooner,' says Mr Hughes. 'You could easily load up a city the size of St
Petersburg very quickly.'
Quotient Communications' Mr Stewart was the lead author of European
Commission-sponsored report on the use of digital, as opposed to analogue,
wireless local loop technology in eastern Europe. He concluded that a system
such as the forthcoming Digital European Cordless Telecommunications system
(DECT) would often be viable with modest numbers of subscribers sharing a
connection.
Motorola's Mr Hughes acknowledges that digital technology has an important
role to play in eastern Europe, but believes that this solution lies in the
future: 'Those countries want communications now, they don't want it in
three-to-five years' time.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4155</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAFYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Survey of Mobile Communications (14): Good ideas grounded -
The US
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER PURTON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
WHEN IT comes to personal communications, the US is bursting with ideas.
Over the past two years, a staggering 156 companies have applied for
licences to set up trial personal communications services or PCSs. But a
complicated regulatory process and a wrangle over radio spectrum threaten to
delay the introduction of commercial PCSs - a delay which analysts say could
cost the US economy billions of dollars.
PCSs - referred to in Europe as PCNs or personal communications networks -
have been allowed to acquire a more flexible definition in the US than in
Europe.
In Europe, PCN has come to mean a version of the GSM digital cellular system
employing smaller-sized cells and higher frequencies. The European
Telecommunications Standards Institute has produced a detailed specification
for it under the title of DCS-1800. All PCN operators in Europe will be
obliged to make sure their systems conform to this standard.
In the US, as long as a proposed PCS uses the appropriate frequencies and
does not interfere with other services, the Washington-based licence
awarding authority, the Federal Communications Commission (FCC), cares
little about the proposed technology. The result has been an explosion of
enthusiasm and ideas about personal communications.
PCSs, either already or soon to be in trial operation, range from enhanced
versions of home cordless telephones allowing outgoing calls only when away
from home, to PCN-like modified cellular radio systems with full two-way
communications and uninterrupted conversations even when travelling at high
speed in a car.
Many US proposals for personal communications go well beyond the original
European concept. Chicago-based Motorola, for instance, wants to create a
global pocket phone system by mounting radio base stations on satellites.
Telecoms giant AT&amp;T has joined up with the Californian based GO Corporation
to develop a personal communicator which integrates voice, data, fax and
electronic mail with handwriting recognition.
The FCC - vital to the development of PCSs because of its regulatory
function - has, under the chairmanship of Mr Alfred Sikes, been supportive
of those looking to create these services. It has awarded over 130 licences
for PCS trial systems across the US.
But in spite of the will to be helpful, there are problems. The FCC's
decisions are made by a panel of seven politically appointed commissioners,
not all of whom are as enthusiastic about PCS as Mr Sikes. And the FCC
itself is answerable to an unpredictable Congress.
At the end of July, the FCC's PCS plans suffered a setback when a Senate
committee moved to block the FCC's ability to free its proposed PCS band.
The Senate move followed intensive lobbying by the utilities and emergency
services which are the main users of the frequencies. In spite of an FCC
proposal that PCS newcomers compensate incumbents for moving to new
frequencies, the current users are proving reluctant to make the move.
'The microwave lobby is proving to be very stubborn. A feeling of not
wanting to give up what you've got has taken hold,' says Mr Michael
Vernetti, senior vice-president of Telocator, the trade association which
looks after the interests of operators of mobile communications networks.
Many also see problems with the FCC's licensing procedures. In particular,
the system of first awarding trial licences, then later selecting commercial
operators by lottery is causing friction with industry.
'The idea of spending hundreds of millions of dollars without knowing
whether or not we would be able to profit from our investment is difficult
to justify,' says Mr David Frear, vice-president and chief financial officer
of New York-based Millicom, which, despite being one of the first recipients
of a PCS trial licence in May 1990, suspended its PCS experiments at the end
of 1991.
The speed of the process is also under fire. In December 1991, Millicom
filed an application to be allowed to operate wireless local
telecommunications networks in the UK. Last month, Millicom was promised its
licence. 'It's three years since we asked for authorisation to run a PCS
from the FCC,' says Mr Frear.
By the FCC's own admission, the process of awarding licences is a slow one.
'We have still not managed to award all of the cellular licences,' says an
official.
By its own calculations the FCC is unlikely to be able to award PCS licences
before 1994. But this could easily slip into the second half of the decade,
complains Mr Frear.
Estimates of the economic impact of delays to PCSs run to billions of
dollars.
Mr Chuck Jackson, vice-president of the Washington-based firm of consulting
economists, National Economic Research Associates (NERA), estimates the
delay in authorising PCSs is imposing costs to the US economy of 'somewhere
between Dollars 1bn and Dollars 10bn a year'.
In a study not yet published, Mr Jackson and NERA colleagues Mr Jeffrey
Rohlfs and Ms Tracey Kelly, show that the cost to the US economy of not
licensing cellular when it was first technically feasible in the early 1970s
was Dollars 86bn. 'And that's a very conservative estimate,' says Mr
Jackson. If factors such as the effect on the competitiveness of US
manufacturers were taken into account, he says, the figure would have been
as high as Dollars 120bn. 'Whichever way you look at it, it's a lot per
household in the US.'
The FCC and the PCS lobby both hope that the House of Representatives will
overturn the Senate's block on the FCC's PCS spectrum plan before Congress
adjourns in October. By the time it meets again, there will be a new
Congress. And probably at least a few new commissioners at the FCC. What
happens then is anybody's guess.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4156</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAFXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Survey of Mobile Communications (3): Drive for the mass
market - Personal communications networks
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL TAYLOR
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   THE architects of the next generation of digital cellular systems
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
to be launched in the UK next year - are gambling on being able to persuade
consumers to trade in their hard wired home telephone for the latest in
pocket-sized hand sets.
Although analogue cellular services have proved highly popular with business
users wherever they have been introduced, they are expensive and have not
generally succeeded in penetrating the individual or residential markets.
But those building the new personal communications networks (PCNs) know
that, to justify their huge investments in digital technology, they must
reach the mass consumer markets by delivering attractively priced and
feature-rich alternatives to the plain old telephone service.
Mr Richard Goswell, managing director of Mercury Personal Communications,
one of the two remaining licensed PCN operators in the UK, says PCN will
'give you a new type of telephone service released from the umbilical cord
of BT' and provide the first real alternative to wired telephones since
their invention more than a century ago.
He believes that PCN will broaden the mobile telephony market and will not
only provide a telephone which is available at all times, but also give
users much more control over their personal telecommunications services.
But he also acknowledges that 'people will be reluctant to separate from BT'
and that, in spite of its functional benefits, PCN will win customers away
from BT only if it is 'the economically rational thing to do'.
MPC, a joint venture between Cable and Wireless and US West, is promising a
PCN service that will offer pricing options which it says are an 'attractive
alternative to the existing cellular and fixed wire operators for both
business and residential customers'.
But elsewhere, much of the initial enthusiasm for the PCN concept appears to
have evaporated and the original PCN launch target of autumn this year has
been slipping. I n 1989, w h e n the U K government asked companies to apply
for PCN licences, international consortia rushed to compete, encouraged by
predictions of 10m to 15m customers by the end of the century.
Since then, the UK economy has sunk into recession, forecasts of the number
of cellular subscribers by the end of the century have been scaled down and
the need for heavy investment - estimated by some as up to Pounds 1bn for a
nationwide PCN network - has scared many of the original PCN shareholders.
Outside Britain, the US and most other European countries remain cautious
abut PCN-style services. In Europe, only Germany has followed Britain's lead
and announced plans to license a national PCN-style operator with the
licence due to be awarded in December.
A recent report on western Europe's telecoms markets by London-based
analysts, CIT Research, said that 'the massive investment required to
install a national (PCN) network, with no guarantee of a return on
investment in the medium or even longer term, may deter many countries from
licensing PCN', thus preserving the dominance of the public telephone
operators.
It now seems highly unlikely that PCN systems will be widespread in Europe
before the late 1990s, by which time other digital cellular services such as
the Pan-European GSM (Global System for Mobile Communications) networks will
be fully operational. In the UK, the two existing cellular network
operators, Vodafone and Cellnet, are building GSM systems; both have already
announced competitive responses to PCN.
PCN technology is similar to that for GSM although PCN phones, which are
covered by the European DCS1800 standard, will operate at the higher 1800MHz
(MegaHertz) frequency where there is more spare capacity than the 900MHz
used by GSM. However, this means that the cost of building a PCN network
will be roughly double that of a GSM network because using high frequency
signals with a relatively short range requires more transmitters.
One advantage of using small digital cells is that PCN handsets will be able
to operate at lower power and so should eventually be lighter, smaller and
cheaper than GSM phones as well as offering secure, interference-free
communications.
Nevertheless, the uncertainties have led to a growing perception that PCN
technology is a more risky investment than at first appreciated and help
explain the game of musical chairs played by shareholders in the three
consortia originally licensed to offer PCN services in the UK.
This began with abortive merger talks between Microtel and Unitel, two of
the licensees, at the end of 1990. Subsequently Pacific Telesis, Matra and
Milicom pulled out of Microtel leaving it controlled by British Aerospace.
In July last year BAe sold Microtel to Hutchison Telecommunications (UK),
part of the Hong-Kong-based Hutchison Whampoa group, in exchange for a
minority stake in the group's UK subsidiary.
Meanwhile Cable and Wireless took sole control of Mercury PCN, the third
licensee, by acquiring Motorola's stake, and announced plans to build a
single shared network with Unitel, jointly owned by Thorn-EMI of the UK,
Northern Telecom of Canada and US West.
In March this year Mercury PCN merged with Unitel to form Mercury Personal
Communications, leaving just two players left in the PCN race.
Mr Richard Goswell of Mercury Personal Communications acknowledges that
there has been 'a certain amount of settlement' among PCN shareholders, but
says three PCN licences was always one too many. 'The number of operators
now is right,' he says.
However, some market analysts, such as UBS Phillips &amp; Drew, have suggested
that Hutchison Whampoa is carefully monitoring the performance of its UK
telecommunications subsidiary's other new but lower-cost UK activities -
such as paging, telepoint and mobile data - before finally deciding whether
to back the heavy investment needed to launch the PCN service.
The PCN operators also face other competitive challenges. Vodafone, which is
already testing its GSM network in the UK, has announced plans to launch its
own version of a digital personal communications service in the first half
of 1993, extending it to all urban areas by the end of 1995.
Vodafone's Micro Cellular Network (MCN) will begin testing early next year
and will be launched 'no later than July', according to Mr Chris Gent,
Vodafone's managing director.
MCN will be a low-cost urban-based service to be launched in south-east
England in mid-1983, aimed at domestic customers and run on the back of
Vodafone's GSM service operating at the same 900MHz frequency but involving
the building of 3,000 micro-cells to meet the expected higher capacity
requirements.
Call charges are expected to range from only 10p a minute within a user's
home town, to 20p a minute for national calls, putting the service in direct
competition with fixed telephone networks. MCN subscribers who travel
outside their home area will also be able to access the nationwide and
Pan-European GSM services, but at premium rates.
Like the PCN operators, Mr Gent believes MCN will help make mobile telephony
available to many more people and believes that, in spite of the recession
and other setbacks, there could be 7m or 8m mobile phone subscribers by the
end of the century, with the as yet untapped domestic market accounting for
half of this.
Additional competition, at least in the business and corporate markets,
could come from low cost regional varieties of GSM itself. Cellnet has put
back the commercial launch of its nationwide GSM service in the UK until at
least 1994, but says its research has shown demand for a regional digital
service initially in areas such as London, southern England, Greater
Manchester and Birmingham.
Accordingly, Cellnet plans to introduce what it calls Local System for
Mobile communications (LSM) regional services ahead of the launch of a
national GSM network. LSM will probably be introduced first in London and is
likely to be launched at the same time or even before the launch of PCN and
MCN services next year. Cellnet has said its LSM services will have low
usage costs to offset the expected high price of GSM handsets.
Cellnet also sees LSM as one way to help manage the transition from analogue
to digital cellular systems and to test customer response to GSM. For the
moment 'no one is banging on our door saying we must have a digital phone',
says Mr William Ostrom of Cellnet.
Whether PCNs and other new digital mobile services aimed at mass markets can
succeed in making inroads into domestic and traditional office environments
will soon be tested. There is, however, little doubt that the old
distinctions between fixed and mobile networks are already beginning to
become blurred.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4157</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAFWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Survey of Mobile Communications (2): Cellular systems given
new impetus - European subscriptions are up in spite of the launch of
digital networks
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL TAYLOR
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE advent of new advanced digital cellular telephone networks, far from
undermining the growth in subscribers to traditional analogue systems,
appears to have given the market added impetus.
Just a few weeks before the commercial launch of Europe's first digital
(GSM) networks earlier this summer, the number of subscribers to western
European existing cellular networks pasted the 5m mark for the first time.
According to figures compiled by the Mobile Communications FT newsletter,
this milestone was achieved in spite of a marked slowdown in growth rates in
several markets last year, including the UK, partially offset by
particularly strong growth in 1991 in the German and Italian markets.
Meanwhile in the US, the world's largest cellular market, the number of
cellular subscribers grew by almost 40 per cent to 7.5m last year and could
top 10m by the end of 1992, according to analysts.
By 1996 EMCI, the Washington-based international telecommunications
consultancy, estimates that the world cellular market will have grown to
53.6m, with analogue systems still accounting for 76.2 per cent of the
total.
Although a growing proportion of new subscribers will be using digital
systems in the US, Europe and other markets, as EMCI notes, 'the complete
migration to digital cellular will take many years'.
Indeed digital systems are likely to suffer from some drawbacks initially,
including bulkier and, in some markets, more expensive handsets and the fact
that in Europe at least, it may be the mid-1990s before many national GSM
networks are fully operational.
This means that early subscribers will not be able to use one of GSM's most
attractive features - the ability to 'roam' across national borders. Even
where GSM networks are in place, this feature will be available only when
commercial agreements are reached between national operators and once other
technical and administrative problems have been resolved.
In some countries - such as Germany, which is quickly becoming the most
dynamic market in Europe - the imminent commercial launch of the GSM digital
system by Mannesman Mobilfunk has prompted Deutsche Telekom, the state-owned
operator of the C-Netz cellular network launched in 1985, to step up its
marketing. This has helped produce a remarkable surge in subscriber figures
in the past year.
Another factor which has helped boost analogue system subscriber numbers
recently has been economic liberalisation and the opening up of new markets,
particularly in Asia, Latin America and eastern Europe
In places such as the former east Germany, cellular systems have provided an
attractive and rapidly installable alternative to the overloaded fixed
telephone service. For example, Deutsche Telekom launched the DAL project
(Drahtlose Anschlussleitung - meaning wireless subscriber line) based on
network equipment supplied by Nokia and designed rapidly to increase the
number of telephone lines in economic centres in eastern Germany such as
Leipzig, Dresden and Berlin.
Although the focus of DAL project is short term, the use of cellular
technology as part of a traditional fixed network marks an important trend
in telecommunications and illustrates how cellular communications have
become a feasible alternative mass market approach to providing a phone
service.
Similarly, Hungary's cellular network, launched in October 1990 by Westel, a
joint venture between US West and the Hungarian Telecommunications Company,
has provided companies with an alternative to the fixed network, which is
unreliable and frequently unavailable.
In some countries, however, capacity constraints on cellular systems have
begun to hinder growth. One of the reasons for the slow growth in Belgium,
which recorded the lowest growth in Europe last year, was the saturation of
the NMT-450 network ahead of the launch of the Belgian PTT's GSM system.
Similarly in France, the shortage of frequencies has been a major problem
for the two networks run by France Telecom and its private sector rival,
Societe Francaise du Radiotelephone.
In other markets such as the US - where the debate over which technology
cellular network operators will use to digitalise their services is still
raging - operators needing additional capacity immediately are using, or
planning to use, new methods for expanding old analogue networks.
Among these methods, Motorola has developed a technology known as Namps
(Narrowband Advanced Mobile Phone Service) which can increase analogue
network capacity three-fold, thereby delaying the need for digitalisation.
Operators that have placed orders with Motorola for Namps systems include
CRM, the consortium which operates a cellular service in Buenos Aires,
cellular operators in Israel, Thailand and Bell Atlantic Metro Mobile,
Centel Cellular and US West in the US.
Meanwhile AT&amp;T, the US telecommunications group, and others have developed
the Microcell concept which can be used in tandem with any network
technology. Microcells can dramatically increase network capacity and,
according to AT&amp;T, enable big savings to be made by operators of small to
medium-sized cellular networks that had previously thought they would have
to digitalise their networks.
Where sufficient capacity already exits ahead of the launch of digital
systems, analogue cellular network operators are also proving adept at
devising marketing and pricing strategies designed to reposition their
services as cheaper, consumer-orientated products.
For example, in both the Swedish and Norwegian markets, which have had
cellular systems for 10 years and have the highest penetration levels in the
world, operators have launched special cut-price services aimed at consumers
who cannot afford the high price of normal cellular services but want to use
mobile telephones in the evenings and at weekends.
Most of the early cellular pioneers have long since recouped their original
investment, so the task now is to maximise return on investment before
digital services become established.
One of the boldest marketing moves has come from Cellnet, one of the two UK
cellular network operators. Cellnet has invested more than Pounds 700m in
its network, including Pounds 4m a week in 1990 to alleviate the then
growing problem of congestion and dropped calls caused by the surge in
demand in the late 1980s. Since then, however, network growth in the UK has
slowed dramatically and Cellnet, like its rival Vodafone, now has surplus
capacity.
In a move which rocked the UK market in June, Cellnet said it would launch
its new 'LifeTime' tariff, cutting the cost of subscribing to its analogue
service in an attempt to tap the low-use consumer market. The new tariff
package will be sold through high street outlets and will be available later
this year.
Subscribers to the new package will pay a low connection charge and half the
usual Pounds 25 monthly charge, but calls will be twice as expensive as the
normal business users' tariff.
Announcing the initiative, Mr Stafford Taylor, Cellnet's managing director,
said: 'There is a huge potential demand for mobile phones. Our research
indicated that up to 10m people are seriously interested, with 1m simply
waiting for the right price to buy.'
Cellnet's initiative - which has subsequently been matched by Vodafone
announcing a similarly structured low-user tariff package called LowCall to
be launched next month - will partly be judged on its success in attracting
new customers while minimising the number of its existing business customers
who simply migrate to the new scheme. Cellnet itself is predicting that its
new low-user tariff will attract 200,000 new subscribers in the first year
while Vodafone is somewhat less bullish.
These customers will also require the low price handsets for sale in the
high street such as the model - at under Pounds 300 - which Sony has said it
will manufacture for use with the LifeTime service.
Cellular services such as LifeTime and LowCall, aimed at domestic consumers,
will rely on handset manufacturers bringing out new low-cost hand-portables.
These are unlikely to involve the same level of new connection payments from
network operator to service supplier and then to dealers - payments which
dealers in the UK have traditionally used to subsidise the retail price of
handsets.
Ultimately, however, the success of analogue network operators in broadening
the appeal of their services will depend upon their ability to differentiate
services and fine-tune tariff structures and charges to address different
markets - something which will be crucial for those operators who will have
both analogue and digital services.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4158</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAFVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / The TUC At Blackpool: Lack of a national skills strategy
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CATHERINE MILTON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
TRAINING and Enterprise Councils, which administer government-funded
training programmes in England and Wales, are compromised by the lack of a
national skills strategy according to the first independent study of the
Tecs, Catherine Milton writes. The study by the charitably funded Centre for
Local Economic Strategy, argues that Tecs do not need more money or
management changes. It says the problems for the employer-led bodies are
related to their market structure, which it says promotes short-termism and
the marginalisation of disadvantaged groups. Reforming the Tecs. Alberton
House, St Mary's Parsonage, Manchester, M3 2WJ.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 14
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4159</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAFUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / The TUC At Blackpool: Necessity forces consorting with the
old enemy / A look at relations with the CBI
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID GOODHART and LISA WOOD
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MR Howard Davies today becomes the first head of the Confederation of
British Industry, the employers' body, to address the TUC in its 124-year
history. The move is part of an attempt by the TUC to build a new
relationship with employers and to climb out of the ghetto of
marginalisation it feels it has fallen into.
Mr Roger Lyons, the new head of the MSF, the white-collar union, tells a
story to illustrate this feeling of marginalisation. When the union recently
opened an office in Dublin, he says, the guest of honour was the former
Irish labour minister, Mr Bertie Ahern, who is now finance minister. A few
weeks later, when the same union opened an office in Manchester, the guest
of honour was not a government representative but a local footballer.
The TUC hopes to signal by its invitation to Mr Davies that it is serious
about the consensus part of the continental European idea of 'social
partnership'.
But with strikes at the lowest level for 101 years, and unions rarely able
to challenge the will of management, many union officials argue that there
is already an enforced consensus in British industry - on the employers'
terms. 'The TUC is just casting around to find someone at national level to
talk to,' said one general secretary dismissively.
It is unlikely, however, that Mr Davies's predecessor Sir John Banham would
have received the invitation. Union leaders believe they can do business
with Mr Davies. But what business can the CBI and TUC usefully do together?
Mr Norman Willis, TUC general secretary, finds it hard to be specific, but
says: 'You could say the invitation was a symbol, but symbols matter.'
Mr John Edmonds, leader of the GMB general union, is more precise. He
believes that there are several issues - for example export credits and
energy prices - where the two organisations have almost identical views and
could together promote them more effectively to the government.
'If we can present a common argument on specific problems why not,
eventually, a common package on infrastructure investment and stimulating
the economy?' says Mr Edmonds. Although the CBI is unlikely to want to give
the kiss of life to the TUC by agreeing to a stream of joint statements, one
area where both sides agree that closer co-operation could be useful is
training.
Mr Davies is expected to devote a large part of his speech to the subject
and will certainly mention the new national training targets which have been
embraced by both the CBI and the TUC.
However, there are still significant differences between the two sides, even
on training, with the TUC keen to enforce better standards of training on
employers by legislation, and the CBI preferring a voluntary approach. But
members of both organisations have sat side-by-side on bodies such as the
National Council for Vocational Qualifications and its committees which have
devised National Vocational Qualifications, the new national system of
assessment based on competence in the workplace.
The CBI will shy away from any national-level pacts on training but the TUC
is in any case planning to concentrate its efforts at local level. Mr
Brendan Barber, head of organisation at the TUC, says: 'Unions have always
been actively involved with training at national level, for example in the
Manpower Services Commission. Where we have not done enough is with
individual employers.'
To make up for that the TUC is to publish a guide for union negotiators to
help put training on the collective-bargaining agenda. Employers will be
asked to agree to a plan promoted by the GMB and TGWU general unions to
provide a minimum of five days annual training for all employees.
At Imperial Chemical Industries the new joint union claim for manual workers
includes the proposal for five days' annual training. At British Gas this
year's agreement included a career support scheme to help employees with
family responsibilities develop their skills. Wages for trainees at British
Gas will also in future rise as they achieve various skill levels.
However, training agreements are not always immune from traditional
industrial relations problems. A two-year multi-skilling agreement at Swan
Hunter Shipbuilding ran into trouble last week when electricians staged a
24-hour unofficial strike to protest at the provision of electrical work for
boilermakers.
But putting training on the collective-bargaining agenda also opens up some
constructive possibilities. For example, some union leaders would be
prepared to encourage their members to forgo part of a pay rise in exchange
for a guarantee of quality training. That is the sort of consensus that the
CBI might also find attractive.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 14
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4160</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAFTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / The TUC At Blackpool: Tougher pensions law urged
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DIANE SUMMERS, Labour Staff
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
UNIONS are to call for a majority of occupational fund trustees to be
democratically elected or appointed by scheme members. A 'charter for
pension fund democracy' is to be launched tomorrow.
The charter will call on the government to put forward new legislation in
the wake of the Maxwell scandal. Unions argue that pensions form an
important part of the pay package so that neither contribution rates nor
benefits should be altered unilaterally by employers.
The idea of majority control by scheme members is more radical than previous
TUC proposals that half of a scheme's trustees should be made up of
employees and pensioners. Although the charter is to be launched at a fringe
meeting, and is not part of an official TUC campaign, it is being backed by
several of the largest unions.
The charter will call for a number of changes, including the separation of
pension-fund assets from the assets of employers; the right for pensioners
to be represented on trustee boards; and the right for trustees to be able
to appoint advisers to obtain independent advice.
The launch of the charter will coincide with two debates on pensions
tomorrow - one on the control of occupational schemes, and the other on the
equalisation of the state pension age for men and women. The TUC is certain
to renew its call for a common retirement age of 60.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 14
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4161</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAFSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / The TUC At Blackpool: Unions to open base in Brussels
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID GOODHART, Labour Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE TUC is to open an office in Brussels. Mr Bill Jordan, leader of the AEEU
craft union, said yesterday the office would be cost-effective as unions did
much business with the European Commission.
Mr Jordan, launching a TUC 'Network Europe' to improve union contacts within
the EC, said he was proposing a common European union card for members of
engineering and metalworking unions, though he advised against interpreting
such a move as the first step towards pan-European unionism.
The problem of fostering co-operation across borders between unions with
different bargaining cultures continues to prevent the establishment of a
European works council at Ford. The German union I G Metall insists that
only Ford employees can be on the council while the UK unions insist that
full-time union officials must also have a voice.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 14
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4162</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAFRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / The TUC At Blackpool: Scargill calls NUM to oppose all
'anti-union legislation'
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
A CALL by Mr Arthur Scargill, president of the National Union of
Mineworkers, to oppose all 'anti-union legislation' introduced since 1979
was rejected by the Trades Union Congress yesterday. However, the annual
conference carried a motion calling for unions to determine rulebooks in
accordance with International Labour Organisation conventions. Leftwingers
interpreted the motion as proposing the dismantling of laws that force
unions to elect officials and ban secondary action.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 14
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4163</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAFQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / The TUC At Blackpool: Plans for sweeping reform win support
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL SMITH, Labour Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE Trades Union Congress yesterday agreed a radical structural and
operational shake-up in the wake of the Conservative party's fourth
successive election victory and its proposals for further employment
legislation.
Delegates to the TUC's annual congress in Blackpool agreed to consider six
priority tasks. These include a campaign for full employment and lobbying
against planned trade union legislation.
The reforms follow a 20 per cent cut in the TUC's staff earlier this year.
Some union leaders yesterday indicated that they believed further changes
were overdue.
Mr Bill Jordan, president of the AEEU engineering workers' and electricians
union, said Congress House - the TUC's headquarters - had become an
overburdened packhorse for every social change that crossed its threshold.
'The TUC's strength is the world of work and we should play to it.'
There was no criticism of Mr Norman Willis, the TUC's general secretary, who
has been under pressure recently and expected by some to resign.
He received warm applause after his opening speech arguing the case for full
employment. 'We have to assert that unemployment is not the price we must
pay for getting the economy right, it is the price we pay for having got it
wrong.'
Mr Alan Johnson, general-secretary-elect of the UCW postal workers' union,
said there were millions of workers who would join unions if given an
opportunity.
The TUC had to tackle declining membership and its own abysmal public
profile, Mr Johnson said. It could provide a focal point for attracting
membership, particularly for people working in small organisations.
The TUC could assist in removing bureaucratic barriers to union membership
by publicising national helplines and assisting respondents in joining the
appropriate union.
Mr Barry Reamsbottom, general secretary of the CPSA Civil Service union,
said the unions did not have a 'scintilla of influence' over government
policy. 'In fact we have less influence than some pressure groups one
hundredth our size.
He added: 'Instead of constantly attacking other people's ideas, we must
produce our own.'
Mr Bill Morris, general secretary of the TGWU general union, said that
because the political climate had not changed last April, it was the TUC
that had to. It should concentrate on co-ordinating activities, building
strong European links and maintaining good relations between affiliates, he
said.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 14
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4164</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAFPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Commodities and Agriculture: De Beers remains in the dark
about extent of Russian diamond smuggling
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LEYLA BOULTON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MOSCOW
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
DE BEERS, the South African group which controls about 80 per cent of the
world's rough (uncut) diamond trade, yesterday admitted it had no clear idea
of how many gem stones were being smuggled out of Russia.
It also became clear yesterday that De Beers faces competition from Japan in
Yakutia, where 99 per cent of Russian diamonds are mined and where it hopes
to help set up a cutting centre.
In any case, the South African group is not confident of its grip on the
Russian diamonds business and therefore wants to reconfirm its existing
five-year contract which gives it a virtual monopoly of Russia's rough
diamond exports.
De Beers concluded an agreement in 1990 that gives its Central Selling
Organisation exclusive rights to sell Russian rough diamond exports until
1995. It advanced a Dollars 1bn loan to the former Soviet Union against
stockpiled diamonds which were moved to London.
However, though Russia has continued to abide by the terms of the deal the
agreement has repeatedly been called into question.
'We hope that uncertainty in the diamond market will be ended by a
pronouncement of the diamond commission which should show that CSO is
Russia's best opportunity,' said De Beers deputy chairman, Mr Nicky
Oppenheimer.
Mr Valery Skripchenko, the deputy head of a group within Russia's budget
committee which is looking into the structure of the diamond industry,
suggested yesterday that De Beers was also seeking a monopoly of Russian
exports of polished stones in addition to that it enjoyed for rough gems. He
suggested a fresh parliamentary investigation could be launched when
parliament reconvened on September 22.
His objections appear to have been prompted by an outline agreement reached
last week by De Beers with Yakutia, the semi-autonomous republic within
Russia, to set up a stone-polishing factory.
Mr Gary Ralfe, the De Beers' director responsible for liaison with Russia,
said that if the agreement went through, his group would supply technology
for the plant and 'help' sell the polished stones it produced - which would
still account for a tiny proportion of rough gems mined in Yakutia.
But if Yakutia instead concluded a diamond-polishing deal with a rival
Japanese company called ARDA, De Beers would have no control over polished
stones sales by Yakutia, which does not yet have its own stone-cutting
capacity.
Asked about the smuggling problem, Mr Ralfe said it was impossible to tell
how many diamonds were leaking from the former Soviet Union in contravention
of the 1990 agreement. He believed smuggling was taking place without the
sanction of government authorities and that the Russian problem was nothing
like on the scale of the illegal flood of diamonds out of Angola.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 32
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4165</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAFNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Fines record
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
FINES totalling a record Pounds 44,500 were imposed by Newbury magistrates
yesterday on the owner and manager of a Chinese food takeaway business in
Hungerford, Berks, for breaches of food safety regulations.
The total in fines was a record for a food safety prosecution. The business
is now operating under new ownership.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4166</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAFMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / BT survey highlights 'wasted' travel time
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LISA WOOD, Labour Staff
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
PROFESSIONAL and managerial workers spend more than three years of their
working lives travelling - time estimated by British Telecommunications to
be worth more than Pounds 7.5bn a year.
According to a BT survey of 300 people, these executives admit to spending
their travel time dozing, daydreaming or reading the sports page.
Fewer than two in five said they worked while travelling. Yet those who did
said they found the time productive.
BT's survey of 300 businesspeople showed that productive travellers caught
up on reading memos, reports and other company literature.
It also showed that two out of three executives travelled on business at
least twice a week while more than a third did so virtually every day. Only
a third expected their business travel to increase.
Most executives believed it was important to keep in touch with office and
home while they were away on business, although most could not themselves be
contacted while they were on the move.
Most travellers preferred to make contact with other people rather than to
be available for contact. Younger business travellers were most likely to
object to being contacted.
Dr Guy Fielding, a psychologist asked by BT to look at the findings, said
many people could not see how they could do more on busy trains and crowded
planes. He said anybody could learn to be a productive traveller if they put
in some planning and were willing to be flexible.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4167</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAFLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Coal equipment given to museum
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
VICTORIAN steam-driven pumps and other equipment salvaged from one of
British Coal's recently closed collieries are to be donated to Beamish, the
North of England Open Air Museum in County Durham.
The equipment, some of which dates back to the 1840s, became redundant when
electricity was introduced in the 1930s but it remained underground at
Murton colliery, Co. Durham, sunk in 1838.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4168</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAFKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Central African poll date set
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BANGUI
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
President Andre Kolingba of the Central African Republic announced yesterday
that presidential and parliamentary elections would be held on October 25,
Reuter reports from Bangui.
He signed a decree setting the date for the double poll as six public sector
trade unions began a 10-day strike over unpaid salaries.
General Kolingba came to power in a 1981 coup with the blessing of France,
Central Africa's former colonial power.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4169</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAFJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Sudan relief airlift halted
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   KAMPALA
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Rebels gunner have forced the United Nations to halt a relief airlift to the
besieged south Sudan city of Juba, where some 300,000 people are short of
food, Reuter reports from Kampala.
It was the third time in two weeks the flight have been halted by rebel
fire. A World Food Programme official, Mr Ben Martinson, said they would not
resume until both sides in the eight-year civil war guaranteed their safety.
He said three rounds fired by the Sudan People's Liberation Army exploded
very close to a chartered Russian Ilyushin cargo plane as it unloaded on
Sunday. He said the plane returned to Entebbe, Uganda, with some of the food
still on board.
Mr Martinson said the UN had flown in 1,080 tonnes of maize and had planned
to send a further 1,000 tonnes during the next two weeks. He said food
supplies in the refugee-packed city were still inadequate.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4170</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAFIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Stronger Iran-Pakistan links
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By FARHAN BOKHARI
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   ISLAMABAD
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
President Ali Akbar Hashemi Rafsanjani of Iran yesterday called for closer
co-operation with Pakistan, as a way to resist 'domineering arrogant
powers,' Farhan Bokhari reports from Islamabad.
In an address to members of Pakistan's parliament on the second day of his
state visit to the country, he said external countries did not want Pakistan
and Iran to become more independent and powerful.
Mr Rafsanjani said both countries must further build upon the existing
historical relations and Islamic ties.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4171</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAFHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Hizbollah triumphs at polls
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BEIRUT
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
The pro-Iranian Hizbollah (Party of God) is likely to control the biggest
single bloc in the Lebanese parliament after scoring sweeping victories in
the country's first election in 20 years, Reuter reports from Beirut.
Hizbollah and its pro-Syrian allies were well ahead of political opponents
in early results yesterday following Sunday's third and final round of
voting.
Diplomats said the once politically dominant Christians had thrown away much
of their power as most of them had boycotted the election in protest at the
presence of Syrian troops in Beirut.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4172</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAFGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / UN nuclear inspectors leave Iraq
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BAGHDAD
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
A UNITED NATIONS nuclear inspection team left Iraq yesterday without laying
to rest the ghost of a secret underground plant but having agreed a plan to
keep an eye on whether Baghdad is reviving its nuclear programme, Reuter
reports from Baghdad.
Mr Maurizio Zifferero said Iraq's rivers, lakes and canals would be
monitored for radioactivity levels, making possible the detection of any
resumption of nuclear activities.
Mr Zifferero, head of the 14th mission charged with destroying Iraq's
nuclear weapons capability, told reporters that Baghdad had to do more to
satisfy the Security Council it was complying with the terms of the Gulf War
ceasefire.
But Mr Zifferero, whose visit followed a period of strained relations
between Iraq and the UN, praised the co-operation he received, and said he
had laid the groundwork for long-term monitoring.
Mr Zifferero, whose 15-member team spent a week travelling round Iraq, said
the question would remain unanswered if more detailed information were not
forthcoming.
Mr Zifferero is a deputy head of the Vienna-based International Atomic
Energy Agency (IAEA), which is conducting the nuclear inspectors for the
Security Council.
The Security Council ceasefire resolution called for the elimination of all
Iraq's weapons of mass destruction.
President Saddam Hussein's eldest son was yesterday quoted as saying it was
time democratic reforms were introduced in Iraq to thwart western attempts
to dismember the country, Reuter reports from Baghdad.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4173</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAFFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / World News In Brief: Skydivers killed
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The pilot and 11 other men on a skydiving outing died in Illinois when their
B-18 Beechcraft aircraft flipped over and crashed into a field.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4174</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAFEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / World News In Brief: Author sacked
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Terry Smith, author of Accounting for Growth, was dismissed as head of
research at UK securities house UBS Phillips &amp; Drew. Smith, whose book upset
leading UK companies, is to appeal. He was suspended last month after a
dispute with UBS over publication of the book.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4175</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAFDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Premier league sponsorship row
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
SEVEN MEMBERS of the new premier league, the top English football division,
walked out of a meeting of the clubs yesterday after a Pounds 13m
sponsorship deal with Bass, the brewer, had been blocked.
Eight of the league's 22 clubs had voted against accepting the deal because
they felt it might conflict with their own sponsorships by brewers.
The seven clubs which walked out argued that the action by the eight was
against the interests of the Premier League as a whole.
Fourteen clubs voted to accept the deal - one less than the 15 votes needed
to carry the motion.
Mr Rick Parry, Premier League chief executive, said he did not expect Bass
to pursue sponsoring the league. The GM Vauxhall Conference yesterday signed
a one-year sponsorship agreement with the Health Education Authority for the
Bob Lord Challenge Trophy, which will become known as the Drinkwise Cup,
named after the authority's campaign to promote sensible consumption of
alcohol.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4176</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAFCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Survey of Mobile Communications (9): Dragons are still
hungry - Asia
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN WILLIAMSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ASIA'S appetite for mobile communications verges on the insatiable.
According to a recent study by the London-based telecommunications
consultancy, CIT Research, the 1991 market for mobile services and equipment
in just eight countries in the Asia Pacific region was worth around Dollars
9bn. By 2001, the company forecasts that the value of the same business in
Australia, Hong Kong, Japan, Malaysia, New Zealand, Singapore, South Korea
and Thailand will grow to around Dollars 28bn, with some countries in this
group clocking up annual mobile market growth rates in three figures.
The reasons for such phenomenal expansion differ from location to location.
Some countries in the region have buoyant economies and are growing at
between 5 and 10 per cent annually. Others possess tremendous growth
potential. In both cases, demand for telecommunications service and
equipment of all kinds is building rapidly and, as is generally
acknowledged, mobile technology is at the cutting edge of the global
telecommunications industry.
Competition is an important factor in some markets, particularly in Hong
Kong, where there are four different nominated cellular operators, and
Japan, where around 40 paging operators compete for customers with the
incumbent carrier Nippon Telegraph and Telephone.
However, competition is not a unique spur to expansion. As CIT points out,
the South Korean paging market, which probably is the fastest growing in the
world, is operated as a monopoly.
A third explanation for Asia's enthusiasm for mobile communications is that,
for the most part, local operators do not have huge investments in wireline
networks which need to be amortised over a period of years. They can,
instead, exploit new mobile radio technology to increase subscriber access
to modern telecommunications facilities.
A cellular service jointly launched by the Ho Chi Minh Post and
Telecommunications Administration and Singapore Telecom International in
Vietnam is a case in point. 'The pace of economic activity in Vietnam has
stepped up to the extent that the telephone infrastructure is inadequate to
meet the demand from business,' says Mr Philip Low, Singapore Telecom's
marketing manager for the project. 'We decided to fill the vacuum by
providing mobile telephone services for businessmen who are constantly on
the move here.'
Analogue cellular telephone systems are spearheading the region's mobile
voice revolution. Pyramid Research of the US calculates that developing
countries in Asia will increase their cellular subscriber populations from a
mere 615,000 in 1990 to 3.3m in 1993. But this is small beer compared to the
industrialised nations in the region. Japan's current 1.25m cellular users
are forecast to increase to anywhere between 9m and 14m by the early years
of the next decade.
Although systems of US origin have tended to dominate Asia's analogue
cellular markets, the switch to digital has created an important opening for
Europe's GSM. This opportunity has come about in part because GSM is
commercially the most mature digital cellular system in the world today.
Meanwhile, the existence of a number of different and incompatible digital
and analogue follow-on systems in the US has not been particularly helpful
to the export prospects of that country's mobile industry.
So far, GSM has been selected for implementation in Australia, Hong Kong,
New Zealand and Singapore. Trial systems have been supplied to China, the
Philippines and Taiwan, and India recently announced its aim of granting GSM
concessions for the cities of Bombay, Calcutta, Delhi and Madras. Interest
in the European system has also been voiced by Indonesia, Malaysia and
Thailand.
But GSM will not have the field to itself. A number of local operators have
decided to wait for a North American digital cellular solution, and Japan is
now starting to promote its own digital system in the region.
The Japanese Digital Cellular (JDC) system is less well developed than GSM,
and will not enter commercial service much before 1994. However, big
non-Japanese manufacturers, such as Motorola and Sweden's Ericsson, have
included JDC in their portfolios and Japanese vendors have an unrivalled
reputation for commercialising technology in the type of mass consumer
markets that digital cellular is intended to address.
If cellular telephony is making headlines, paging is already the most
pervasive, not to say audible, mobile communications service in the Asia
Pacific region. CIT Research says that there are over 8.2m wide area pagers
in the eight countries it surveyed and forecasts that this number will rise
to 13m by 2001.
In some countries pagers have already achieved the ubiquity of mass market
consumer durables. In others, pagers are regarded as fashion accessories:
the main target for paging vendors in Hong Kong is the 16- to 20-year age
group.
Hong Kong and Singapore have Asia's highest pager penetration rates with,
respectively, 152 and 130 receivers for every 1,000 population. The most
dynamic market, however, is South Korea where the paging population doubled
to 851,000 in 1991.
Less glamorous than cellular telephony and less visible than paging, private
mobile radio continues to make gains in the Asia Pacific market. The largest
market of the eight analysed by CIT Research was Japan, with an installed
base of 27m units at the beginning of this year. Trunked networks are
becoming important and should dominate terminal sales worth nearly Dollars
930m, at current prices, in 2001.
While technologies such as Japan's Personal Handy Phone and the Digital
European Cordless Telecommunications system (DECT) are being energetically
promoted in the Asia Pacific region, the surprise hit of the cordless sector
so far is CT-2 telepoint. In stark contrast to its disappointing start in
the UK, and the rather cautious welcome it has received in most other
European countries, Asia has taken to the CT-2 wireless payphone service in
a big way.
Hong Kong has two services and two more have been licensed. Hutchison's Tien
Dey Seen service was switched on at the end of March and had signed up
around 20,000 subscribers by mid-May. A second service, Chevalier's Bo Bo
Tung, went live at the end of May and picked up 4,000 users in a matter of
weeks. Mr Neil Montefiori, Chevalier's managing director, promises cordless
office switchboards, interactive voice mail linked to paging and two-way
calling on his system later this year.
Singapore's Callzone CT-2 telepoint service was launched earlier this year
to scenes reminiscent of the opening the first MacDonald's hamburger outlet
in Moscow. According to Mr Sung Sio Ma, head of Singapore Telecom
International's arm, the company's stock of 10,000 CT-2 terminals was sold
out in one week and the carrier had to back-peddle on promoting the service
further. At the end of May, Callzone customers numbered over 18,000, and Mr
Sung was forecasting that CT-2 subscriptions would soon outnumber the island
state's 80,000 cellular telephone users.
All of this is a far cry from CT-2's muted performance in its region of
origin and is something of an embarrassment for the assorted pundits who had
already written the obituary of the service. But as Mr John Carrington,
director for mobile and new services at Cable and Wireless has remarked,
even the great and good are not right all the time: 'I think that the key to
telepoint is that, not for the first time, many experts got it wrong. There
is a large demand for low cost communications which do not have the full
functionality of cellular. Telepoint meets that need and seems set for a
bright future.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4177</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAFBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Survey of Mobile Communications (10): Time for some new
ideas - Radiopaging
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SIAN BOHANA
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE radiopager is arguably the oldest form of personal communications. But
the unexpected success of the mobile telephone has been something of an
embarrassment to the sector, relegating it to the status of a poorer cousin.
Now it is looking to boost its image and its income with some new ideas and
a new approach.
Radiopaging first saw the light of day at St Thomas's Hospital, London, in
1956, as a way of contacting doctors and other personnel when they were
needed.
Even today, radiopaging remains the simplest form of personal
communications. Three different types of radiopager are available. The
simplest and cheapest is the tone only radiopager. It costs around Pounds 10
a month to rent and use. It beeps to alert its owner that someone wants to
get in touch with him or her.
The numeric radiopager, which costs around Pounds 20 a month, uses a tiny
screen to display numbers. These could be either the phone number of the
person who wants to get in contact, or coded messages. Thus, a service
engineer might deduce from the number 200--3, that Mr Bloggs from Woolworth
needs some more fax paper.
The top option is the alphanumeric radiopager. This can cost up to Pounds 30
a month. A small screen displays text and numbers. Typical alphanumeric
radiopagers can hold up to 400 characters. Some even hold up to 2,000.
The UK's six radiopaging network operators - Aircall Communications, BT
Mobile Communications, Intercity Paging, Hutchison Paging, Mercury Paging
and Racal Vodapage - serve some 700,000 radiopaging users.
But this figure is only some 200,000 up from the number of radiopagers in
use in the mid-1980s when the cellular telephone was launched. By contrast,
the UK's two cellular radio network operators now support over 1.3m users.
As though to rub salt into the wound, radiopaging's own version of the GSM
(Global System for Mobile Communications) digital pan-European cellular
radio system now being introduced across Europe, Euromessage, was initially
supported by all six operators, but only one, Hutchison Paging, is now
continuing with the service. It allows radiopaging users to take their
pagers with them on their travels across Europe.
The relative success of cellular and failure of radiopaging has prompted an
industry rethink. Some basic principles - particularly in the area of
marketing - are being questioned, including:
radiopaging users rent but do not buy;
radiopaging is a stand-alone service;
only people in suits are interested in radiopaging;
radiopagers must be black.
Mr Trevor Harvey, chairman of the UK Paging Operators Association which
represents the interests of the six network operators, points out that most
radiopaging network operators rent their equipment. 'But things are
changing,' he notes.
Hutchison Paging was the first radiopaging network operator in the UK to
offer a sale-only option. It brought the idea from Hong Kong, where it
commands over half of the 800,000-strong market. 'We now have a market share
in excess of 50 per cent in Hong Kong and we've never rented a pager,' notes
Mr Mike Bowerman, managing director of Hutchison Paging UK.
In the UK both Hutchison and Mercury Paging offer a sale option. Moreover,
Mr Owen Lamont, general manager responsible for radiopaging at BT Mobile
Communications, says that it will start selling radiopagers by October.
According to Mr Mike Walton, marketing manager at Mercury Paging, many users
'would find it more effective to buy their pagers and thus reduce their
monthly costs'. Though the majority of radiopagers in use today are rented,
some observers believe it might not be that long before the ratio is
reversed.
Another dogma which is being called into question is that radiopaging should
be seen as a stand-alone service. In contrast, 'the real strength of the
pager is probably as a complement to other communications technologies,'
notes Mr Harvey.
One strong potential area of growth where the industry hopes that the whole
will add up to more than just the sum of the parts is the combination of
radiopaging with voice messaging. This allows callers to leave spoken
messages on centralised computer systems, triggering a radiopager so that
the intended recipient of the message can retrieve quite complex
information. All six radiopaging operators offer combined radiopaging/voice
messaging packages.
Another synergetic area may be to combine radiopaging with telepoint, the
service which allows users of cordless telephones to use them not only at
home or in the office but while out and about. In many ways it provides a
perfect complement to radiopaging - while radiopagers can only receive
messages, today's telepoint handsets can only make calls, so together they
provide inbound and outbound communications.
The telepoint option, at least for the time being, is open only to
Hutchison, as it alone of the radiopaging network operators operates a
telepoint network.
Also gone is the belief that radiopaging is exclusively the preserve of the
consumer. In the US, even schoolchildren are becoming users. BT's Mr Lamont
believes that with the right marketing and advertising strategies, the UK
radiopaging market could develop similarly, although he admits: 'It will be
a challenge.' The move from renting equipment to selling it is likely to be
significant in the development of a consumer market for radiopaging.
Radiopagers are getting smaller and new colours - other than black - are
starting to appear. Pen-sized models are also already available, as are
radiopagers integrated into wrist-watches, and even organisers with
radiopagers in them. 'The possibilities are endless,' Mr Lamont notes.
As well as the rethink in marketing, radiopaging is also beginning to
benefit from some new network technologies, something particularly welcome
to the relatively new entrants to the field, who are keen to roll out their
networks as soon as possible. Mercury and Hutchison, for instance, both now
use satellite links to relay radiopaging messages from control centres to
the radiopaging transmitters. This cuts operating costs significantly.
Despite the initial disappointment of Euromessage, a flicker of hope still
remains among many in the industry that crossborder paging can yet be made
to work. Hutchison Paging has spent the last two years carefully negotiating
the rights to all of the UK's allocation of spectrum for Euromessage. Many
believe with control now in the hands of a single network operator, success
may still be in store for Euromessage.
Enthusiasm for global messaging, however, not so long ago the goal of a
number of actual and potential radiopaging operators, seems to have been
dampened. The general opinion seems to be that global messaging is still a
long way off.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4178</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAFAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Survey of Mobile Communications (11): Rabbit starts to run -
Public cordless telephones
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER PURTON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TELEPOINT
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
the UK-developed public cordless telephone service which had a disastrous
start in the late 1980s - is looking forward to a revival of its fortunes in
the 1990s. Ironically, the revival is being led from abroad, writes Peter
Purton.
Telepoint in the UK started in 1988 when the government announced its
intention to license at least two operators. In the end four were licensed:
Manchester-based electronics company Ferranti (Creditphone), Phonepoint, a
consortium consisting of BT, STC (now part of Northern Telecom), US regional
telephone company Nynex and France Telecom, another consortium called
Callpoint made up of BT rival Mercury, telepoint equipment maker Shaye and
US electronics company Motorola and a third consortium, BYPS, made up of
Dutch electronics giant Philips, UK clearing bank Barclays and the
Anglo-Dutch oil company, Shell.
By the end of 1991 the three licensees which had launched a service had
withdrawn from the market and the fourth, BYPS, had been sold to a new
owner, Hong Kong-based Hutchison Telecom. Few disagreed at that point -
telepoint was an unmitigated disaster.
Telepoint took longer to take off abroad. In fact, it is only now moving out
of its trial stage to become a commercial service. But the early indications
are that it will be successful.
In Hong Kong two operators, Hutchison and local radiopaging network operator
Chevalier, have been offering a telepoint service since March and April. A
third, Pacific Telelink, backed by UK telecommunications network operator
Vodafone, is due to come into service at the end of the year. Already there
are some 30,000 users with some 7,000 newcomers signing up every month - a
faster growth rate than any of the world's cellular radio services enjoyed
during their start-up phase.
In Singapore, the service was launched on January 27. The main Singapore
newspaper, the Straits Times, reported the sale of 1,500 phones on the first
day and queues of 300 people forming at the stores selling the handsets. Now
there are over 12,000 users of the Callzone telepoint service offered by
Singapore Telecom. Malaysia's and Thailand's national carriers are also
offering telepoint services.
Also in the Asia-Pacific region, Australia Telecom is planning a telepoint
network in Brisbane. And in Canada, an upgraded version of the telepoint
cordless telephone specification has been adopted as the country's official
cordless phone standard.
Even in Europe, the sun is beginning to break through for telepoint. In
Germany, where telepoint got off to a bad start with a six-month delay to
the trial in Munich, it now looks as if the national operator, Deutsche
Telekom, will proceed with a full commercial version of its Birdie service.
And Hutchison has also announced that it is keen to launch its own rival
service.
In France, demand for handsets in a trial of telepoint in Strasbourg, has
been so great that the project has had to be extended from 2,000 to 3,000
users. This month the trial is being extended further to cover Paris, where
some 3,000 base stations will provide coverage not only above ground but
also underground for travellers on the Metro.
Within a month of PTT Telecom of the Netherlands' launch of its telepoint
service, Greenpoint, on May 20, it reported over 1,000 users. Like Germany's
Telekom, PTT Telecom is likely soon to face competition from a private
rival, provisionally named Bluepoint. In Finland, a commercial telepoint
service is due to come into service in the coming weeks following trials
lasting over two years. And Belgium's Regie des Telegraphes et des
Telephones is gearing up for the commercial launch of its own telepoint
service.
So what went wrong in the UK? The first and biggest mistake, most observers
now agree, is that too many operators were licensed for the market. But this
was only the beginning of a series of disasters.
'The early operators failed because they could not perceive a route to
market - you can have the best product in the world but if you don't bring
it to the market in the right way, it won't sell,' says Mr Brian Wolfe,
group director responsible for mobile communications products at GPT, one of
the leading suppliers of telepoint infrastructure and handsets.
Telepoint in the UK, he explains, was originally marketed as a competitor to
cellular. 'In reality, it addresses a completely different segment of the
market,' says Mr Wolfe. The emphasis, he says, should have been on the home
cordless telephone. 'Add to that the feature that you can use it on the
street - at a cost which is hardly different to that of making a call from
home - and I am sure you have the ingredients for commercial success.' Mr
Mel Zizeros, principal analyst at Marlborough-based marketing consultancy
MZA, agrees, but he adds that the original networks were launched
prematurely.
'The three networks launched without any sort of infrastructure in place,'
says Mr Zizeros. 'On top of that, the handsets were too expensive. And with
several proprietary products being offered, the market was confused about
the technology.' In spite of their criticisms of the UK's first generation
of telepoint networks, most analysts believe that Hutchison will make a
success of the new cordless technology.
Hutchison has adopted a 'refreshing new approach', says Mr Tony Warwick,
director of European CT-2 systems at US-owned communications equipment maker
Motorola, which alongside GPT has been responsible for the telepoint
infrastructure installed around the world.
Hutchison launched its telepoint service, Rabbit, at the end of May in
Manchester, with 800 base stations already in place. By the end of the year,
it hopes to have 12,000 base stations in place to offer full coverage of the
UK's main towns and transit routes.
'Coverage will be contiguous,' says Mr Peter Wright, managing director of
Hutchison Personal Communications, as BYPS was renamed after its takeover by
the Hong Kong company. The emphasis of his company, he says, will be never
to promise what it cannot deliver.
Hutchison has already expanded its network to cover the Granada, Yorkshire
and the Tyne-Tees television areas where it now has 2,000 users. By the end
of 1994 it hopes for 300,000 users across the UK.
Some half a million low cost analogue cordless telephones are sold each year
in the UK. 'If we could convert only 10 per cent of the analogue cordless
phone buyers to CT-2 it would be a nice business, and I don't think that is
so ambitious a target,' Mr Wright says. Add to that the new categories of
business users who he believes will use cordless phones for the first time,
thanks to the improved utility and better quality of telepoint technology,
and the figure could well reach 300,000.
When Phonepoint, the BT telepoint consortium suspended its operations, it
emphasised that it was not abandoning them completely. Mr Wright
acknowledges that if Hutchison succeeds in proving that telepoint can be a
commercial success, it may still find itself facing competition. But, he
stresses, it will not be easy for any newcomer or re-entrant.
First, it would have to renegotiate licences, then it would have to think
about resourcing and building its network. 'It would be the end of 1994
before anyone could reappear in the market place - and by then we'll have
sealed off most of the juicy locations,' Mr Wright says.
In Hong Kong, if the current rate of uptake is maintained, telepoint will
overtake cellular radio in popularity next year and may even overtake
radiopaging - which with 800,000 users has the highest penetration in the
world - by the second half of the decade.
Even the most optimistic analysts of the UK telepoint market do not believe
it will do as well as Hong Kong, where the high population density and
telephone culture combine to make a special case. But even if it only does
half as well, all concerned will be very pleased.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4179</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAE9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Survey of Mobile Communications (8): The party winds down -
Cellular service providers
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER PURTON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   THE party is over for the UK's 40 cellular service providers
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
at least for the time being. Already slimmed down from a figure of 70 in the
late 1980s, further rationalisation of the sector will almost certainly
follow. For the survivors, however, there may be the reward of a mass
market.
For the cellular service provision sector in the mid-1980s, the good times
seemed to roll. Many small radio telephone dealers, such as Frome's Carphone
Group, saw their businesses transformed from local installers of a few
high-priced phones a week to national names with tens of thousands of
subscribers, each contributing to the company's revenues every time they
made a call from their new mobile phones.
But all was not as it seemed. 'As far as I know, none of the service
providers to date have actually made an operating profit,' says Mr Garry
Garrard, mobile communications expert at London-based PA Consulting. 'Up
until now the only people who have made money out of service provision have
been those who have sold their businesses,' he adds.
In the case of the Carphone Group, this was in 1988 when its shareholders,
led by company chairman Mr Graham Thomas, sold out to fixed network operator
Mercury Communications. Some 40 other companies did the same thing.
'The business is now dominated by the big boys,' says Mr Andrew Lockwood,
general manager responsible for cellular radio at BT. According to his
estimate, the top five companies serve over 60 per cent of the UK's 1.3m
cellular subscribers, leaving the other 35 to share just 40 per cent of the
market between them. Sooner or later, he believes, all of the smaller
players will either decide to 'cash in their assets or look for particular
niches', leaving the development of the market to the top five.
The current top five are, in falling order of subscriber base, Hutchison
Service Provision with 170,000 subscribers, BT with about 160,000, Talkland
with 150,000, Vodac with 130,000 and Mercury with 120,000. But even the top
five may not be all that safe, however.
The entrance of powerful new players has been predicted for some time. Many
believe the introduction of the subscriber identification module card with
GSM - and the consequent separation of the sale of the cellular handset from
the sale of the cellular service - will draw credit card companies such as
American Express or Visa into the market.
Others see a growing mass market as likely to attract high street names,
such as Dixons and Comet.
At the same time, the network operators are showing increased interest in
by-passing the service providers and selling directly to their larger
customers.
'The cellular service providers are facing the squeeze from two sides - the
corporate and the consumer market,' says PA Consulting's Mr Garrard. He sees
network operator Cellnet's recent announcement to use Club 24, the in-store
credit card company, to help set up a back-office transaction bureau as an
attempt to bring newcomers, such as high street chains, into the field.
'It allows anyone to become a service provider,' he says. And large
customers, he says, expect to be served directly by network operators. All
that remains for the current service providers is the gap in the middle, he
says, 'and that is getting smaller and smaller'.
BT's Mr Lockwood believes there is 'more than enough room' in the market for
direct sales and service provision. Mr Barry Moxley, managing director of
the market-leader, Hutchison Service Provision, believes his company's
emphasis on quality of service will carry it through.
The only hint of problems ahead comes from the sector's spokesman Mr David
Savage, chairman of cellular service provider Astec. Mr Savage, who is
chairman of the Federation of Communications Service Providers, is concerned
that network operators - who make 80 per cent of their revenues from each
call on their network - will use this money to buy customers.
'I don't have any problem with the network operators selling directly to
users providing there are no cross-subsidies. But I don't think that is the
way it will work out,' he says.
Cellnet's managing director, Mr Stafford Taylor, makes no secret of the fact
that he believes it is time for a change in the cellular service provision
sector.
'I'm very much in favour of service providers,' he says. 'They are an
established route to market, but they are not the only one. If they want to
survive they've got to decide to do things differently to the past. They
need to find ways of finding a much broader appeal to consumers.'
Mr Taylor believes Lifetime, the low user tariff launched by Cellnet in
June, and LowCall, Vodafone's response to the Cellnet announcement give
service providers paths towards the consumer market. Using Cellnet's back
office transaction processing facility could take them yet further, he says,
by cutting overheads on increasingly tight margins.
But whether service providers take up the challenge is up to them, he says.
Mr Taylor argues that direct sale of cellular airtime is inevitable. He
bases his view in part on his experiences as the man who managed the launch
of the IBM personal computer in the UK. 'We've now entered an era of direct
sales from companies such as Dell,' he says. 'I believe there will almost
certainly be some form of direct distribution in the cellular business at
some time in the future.'
Mr Savage agrees change is inevitable. But he does not believe this is
necessarily for the worse. 'We were going to change anyway - whether or not
Cellnet has its own direct team, whether or not Dixons are capable of
selling these things. If you don't change you don't progress.'
But, he says, the consumer market is big enough to handle a variety of
retail paths. 'Only a proportion of it will ultimately be handled by the
likes of Dixons and Comet. There are still umpteen other different ways of
doing business.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page V
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4180</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAE8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Survey of Mobile Communications (7): A multitude of options
 -Tremendous potential seen for fledgling mobile data market
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MARLA MADISON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE VIABILITY of a market for mobile data services in the UK was brought
into question after the collapse this summer of one of its pioneers,
Cognito. But while there might not be one market, there may well be 50 or
60.
Cognito's withdrawal from the market after the acquisition of its biggest
investor, Dowty, by the TI group, was not unexpected. Mr Karim Khoja,
general manager of Ram Mobile Data Services, a competitor of Cognito's,
believes rationalisation in the mobile data industry was bound to happen. To
begin with, according to Mr Khoja, 'the government awarded licences for five
operators when there is probably only a market in the UK for two'.
Cognito's downfall may have also been a result of its different approach,
says Mr Khoja: 'Cognito tried to reinvent the wheel by developing its own
technology,' he says. His own company, like the other surviving operators in
the sector, uses off-the-shelf mobile data systems. And, according to Mr
Khoja, Cognito concentrated to heavily on one particular service: two-way
paging.
It hoped this would help it see a quick return on its investment, but in
fact it made the company look like a one-service supplier. 'It was then
unable to break out of this mould,' says Mr Khoja.
That the mobile data market is potentially large is something on which all
involved agree. For many applications, mobile data is much cheaper to use
than say cellular or mobile radio. 'Data can be prepared in advance and then
sent with no need to enter into long conversations,' says Mr David Pearce,
marketing manager for data products and service at Vodata, part of the
Vodafone telecommunications service group.
All agree that mobile data may make a big difference to a company's bottom
line. 'For companies with service or delivery vehicles, often the only
competitive advantage is in the actual speed of delivery or service
delivered,' says Mr Pearce.
But where mobile data runs into problems is with the complexity of its own
message. 'It's not an easy buying decision for customers,' says Mr Pearce.
'Remote communications using modems are difficult to use; they require
specialist skills in installation and use. This puts many people and
companies off using mobile data,' he adds.
'It is a mistake to conceive or portray mobile data as a single product,'
says Mr Jonathan Elder, mobile data product manager at Cellnet, the UK
cellular service provider. 'Our market research shows that what customers
want to do requires a lot of their own development time,' he says. At the
same time, his market research shows 'that customers are left cold by
current applications', he adds.
Even if customers do identify an application for themselves, finding the
right operator or working out the cheapest method for their applications may
prove to be difficult.
Mobile data services are offered by the cellular operators, dedicated mobile
data network operators such as Hutchison Mobile Data and Ram Mobile Data,
and data over private mobile radio networks.
All of these services are offered over different largely incompatible
technologies. There is no worldwide standard for mobile data services.
Suppliers also find the market a difficult one. Selling cycles are usually
four to eight months at the shortest but can often take up to 18 months with
up to a three-year return on investment likely. says: 'The different niche
markets and fragmented supplier base make this a very difficult market to
address.' But, he says, it may be this very diversity which gives the market
its greatest strength, as it pushes both suppliers and users towards
customised solutions.
One way forward for the operators may be to link up with third parties.
'We just offer a simple connectivity service. We are network operators not
systems integrators,' says Mr Terry Bowden, managing director of Hutchison
Mobile Data.
But, he admits, it may be systems integrators that hold the key to
addressing the various niches in the mobile data market. Different
applications packages may be designed by the systems integrator with an
operator to address a particular niche and marketed mainly by the systems
integrator.
Cellnet is currently trying out a package designed with a systems integrator
for motor insurance adjusters to help them work out the fair price for motor
insurance claims. It will allow adjusters to access a remote database from
the site where the car with the damage is to see what similar claims have
recently cost.
Another possible application may be for a pensions adviser to offer an
instant on-the-spot quote to a customer by being able to consult the office
database remotely.
Another option may be for a customer who has developed a package for its own
needs, to go on to market it to others in its own industry.
British Airways, for example, is helping Ram mobile data to sell its
specially developed luggage handling mobile data application to other
airlines.
Like many other mobile communications markets, mobile data is still
essentially an immature market. According to Mr Garry Garrard, mobile
communications specialist at London based PA Consulting, the mobile data
market may develop in three phases:
Specific packages for large customers.
Off-the-shelf application specific packages.
More horizontal off-the-shelf packages.
Given time, some believe, the use of mobile data could become as ubiquitous
as the facsimile.
Combining new digital cellular technologies, such as GSM in Europe, with new
forms of sending data - such as light pens which allow the user to enter
commands by simply pointing at on-screen symbols could - at sometime in the
future, even make the mobile data market into a mass market, says Vodafone's
Mr Pearce. 'Imagine a system that can be used over all of Europe where the
user interface isn't cable, buttons or keys but just a pen.'
Some big names are taking this proposition seriously. Since the launch of
Apple's pocket computer, the Newton, this spring, Mr John Sculley of Apple
has made it clear that he sees communications as the way forward for the
personal computer industry.
US telecoms giant AT&amp;T seems to be laying equal value by the contribution
pocket computers could make to the telecommunications industry. It is
expected soon to announce its own response to the Newton - the Hobbit, a
personal communications terminal not only capable of supporting data
communications but also of voice and image.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page V
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4181</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAE7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Survey of Mobile Communications (6): Selling off the
airwaves - Radio frequencies
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MONICA HORTEN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SHOULD THE radio waves be a revenue earner for government or a resource
available to all at a reasonable price? Some governments are considering
fees of more than Pounds 100m for mobile phone licences and, as a result,
the question has become a hot debating topic in the industry. But issues of
ethics as well as commercial sensitivities come into play and it seems that
there is no straightforward answer.
Radio is used for many different communications activities. Some are
obvious, such as mobile phones and the radios used by taxi companies or the
police. But items such as security tags in clothing stores, remote controls
for cars or garage doors also operate via radio; they come under the same
set of government regulations.
In the UK, the government determines who can use radio frequencies by
granting licences. A taxi company can get a licence for five radios, just
like a large mobile phone operator with many thousands of subscribers.
Manufacturers of security products and remote controls do not need a
licence, but they do have to obtain permission before they can go ahead and
sell their products.
The fees charged for licences vary according to the type of use: a taxi
company pays less than a mobile phone network operator. Vodafone and Cellnet
each pay an estimated Pounds 2.5m for their licences.
But as governments in other countries begin to see how much money some
services are making, they are questioning the level of the licence fee,
especially for mobile phone networks. Obviously, Pounds 2.5m is a tiny
proportion of Vodafone's annual turnover of Pounds 585m.
Two new mobile phone network licences recently granted in Greece were sold
for Dollars 160m (about Pounds 80m).
The Greek government is understood to have operated a form of 'auction' for
the licences. Prospective mobile phone operators sent in their bids in a
sealed envelope. The first licence went to the one offering the most money.
The second highest bidder was then invited to increase its offer to the
level of the highest bid, in order to get the second licence.
The Dutch government is now also considering what value it should place on
the spectrum for a second mobile phone network, to compete against the phone
company, PTT Telekom Netherlands. A figure of Dollars 250m is being
suggested.
However, while charging a large sum for the right to use the radio spectrum
could bring in substantial revenues for treasury departments, it could be to
the detriment of the general public and taxpayers.
Mr Keith Sowell, of the phone company US West, points out that such high
licence fees are a disguised form of taxation: 'It's a tax. Sooner or later,
the reasonable businessman factors it in,' he says.
The UK's Radio Communications Agency, the government body responsible for
managing the radio spectrum, is currently reviewing spectrum prices. It has
a total income of Pounds 27m from 28,000 licences. However, the Wireless
Telegraphy Act stipulates that these fees should cover costs of
administering the licence, and not make a profit.
Auctioning will have to be considered as part of the review, but it appears
unlikely that the concept will be taken on board.
The pressure for auctioning comes from the so-called shortage of radio
frequencies. Radio waves are all around us and in a sense there is no
shortage. But, there are only certain frequencies that are good for the
commercial applications. These are between 28 Mhz and 3Ghz.
In the large metropolitan areas - London, Birmingham, Manchester -
frequencies in this range are already almost all taken and there is a need
to make sure that they are used as efficiently as possible. There is a view
in the industry that making people pay more for licences will lead them to
use the resource better.
But spectrum auctions have already been looked at in detail three years ago,
by what was then the Department of Trade and Industry's radio section. The
idea was dismissed as unworkable.
The critical issue is 'safety of life'. Mobile communications of all types
can be used in situations where the safety of an individual or group of
people is at risk. Ambulance and police radios, as well as radios on board
yachts that sail around the coast, are obvious examples. But there could
also be a case where a lorry has spilled hazardous chemicals on a road - a
mobile phone in the cab could be vital to protect other drivers and
pedestrians from harm.
It is generally thought that commercial prices should not be applied to
licence fees for safety of life uses. But it would be difficult to determine
a clear-cut way of deciding who pays the commercial fee and who is exempt:
'Even if you take the emergency services out, where do you draw the line?'
asks Mr Garry Garrard, mobile communications director with the PA Consulting
Group.
In the US, a similar debate is taking place. In a bill which goes before
Congress this autumn, there is a new allocation for spectrum to be used by
emerging technologies. These include personal communications services and
new personal digital wireless gadgets such as Apple Computer's Newton.
There is a push from the White House that this new spectrum should also be
used to bring in revenue which could reduce the budget deficit. An auction
is high on the agenda.
Under the normal procedures, the allocation of radio licences and the
licence fee are handled by the Federal Communications Commission (FCC).
Licences are granted by a lottery of the prospective applicants. However,
some companies which obtain licences later sell them on for an enormous
profit - one mobile phone licence in Massachusetts went for Dollars 40m two
years after it was granted, and no network had been constructed. Such moves
could be behind the White House push for auctions.
An experimental auction of 30Mhz of spectrum is proposed in the Bill and may
get through. But the fear is that speculators could push up prices to
unreasonable levels.
GTE, which operates mobile phone networks across the US, is lobbying against
auctioning. It says that auction prices could force some potential players
from the market. 'We want to see open entry and public eligibility,' says
the company.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4182</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAE6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Survey of Mobile Communications (5): Leos go anywhere -
Satellites
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL CHAMBERS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
CELLULAR mobile telephones have become a common sight in recent years. They
make the user much more accessible than he or she could possibly be using
fixed phone networks. But they have one disadvantage. There are parts of the
world - considerable parts in fact - that mobile phone networks simply do
not reach, writes Paul Chambers.
Recently, several companies have come up with ambitious proposals to put
this right. They have decided it is technically feasible to turn the typical
cellular telephone network on its head. Literally. Instead of having radio
transmitters on the ground, put them on board satellites in low earth orbit
(Leos for short). The idea is: put enough satellites up there and you will
be able to get in touch with a mobile phone anywhere.
There are five companies proposing Leo systems: Motorola Satellite
Communications of Chandler, Arizona has a system called Iridium, Loral
Qualcomm Satellite Services of New York (Globalstar) TRW Space Technology
Group of Redondo Beach, California (Odyssey), Constellation Communications
of Herndon, Virginia (Aries) and Ellipsat of New York (Ellipso).
London-based Inmarsat (International Maritime Satellite Organisation)
proposes a service called Inmarsat-P (for portable) which could use a
combination of low earth orbit satellites and its existing geostationary
satellites. Inmarsat has pioneered voice data and facsimile communications
with small terminals. But, to date, they are no smaller than a briefcase,
something on which Inmarsat-P and the other systems should improve.
The number of satellites proposed varies. Motorola's Iridium will have 66,
Globalstar 48, Odyssey 12, Aries 48 and Ellipso 24. All will use circular
orbits except Ellipso, whose satellites will use elliptical orbits, hanging
high over the parts of the world to be served, before swooping low around
the back of the earth. Ellipsat claims this will offer longer coverage of
key markets for less satellites and a more cost-effective system.
Investment costs will be high. Estimates in alphabetical order are: Aries
Dollars 192m, Ellipsat Dollars 230m, Globalstar Dollars 1.2bn, Odyssey
Dollars 1.3bn, Iridium Dollars 3.4bn. The cost of offering Inmarsat-P is
undisclosed.
Competition for investment money is keen. Nearly all the operators had hoped
earlier this year to be granted 'pioneer's preference'. This designation, in
the gift of the US regulatory body, the Federal Communications Commission
(FCC) would have recognised one company as the pioneer of the low earth
orbit idea.
Pioneer's preference could have meant the selected operator getting first
choice on spectrum, making it easier to get investors on board, explains Mr
Joe Tedino, of Loral Qualcomm Satellite Services.
In the event, the FCC decided all operators had done equal research on Leos
and declined last month to award any operator pioneer's preference. Mr
Tedino expresses relief. This 'substantial decision means all operators are
on an equal footing to compete for services,' he says.
Behind the anxiety over who might or might not get pioneer's preference,
there was particular concern about whether Motorola would perhaps corner the
market. This led to a move in April by TRW and Loral Qualcomm to get the FCC
to deny Motorola permission to launch an experimental version of Iridium.
At the time they said they feared launch of an experimental system could
'prejudice the results of licensing' and 'predispose the FCC to choose
Motorola'. The FCC later granted Motorola, Constellation, Globalstar and
Ellipsat permission to launch experimental satellites. TRW was allowed to
simulate service using equipment on aircraft and balloons.
But wider anxieties remain. One concern is about how to regulate Leo
operators. The European Commission and the US State Department have been in
touch about this question.
One problem is that licences issued through the US could be taken 'by
implication if not necessarily by desire be taken to have validity in
Europe,' explains Mr Paul Verhoef of the European Commission.
Another concern is about whether the market will support everyone who wants
a share of it. 'If the US were to license two systems and if we in Europe
would want to license two more, all four could go down the drain,' Mr
Verhoef says.
Organising frequency is not in itself likely to prove difficult. An
international conference in Malaga this year agreed on broad frequency bands
for global mobile systems. Now a frequency co-ordination body of the
International Telecommunications Union will circulate individual frequency
requests to its 172 members and sort out any clashes with existing users on
national territories.
Day-to-day running and regulation of operators will remain in the hands of
national regulatory bodies. At the World Administrative Radio Conference,
the idea of creating a kind of Intelsat (International Telecommunications
Satellite Organisation) or Inmarsat to regulate the operators of global
mobile systems was mooted.
But, says Mr Gerald Helman, vice-chairman of the US delegation, there was a
'singular lack of enthusiasm' for the idea. National regulators such as the
UK Department of Trade and Industry are happy to retain day-to-day control.
Mr Colin Cross of the DTI says: 'We don't feel there is a need for a
European regulatory body, let alone a worldwide regulator.'
Leos could get off the ground fairly soon. Optimistic estimates see the
first satellites going into orbit in 1996 or 1997. Market estimates vary. Mr
Roger Rusch of TRW says Odyssey could handle up to 16m subscribers, but the
company is doing price calculations on the basis of 0.9m.
Motorola says there could be 1.1m voice and data subscribers on Iridium by
the year 2001 and 0.7m subscribers for data only. There might be 3.2m
subscribers overall by the year 2006. Ellipsat is significantly more
ambitious, basing its optimism on the alleged cost effectiveness of its
system. 'We confidently expect between 25m and 50m subscribers in the first
year alone,' says Mr Scott MacEnearney of Ellipsat.
Handsets will not be cheap. Motorola says it could charge Dollars 3,000. At
the other end of the spectrum, Ellipsat users will pay Dollars 300 for a
so-called Ellipcell which they will install in the boot of their car to
boost their car telephone to use the Ellipsat satellites.
Airtime prices will also vary. Globalstar users will pay 30 cents a minute
for use of space segment (the link between the hand-held terminal and the
satellite and back down again), says Mr Tedino. Mr Rusch of TRW says Odyssey
users will pay 65 cents a minute. Ellipsat estimates its service will cost
50 cents a minute, while Motorola expects Iridium to cost Dollars 3.
No doubt the manoeuvring is not yet over. In August Globalstar backers were
reported to have made a bold approach to Inmarsat to drop Inmarsat-P in
favour of marketing the Globalstar service. This was not the first time
Inmarsat had received such an approach. In February, Motorola made much of
an idea to lease Inmarsat capacity on Iridium. Inmarsat never formally
admitted that it had received an approach.
What is certain is that the US-based operators and the FCC are to get
together between November and March next year to make the rules which will
govern the operators of Leos. When the rules are clear, no doubt play will
start in earnest.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4183</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAE5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Survey of Mobile Communications (4): Cinderella is off to
the ball - Mobile radio
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL CHAMBERS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MOBILE RADIO seems to some to be the Cinderella of mobile communications.
Where cellular enjoyed a ball in the boom years of the mid-1980s, mobile
radio sat quietly at home. The conventional Private Mobile Radio (PMR)
market showed steady, but not spectacular, growth.
However, developments were in the offing. 1988 saw the launch in the UK of a
new kind of mobile radio service called Public Access Mobile Radio. PAMR has
since spread into Europe and mobile radio is set to benefit like other
mobile communications technologies from digitalisation.
The idea of PAMR is to save users money. Whereas users of private mobile
radio systems have to buy and maintain their own radio transmitters as well
as base-stations, users of PAMR can use radio transmitters maintained by a
network operator. They have only to buy or lease their handsets and pay a
subscription charge.
Since 1988, when PAMR was launched in the UK, it has been introduced on the
same standard (MPT 1327/43) in France, Germany, Holland and Switzerland.
Spanish operator Telefonica has been running networks for the Olympic Games
in Barcelona and for the Universal Exhibition in Seville. Italy is
interested. Belgium is believed to be considering launching too.
Performance in the UK has not been so good, says Ms Juliet Hale of market
research company Systems Dynamics. The merger in April this year of national
PAMR operators GEC National One and Band Three Radio could appear to prove
her right.
But Mr Richard Sellers, chairman of the UK's Regional Band III (PAMR band)
Operators Committee, disagrees. He says difficulties with MPT 1327/43 and
disputes over the intellectual property rights involved meant original
licensees were late to market, by which time the UK was dipping into
recession. There was a shortage of PAMR handsets for users and the UK was
already a very mature mobile radio market.
This meant cellular took away from PAMR before it could get onto the
starting blocks. When cellular started in 1985, it was the only wide area
scheme available at the time, say some industry sources, and it attacked a
market niche that trunked mobile radio would have addressed.
That could be about to be put right. Large customers such as county councils
and utilities which may have bought cellular in 1985 are now finding their
systems coming up for replacement.
With public mobile radio operators not charging for airtime and charging
monthly subscriptions of between Pounds 10 and Pounds 50 - comparable at the
low end with cellular - many are reported to be choosing mobile radio which
Mr Sellers claims can be '10-20 times more cost-effective than cellular
telephony'.
Added to which, he says, 'the cost of terminals has come down and the number
of features has gone up. The appeal of PAMR across the board has become much
greater.' In fact, the MPT 1327/43 standard has provision for a large number
of features which are only now coming on stream, such as call diversion and
data facilities.
Mr Sellers puts the total UK mobile radio market at between 550,000 and
600,000 terminals in service. He estimates that there are 29,000 National
Band Three customers and at least 11,000 users of regional PAMR networks.
Between 35,000 and 40,000 customers use public access systems with more
localised customers. His total market figure excludes terminals in use by
emergency services, taxi companies and government departments.
Those user numbers could be boosted if, as some predict, mobile data
customers choose mobile radio operators instead of dedicated mobile data
network operators for service.
The mobile data market has had a shock recently with the demise of one UK
operator, Dowty-backed Cognito. Although not a direct comment on the
viability of mobile data networks as such - Dowty's buyer, TI, never
intended to keep it - mobile radio operators are quick to point out that
here is a market opportunity for them.
'There is a lot of hype on with the mobile data networks,' says Mr Andrew
Barrett, technical director of Key Radio Systems, a maker and distributor of
two-way radio systems based in Aldermaston, Berkshire. 'But my impression is
that the market does not just want data. It wants speech and data.' This, he
says, is something mobile radio can very well offer.
'There has always been a data facility on band three (the PAMR band). It is
hardly ever used. People are starting to ask for that more and more.' Lower
costs could underline the case for sending data over mobile radio and not
over mobile data networks, Mr Barrett says.
He notes that some mobile radio networks offer lower tariffs for users
wanting to transmit data. They use the network for less time. And mobile
radio networks can handle messages of between 100 and 200 characters.
In this war on cellular and mobile data, the arrival of digital mobile radio
systems can only help the mobile radio cause.
'Digital offers certain benefits in itself,' says Mr John McKendry, manager,
regulatory affairs of Cambridge-based Philips Telecom Private Mobile Radio,
the UK equipment maker.
'Quality is better than analogue and you can mix voice and data together in
one bit stream. Digital streams are easy to encrypt and can be interfaced
with the public switched telephone network.' But it also offers other
possibilities for mobile radio, as Mr Andrew Dean, marketing manager,
private mobile radio for Motorola in the UK, explains.
In a recent presentation to the UK's Communications in Public Safety
Conference, Mr Dean said digital mobile radio systems could offer vehicle
location, facsimile, still picture and slow video transmission.
Three manufacturers, Sweden's Ericsson, Chicago-based Motorola and France's
Matra have their own digital systems.
Meanwhile, ETSI (European Telecommunications Standards Institute) is
developing a standard digital mobile radio system called Tetra (Trans
European Trunked Radio). However, not all commentators are optimistic about
the chances for digital mobile radio. According to some, Tetra could
experience problems.
Systems Dynamics' Ms Hale thinks it could be difficult to sell Tetra systems
when they start appearing - it is hoped from the middle of the decade -
because of the presence of Motorola's, Ericsson's and Matra's home-grown
systems.
Overall, she says, demand for digital systems will not start to take off
until 1995 and then only in the trunked (shared channel) and PAMR sector.
About 10 per cent of European users will want digital systems then, she
says, with the number rising to 98 per cent by the year 2000. In the
conventional single channel PMR sector, only 25 per cent of European users
will want digital systems by the turn of the century.
While they wait for digital systems to come on stream, UK operators and
manufacturers have steady growth to look forward to, says Mr Sellers.
Regional PAMR systems are showing steady net growth in spite of the
recession. And there is going to be a lot of replacement business for older
conventional systems.
Motorola's Mr Dean takes an equally optimistic view. The UK installed base
of terminals is growing at about 5 per cent a year, he says. Other industry
sources say the number of licences issued a year in the UK is growing by 13
to 15 per cent.
Their feeling is that growth in the number of mobiles taking up those
licences is similar.
As if to underline the sector's cautious optimism, the UK's Department of
Trade and Industry only last month decided to allow 13 regional PAMR
operators to provide their own fixed links in their networks and service to
fixed terminals.
Mr Sellers hails this as a great move forward. Operators should now be able
to offer speech and data communications between two fixed points and not
just links between a base and a mobile. And being allowed to provide their
own fixed links will save mobile radio operators from having to lease them
from Mercury Communications and British Telecom. Another way of saving
money; another weapon in the war on cellular.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4184</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAE4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Survey of Mobile Communications (1): Telephones lose strings
 -The emerging generation of advanced digital equipment and services
promises alternatives perhaps even to the hard-wired telephone itself
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL TAYLOR
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
UNTIL RECENTLY, the telephone had changed little since Alexander Graham Bell
invented it more than a century ago. For the majority of business and
residential customers, it remained an impersonal piece of equipment,
inconveniently tethered to the wall by a cable.
Beginning in the 1980s, cellular mobile telephone services began to add a
new, more flexible dimension to telecommunications and proved so successful
with business customers in some markets, particularly newly deregulated
environments like those in the US and UK, that network operators could
barely keep pace with demand.
To date however, these pioneering cellular systems, built around analogue
technology, have been too costly for all but the most affluent domestic
users, and in some markets have suffered from problems such as dropped lines
and interference - the effects of traffic congestion and capacity
constraints.
Now a new generation of advanced digital mobile communications equipment and
services is emerging which promises secure, interference-free,
cost-effective and feature-rich alternatives not only to older analogue
cellular systems, but perhaps also to the hard-wired telephone itself.
Despite the recession which has slowed growth in some markets, including the
UK, mobile communications is one of the fastest-growing and most profitable
telecommunications sectors. Fuelled by advances in technology, competition
and economies of scale, equipment prices are coming down.
By the end of the decade most consumers in wealthy nations will be able to
afford a mobile telephone - heralding the possibility of a mass market for
cellular telephony for the first time.
The introduction of digital networks, coupled with the opening up of new
markets in Asia, eastern Europe and South America, is expected to help boost
the worldwide total of cellular subscribers from about 15.5m at the start of
this year to more than 50m by the mid-1990s.
Already the expansion of analogue networks and the building of new digital
systems are generating a surge of infrastructure and end-user equipment
orders. By 1996 EMCI, a Washington-based telecommunications consultancy,
estimates that cellular telephone handset sales worldwide will reach nearly
19m units, valued at Dollars 11bn.
Cellular systems have managed to establish themselves as a vital part of the
telecommunications profile of many countries. In the developed western
nations mobile telephony has proved an important business tool, particularly
for small businesses, while governments have discovered that licensing
private sector mobile communications operators can be a useful way to
introduce competition into a market previously controlled by state-owned
monopolies.
For example, in Europe most governments have licensed private sector
operators to provide mobile telecommunications services including digital
cellular networks, although in every country except the UK, fixed wire
telephone services are still a state-controlled monopoly.
Meanwhile developing nations, including those in eastern Europe, have found
that cellular systems can provide a quick and relatively low-cost
alternative to inadequate, unreliable or non-existent conventional fixed
telephone networks.
Last year, despite slower subscriber growth rates in some countries, the
worldwide cellular customer base grew by about 5m or nearly 50 per cent,
according to EMCI. The introduction of digital networks in North America and
Asia, particularly Japan, should help fuel continued cellular subscriber
growth over the next few years. At present Asia accounts for just 17 per
cent of world subscriber numbers but this is expected to rise to nearly 25
per cent by the mid-1990s.
However, much attention is focused on western Europe where the first digital
cellular networks based on the pan-European GSM (Groupe Special Mobile or
Global System for Mobile communications) standard began commercial operation
earlier this year - about 12 months after what many consider to have been an
over-ambitious target launch date.
Growth is expected to be particularly strong in Germany and France, where
proprietary analogue systems and lack of competition have kept prices high
and demand low. Over the next few years GSM services will roll out in 18
European countries and by the turn of the century the European Commission
estimates that half the continent's 100m telephone extensions will be
cordless.
The delay in the start-up of GSM services reflects several technical and
administrative factors including the design complexity of a sophisticated
digital network together with wrangles over issues like equipment-type
approval.
In the process, some significant compromises have had to be made and some of
the most important features of GSM, like the ability of subscribers to use
their handsets anywhere in Europe where there is a GSM network, have yet to
be implemented because of administrative delays in negotiating 'roaming'
agreements between network operators.
As a result, it is unlikely that there will be more than a handful of
roaming agreements before the end of this year. It could be two or three
years before GSM can be marketed as a pan-European service.
Initially, GSM handsets are expected to be more bulky and more expensive in
most markets than their analogue equivalents. However, these disadvantages
are unlikely to persist for long.
Mr Gordon Aspin, responsible for mobile communications product development
at the UK-based Technology Partnership consultancy, says: 'We are developing
hand-portable equipment for our clients which will compete with any analogue
cellular telephone on the market today in terms of size, weight, talk-time
and manufacturing cost.'
The key to achieving this lies in silicon chip integration, improving power
consumption and new battery technology. Although Mr Aspin accepts that the
development costs for GSM products are substantially higher than for
analogue cellular - costs which manufacturers will try to recover in the
initial price of terminals - he adds: 'In the longer term GSM, with its
large market in Europe and increasingly elsewhere, holds out the promise of
very low cost terminals.'
The introduction of GSM services will also provide network operators with
opportunities for delivering 'value-added' services. For example Sema Group,
which has developed a number of products for GSM networks including the
database software for locating, tracking and authenticating subscribers on a
network, has designed a 'short message service centre' for digital networks.
Mr Martin O'Byrne, Sema Group communications division managing director,
says this will allow cellular operators to provide voice mail services on
their GSM networks.
Each GSM subscriber will also have a 'subscriber identity module' - a smart
card which stores customer information and plugs into any GSM handset to
make it work. This smart card, rather than the telephone, contains the
subscriber's number and provides the network with other information, for
example where to send bills.
Some industry analysts already predict that by separating the sale of
service from the sale of equipment the GSM smart card could turn the
cellular service provision industry on its head and allow credit card
companies and others to enter the field.
Other important changes could also be on the way. The introduction of
digital cellular services such as GSM and PCNs (personal communications
networks) in the UK which are aimed specifically at mass consumer markets,
is resulting in a proliferation of mobile communications services and tariff
structures.
Analogue system operators in Scandinavia and the UK have already responded
to the imminent arrival of digital networks by repackaging their services
around different tariff structures designed to attract new customers. For
example Cellnet, one of the two analogue network operators in the UK, is to
launch a service called LifeLine targeted at low-use customers after its
research showed that about 1m people would consider using a mobile phone in
the very near future if the pricing package was right.
In some markets, including the UK, there is a risk that cellular customers
will face a bewildering array of service offerings. 'It is a confused market
as it is and it is going to become even more confusing,' warns Mr David
Savage, chairman of the Cellular Service Providers Committee within the UK
Federation of Communications Services.
Meanwhile, some people are already looking towards the development of a
truly global mobile communications standard - a third generation of mobile
communications systems which would be based on a single common standard.
The prospect for the introduction of FPLMTS (future public land mobile
telecommunications systems) early next century was given a boost earlier
this year when the World Administrative Radio Conference agreed to designate
a common band of frequencies around the world for the next generation of
mobile communications services.
In the meantime several organisations and private sector groups have
announced plans for satellite-based global mobile communications systems.
Among them is Motorola's Dollars 2bn Iridium project, which is intended to
go into service in 1996. It involves the launch of 77 low-orbit satellites
and would bring satellites into direct competition with terrestrial mobile
communications technologies.
Whether future mobile communications needs are met by terrestrial or
satellite-based systems, the day when children ask whether it is really true
that telephones used to be attached to the wall by wires moves ever closer.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page I
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4185</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAE3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / London Stock Exchange: Gains trimmed in very thin trading
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By TERRY BYLAND, UK Stock Market Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A GRUDGING response to the meeting of EC finance ministers in the UK over
the weekend brought a modest rally in UK share prices yesterday, but gains
were halved when sterling stumbled below the important DM2.80 quotation at
mid-session. However, the outstanding feature of the first session of the
new equity account was the poor level of turnover in a market lacking a lead
from Wall Street, which was closed for Labor Day.
The lack of business in equities left the stock index futures market to
provide the impetus. In spite of the pledge that the Bundesbank would not
lift interest rates 'in present circumstances', UK stocks opened lower as
London securities houses resolved to take no risks on a Wall Street holiday.
However, with sterling firmer and stock index futures better, shares soon
turned higher and the FT-SE Index registered a gain of 23.5 at 2,385.7, the
day's peak, around lunchtime. Trading volume was well under 200m shares at
that point, and many share prices had barely been tested.
The shine disappeared from the stock market as sterling turned back from its
early gains, both on the short sterling and the foreign exchange cash
market. Traders sounded uneasy as the pound began to slip back towards the
levels seen prior to Thursday's announcement of a Pounds 7.27bn support loan
for the pound.
Early gains in shares were steadily eroded and Seaq volume increased
somewhat as marketmakers, still unwilling to hold positions, passed parcels
of stock around the market. Equities steadied at the close as sterling tried
to rally and the final reading on the FT-SE Index of 2,372.2 was a net 10
points up.
Seaq volume of 299.8m shares compared pitifully with the 546.7m recorded on
Friday. Traders pointed out that retail, or customer, business in equities
yesterday must have fallen far short of the Pounds 923.5m seen on Friday.
Little heed was paid to the UK consumer credit figures for July, showing a
sharp and unexpected increase in new credit. The stock market was bracing
itself for this week's heavy list of corporate trading results which,
traders hope, may provide some indication that the worst of the economic
recession has now been seen. In particular, the market is on alert for any
further dividend cuts, a factor which continued to weigh on sentiment in the
building sector.
Reports in the UK press that some stores had seen improved sales levels
failed to excite retail shares. The stock market is awaiting the August
retail price index, due on Friday, with confidence. The annualised headline
number is expected to jump to 3.8 per cent, reflecting distortions caused by
a drop in mortgage rates 12 months ago. The underlying rate, however, is
likely to show a further dip and to find a warm welcome in the City.
But for the short term, that is to say until September 20, the date of the
French ref-erendum on the Maastricht proposals, the UK stock market will
remain on tenterhooks, with all eyes fixed firmly on the sterling/D-Mark
exchange rate.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 42
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4186</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAE2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / London Stock Exchange: Equity futures and options trading
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOEL KIBAZO
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
TRADERS IN the derivatives market reported a volatile but uneventful start
to the new trading account, in which early gains were reversed later in the
session due to lack of activity, writes Joel Kibazo.
The September future contract on the FT-SE 100 Index opened tentatively at
2,377, but then climbed with only a brief pause to reach 2,396 as
independent traders moved to close short positions.
Sentiment was also boosted by weekend comment from the Bundesbank president
that a rise in German interest rates was unlikely at the moment. September
traded in a tight range of 2,390 to 2,395 before drifting lower at lunch
time.
With Wall Street shut for a public holiday, there was little to hold the
interest of traders and the contract continued to decline, setting a day's
low of 2,373 towards the finish.
A small rally just before the close helped September end off the bottom at
2,378, and with the estimated fair value premium to cash now calculated at
parity, the contract finished 6 points ahead of the underlying cash market.
Turnover was poor at 5,990 lots.
Traded options were dull, total volume reaching only 20,456 contracts. .
United Biscuits, with 1,780 lots dealt, was the busiest stock option.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 42
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4187</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAE1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / London Stock Exchange: Cheer for the builders
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By STEVE THOMPSON, JOEL KIBAZO and PETER JOHN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A BUILDING sector bracing itself for a series of profits setbacks and
dividend cuts during the new trading account was given a shot in the arm by
better than expected interim results from Rugby, the cement group.
The good figures saw Rugby shares advance 9, or some 5.6 per cent, to 169p,
one of the best individual performances yesterday in the stock market.
The profits increase, a rare achievement by a building company over the past
two years, prompted analysts to raise their full-year expectations. Mr Robin
Hardy at Panmure Gordon lifted his forecast for the current year to Pounds
56.78m and that for the following year to Pounds 59m.
The Panmure analyst said: 'If the building materials have a strong run, then
Rugby, with its good spread of interests, net cash and good strategy, will
be at the head of the pack.'
Drug stocks firm
Pharmaceuticals group SmithKline Beecham gained ground, helped by a positive
note from a securities house. The shares, up 11 at one stage, closed a net 7
ahead at 473p. The sector in general was firmer, benefiting ahead of
forthcoming results and a drug conference this week.
Mr Martin Hall of UBS Phillips &amp; Drew raised his forecast for 1993 profits
to Pounds 1.32bn from Pounds 1.28bn and published a note pointing out the
combined effect of a number of company announcements this year of drug
approvals, launches and promotion agreements.
UBS said the SmithKline upgrade also reflected better than expected sales of
the company's anti-emetic drug Kytril in Japan and its anti-arthritis
treatment Relafen in the US. Mr Hall said the impact on 1992 profits would
be held back by heavy marketing and launch costs. As a result he maintained
his current year forecast of Pounds 1.14bn.
Glaxo, which has results due for release on Thursday and is to discuss its
anti-migraine drug Imigran in London today, climbed 15 to 764p. Wellcome,
reinstated on Merrill Lynch's buy list, improved 18 to 844p.
Some analysts said sentiment towards the sector was positive due to its
defensive qualities during economic downturn and as investors looked to
increase their exposure to dollar-earning stocks on the possibility of
recovery in the US currency. However, there is also the view that UK drug
shares are relatively expensive versus Wall Street and that outperformance
is limited.
SG Warburg shares were chased higher, closing 13 ahead at 439p, after
weekend press suggestions that the stock may be inserted in the FT-SE 100
Index.
An agency cross of 3m shares at 202p prompted a sharp decline in London &amp;
Manchester, the life group, which ended 9 lower at 206p. A stock shortage
drove Commercial Union up 10 to 475p and General Accident 12 ahead to 443p.
The good results released by Rugby prompted a brief burst of buying interest
in Redland, which rose to 371p before ending a net 8 to the good at 368p.
Blue Circle Industries, on the other hand, suffered a decline of 5 to 155p
on keen turnover of 1.2m shares after bearish stories on the dividend, said
to have emanated from Smith New Court, the stockbroker. BCI is scheduled to
produce interims on Thursday, with profits expected to have dropped from
last time's Pounds 81m to Pounds 35.5m.
Building materials group Hepworth was also given a rough passage yesterday,
the shares plummeting 20 to 243p after hints that Kleinwort Benson
Securities had sharply downgraded its estimates. Last week Kleinwort pulled
the rug from underneath Tarmac shares after a very bearish review of the
company's earnings and dividend prospects.
Building specialists said the real bad news from the industry would kick off
this morning when George Wimpey will unveil its half-time figures. The
market expects the company to at least halve its interim dividend, from 4p
to 2p, and to reveal losses of around Pounds 10m, against a profit of Pounds
200,000 in the same period last year. Specialists warned of substantial
provisions against loss-making contracts and land. Wimpey slipped 2 more to
77p, easily the lowest level since the mid-1980s.
Hopes that British Aerospace would soon announce new orders were the spur to
the day's trading in the stock. The shares put on 6 to 219p as just in
excess of 1m shares were dealt.
Financial worries overhung Eurotunnel, which receded 15 to 365p. Dividend
concern surrounding P &amp; O appears to have faded and a squeeze in the stock
left it 8 up at 359p.
Plastics manufacturer British Vita fell 6 to 219p after weaker than expected
first-half results.
Furniture group MFI lost 6 to 102p, with UBS Philips &amp; Drew reported to have
downgraded the stock. The securities house is believed to have shaved Pounds
15m off its current-year figure to Pounds 60m.
Kingfisher was in demand, firming 7 to 441p, boosted by a recommendation
from SG Warburg, the company's broker, and County NatWest, which advised
investors to switch into Kingfisher and out of WH Smith. County said Smith,
which closed at 402p ex-dividend, has recently outperformed the market.
A continuing overhang of stock left United Biscuits 6 weaker at 260p.
A strong run for Unilever was checked as profit-takers moved in and took the
shares down 5 to 925p.
A shortage of Reed International shares squeezed them 13 higher to 511p,
helped by a recommendation from BZW. The house's media team told clients
that it felt Reed and Emap offered good exposure to the recovery potential
of the sector.
Support ahead of today's interim results saw Medeva improve 17 to 198p. The
market is looking for profits of between Pounds 12.2m and Pounds 15m,
against Pounds 5.05m last year.
Fisons, which also reports today, eased a penny to 174p. First-half profits
are expected to come in at between Pounds 35m and Pounds 43m.
Further reflection on last week's results continued to make Ladbroke a busy
market and turnover reached 3.8m as the shares put on 5 to 155p.
In hotels, sellers were seen in Stakis, where turnover rose to 5.1m as the
shares relinquished 2 to 25p.
NEW HIGHS AND LOWS FOR 1992
NEW HIGHS (10).
BRITISH FUNDS (1) Tr. 9pc '12 A, BREWERS &amp; DISTILLERS (1) Holt, BUSINESS
SERVICES (1) Penna, ELECTRICITY (1) Scot. Hydro, FOOD MANUFACTURING (1)
Acatos &amp; Hutcheson, INVESTMENT TRUSTS (1) St David's Zero Pf, MEDIA (2) TVS
Ent. 7.4pc Pf, Ulster TV, OTHER FINANCIAL (1) Sterling Tst., PACKAGING,
PAPER &amp; PRINTING (1) Carnaud Metalbox.
NEW LOWS (143).
BANKS (2) ANZ, Westpac, BREWERS &amp; DISTILLERS (2) Greenalls, Do 5.95pc,
BUILDING MATERIALS (5) CRH, Cape, Epwin, Hepworth, Newman-Tonks, BUSINESS
SERVICES (3) Johnson Cleaners, RCO, REA, CHEMICALS (1) Brit. Vita,
CONGLOMERATES (6) AGA, CSR, Chillington, Ensor, Fletcher Chlnge., Sale
Tilney, CONTRACTING &amp; CONSTRUCTION (8) Bailey (B), Campbell &amp; Armstrong,
Cussins, EBC, Edmond, Tay Homes, Vibroplant, Wimpey, ELECTRICALS (4) Dale,
Emess, Lec Refrig., Wholesale Fttgs., ELECTRONICS (9) AB, CML, Indl. Control
Servs., Kewill Sys., Logica, Lynx, Molynx, Trace Cmptrs., Vega, ENGINEERING
AEROSPACE (2) FR, Rolls-Royce, ENGINEERING GENERAL (3) Haden MacLellan,
Kvaerner, Victaulic, FOOD MANUFACTURING (5) Clifford N/V, Matthews (B),
Perkins, Sims, Utd. Biscuits, FOOD RETAILING (2) Cullen's, Nurdin Peacock,
HEALTH &amp; HOUSEHOLD (3) Baxter, Nestor-BNA, Seton Healthcare, HOTELS &amp;
LEISURE (5) Airbreak, Chrysalis, Expedier, Fairline Boats, Kunick 8 1/4 pc
Pf, INSURANCE LIFE (1) Lon. &amp; Manchester, INVESTMENT TRUSTS (18) Amicable
Smllr., City &amp; Comm. Inc., County Smllr. Co's, Eng. &amp; Caledonian, English &amp;
Scot., Flmg. Far Eastern, Fulcrum, Kleinwort Smllr. Co's, M &amp; G Income, Do
Pckg. Uts., Mid Wynd, Murray Smllr Mkts. B, New Throg. New Wts., Primadona,
Riv. &amp; Merc. Smllr. Co, SPRAIT, TR European Gwth., Temple Bar 6pc Cv '02,
MEDIA (2) Goodhead, Yorks. Tyne Tees TV, MERCHANT BANKS (1) Hambros 7 1/2 pc
Pf, METAL &amp; METAL FORMING (4) ASW, Cohen (A), Johnson &amp; Firth B, Richards,
MISCELLANEOUS (7) Amberley, Calderburn, Dudley Jenkins, Nu-Swift, Office &amp;
Elect., Spandex, Wood (A), MOTORS (2) ABI, Jacks, OIL &amp; GAS (3) Gaelic,
Kingston, New London, OTHER FINANCIAL (6) Baltic, INVESCO MIM, Jupiter
Tyndall, Lightship, Mercury Asset Mngemt., Natl. Home Loans, OTHER
INDUSTRIAL MATERIALS (4) BH Prop., Norcros, Pacific Dunlop, Williams 8pc Pf,
PACKAGING, PAPER &amp; PRINTING (4) Arjo Wiggins A, Shelton, Wace, Wood (SW),
PROPERTY (6) Allied Lon. 5 3/4 pc Pf, Chesterfield 5 1/4 pc Pf, Ests. &amp; Gen.
6pc Pf, Grainger, Prop. Security, Wates City of Lon., STORES (3) Coles Myer,
Courts, MFI, TEXTILES (4) Conrad Contl., Foster (J), Lamont, Tomkinsons,
TRANSPORT (2) Assoc. Brit. Ports, IoM Steam, MINES (16) Anglo Amer. Gold,
Anglo Amer., Buffels, Delta Gold, Doornfontein, Elandsrand, FS Cons.,
Greenwich Res., Loraine, OFS, Renison, Vaal Reefs, Venterpost, Welkom,
Western Deep, Zandpan.
Other market statistics, Page 24
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 42
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4188</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAE0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / World Stock Markets: Interest rate questions loom beyond the
Maastricht vote
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANTONIA SHARPE and JOHN PITT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
With the scales tipping in favour of a Yes vote in the French referendum on
the Maastricht treaty on September 20, European equity strategists are
looking beyond the poll to the question of a cut in German interest rates.
There appears to be agreement among them that European bourses have fallen
too far since the Danish referendum in June. In spite of the short-term
risks connected to the referendum result, current levels offer a good buying
opportunity for longer term investors, they say. But the interest rate
prospect is less encouraging.
Merrill Lynch recommends reducing high cash positions and re-allocating
funds back into European equities, towards Germany and Sweden in particular.
On balance, it believes that markets have now more than discounted a
realistic assessment of the uncertainties which they face.
UBS Phillips &amp; Drew is also of the view that European markets appear
oversold and that they are better underpinned by fundamental value than
other markets. It notes that France has outperformed Europe in July and
August and expects it to do well as support for a Yes vote recovers. Germany
has underperformed, it says, but may outperform in the next month as weak
German growth resurrects the possibility of a rate cut.
Mr James Cornish at County NatWest says Maastricht is not the only
consideration. In view of the slowdown in the US economy, underlined by last
week's weak August employment figures, and increasing political worries
ahead of the presidential election, County's forecast of the dollar at
DM1.45 at the end of this year shows little improvement on the current
level. Therefore, prospects for equity markets are likely to be similarly
restrained.
The other underlying problem is German interest rates, and with German M3
unlikely to come down to within reach of the Bundesbank's target range until
the winter, only the collapse of the west German economy into recession
could force an early fall in German rates. 'Accordingly, we believe that
interest rates in Europe are at best condemned to stay near current levels
until the end of the year,' Mr Cornish says.
On the other hand, Mr Adrian Phillips, head of European research at Baring
Securities, says that however distant a cut in German rates might be, bond
markets are prepared to discount it well in advance. Therefore, Barings
would recommend purchases of high-quality, interest rate-sensitive stocks.
CCF and Societe Gene-rale in France, UBS in Switzerland, ABN-Amro in the
Netherlands are among Baring's favourites, as well as Ambroveneto, for
investors brave enough to venture into Italy.
While the influence of the referendum appears to be waning, it still
influenced European trading last week, France and Spain leading the way with
strong positive performances. But Italy suffered another dreadful week,
culminating in Friday's lifting of the discount rate to its highest level
since 1985, in an effort to protect the lira.
Generally robust senior bourses left the FT-Actuaries Europe index 1.6 per
cent higher on the week, a performance matched by the World index. Spain's
rally pre-empted a French endorsement of Maastricht. The market gathered
strength during the week, with the general index ending 5 per cent higher.
Mr Stephen Hughes at Nikko Europe says that Madrid was partially inspired by
the return of institutional investors, looking to buy for the short term.
The recent clutch of better than expected interim results highlighted
undervaluations in several shares, which contributed to the rise in volume
as buyers returned.
The release of August inflation figures, expected early next week, may
prompt some investors to take early profits, Mr Hughes says, since the
increase in the VAT rate, introduced at the start of the month, is likely to
result in a rise in the CPI of up to one percentage point.
Scandinavian markets continued to be dragged lower by a spate of bad news,
especially from the financial sector, and according to some analysts there
seems to be little prospect of the gloom lifting in the short to
medium-term.
Mr Gordon Maclean, Scandinavian analyst at Robert Fleming, sees little
prospect of an upturn in the economy or in corporate earnings this year.
Signs of a recovery in the US economy have not fed through because of the
weakness of the dollar, while in Sweden and Finland, pressure on domestic
currencies led to a sharp increase in short-term interest rates last week.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
                        MARKETS IN PERSPECTIVE
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
                                                 % change   % change in
                   % change in local currency**  sterling** US Dollars**
              1 Week  4 Weeks  1 Year   Start of  Start of    Start of
                                          1992      1992        1992
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Austria       +1.10    -0.16  -31.45    -15.07     -13.97      -8.25
Belgium       +0.65    -5.83   -9.92     -6.89      -5.92      +0.34
Denmark       -4.67   -13.27  -31.05    -26.04     -24.58     -19.57
Finland       -3.70   -20.50  -42.99    -29.33     -29.73     -25.06
France        +4.20    +0.05   -2.66     +1.19      +2.97      +9.82
Germany       +1.86    -5.14  -11.39     -5.99      -4.69      +1.65
Ireland       -0.92    -2.44  -17.49    -12.43     -11.60      -5.71
Italy         -6.70   -12.08  -31.78    -25.95     -25.69     -20.75
Netherlands    0.00    -1.67   -2.97     +1.30      +2.58      +9.40
Norway        -6.45   -11.15  -39.58    -23.35     -22.90     -17.77
Spain         +5.51    +0.69  -19.48    -12.39     -13.05      -7.26
Sweden        -1.58    -7.43  -21.33     -7.12      -5.96      +0.30
Switzerland   +1.63    -2.43   +2.56     +6.39      +8.03     +15.22
UK            +2.02    +0.07  -12.76     -5.94      -5.94      +0.33
EUROPE        +1.58    -2.17  -11.91     -5.81      -5.13      +1.18
Australia     -1.92    -4.29   -5.72     -9.66     -19.75     -14.42
Hong Kong     +1.47    -3.74  +40.16    +32.11     +24.66     +32.96
Japan         +3.27   +21.46  -16.79    -15.85     -19.94     -14.61
Malaysia      +1.40    -1.59   +1.63     +1.58      +4.01     +10.93
New Zealand   +1.15    -4.66   -2.35     -8.36     -13.94      -8.19
Singapore     +0.67    -5.19   -9.91    -13.83     -18.07     -12.61
Canada        +1.62    +1.12   -3.30     -2.83     -12.08      -6.24
USA           +0.59    -0.44   +7.35     +0.05      -6.20      +0.05
Mexico        -1.09    -7.27   +7.30     -5.20     -11.88      -6.02
South Africa  +1.44    -7.16   -7.92     -9.17     -28.44     -23.68
WORLD INDEX   +1.57    +3.93   -5.55     -6.35     -10.46      -4.50
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
** Based on September 4th 1992.   Copyright, The Financial Times
Limited, Goldman, Sachs &amp; Co., and County NatWest Securities
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 39
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4189</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAEZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / World Stock Markets (Asia Pacific): Nikkei average eases on
late profit-taking
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By EMIKO TERAZONO
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TOKYO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
SHARE prices finished easier on the day after late afternoon profit-taking
eroded earlier gains and buying by dealers lost its momentum, writes Emiko
Terazono in Tokyo.
The Nikkei average was finally 115.12 down at the day's low of 18,440.18. It
registered a high for the session of 18,916.70 in the morning, as last
Friday's Federal Funds rate cut in the US raised hopes of an imminent
lowering of the official discount rate by the Bank of Japan.
Volume fell to 380m shares from 754m as dealers, who have been active buyers
recently, refrained from buying. Declines led advances by 509 to 489, with
146 issues unchanged, the Topix index of all first section stocks shed 9.82
to 1,410.56 and, in London, the ISE/Nikkei 50 index eased 2.12 to 1,135.30.
Short-covering by foreign investors and short-term buying by individuals
were noted as hopes of an early credit easing lifted prices in the morning.
Investment trusts came in with the profit-taking in the afternoon.
Major institutional investors were inactive. Since a high proportion of
institutional portfolios is already invested in equities, institutions are
not aggressive buyers of shares; and, due to 'guidance' from the Ministry of
Finance, they are unable to sell to take profits either. 'Banks and life
insurers which have sold stocks are receiving calls from the Finance
Ministry,' said Mr Masami Okuma at UBS Phillips &amp; Drew.
Individual investors continued with speculative short-term trading. Nippon
Mining, the most active issue of the day, rose Y10 to Y510 on the Aids
theme.
Trust banks were firm on active short-covering. Yasuda Trust advanced Y96 to
Y1,010 and Toyo Trust Y79 to Y1,030. Leading commercial banks lost ground on
profit-taking. Industrial Bank of Japan fell Y30 to Y2,960 and Sakura Y100
to Y1,210.
Minebea, the leading ball bearing maker, put on Y3 to Y495. The issue saw
active buying on reports over the weekend that it would sell NMB
Semiconductor, its semiconductor manufacturing affiliate, to Nippon Steel.
However, some earlier gains were lost as denials by Minebea of an agreement
with Nippon Steel prompted profit-taking. In the morning session, the Japan
Securities Dealers' Association said it would suspend trading of NMB
Semiconductor shares on the over-the-counter market in order to allow
investors to confirm newspaper reports.
In Osaka, the OSE average rose 13.12 to 20,134.62 in volume of 20.4m shares.
Nintendo, the video game maker, gained Y100 at Y10,800 on bargain hunting.
Roundup
SENTIMENT varied in the Pacific Rim region yesterday, reflecting a fairly
gloomy tone in the higher volume markets.
HONG KONG blamed Sino-US trade disputes, profit-taking and switching back
into Japanese equities as the Hang Seng index ended 43.1 down at 5,664.41
after hitting an intraday low of 5,647.07 just before the close.
Turnover shrank from HKDollars 1.82bn to HKDollars 1.32bn. Selective
profit-taking took in HSBC Holdings, which topped the actives list as it
retreated HKDollars 1 to end the day at HKDollars 54.50.
AUSTRALIA reflected nervousness about interest rates and the weak local
dollar as the All Ordinaries index slipped 15.4 to 1,514.9. Turnover more
than halved from ADollars 291m to ADollars 139.9m.
Brokers said banks were depressed by the perception that interest rates have
bottomed. The sector was led down by NAB, 14 cents off at ADollars 7.20,
followed by ANZ and Commonwealth, each 8 cents cheaper at ADollars 3.08 and
ADollars 6.66 respectively. Westpac dipped 7 cents to a 7 1/2 -year low of
ADollars 2.83.
TAIWAN reversed early gains on meeting heavy selling of electronics stocks.
The weighted index, which rose more than 40 points at the opening, finished
36.22 lower on balance at 3,852.27. The market was closed on Friday and
Saturday due to a typhoon.
The electronics sector was weak after poor interim results, and amid talk
that some might fail to meet payment deadlines to suppliers. Microtek fell
TDollars 2.10 to TDollars 29.10.
SEOUL climbed steeply in moderate trade as President Roh set a date for his
visit to China, and on news of a Siberian gas joint venture for the
construction of a pipeline linking the reserves with Korea.
The composite index moved ahead 22.90, or 4.3 per cent, to 557.59 in
turnover of Won298.9bn, against Saturday's Won231.9bn.
MANILA saw modest gains in leading telephone issue PLDT and state-controlled
Philippine National Bank (PNB), and the composite index rose 21.70 to
1,413.70.
News that the government planned to sell 11 per cent of its PNB shares to a
state pension fund, ensuring that government deposits remain intact in the
profitable bank, helped PNB to move forward 12.50 pesos to 277.50 pesos.
BANGKOK reflected a spurt in property companies and Thai Airways as the SET
index advanced 6.98 to 770.26 in turnover of baht 6.62bn.
BOMBAY had just one hour of trading instead of the usual two, but this still
left the BSE index 60.42 stronger at 3,226.52 as speculators and small
investors bet on a continued uptrend.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 39
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4190</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAEYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / World Stock Markets: South Africa
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Leading shares pared earlier gains on news that Ciskei soldiers had opened
fire on ANC supporters, killing 14 people. Industrials fell 9 to 4,102 and
the overall index was off 4 at 3,178. But golds rose 8 to 943 on the back of
the firmer bullion price.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 39
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4191</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAEXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / World Stock Markets (Europe): Bundesbank's promise carries
limited effect
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By Our Markets Staff
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE weekend news that the Bundesbank would not raise its interest rates
under current circumstances had a limited effect on European financial
markets yesterday, writes Our Markets Staff.
FRANKFURT saw it more in bonds where the Bundesbank's average yield -
calculated in late morning and also reflecting last Friday's US interest
rate cut - fell 10 basis points to 8.24 per cent.
In the equity market, turnover fell from DM4.9bn to DM3.4bn, and the DAX
index rose only 4.13 to 1,540.63. This, said Mr Jens Wiecking at Merck Finck
in Dusseldorf, reflected fundamental problems like the lack of German
economic growth, and disappointing corporate earnings.
A report that Klockner-Werke expects a steel division loss of DM180m for the
year to September 30 brought KW down by DM2.50 to DM8.50; its competitor,
Preussag, fell DM13 at one point before recovering to DM352, down DM8 on the
day.
Equities were also subdued by the question of when interest rates might
actually fall. Bank Julius Bar in Frankfurt said that this might have to
wait until after German wage contract negotiations in April and May 1993.
PARIS opened slightly higher but then drifted back by the close, a
performance which masked severe declines in some stocks. The CAC-40 index
ended 0.32 higher at 1,779.30, after a high of 1,793.52, in turnover of
FFr2bn.
Carrefour, the supermarket group, opened limit down on heavy selling, in
particular from London, following Friday's news of a 53.3 per cent drop in
first-half net attributable profit and that its chairman, Mr Michel Bon, had
resigned. The stock went as low as FFr2,050 before closing FFr224, or 9.7
per cent lower at FFr2,076 in heavy volume of 199,435 shares.
Eurotunnel was also a heavy faller, losing FFr2.00 or 5.4 per cent to
FFr35.15, on worries about its dispute with TML. Accor, the hotels group,
dropped FFr30 or 5.5 per cent to FFr520 ahead of its interim results, due
today, which are expected to be disappointing.
Air Liquide, ex a 1-10 scrip issue, closed a net FFr10 higher at FFr745,
while L'Oreal jumped FFr33 or 3.4 per cent to FFr999 on good first half
turnover figures.
MILAN reflected the after hours falls on Friday, although a recovery in the
lira provided some support as the Comit index fell 9.99 or 2.7 per cent to
361.52, its lowest close since mid-August 1985, in turnover estimated at
more than L100bn after Friday's L117.6bn.
Mediobanca, which reported 1991/92 results in line with expectations, fell
L180 or 2 per cent to L8,920, but recouped L130 after hours. Dealers were
disappointed that the bank did not shed light on its performance since June
nor make any comment on the recent speculation of a capital increase.
AMSTERDAM drifted down in quiet trading, the CBS Tendency index losing 0.6
to 109.3. Heineken fell Fl 5.70 to Fl 167.00 as investors took profits after
Friday's 17 per cent rise in first-half profits. A number of analysts have
lowered their full-year forecasts but remain long-term buyers of the stock.
Its fellow brewer, Grolsch, lost Fl 3.00 to Fl 220.00 ahead of interim
results due later this week.
ZURICH rose in low volume, the SMI index ending 13.9 higher at 1,788.3.
Among chemicals, Roche certificates firmed SFr50 to SFr3,440. There was talk
that a new issue of covered warrants on the certificates was being prepared.
BRUSSELS weakened slightly on the last day of the forward account, the
Bel-20 index losing 3.60 to 1,066.76 in low turnover of BFr527m. UCB, the
chemical and pharmaceutical group, advanced BFr275 to BFr21,900 ahead of
interim results due on Thursday.
VIENNA gained strongly as short-covering on the futures and options exchange
pushed the ATX index up 14.69 to 745.17, its highest level for more than two
weeks.
Wienerberger, the building materials supplier, continued last week's rally,
gaining Sch120 to Sch3,320 while OMV was Sch21 stronger at Sch666.
STOCKHOLM fell in thin trading, as the Affarsvarlden General Index shed 6.3
to 750.7.
Last week's suspension of shares in Svensk Kredit continued to plague the
banking and insurance sectors. Skandia, a major shareholder in Svensk
Kredit, fell SKr4.50 to SKr62.50.
MADRID's general index lost 0.86 to 215.56 in turnover estimated at
Pta5.5bn.
OSLO's all-share index fell 4.05 or 1.3 per cent to 309.04 after the central
bank raised its overnight lending rate to 11.0 per cent from 10.0 per cent.
Wall Street and Toronto were shut yesterday for Labor Day.
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
                      FT-SE EUROTRACK 100 - SEP 7
                             Hourly changes
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
 Open    10.30am   11 am    12 pm    1 pm      2 pm     3 pm    close
1032.49  1030.87  1031.52  1032.73  1034.46  1033.88  1032.63  1032.28
               Day's High  1034.83    Day's Low  1030.47
       Sep 4       Sep 3      Sep 2       Sep 1      Aug 28
      1029.27     1031.46    1011.19    1007.79     1013.54
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Base value 1000 (26/10/90).
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 39
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4192</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAEWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Foreign Exchanges: EC declaration has no impact
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JAMES BLITZ
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
STERLING closed  1/2 pfennig down against the D-Mark in London yesterday as
traders became increasingly concerned about the weakness of the US dollar
and its impact on the European exchange rate mechanism, writes James Blitz.
Trading was thin because the US was off for the Labor Day holiday. But an
atmosphere of uncertainty pervaded the market after last Friday's extremely
poor figure for the August US non-farm payroll.
The drop in US employment, and the  1/4 percentage point reduction in the
Federal Funds rate that followed, have had two consequences. First, they
have raised renewed fears of a drop in the dollar, which is certain to test
DM1.40 on the downside today. Analysts said the producer price index, due
out this Friday, could contain low inflation data and give the Federal
Reserve a good excuse to push the discount rate below 3 per cent.
Secondly, there are fears that this drop will cause new tensions in the
European Monetary System, because of renewed buying of D-Marks. Dealers
appeared to be unimpressed by a declaration from European Community finance
ministers at the weekend that an EMS realignment is out of the question. Mr
Helmut Schlesinger, the Bundesbank president, still appeared uncertain on
this point in a radio interview on Sunday.
The commitment from the Bundesbank not to raise interest rates 'in present
circumstances' was also disregarded. Mr Jim O'Neill, head of research at
Swiss Banking Corporation in London, said the markets had already assumed
that this was the case. 'There is nothing new there at all,' he added. 'What
the market wants to know is when the cut will come.'
Mr O'Neill believes pressure on the pound could be intense in the next few
days. In his view, the US payroll figure on Friday undid 75 per cent of the
UK government's efforts in securing an Ecu10bn loan with which to buy
sterling on the foreign exchanges. 'The Bank will certainly have to spend
that money this week, but the possibility that they will have to raise rates
still exists,' he said.
The pound ended in London yesterday at DM2.7950, off  1/2 pfennig on the
day. The dollar closed unchanged at DM1.4030.
The Italian lira improved against the D-Mark as investors unwound short lira
positions, knowing that the currency was unlikely to come under strong
speculative attack while the US is on holiday. The heavy selling of the
Italian currency on Friday may have been overdone, considering the 1 3/4
percentage points rise in interest rates that day. But a fall in the dollar
to new lows would put the lira under pressure again. It closed at L763.5 to
the D-Mark against a previous L765.0.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 33
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4193</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAEVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Money Markets: Futures fall back
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
STERLING futures opened higher yesterday morning as some dealers were
encouraged by a promise from Bundesbank officials that there will be no rise
in German interest rates 'in present circumstances'.
However, futures prices later fell back as sterling dropped below DM2.80
against the D-Mark. The government's recent decision to borrow D-Marks and
buy sterling on the foreign exchanges has calmed the atmosphere in the
markets. But there is lingering uncertainty over France's vote on the
Maastricht referendum in two weeks' time.
The September and December contracts were tossed around by this uncertainty.
In the morning, both contracts opened 9 basis points higher at 89.79 and
89.78 respectively. but they soon dwindled with the currency: the September
contract closed 13 basis points down from its opening level and the December
contract 3 basis points off. Both closing prices still discount a rise in
base rates of  1/4 percentage point.
In the cash market, trading was dominated by the very large shortage of
Pounds 2.4bn forecast by the Bank of England in the morning. Some traders
felt that the shortage was the outcome of translating foreign borrowings,
using part of the Ecu10bn borrowing facility arranged by the UK government
last week.
In the early round, Pounds 1.8bn of the shortage was removed in a repurchase
agreement for resale to the market in equal amounts on September 21 and 22
at 9 15/16 per cent. If banks are willing to have their bills returned at
this interest rate after the Maastricht referendum on September 20, they
must be confident that there will be no increase in base rates following the
result.
Simultaneously, the Bank bought Pounds 8m of Band 3 bank bills at 9 3/4 per
cent and Pounds 17m of Band 4 bank bills at 9 per cent. After revising the
shortage to Pounds 2.25bn, the Bank then purchased Pounds 400m of Band 1
bank bills at 9 7/8 per cent, Pounds 3m of Band 3 bank bills and Pounds 35m
of Band 4 bank bills. In the afternoon, the shortage was revised to Pounds
2.6bn and the Bank purchased Pounds 355m of Band 1 bank bills.
Three-month money softened in the morning to 10 1/4 per cent on the offered
side. Following sterling's fall, it closed unchanged at 10 5/16 per cent
offered.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 33
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4194</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAEUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Commodities and Agriculture: Quebec selling off asbestos
interests
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT GIBBENS
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MONTREAL
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
QUEBEC'S ASBESTOS fibre industry, once the western world's biggest, is being
returned to the private sector.
A Quebec government agency is selling its 55 per cent interest in Asbestos
Corporation and its 100 per cent of Bell Asbestos and Atlas-Turner to a
small Quebec mining group for CDollars 34m (Pounds 14m) over 10 years. The
minority shares of Asbestos Corporation will still be held by the public.
The former separatist Parti Quebecois spent well over CDollars 500m in the
early 1980s nationalising and supporting the industry, up to that point
dominated by General Dynamics, other US interests and the former Turner &amp;
Newall of Britain. These companies gradually pulled out because of the
anti-asbestos health campaign.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 32
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4195</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAETFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Commodities and Agriculture: More clouds gather over
Caribbean export sector - Canute James studies a gloomy report on last
year's performance from the region's development bank
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CANUTE JAMES
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
COMMODITY EXPORTING countries in the English-speaking Caribbean will
continue to experience fluctuating output and earnings because of weak and
uncertain markets, and will feel the effects of a prolonged drought last
year, the Caribbean Development Bank has said in its report on the region's
economic performance in 1991.
The Barbados-based bank, which provides project loans for 17 members in the
region, said sugar producers were being affected by reduced access to the US
market; bauxite (aluminium ore) output was being contained by oversupply of
aluminium; oil production had been relatively stable; and banana producers
were worried about competition for their traditional markets.
The region's sugar production would be lower this year because of last
year's drought, the CDB said. Output in the bank's sugar-producing members -
Guyana, Trinidad and Tobago, Barbados, St Kitts-Nevis, Jamaica and Belize -
reached 688,000 tonnes last year, 5 per cent more than 1990. Both Guyana and
St Kitts recorded production increases of more than 20 per cent, reversing
declines in 1990, while in Trinidad and Tobago and Barbados output declined
by 5 per cent and 15 per cent respectively.
'A major concern of regional sugar producers continues to be the reduction
in US sugar import quotas,' the bank reported. 'In October (1991), the US
administration announced a 35 per cent reduction for all regional producers
except St Kitts-Nevis, whose quota was reduced by 9.6 per cent.' The cuts in
US quotas would severely affect some producers, such as Belize, which was
producing more than its quota commitments to both the EC and US markets,'
said the bank. 'Sugar not sold on the preferential markets is sold at world
market prices, which are substantially below preferential prices.'
The report said that with the 'rapid compression' of regional sugar quotas
since 1982, the attention of producers would be focussed increasingly on
improved efficiency to increase export competitiveness and profitability of
their industries.
The weak state of the international aluminium market, caused by economic
recession and unexpectedly high levels of sales by the former Soviet Union,
would continue to have a dampening effect on the region's bauxite mining and
refining industry, said the CDB. While projecting the start of a recovery in
the aluminium market in the second half of this year, the bank expected
continued low prices. 'Taking into account the closure of several smelting
plants, world production is projected to decline slightly in 1992,' it said.
Regional production of bauxite fell 4 per cent last year to 13m tonnes in
response to weak world market prices caused by oversupply, the report said.
The two producers had mixed fortunes. Guyana's production of 1.35m tonnes
last year was 5.5 per cent less than 1990, while Jamaica's grew by 5.8 per
cent to 11.6m tonnes.
The CDB indicated that the region's bauxite output had also suffered from a
shortfall in shipments to the former Soviet Union. That was a reference to
the de facto termination of a five-year contract between Jamaica and a
Soviet importing house for 1m tonnes of ore a year. Shipments were well
below the contracted quantities last year because of delayed payments by
Moscow, followed by the disintegration of the Soviet Union.
The bank's oil producing members also suffered mixed fortunes, with output
remaining stable in Barbados but declining in Trinidad and Tobago, mainly
because of accidents and the need for 'non-routine maintenance' of
refineries, the report said. It gave no figures for 1991 output, but
official figures from the respective governments show Barbadian 1991 oil
output at 1,550 barrels a day, with Trinidad and Tobago's at 147,000 b/d.
In the face of continuing uncertainty over preferential access to the
European market, the bank's banana-exporting members recorded a 16 per cent
decline in volume last year to 300,000 tonnes. The producers are Belize,
Jamaica and the Windward Islands of St Lucia, St Vincent, Dominica and
Grenada.
'All producing countries, except Jamaica, reported declines mainly because
of prolonged drought which also affected fruit quality,' the bank said. 'In
the Windward Islands, the volume of bananas exported to the UK under
preferential arrangements fell by 18 per cent. the decline in performance
was most pronounced in St Lucia and St Vincent.'
The bank forecast expanded production and export of bananas this year,
mainly in the Windward Islands which was expected to ship 300,000 tonnes.
But the report warned: 'Despite this optimistic outlook for production, the
threat of the removal of protection for banana exports after 1992 has
resulted in considerable uncertainty in the industry. Efforts by regional
producers to identify alternative markets for bananas have had limited
success because of intense competition from Latin America.'
The bank suggested that one way in which the regional producers could
cushion the damage was through improved efficiency and competitiveness, and
by agricultural diversification. It noted 'an expansion in vegetable and
other food crop production during 1991'.
Nutmeg production in Grenada, the world's second largest producer after
Indonesia, fell by 2.5 per cent to 2,643 tonnes last year, the bank
reported. 'Since 1990 production has been below the average for the
preceding three years largely because of the soft market for this crop,' the
report said.
US markets were closed yesterday for the Labor Day holiday
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 32
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4196</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAESFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Commodities and Agriculture: India set for bumper cotton
crop
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KUNAL BOSE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   CALCUTTA
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
INDIA, which accounts for nearly 22 per cent of the world area under cotton,
is expected to harvest a bumper crop of between 13m and 13.5m bales (170 kg
each) in the 1992-93 season, provided the September rains are adequate. This
is in spite of a delay in sowing because of the late arrival of the monsoon.
Crop reports from big cotton producing states like Maharashtra, Gujarat and
Madhya Pradesh, which suffered production setbacks in 1991-92 in terms of
both quantity and quality, are highly encouraging this time. The 1991-92
crop was about 12m bales.
Unlike last year, the quality of the crop in the current season will be
good.
Federal officials do not rule out the possibility of a glut and a consequent
collapse in prices in the coming months. To make matters worse, India is
opening the 1992-93 season with stocks of 3.4m bales, up from 2.27m bales at
the start of the 1991-92 season.
Government procurement agencies will have to conduct price support
operations on a large scale to protect the interest of farmers. According to
officials, while there will be considerable surplus of cotton after meeting
the mill requirement of about 10.5m bales, exporting will not be easy in
view of the low international prices and the recession in the world textile
industry. In the past, India had exported up to 1.2m bales a year, but last
year sales abroad amounted to only about 75,000 bales, including 65,000
bales of Bangladeshi cotton used mainly for making surgical grade cloth.
According to trade representatives, India must export cotton during 1992-93,
even at a loss, in order to maintain prices in the domestic market. More
often than not in recent years, Indian cotton growers have received less
than remunerative prices. The large-scale diversion of land from cotton to
other crops is not ruled out if distress selling becomes general this
season.
The textile industry, which is generally held responsible for the woes of
growers, contends that the returns from cotton cultivation will improve if
productivity is brought up to the international level. Indian productivity
of 260 kg a hectare (105 kg an acre) is less than half the world average of
550 kg a hectare, points out Mr Anil Jain, spokesman for the cotton spinning
industry.
India is keen to adopt the techniques that have enabled Israeli cotton
farming farmers to achieve an average yield of of 1,500 kg a hectare and
itrecently sent a team of experts, including the chairman of the Cotton
Corporation of India, to study that country's cultivation methods.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 32
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4197</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAERFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Commodities and Agriculture: BP and Statoil in deal to
develop Caspian Sea field
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NEIL BUCKLEY
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BAKU
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
BRITISH PETROLEUM, the UK oil company, and Statoil, the Norwegian state oil
company, yesterday reached an exclusive agreement with Azerbaijan to
negotiate to develop the Dostlug (Friendship) field in the Caspian Sea.
The deal is BP's most significant agreement with a former Soviet republic -
probably involving investment of at least Dollars 1.5bn - and only the
second by Azerbaijan with a western company.
BP-Statoil has exclusive rights to conduct a feasibility study of the
1bn-barrel Dostlug field (formerly known by its Russian name of
Kaverochkin), 75 km (47 miles) south of Baku, the Azeri capital, as well as
to explore the nearby Shak Deniz (formerly Shakhovo More) area, where
experts believe significant amounts of oil may be found.
The agreement was signed by Mr Isa Gambarov, chairman of the Council of
Ministers, and Mr John Browne, chief executive of BP exploration. It was
witnessed by Lady Thatcher, the former UK prime minister, who, as guest of
the newly-elected Azeri president Mr Abulfaz Elchibey, had earlier swept
into Baku at the head of a 30-car convoy.
'We have signed today a momentous deal,' Mr Browne said. 'It will bring
prosperity to the people of Azerbaijan through investment, training,
technology transfer and revenue.
The alliance will conduct a two-year study of the field with local oil and
gas producers Kaspmorneftegaz and Azerineft, while negotiating
production-sharing agreements with the Azeri government.
BP-Statoil paid Dollars 30m for exclusive rights to the field, and will make
a further payment once final agreements have been ratified. Interests in the
venture will be split 50:50 with Azerbaijan.
The Dostug field is at present estimated at more than 1bn barrels, although
experts believe eventual recoverable reserves may total more than 2bn
barrels - ranking the field alongside the UK North Sea Forties field in
size. Production could be more than 200,000 barrels a day, which would
double present Azeri oil output.
Mr Browne said he was 'very satisfied' with the results of an experimental
Dollars 7.5m contract with the ShelfProyektstroi construction yard, 15 km
(nine miles) south of Baku, to produce four piles which will used to secure
platforms in the North Sea. He said BP hopes to construct as much as
possible of the Dostlug infrastructure at the SPS yard. It will also employ
native Azeris offshore and in local management, providing employment for
about 700 people.
Oil will be exported through an existing pipeline through Russia, there are
also plans for a Dollars 750m pipeline through Georgia to a new oil terminal
at Poti, on the Black Sea.
The deal is a welcome boost for BP-Statoil, which was narrowly beaten last
year by Amoco, the US oil company, in Azerbaijan's first international
tender to develop the Caspian Sea Azeri field, although the alliance was
awarded a 19 per cent interest in the field.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 32
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4198</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAEQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Commodities and Agriculture: Sour response to milk co-op
plan - A row over plans to reform the UK dairy market
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID BLACKWELL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MR ANDREW DARE, after just one week as chief executive of the Milk Marketing
Board, found his own words used against him in a blistering attack by the
Dairy Trade Federation on plans to end the 60-year-old statutory milk
marketing monopoly.
Mr Brian Smith, president of the DTF, said he could not understand how a
government that believed in a free market could be in favour of the MMB's
proposal to turn itself into a voluntary co-operative. And he quoted Mr
Dare, himself a former president of the DTF, as saying three years ago: 'We
are not prepared to see the MMB try to make itself voluntary'. Mr Smith
said: 'Now he is the architect of the MMB proposals.'
However, he said the DTF's main argument was with the government and the
agriculture ministry, not the MMB itself.
The MMB's proposals were published only at the beginning of last month after
more than two years of intense debate. The Ministry of Agriculture has given
interested parties until September 18 to comment on the plan, which will
also have to be approved by the European Commission. A Bill to end the
monopoly is expected to come before parliament this autumn and be given the
Royal Assent next June.
However, the Dairy Trade Federation has whole-heartedly backed only one part
of the plan - the proposed spin-off of Dairy Crest, the MMB's wholly-owned
subsidiary with a 25 per cent share of the UK's manufactured dairy products
market.
The DTF welcomed the fact that farmers should be free to sell milk to anyone
they chose once the MMB was closed - but Mr Smith doubted that the market
would be genuinely free. He pointed out that the proposed legislation would
create a single co-operative handling more than three times the milk of the
largest co-operatives in Europe.
Mr Smith criticised plans for the co-operative to retain its assets, such as
central testing of milk. The assets were a disguised incentive to persuade
farmers to join.
He pointed out, again citing Mr Dare when he was DTF president, that the
rules of supply and demand were different for milk because there was a
monopoly supplier and the UK was under the EC's production quota system. Mr
Smith said that while supply could not be increased, prices could only rise.
In addition, Mr Smith pointed out that the MMB was subject to all sorts of
statutory controls. 'What is to control the co-operative?' he asked.
The DTF proposed that all MMB assets, including property, should be realised
and returned to farmers along with their share of Dairy Crest. The MMB's
farm services should be transferred to an independent body such as the
Agricultural Development Advisory Service (Adas).
'The current proposals from the MMB tend towards replacing a statutory
monopoly with a private one,' said Mr Smith. 'If the government is unwilling
to intervene to stop this, the DTF believes that the government must act to
establish simple but effective regulatory controls over prices, supply and
contract terms in order to prevent the co-op from abusing its dominant
position in the market.'
Mr Dare yesterday counter-attacked, saying that he stood by everything he
had said as president of the DTF. When he was president of the DTF he had
made lots of criticisms of the board. 'I can tell you I made those same
criticisms in the boardroom,' he said. The situation had changed completely,
and the DTF had been 'less than fully appreciative of what we have said'.
The proposed co-operative, which he believed about 80 per cent of the 30,000
dairy farmers in England and Wales would join, would have to stand or fall
in a free market, he said. 'There is nothing to stop anyone else setting up
a co-operative - regional or otherwise.'
Since he had started advising the MMB in November last year, he had urged it
to become much more open and commercial, and it now met most of the DTF's
original requirements. Dairy Crest would be floated off, farmers would not
be under contract for more than a year, and anyone could set up in
competition against the new co-op.
He described the DTF demand for the MMB's testing service to be hived off as
bizarre. 'Whoever heard of a co-operative buying and selling milk without
testing facilities? We have the best quality milk in Europe and that's got
to stay.'
Defending the potential size of the co-operative, he said that on the
consumer side there were now only four major dairy groups, he said -
Northern Foods, Dairy Crest, Unigate and the Co-operative Retail Services.
Annual turnover of the MMB without Dairy Crest would be about Pounds 2.4bn
if all dairy farmers joined - about the same size as Unigate, he said.
The plans to end the milk monopoly are not the only source of friction
between the MMB and the DTF at the moment. Late last month the two
organisations failed to agree on a new way of pricing milk for manufacturing
which should have started on September 1 - the day Mr Dare took up the reins
as MMB chief executive.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 32
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4199</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAEPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Commodities and Agriculture: Lifting of Malaysian palm oil
duty opposed
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KIERAN COOKE and KUNAL BOSE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   KUALA LUMPUR, CALCUTTA
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
MALAYSIA'S PALM oil refiners have objected to suggestions that the country
lift export duties on crude palm oil exports in an effort to increase
foreign sales.
The Palm Oil Refiners Association of Malaysia said the country should
continue to be a crude palm oil refining centre. 'If this suggestion is
carried through then many millions of dollars of investments we have made in
refining capacity could be lost,' said one refiner.
Malaysia, the world's biggest palm oil producer, exports almost all of its
palm oil in processed form. For several years the government has imposed a
20 per cent duty on crude palm oil exports in order to encourage downstream
processing within the country.
Last week Mr Lim Keng Yaik, the Malaysian Primary Industries Minister,
confirmed that Malaysia now had excess palm oil refining capacity and needed
to reconsider its marketing strategy. 'I am thinking out loud whether, at
the present stage of development, we still need to go into value added,
downstream refining of crude palm oil when it is no longer very profitable,'
he said.
Malaysian refineries now have a processing capacity of 10m tonnes a year
while supply is a little over 6m tonnes. Several countries impose
substantial import taxes on processed palm oil whereas crude palm oil is
subject to little or no import duties.
Mr Lim said processing companies should be encouraged to set up refineries
overseas as part of a strategy to build up new markets and gain greater
market share in other countries.
He has also said Malaysia is considering offering more countries credit
facilities for palm oil imports. So far Pakistan and Algeria have signed
credit agreements with Malaysia covering a total of Dollars 150m worth of
palm oil imports.
The government-owned State Trading Corporation of India has signed a
contract with Indonesia for the import of 150,000 tonnes of palm olein (the
liquid portion), writes Kunal Bose in Calcutta.
As the contract has been agreed so soon after India signed a memorandum of
understanding with Malaysia covering the purchase of 300,000 tonnes of palm
oil in the next two years, it is understood to be expecting a good price
discount from the Indonesian suppliers.
The contracted Indonesian oil will be arriving next month for distribution
through 'fair price' shops. October being the festival month in India, there
is a surge in demand for edible oils and the proposed import from Indonesia
will help in keeping the oil prices in check.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 32
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4200</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAEOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Commodities and Agriculture: Poland begins heavy wheat
imports
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTOPHER BOBINSKI
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   WARSAW
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
POLAND HAS bought 500,000 tonnes of wheat abroad and further imports this
year could go as high as 2.5m tonnes in the wake of the country's
drought-ridden harvest. Latest official estimates put this year's grain crop
at 21.2m tonnes or 24 per cent less than last year.
The shortfall has already pushed up grain and meat prices and retail food
prices threaten to grow by 20 per cent in the coming months. Indeed prices
being asked for grain by farmers in some parts of the country have already
outstripped world market levels. The present grain purchase has been made in
the European Community by the state run Food Market Agency to boost
government reserve stocks.
A 40 per cent drop in this year's potato crop down to 17m tonnes will also
affect pork output in the coming months. The Solidarity Farmers' Union has
called on the government to provide aid for farmers in the worst hit areas
in western and northern Poland as well as subsidised credits and tax
deferments until the end of 1993.
This year's grain shortage comes after three years of declining fertiliser
and pesticide usage as real farming incomes have fallen. This year the
number of hectares sown with grain fell for the first time by 4.6 per cent
to 8.3m hectares.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 32
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4201</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAENFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / World Commodities Prices: Market Report
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Lack of activity in the London markets reflected the US Labor Day holiday.
Some light buying was seen in GOLD, which helped to maintain the market
above Friday's levels. Most BASE METALS ended a quiet day with prices below
Friday's levels but above the day's lows. The SUGAR market's main talking
point was the Cuban president's weekend assertion that the country had
produced 7m tonnes of sugar for 1991-92. Talk of Cuban buying in March New
York has been a key supportive factor recently amid concern that production
may fall further in 1992-93.
Compiled from Reuters
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 32
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4202</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAEMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / World Commodities Prices: Tea
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
There were 17,634 packages for the day, reports the Tea Brokers'
Association. There was good general demand. Landed new season's Assams sold
at about last levels although plainer sorts tended easier. Bright liquoring
and good medium east African teas met good competition but prices were often
lower with quality. Lesser mediums remained a strong feature and fully firm
to 2p dearer. Brighter central African descriptions were dearer. Offshore;
strong demand at fully firm rates. The highest price realised was 152p for a
Rwanda pf. 1. Quotations: quality 160p, good medium 132p, medium 125p, low
medium 80p.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 32
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4203</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAELFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Commodities and Agriculture: Europe and America slip down
coal league
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By FRANCIS WILLIAMS
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   GENEVA
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
EUROPE AND North America, which a decade ago accounted for two-thirds of
world coal production and trade, now account for less than half, the United
Nations Economic Commission for Europe says in a report on coal market
trends and prospects in the region. The ECE area also became a net coal
importer in 1991 and is expected to remain one this year, due mainly to
lower exports from eastern Europe and the former Soviet Union.
Global hard coal consumption and production both fell last year to below
3.5bn tonnes, reflecting a steep decline in eastern European output and a
smaller drop in the US. US output is expected to rebound this year,
alongside a 1 per cent rise in world production, but demand and production
will fall in both halves of Europe in 1992, the ECE says.
The drop in ECE coal use to about 1.7bn tonnes last year took its share of
world demand to less than 50 per cent for the first time, and the declining
trend is likely to continue, the report says. The ECE is predicting that
hard coal consumption in Asia, already 45 per cent of the world total, will
rise by 2 per cent a year, double the growth rate forecast for the ECE
region.
The slow growth in coal use in Europe and North America stems mainly from
economic and environmental pressures with, in eastern Europe, the additional
problems arising from transition to market-based economies.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 32
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4204</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAEKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / International Company News: SocGen acquires 30% stake in HK
brokerage
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SIMON DAVIES and WILLIAM DAWKINS
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   HONG KONG, PARIS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
SOCIETE GENERALE, the leading French private sector commercial bank, has
acquired a 30 per cent stake in Crosby Securities, the Hong Kong-based
stockbroking group.
The French bank intends to increase its holding to 49 per cent within the
next few months, but it would not disclose the size of its investment in the
group which last year generated a trading turnover of Dollars 4bn.
The announcement ends months of speculation that the brokerage was looking
for outside capital backing. It represents a significant expansion move for
the French bank, which has almost no exposure to Asia's emerging markets.
Mr Marc Vienot, Societe Generale's chairman, said: 'We see this investment
as an enlargement of the product range of our division Societe Generale
Equities, which is in full take-off. It will allow us to offer to our
clients highly judged financial analysis and high quality execution on the
emerging markets of Asia.'
The French bank added that this was part of its general strategy of building
an international network of brokers specialising in research in secondary
equity markets.
Crosby has 10 offices in Asia, and sales desks in the UK and US. It has
developed a presence in China, with offices in Beijing and another planned
for Shanghai, while it recently set up a joint venture operation in Sri
Lanka.
The year to September will be the most profitable in Crosby's history, as a
result of the booming Hong Kong stock market, but the level of international
competition has been rapidly increasing in Hong Kong. The presence of the
world's 20th largest commercial banking group will provide a necessary
source of capital backing.
Crosby was set up in 1984 by Mr Tim Beardson, chairman, with financial
support from venture capital funds. Mr Bruce Darrington, managing director
of Crosby Securities, was adamant the management would retain 51 per cent of
the company and the brokerage would not change its name.
He argued that the record of the banks' wholly-owned stockbroking houses had
been limited and that by buying into Crosby, 'Societe Generale has
leap-frogged (other international banks) who have tried to set up their own
broking operations in Asia'. The SocGen stake was mostly acquired in the
form of new equity, but some of the minority shareholders were bought out.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 29
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4205</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAEJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / UK Company News In Brief: Dassault order book gives chairman
hope
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By AP-DJ and REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   PARIS, STOCKHOLM
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
MR SERGE Dassault, the chairman of French aircraft manufacturer Dassault
Aviation, said the company was experiencing a difficult period, but that
recent restructuring measures and an order book equivalent to three years'
revenue made him hopeful for the future.
'We can manage until the first orders come in for the Rafale and the Falcon
2000, around 1995,' Mr Dassault said. 'The situation would have been
catastrophic had we been indebted - which isn't the case - and if we hadn't
anticipated workload problems,' he added.
Last year, the state-controlled aerospace group saw net profit drop to
FFr263.9m (Dollars 55.20m) from FFr374.2m a year before. Last June, Dassault
said 1992 revenue was likely to be little changed from the FFr14.35bn posted
for 1991.
He dismissed rumours of an eventual rapprochement with state-owned
Aerospatiale, another aircraft producer.
*****
Wagons-Lits, Franco-Belgian subsidiary of Accor, has formed a joint venture
with the Italian state railroad to operate night trains, AP-DJ reports from
Paris.
The joint-venture, to be called Treni Notturni (Treno), will begin operating
in January 1993 and will operate and market the existing overnight train
service in Italy in addition to future hotel-trains.
The companies will create an investment company to which both parties will
contribute their own rolling stock.
The new venture is expected to carry 11m passengers on 1,600 cars in the
first year of operation. Estimated revenues will be L750bn (Dollars 6.7bn).
The move will help the Italian railroads rationalise their night train
service, cutting costs significantly.
*****
Mr Hans Rausing, a member of the family which founded and owns Tetra Pak,
Sweden's large packaging company, will step down as chief executive when the
company joins operations with Alfa-Laval on January 1 1993, Reuter reports
from Stockholm. He will remain chairman of the group.
Mr Lars Hallden, president of the Alfa-Laval group, is appointed new chief
executive to the group, named Tetra Laval Group. The group will have a
combined turnover of Dollars 8.5bn in 1992. Tetra Pak bought dairy and food
processing group Alfa-Laval in 1991 for Dollars 2.5bn. The two have been
operating separately pending a decision to merge operations.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 29
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4206</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAEIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / International Company News: The company that admits it made
mistakes / A look at how Outokumpu is coming to terms with its record loss
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KENNETH GOODING
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
It is still unusual for senior managers of large companies to admit mistakes
publicly without being forced to do so. But Outokumpu, the Finnish metals
and mining group, owns up in its latest annual report. New chairman, Mr
Jyrki Juusela, says: 'We did not react to change quickly enough.'
Consequently, Outokumpu last year suffered the biggest loss in its long
history. The setback has come at an unfortunate time because Outokumpu is
being lined up for sale to international investors.
Next January, non-Finnish investors will for the first time be able to buy
Outokumpu shares. And the Finnish government has passed legislation to
enable the state's 57.5 per cent shareholding to be reduced to 30 per cent
when market conditions improve.
Mr Juusela hopes that in a year or so Outokumpu's shares will be quoted on
the London and New York stock exchanges as well as in Helsinki, where
employees and some domestic institutions have been able to trade them since
October 1988.
Like most of Finland's business leaders, he hopes that by 1995-96 his
country will be a member of the European Community and that its trade
barriers will be down and capital will flow more freely across its borders.
'I believe, for example, that Japanese investors would then be more willing
to invest in Finland. We need such investment for the economy to grow. The
capital generated in Finland is not enough.'
Mr Juusela's appointment as chairman and chief executive in January was
sudden but it had nothing to do with the fact that Outokumpu had reported
record losses of FM768m (Dollars 191.3m) on sales of FM12.6bn for 1991. It
was because his predecessor, Mr Pertti Voutilainen, was snatched away by the
government to become chief executive of Kansallis-Osake-Pankki, Finland's
largest commercial bank and state-owned, which had run into severe troubles.
While Mr Voutilainen was president and subsequently chairman, Outokumpu
became one of the world's biggest integrated multi-metal companies. Its size
tripled in the 1980s, mainly through vigorous acquisition activity. This
strained its financial resources because the Finnish government was not
willing to provide much extra equity funding.
Mr Juusela points out there will be no jolting changes of direction
following his appointment. He has spent his entire working life with
Outokumpu and for the past five years has been on the board.
He says: 'We are taking fewer risks, mainly for financial reasons. We are
concentrating on those areas where we think we are good and stepping out of
those businesses where we are not so good.' It will take two or three years
more to reshape the group, he suggests. But Outokumpu will stick with its
present four division structure developed during the past five years: base
metals production; copper products; stainless steel; and technology.
Copper products present the group with its biggest headache. Outokumpu has
assembled one of the world's biggest copper semi-fabrication businesses and
is probably the only global player in this highly competitive industry where
there is substantial over-capacity.
Mr Juusela says: 'Perhaps we grew too fast in copper semis. But with
acquisitions you must seize the opportunities when they come along.' For
example, Outokumpu had intended to restrict expansion to Europe at first but
then it had the chance to acquire (for about Dollars 200m) American Brass,
the second-largest copper semi-fabricator in the US with a 20 per cent
market share. Mr Juusela says: 'The only problem is that we bought it just
before the US market went into recession. Apart from that it has done very
well.'
In fact, he says that only five of the 25 profit centres within the copper
products division are loss makers - 'but those losses are very large'.
Mr Juusela says: 'The (copper semis) market changed. The growth in demand
was not as great as predicted. Competitors did not drop out as fast as we
expected. There are many small plants close to individual markets and
reconstruction of the industry is taking longer than we anticipated. We were
too optimistic about the shape of the business.'
To stop the losses Outokumpu has shut down its hot and cold rolling
operations in Sweden and has moved out of rolled products in Spain, where it
bought Iberica del Cobre (Ibercobre) in 1989. The group is setting up a
joint venture with SMI, the Italian company, to merge some of their copper
semi-fabrication operations in Spain and negotiations are going on with the
Spanish authorities and banks about Outokumpu's remaining copper semis
operations in that country. These should be concluded by the end of this
year.
Outokumpu has allocated FM150m towards the cost of restructuring the copper
semis operations but Mr Juusela remains convinced that the copper semis
business 'will be healthy in the 1990s'.
Losses are flowing from the technology division which has an array of
embryonic companies involved in special services and frontier-type
technologies associated with Outokumpu's mainstream operations but is
suffering from a lack of orders.
Action is being taken to merge some of the technology operations with other
companies both inside and outside Outokumpu.
Mr Juusela says Outokumpu's capital spending will remain at its normal rate
of about 10 per cent to 15 per cent of group sales. In the immediate future
most will be spent on developing new copper projects in Chile and nickel
projects in Australia.
Equity represents only 20 per cent of Outokumpu's total assets today. The
group aims to lift this to 30 per cent in two to three years, 'but to be
healthy it needs to be between 40 and 50 per cent', Mr Juusela insists. Only
when the balance sheet is in good order will the group spend some more risk
capital. 'The most important thing is for us to make a good profit.'
He looks for a 15 per cent to 20 per cent return on capital employed over
the business cycle. Last year it was a lowly 1.9 per cent, down from 4.5 per
cent in 1990.
Mr Juusela says that the bottom of the recession for the group was reached
in 1991. 'Our markets in the US are now quite good. German metals
consumption is still holding up.' Outokumpu made a profit in the first four
months of 1992 - it reported income before extraordinary items of FM3m - and
'it doesn't look too bad for the rest of this year'.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 29
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4207</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAEHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / International Company News: Elkem close to selling
subsidiary to US group
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KAREN FOSSLI
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   OSLO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
ELKEM, the Norwegian light metals producer, has almost completed the NKr330m
(Dollars 57.2m) disposal of its Elkem Nefelin subsidiary to US-based Unimin
Corporation, a minerals and mining company. The sale could return Elkem a
profit of over NKr200m. Details will be announced after final approval is
received from Norwegian authorities. A final agreement could be signed
within three months.
Elkem Nefelin produces nepheline syenite, a mineral used by the glass and
ceramic industries. It has an extensive domestic distribution network and
last year posted a pre-tax profit of NKr32m.
The deal also calls for Unimin to acquire Nefelin's debt, estimated at
NKr60m at the end of last year.
'The sale will contribute further to strengthen the Elkem group's balance
sheet and to free capital,' the company said. Elkem's A shares closed
NKr1.50 up at NKr32 and free shares rose NKr2 to NKr39 on the news.
Elkem is raising much-needed capital and reducing debt through the disposal
of assets and reining in costs through further staff cuts and reductions in
output from aluminium and ferrosilicon plants.
The company said the Elkem Nefelin disposal, combined with the earlier
disposals of its 50 per cent stake in Elkem-Rockwool and its wholly owned
Elkem Eiendom real estate subsidiary, would reduce debt by NKr900m.
Mr Kevin F. Crawford, Unimin's president and chief executive, will develop
Elkem Nefelin and regarded the company as highly competitive.
'Due to the distance from our North American headquarters, we will be
relying on the existing management and production workforce of Elkem
Nefelin,' Mr Crawford said. For Elkem, the disposal means a further
concentration of the group's core business areas of ferroalloys, silicon
metal and aluminium.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 29
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4208</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAEGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / International Company News: Daishowa Paper share deal to
raise Y9.9bn
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By EMIKO TERAZONO
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TOKYO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
DAISHOWA Paper, Japan's second largest paper manufacturer which is facing
mounting debts due to over-expansion in the late 1980s, said yesterday it
would raise Y9.9bn (Dollars 78.7m) through a share allotment.
This follows the company's recent decision to pass its interim dividend and
sell overseas assets. Daishowa will allot 5.26m in new shares to Mr Ryoei
Saito, honorary chairman and controversial art collector. He will pay Y1,900
a share on September 28. The allotment will raise his equity stake to 3.81
per cent from 1.45 per cent.
The share allotment will increase Daishowa's outstanding shares to 219.4m,
raising its capital to Y31.6bn. Daishowa said it would use Y8.1m to repay
debts, and the remaining Y1.8m as operating funds.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 29
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4209</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAEFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / French voters still undecided as official campaign begins
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By WILLIAM DAWKINS
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   PARIS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
OFFICIAL campaigning in the French referendum on European union began
yesterday with the latest opinion polls showing many voters still undecided.
Mr Laurent Fabius, first secretary of the ruling Socialist party, kicked off
the media campaign for the Yes camp with an evening television appearance.
The Gaullists divided their first broadcast between arguments for and
against the treaty, reflecting divisions in their own ranks.
The media campaign was overshadowed by a row over allocation of airtime,
which the CSA broadcasting authority has divided out according to the number
of seats in the National Assembly held by political parties.
This has given the Yes campaigners, which consist of the leadership of
mainstream parties on the right and left, 80 minutes over the next fortnight
to the September 20 vote. A mere 11 minutes has been allotted to the
anti-Maastricht camp, a fragmented group of rebel centre-right politicians,
a small band of dissident Socialists, plus the extreme right wing and the
Communists. Another half-hour has been allocated for combined campaigning
which could be devoted to debates on both sides.
Mr Jean-Pierre Chevenement, leader of the anti-Maastricht Socialist rebels,
appealed to the CSA to apply the rules more fairly. In an attempt to beef up
the No movement, he yesterday joined forces with Mr Charles Fiterman, a
former Communist minister, agreed to campaign jointly.
Latest opinion polls showed support for the treaty strengthening. A Louis
Harris poll for the magazine VSD last night indicated 59 per cent  - of
those expressing a choice - in favour, the biggest margin for more than a
month. But 39 per cent did not make their preference known. A survey
published by the CSA polling institute showed 54 per cent backing for
Maastricht.
Opposition to the treaty had grown through the summer to peak with a small
majority against at the end of August. Since then the trend has started to
creep back. Between a quarter and a third of electors are still undecided,
in spite of being bombarded with arguments for and against Maastricht.
French unions yesterday entered the campaign, showing themselves to be as
divided over European union as the rest of the population. Mr Louis Viannet,
secretary-general of the Communist-led CGT, France's largest union, said the
treaty's tough economic criteria would create 'social explosions'.
Mr Jean Kaspar, leader of the CFDT, loyal to the Socialists, said Maastricht
could improve social conditions.
The government's efforts to keep its own unpopularity out of the campaign
suffered a setback when Mr Henri Emmanuelli, president of the National
Assembly and former Socialist party treasurer, received a summons to appear
before magistrates in Rennes next Monday. He is expected to face charges
relating to allegedly irregular fundraising methods by the Socialist party.
President Francois Mitterrand has repeatedly defended Mr Emmanuelli's
reputation.
Socialists have accused the judiciary of political motivation in the timing
of this latest twist in a long-running inquiry into political corruption.
FRENCH REFERENDUM
Page 2
'Good for Britain and good for Europe'
Business largely united behind treaty
Editorial Comment Page 22
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4210</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAEEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Smuggled Russian diamonds stoke upset in market
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LEYLA BOULTON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MOSCOW
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
DIAMOND SMUGGLING from Russia is adding to the turmoil in the market for the
precious stone, De Beers admitted yesterday, but the group, which controls
80 per cent of world trade in rough (uncut) diamonds, said it had no clear
idea of the extent of the leakage.
Mr Gary Ralfe, the De Beers director responsible for liaison with the
Russians, said it was impossible to tell how many diamonds were being
smuggled from the former Soviet Union.
He believed the smuggling was taking place without the sanction of the
government authorities and that the Russian problem was nothing compared
with the illicit flood of diamonds out of Angola where an estimated Dollars
1m worth a day are being smuggled to Antwerp.
He said he understood some rough gems were being smuggled out by joint
ventures which only had the right to export polished stones. Mr Ralfe said
he could not disclose official figures for Russian diamond output but denied
one suggestion that production had fallen from 11m to 4m carats. 'We sell
well in excess of 4m carats a year.'
It also became clear yesterday De Beers faces competition from Japan in
Yakutia, where 99 per cent of Russian diamonds are mined and where it hopes
to help set up a cutting centre.
In any case, the South African group is not confident of its grip on the
Russian diamonds business and therefore wants to reconfirm its existing
five-year contract which gives it a virtual monopoly of Russia's rough
diamond exports.
De Beers concluded an agreement in 1990 which gives its Central Selling
Organisation exclusive rights to sell Russian rough diamonds exports until
1995. It advanced a Dollars 1bn loan to the former Soviet Union against
stockpiled diamonds which were moved to London.
Though Russia has continued to abide by the terms of the deal the agreement
has often been called into question. Mr Nicky Oppenheimer, De Beers deputy
chairman, said: 'We hope that uncertainty in the diamond market will be
ended by a pronouncement of the diamond commission which should show that
CSO is Russia's best opportunity.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4211</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAEDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / The Lex Column: Pentland
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Assuming the deal to acquire Adidas goes through without a hitch,
yesterday's interim results from Pentland are largely of historical
interest. The company is currently between sports shoe brands, having
disposed of its Reebok holding, and the Pounds 14m interest income earned in
the half year is a freak result. To value the shares now investors must
decide what sort of a fist Pentland can make of Adidas.
Clearly one of the tricks which Pentland turned at Reebok can be repeated
with Adidas. Pentland has plenty of experience buying sports shoes cheaply
in the far east, and so should be able comfortably to improve on Adidas's
poor sourcing record. There may also be efficiency gains to be had in the
European operation which will further help margins. That may push Adidas
margins up from just 1 per cent at present to nearer the mid-teens Nike and
Reebok have managed, even though industry margins may come down as the
market matures.
It is less certain that the other part of the Reebok success story can be so
easily reproduced. Reebok triumphed in the 1980s by capturing that vital but
elusive quality for the youth fashion market, street credibility. To match
that Pentland's marketing and advertising strategy must reverse Adidas's
flabby brand image. It will also require money, and while some sponsorship
deals may be dropped in favour of direct advertising, it would be surprising
if Adidas's total marketing budget did not rise. If it works, the rewards
will be substantial. But investors should remember that fashion has always
been a high risk game.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4212</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAECFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / The Lex Column: Consumer spending
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Exports and capital investment have never been leading candidates to drag
the UK out of recession: this year's dreadful net trading performance and
the size of the country's spare manufacturing capacity make them ever less
plausible spurs to revival. Yesterday's credit figures for July, on the
other hand, showing net lending of Pounds 78m after net repayments in June
of Pounds 55m, provide just a glimmer of hope that consumers may yet do the
trick.
Admittedly one month's figure in this notoriously erratic series should not
be overstated, and the three month trend has barely changed. On top of
anecdotal evidence from retailers that non-food sales in August were not the
disaster some were predicting, however, the credit numbers suggest that the
bears may be unwise to pile on the gloom. It could be, of course, that the
housing market rush to beat the August deadline for withdrawal of stamp duty
relief inspired an exceptional burst of fridge and washing machine sales.
But experience suggests this would come after people had moved into their
houses rather than before.
With houses in the south-east of England losing Pounds 1.14 of their value
per hour (judging by the latest Halifax index) the recovery in any case may
not come first from discretionary consumer durable purchases financed by
credit cards and finance house loans. Small ticket items are probably the
ones to watch.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4213</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAEBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / The Lex Column: Rugby Group
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
After CRH last week and Rugby yesterday the market might well ask itself how
many other UK building material companies will manage to increase first half
profits in 1992. The answer is probably one at most. Rugby's 10 per cent
advance at the pre-tax level is undeniably a good performance in the current
climate, though even more encouraging yesterday was the group's assertion
that it is suitably structured for today's conditions. Further capacity and
cost cuts are all too painfully inevitable elsewhere in the sector.
It is nevertheless the overseas tail (36 per cent of the profits total and
rising) which is now conspicuously wagging the Rugby dog. In spite of
adverse currency movements - which knocked more than Pounds 600,000 off
profits in translation - Australia, the US, and the European joinery
businesses all turned in better results than a year ago. Combined with a
higher return on Rugby's cash balances - which are broadly unchanged from
the end year level - this more than offset lower contributions from the UK
joinery and metal products divisions. The impact of rigid cost controls is
best seen in cement where operating margins in the six months were 16.3 per
cent, against 13.5 per cent in last year's second half.
With Rugby budgeting for a further 5 per cent decline in UK cement volumes
in 1993, the importance of its overseas interests is merely underlined. The
shares, up 9p yesterday at 169p, look fairly rated for the moment on the
market yield of 5.1 per cent and a forward earnings multiple (given full
year profits of say Pounds 58m) of 12.6. Ultimately they may do better if
the company uses its strong balance sheet to make a shrewd acquisition or
two.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4214</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAEAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / The Lex Column: Lamont's cold Bath
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The UK chancellor may be crowing about the 'promise' he extracted from the
Germans over the weekend, but on reflection yesterday the gilt and equity
markets were rather less impressed. In part second thoughts recognised that
the German statement was little more than an offer not to increase interest
rates unless it was necessary, but sterling's weakness hardly helped. The
Treasury must feel that the pound hovering just below DM 2.80 is scant
reward for last week's Ecu 10bn-worth of ingenuity.
In truth, all eyes are fixed on the dollar and the French referendum; until
that is out of the way, there is little the chancellor can say to influence
events. However hard the government struggles to persuade investors that it
is committed to the current parities, the markets still look towards the
pressure on the ERM which would follow a No vote.
Assuming the French say Yes, there is probably room for the gilts market to
go higher. Gilts now yield some 150 basis points more than German bunds, and
while that is less than the 200 basis points reached in the darkest days of
August, it still reflects a healthy risk premium. The market has also had
some Pounds 7.5bn of supply removed from this year's funding requirement,
and real yields remain at very high levels. If that is not yet enough to
encourage investors to brave the risks of a No vote, it is at least a
reasonably solid underpinning for the market.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4215</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAD9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / International Bonds: Demand continues for dollar-denominated
FRNs
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD WATERS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
LAST Friday's US interest rate cut gave further impetus yesterday to the
stream of dollar-denominated floating rate notes with minimum coupons -
although there were also reports in some quarters that the appetite for such
instruments was finally drying up.
'The quarter point cut is really boosting demand for this product,'
commented one syndicate manager yesterday as both Credit Fonciere and the
Swedish National Housing Finance Corporation (SBAB) issued FRNs with minimum
and maximum coupons.
SBAB, a double-A credit, sought Dollars 100m with a minimum coupon of 5.25
per cent - two percentage points above current market rates.
However, even at that level, members of the syndicate reported some
difficulty in selling paper.
This was put down in part to the fact that SBAB is a less well-known name
than some others that have come to the retail-oriented FRN market in recent
weeks.
However, some said it was a sign that investor interest in FRNs was
weakening.
'This market is hit and miss to some extent - you identify a pocket of
interest, and then everyone tries to rush into it,' one observer said.
Credit Fonciere, meanwhile, returned to the market to raise Dollars 200m
with a minimum coupon of 5 per cent and maximum of 10 per cent.
The deal, priced at 100.10, was reported to have sold reasonably well,
although the long payment date was said to have dented some of the potential
demand.
In the third deal of the day, Deutsche Bank returned to reopen a Canadian
dollar issue for the third time, taking the total amount issued up to
CDollars 275m from CDollars 225m.
Amid the flow of FRNs, the large fixed-rate dollar deal from LKB
Baden-Wurtt-emberg, the German regional bank, due this week, will come as
something of a novelty to the market.
'The market hasn't had a lot of fixed rate paper - if it's priced well, it
should go all right,' one observer commented.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 31
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4216</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAD8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / International Capital Markets: Difficult times for US
private placement market / A look at the sharp decline in privately issued
securities
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PATRICK HARVERSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
The boom in US public stock and bond issues over the past year and a half
has made Wall Street underwriters and corporate finance officers happy, but
it has exacted a heavy toll on the market for privately placed debt and
equity.
The volume of corporate debt and equity placed privately with investors in
the US has fallen sharply since last year. In 1991 private placements in the
US fell 14 per cent to Dollars 110.4bn, according to IDD Information
Services in New York. That rate of decline has accelerated this year. The
Dollars 42.3bn issued in the first six months of 1992 was almost 20 per cent
below the same period last year.
The slump in the private market contrasts with the public market, where the
lowest domestic interest rates for 30 years have lured companies to the US
debt and equity markets in record numbers - Dollars 437.1bn was raised via
bond and stock sales in the first six months of this year alone.
The only consolation is that the downturn in private placements would have
been worse but for a big increase in the number of foreign companies tapping
the US private market - between January and the end of June overseas
issuance rose 40 per cent to Dollars 15.6bn. Rule 144a had a lot to do with
the rush of foreign issues. Introduced in 1990, Rule 144a exempts big US
investment institutions from registering privately issued securities with
regulatory authorities, making it much easier for foreign companies to sell
their securities to US investors.
UK issuers were the most active users of the US private market, led by
well-known names such as Pilkington and British Aerospace (which issued
notes secured by its UK headquarters, the first deal from a non-US issuer
secured by property).
US investors, hungry for better yields than currently available from
domestic issues, have leapt at the chance to pick up foreign paper. Ms Dale
Paulshock, managing director of private placements at Merrill Lynch in New
York said: 'With US rates so low, US private placement investors are now
much more willing to take the time to look at non-US issuers than they used
to.'
The surge in foreign issuance aside, the sharp decline in privately issued
securities is a consequence of the boom in the public markets, where
corporate finance officers have been eager to take advantage of low rates
and heavy demand for securities from institutional and individual investors.
The favourable conditions persuaded many companies that might have
previously tapped the private markets to issue public debt instead.
This trend has been noticeable on the equity side. During the first five
months of this year initial public offerings (IPOs) of stock roared to
record levels, while private equity issuance stagnated.
The reluctance of many institutions, especially the insurance companies
which make up the core of the investing community, to lend to issuers rated
below investment grade has been another factor behind the private market's
malaise.
The new emphasis on credit quality, a hangover from 1990 when insurance
regulators set stricter guidelines for the private sale of debt to insurers,
has hit the private market hard. Often companies choose to raise funds
through private placements because of their non-investment grade status,
which makes it difficult for them to raise money in the public markets
without paying a heavy price.
Investment-grade issuers, meanwhile, especially those from overseas that
offer higher yields, have found conditions much more favourable, with a
large supply of insurance companies, banks, pension funds and money managers
willing to sign up for their paper.
Another factor troubling the private market has been the steepness of the
yield curve. The huge spread between short-term and long-term interest rates
has dissuaded many companies from issuing longer-dated securities. Yet the
long end of the market is exactly where many insurance companies want to
invest. Having turned away from the troubled property market, insurers are
keen on long-dated paper, which provides them with a better match of their
liabilities.
Yet, despite the gloom of the past year and a half, the outlook for the
private placement market is improving. Ms Paulshock of Merrill Lynch said:
'The level of inquiry about doing private placements is up significantly in
the last couple of months, from both domestic and international issuers.'
Ms Paulshock said many of the companies that adopted a 'wait and see'
approach during the past year while US interest rates were falling may now
be ready to enter the fray. She said that as the US election day (November
3) nears, domestic and foreign issuers will be in a hurry to complete their
deals before interest rates are buffetted by uncertainty over the voting.
The private markets may also benefit from a slowdown in public issuance,
especially on the equity side. In the past two months the IPO market has run
into trouble. Investors have become more choosy, and companies have been
deterred from going public by the sight of large numbers of IPO issues
trading at a discount in the stock market.
Several big companies have cancelled or postponed IPOs, and it is possible
some of them may turn to the private market if conditions in the public
arena remain unfavourable.
Ms Carla Harris, head of equity private placements at Morgan Stanley in New
York, is another banker who has seen the number of deals coming across her
desk increase since the IPO market ran out of steam. She believes the trend
is positive for private placements: 'So long as the public market continues
to stay challenging, especially on the IPO side, it will be a boost to the
private equity business.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 31
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4217</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAD7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Government Bonds: Bundesbank rate pledge restores confidence
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SARA WEBB
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE Bundesbank's pledge not to raise German interest rates any further gave
a strong boost to the main European government bond markets yesterday.
Speaking at the weekend meeting of European Community finance ministers in
Bath, Mr Helmut Schlesinger, the Bundesbank president, said the German
central bank would not increase its interest rates 'in present
circumstances'.
His statement was greeted with relief by the European bond markets and the
German and French markets rallied strongly when trading opened. 'The markets
feel more comfortable now, and we've seen some outright buying of European
government bonds,' reported one dealer.
German 10-year bonds continued Friday's strong advance, with the yield on
the 8 per cent bund due 2002 falling to 7.76 per cent, the lowest level seen
so far this year, before closing at 7.78 per cent. The Liffe bund futures
contract climbed to a high of 89.63 but prices drifted back later in the day
and the futures contract ended at 89.24.
Dealers said the bund market appeared to have absorbed last week's tender of
DM2.31bn of the Unity 8 per cent 2002 bund. News of further issuance - the
Treuhand's forthcoming DM8bn to DM10bn bond issue - had little impact on the
bund market.
The government agency, which is charged with privatising former East German
businesses, will issue 10-year bonds, with the first tranche due to be
placed next Tuesday via the traditional federal bond consortium.
Elsewhere in Europe, the French government bond market rallied on bullish
sentiment over German monetary policy and on the French referendum on the
Maastricht treaty.
On the Matif futures exchange, the September bond futures contract climbed
as high as 107.02, before drifting back to close at 106.66, up 0.16 from
Friday.
Dealers said the French market was also boosted by a couple of favourable
opinion polls showing increasing support for European economic and monetary
union at the weekend. The latest opinion poll, released yesterday by the
French magazine VSD and the Louis Harris polling firm, showed that 59 per
cent of French voters who have made up their minds will vote in favour of
the treaty in the September 20 referendum, while 41 per cent will vote
against.
The yield on the 10-year French government bond, the 8 1/2 per cent bond due
2002, ended at 8.76 per cent, against its opening level of 8.77 per cent.
Long-dated UK government bonds continued to out-perform shorter-dated issues
yesterday following last Thursday's announcement that the government will
borrow the equivalent of Ecu10bn to support sterling and finance government
spending.
Long-dated gilts remain the chief beneficiaries of the government's decision
as more than half of the government's funding in the gilt-edged market this
year has been in long-dated issues: the borrowing plan is therefore seen as
removing funding pressure at the long end of the market.
The 9 3/4 per cent gilt due 2002 rose from 103 1/2 to trade at 103 5/8 by
late afternoon, yielding 9.18 per cent.
Japanese government bonds rallied strongly, with the futures contract
climbing to a new high on hopes of a cut in Japan's official discount rate
and the covering of short positions. Dealers said market expectations of a
cut in Japanese interest rates increased after Friday's easing by the US
Federal Reserve. The Fed relaxed monetary policy by signalling a quarter
point cut to 3 per cent in the Fed funds rate, prompting a rally in the US
Treasury bond market which fed through to the Japanese market yesterday.
The key futures contract traded in a range of 106.10-106.20 for much of the
day and then rallied sharply to reach a new high of 106.70 before closing at
106.65. The contract ended at 105.55 on Friday.
Some dealers suggested the Bank of Japan may decide to cut interest rates
soon. The government recently announced a Y10,700bn fiscal spending package,
but dealers point out that this week's Tankan report - the Bank of Japan's
quarterly survey of business sentiment - is expected to show that the
Japanese economy is still in a weak state.
The yield on the benchmark No 145 moved from 4.855 per cent at the opening
to close at 4.79 per cent. Short-term interest rates slipped, with the rate
on three-month certificates of deposit dropping to 3.80 per cent from 3.85
per cent on Friday.
The US markets were closed yesterday for the Labor Day holiday.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 31
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4218</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAD6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / UK Company News: MCC's 75% holding in Nimbus Records bought
by US merchant bank
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RAYMOND SNODDY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
AN AMERICAN merchant bank is buying Maxwell Communication Corporation's 75.1
per cent stake in Nimbus Records, the classical music label and manufacturer
of compact discs
The stake in the Wales-based company founded by Count Labinsky, a
professional singer who wanted to improve music recording quality, is being
bought by DLJ Merchant Banking, a wholly owned subsidiary of Donaldson
Lufkin &amp; Jenrette, the New York investment banker.
Nimbus, which employs 650 people, has an annual turnover of about Pounds 50m
and presses 70m CDs a year in the UK and the US. Pre-tax profits in 1991
were about Pounds 500,000, or Pounds 2m before interest charges.
No price was disclosed for the sale, which was organised by Price
Waterhouse, administrators to MCC following the collapse of the Maxwell
empire. It is expected to be completed by the end of this month.
There was considerable international interest in Nimbus, which began
pressing CDs in Monmouth in 1984 and later won a Queen's Award for
Technological Achievement.
Count Labinsky, president of Nimbus Records, said the company had been
'looking for the investor with the strongest commitment to the future of CD
technology in all its audio and multimedia applications'. He added that he
felt that with DLJ's support, the company was structured for growth in all
areas of its business internationally.
Apart from music, Nimbus is a specialist in CD-ROM technology which uses
compact discs to store information on a wide range of activities including
computerised mapping and technical documentation for aerospace and vehicle
manufacturers.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 28
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4219</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAD5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / UK Company News: Intrum Justitia rises to Pounds 6m
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD GOURLAY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
INTRUM JUSTITIA, the Dutch-based group aiming to bring respectability to
debt collection, yesterday reported a 33 per cent rise in interim profits
despite the slowing pace at which overdue debts are being paid.
Pre-tax profits in the six months to June 30 rose from Pounds 4.6m to Pounds
6.11m on sales ahead 12 per cent at Pounds 40.8m.
Earnings per share rose 14 per cent to 4.2p.
The interim dividend is increased by 25 per cent to 1p.
'This year we will not achieve 20 per cent eps growth,' said Mr Gert van
Laar, chief executive.
'In some of the company markets the deepening recession is impacting upon
the success rate for collections, which is declining. This will reduce the
rate of growth in profits in the short term.'
In the last six months, the company has seen a 19 per cent increase to
Pounds 1.2bn in the value of gross collections it is making in Europe.
Mr van Laar said there was a growing awareness of the balance sheet problem
many companies faced which would be good for Intrum Justitia once the
European economy began to recover.
The company was confident that once that recovery arrived handling times
would shorten and companies would have become accustomed to using its debt
collection services for slow paying accounts.
It recently stepped up its campaign for creditors to be paid in full and on
time by debtors; it is to spend Pounds 3m sponsoring a European entry in the
1993 Whitbread round the world yacht race under the slogan Fair Pay.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 28
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4220</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAD4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / UK Company News: Suter benefits from lower interest costs
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANGUS FOSTER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A LOWER interest charge enabled Suter, the distribution, industrial and
chemical group headed by Mr David Abell, to announce a 2 per cent increase
in interim profits.
The pre-tax outcome came to Pounds 9.4m (Pounds 9.2m) for the six months to
June 27, although turnover dipped 3 per cent to Pounds 101.3m. Trading
profits fell 6 per cent to Pounds 11.3m but the net interest charge dropped
to Pounds 1.9m (Pounds 2.8m).
In distribution, trading profit fell 27 per cent because of a downturn in
industrial refrigeration sales. The drop was exaggerated as the comparable
profits were lifted by legislative changes which led to customers upgrading
equipment.
Recession in UK construction affected sales of air conditioning equipment.
But automotive components did well and the decline in the industrial
division's trading profit was limited to a 11 per cent.
Chemicals performed strongly and lifted trading profits 27 per cent to
Pounds 4.2m. Fine chemicals increased sales 14 per cent, helped by exports,
although Pentagon continued to be affected by last year's cancellation of a
sub-contracting contract.
Net borrowings fell Pounds 4.9m to Pounds 36.4m - the benefit of tighter
working capital control. Mr Abell said he expected year-end borrowings to be
little changed from last time at Pounds 30.2m. Gearing, on shareholders'
funds of Pounds 48.2m, was 76 per cent (80 per cent) although interest cover
improved to 5.9 (4.3) times.
Fully diluted earnings were again 5.4p. The interim dividend is held at 3.2p
and the final is forecast to stay at 5.6p.
Mr Abell, who in May promised 'radical action' to improve Suter's share
price, said he could still not comment on what plans were under discussion.
The Department of Trade and Industry is continuing its investigations of six
companies with Suter links. DTI inspectors were appointed in 1988 and 1989
to establish whether certain investors in the companies acted in concert.
Their report is still pending.
COMMENT
Yesterday's dividend pledge may have helped Suter's shares hold steady at
97p, but they are still languishing from last May's peak of 142p which
followed Mr Abell's statement on 'radical action'. Most observers assume his
cryptic comments will lead to a disposal, possibly of the automotive or
valve businesses. This would certainly help the balance sheet which, despite
a fall in net borrowings, still looks vulnerable. But assuming a buyer can
be found, Suter will have little left to recommend it. Parts of the
business, for example chemicals company Chemoxy, are well managed and should
perform well out of recession. But refrigeration and air conditioning sales
are likely to remain muted until 1993 at the earliest. Analysts clipped back
full year forecasts to Pounds 19m yesterday, putting the shares on a
multiple of 9. Even if the DTI cloud passes, the shares are not undervalued.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 28
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4221</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAD3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / UK Company News: Metsa-Serla sells UK subsidiary
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Metsa-Serla Oy, the Finnish forestry group, has sold Stuart Edgar, its UK
subsidiary, to Fort Sterling, the British tissue offshoot of Fort Howard
Corporation of the US, for FM100m (Pounds 13m). Stuart Edgar's annual net
sales amount to FM190m but operations have been unprofitable, Metsa-Serla
said.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 28
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4222</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAD2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / UK Company News: Hot under the collar over the dollar - A
flood of cheap imports may result from falling US currency
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DANIEL GREEN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BRITISH TEXTILE and garment makers are facing another surge in competition
from imports made cheaper by the falling dollar.
It comes just when they were hoping that their heavy restructuring
programmes were paying off.
The message will be driven home in the next few weeks as the UK companies
report their interim results. The figures should show that the cost-cutting
of 1991 is bearing fruit.
But unless there is a sharp recovery in the dollar, they will be accompanied
by warnings that Far Eastern countries with currencies tied to the dollar,
such as South Korea and Hong Kong, are pricing Europeans out of the market.
At stake are more than just the remnants of a once great Old World industry.
In recent years, manufacturers in the UK and elsewhere in Europe have been
implementing a strategy to fight the drift of production to low cost
countries. They cut a more expensive cloth and designed a more distinctive
look. They automated distribution to fill shelves with their well-made, high
margin goods. They invested to put fashions on the street sooner than Far
Eastern competitors that are six weeks removed by ship.
EC employment in clothing manufacture last year was more than 750,000 and
output passed Dollars 65bn.
The strategy is now at risk. The fall in the dollar has given rivals in the
Far East a price advantage that allows them to sell to recession-hit
customers at apparently unbeatable prices and quality.
'At two dollars to the pound, it is hard to see how anyone could have a
profitable European base for clothing manufacture,' says Mr Neville Bain,
chief executive of Coats Viyella, the world's biggest textiles manufacturing
company. 'Even beyond Dollars 1.75, the UK and European industry has got
some restructuring to do.'
His views are shared by Mr Klaus Steilmann, whose eponymous company is
Germany's biggest clothing manufacturer. 'The low dollar causes extreme
pressure on German and European textile and clothing industries. Retailers
are very cautious and are cutting back (orders) for spring 1993.'
The currency question comes at a particularly sensitive time for the
European industry as its strategy to move up market has just begun to bear
fruit.
Take men's shirts. Management consultancy Kurt Salmon Associates estimates
the cost of manufacturing a man's shirt in the UK as Pounds 3 and in Germany
Pounds 4.70. With productivity differences taken into account, a similar
shirt in South Korea costs Pounds 2.16. In Hong Kong, the figure is Pounds
1.86.
Not surprisingly, most men's shirts sold in the UK are imported. Over the
past five years alone, import penetration has risen from 75 per cent to 85
per cent in volume terms.
But the rise was because UK manufacturers concentrated on expensive shirts.
Import penetration of men's shirts by value rather than volume has been
steady over the five years at about 50 per cent. It may even have fallen
slightly, according to the British Clothing Industry Association.
There is evidence to suggest that the strategy has worked on a grander scale
too.
Total import penetration by volume in the UK apparel market has steadied at
about 50 per cent over the last 18 months, having risen from 30 per cent
over the previous five years, according to BZW, the stockbroker. At the same
time, the trade deficit in clothing has begun to shrink in real terms,
although it still stood at Pounds 1.8bn for the first half of 1992.
Now clothing industry executives fear that the dollar's fall will make it
hard not to lose ground once again. Already the the shirt manufacturing cost
comparisons are out of date. Since Kurt Salmon Associates made its
estimates, the dollar has fallen 16 per cent against sterling and 19 per
cent against the D-Mark.
'The European currency bloc is ridiculously overvalued,' says Mr Martin
Taylor, chief executive of Courtaulds Textiles, the UK's second biggest
textiles company. 'Imports come in from countries with a dollar cost base
like the Far East and you can't hedge against economic disadvantage. It's
costing millions of pounds '
Unfortunately for textiles and clothing, a weak dollar has other effects
that are also damaging.
Earnings from sales in the US, the world's biggest single market, shrink
when translated back into European currencies. Dawson International, known
for its Pringle and Ballantyne cashmere clothes, earns 60 per cent of group
operating profits in the US.
'Unless one is lowing margins it's very difficult to do business there. We
will have to take it on the chin,' says Mr Ronald Miller, chairman. At
Dollars 1.99 to the pound, he says, 'there is no money in it.'
European companies are not entirely defenceless. They know that clothing and
textiles are more vulnerable than most industries to the vagaries of
currencies because so much of its output is traded internationally. Only oil
and agriculture are more important in international trade.
This means that most companies are international enough to survive. Many
already have production in Asia or other low-cost centres; more than half
Coats Viyella's sales, and 70 per cent of its profits, are generated by
overseas subsidiaries.
European manufacturers can also look to protection from import quotas set by
the multi-fibre arrangement (MFA), a catalogue of detailed bilateral deals
that specify ceilings on trade in named garments. For example, last year
Hong Kong was allowed to send to Germany a maximum of 9.3m 'shirts,
T-shirts, lightweight fineknot roll, polo or turtle necked jumpers and
pullovers (other than of wool or fine animal hair), undervests and the like,
knitted or crocheted'.
A bureaucrat's employment scheme perhaps, but useful protection for European
manufacturers.
European suppliers also have retailers on their side, at least for the
moment. Relationships between retailers and manufacturers have taken years
to build-up and the inertia to keep them together is strong.
'For us to change our source of supply, we have to have the quality and
design guarantees,' says Ms Liz Braun, buying director of men's and women's
clothes at retailer BhS. And Marks and Spencer, the UK's biggest clothes
retailer, insists: 'There is no way we are going to change our policy as a
result of the fall in the dollar. If people want to buy cheaper they can
always go somewhere else.'
Retailers may not be able to hold on to these view for long. Sales are hard
enough to come by in a recession, and now even fashion is swinging against
the European way of manufacture.
According to Ms Braun: 'During the late 80s, paying a premium price was a
cool thing to do. Now it's a cool thing to have value.'
 -----------------------------------------------
      MAN'S STANDARD SHIRT PRODUCTION COST
             (Pounds March 1992)
 -----------------------------------------------
Germany                            4.71
Italy (grey economy)**             3.81
rest                               4.77
UK                                 3
South Korea                        2.16
Taiwan                             2.04
Mexico                             1.95
Hong Kong                          1.86
India                              1.50
Czechoslovakia                     1.26
Vietnam                            1.32
 -----------------------------------------------
**Accounts for at least two thirds of production
 -----------------------------------------------
Source: Kurt Salmon Associates
 -----------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4223</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAD1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / UK Company News: Electronics side behind Fairey's rise to
Pounds 8.1m
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL TAYLOR
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
FAIREY GROUP, the diversified engineering company, reported a near-15 per
cent increase, from Pounds 7.07m to Pounds 8.12m, in interim pre-tax profits
 -a rise underpinned by a strong performance in its electronics and
electrical power businesses.
The improvement for the half year to June 30, achieved on turnover ahead
some 12 per cent at Pounds 48.2m (Pounds 43.2m), resulted in earnings per
share of 15.4p (13.3p).
As expected, the interim dividend is raised to 3.3p (3p).
The electronics and electrical power sector lifted operating profits to
Pounds 5.08m (Pounds 3.68m) on turnover of Pounds 25.7m (Pounds 18.2m),
helped by the contribution of LaserMike, acquired in August last year.
In contrast, operating profits in aerospace and defence fell to Pounds
778,000 (Pounds 1.05m) on turnover of Pounds 10.1m (Pounds 12.1m).
Mr John Poulter, chief executive, said the division's performance had been
temporarily affected by the relocation of operations to a new site.
He said that sub-contract work for the Tornado was coming to an end and it
remained unclear whether Saudi Arabia will order more Tornados.
However, he said the business was delivering steady results 'despite
difficult market conditions.'
The filtration and specialised ceramics sector saw operating profits of
Pounds 1.54m (Pounds 1.51m) on turnover of Pounds 12.4m (Pounds 12.9m).
Net cash at the period end stood at Pounds 14.8m, compared to Pounds 12.7m
at end-December, and will be used for a continuing, selective acquisition
programme.
In May, the group completed the acquisition of the minority in Arcom Control
Systems.
In addition it acquired Zygo's US non-contact laser gauging activities in
June. This business has annual sales of about Dollars 4m (Pounds 2m).
Since the end of June Fairey has also paid Pounds 10.3m in new shares for
Infrared Engineering, a leader in the production of infrared
technology-based measuring devices.
Infrared had sales of Pounds 7.3m in 1991-92.
COMMENT
Since coming to market in November 1988, Fairey has enjoyed a positive cash
flow resulting in a handsome cash pile. With additional small acquisitions
expanding its range of products, a new Tornado order would be welcome but
not crucial. Meanwhile, UK utilities provide a steady stream of orders and
Fairey appears well positioned to take advantage of any upturn. Projected
full year pre-tax profits of about Pounds 17m give earnings of 31p a share,
putting the company on a prospective p/e of 12.6. The stock looks safer but
less exciting on the upside than some other engineering plays.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4224</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAD0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / UK Company News: ASW dives into Pounds 2m loss and cuts
interim by 33%
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD GOURLAY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
PRESSURE FROM continental European steel producers forced ASW Holdings, the
Cardiff-based steel and wire group, into pre-tax losses of Pounds 2.1m and a
33 per cent dividend reduction in the first half.
Its share price yesterday fell 2p to a new low of 60p.
Mr Paul Rich, managing director, said operating margins had fallen by Pounds
30 per tonne in the last two years and were now at levels prevailing a
decade ago, a situation that implied 'negative price inflation in spades.
'Producers' balance sheets are becoming worse and worse in Europe,' he said.
'I don't see how this can continue much longer. There are cash losses on
other operations in Europe which may force the issue.'
Losses in the six months ended June 30 turned round from a profit of Pounds
8.1m.
Sales were down Pounds 15.7m at Pounds 190.5m.
Losses per share came out at 4.2p (earnings 6.9p) and the interim dividend
is cut from 4.5p to 3p.
ASW is one of Europe's lowest cost steel producers and has been among a
number of UK-based steel and steel casting companies lobbying for measures
to cut overcapacity.
During the period the group swung from a postion of net cash to net debt of
Pounds 18m after acquisitions.
Despite the losses the group said the ASW steel businesses remained
profitable activities. Volumes had been maintained in flat markets.
'What we have to do is to return the margins,' said Mr Rich.
'Its ironical that we are saying if we can have 1982 margins we would be
very happy indeed.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4225</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQADZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / UK Company News: Sharp decline to Pounds 0.35m at WSP
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
WSP Holdings, the consulting engineer, saw profits fall to Pounds 352,000
pre-tax in the six months to June 30.
The decline from the comparable Pounds 613,000 came on turnover of Pounds
5.01m (Pounds 5.27m).
The interim dividend is unchanged at 1.1p, payable from earnings of 2.4p
(4p) per share.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4226</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQADYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / UK Company News: Burford shows 5% increase to Pounds 1.72m
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Burford Holdings, the property investment and publishing group, increased
first half profit by 5 per cent in the opening half of 1992.
The pre-tax figure came to Pounds 1.72m (Pounds 1.63m) on turnover of Pounds
4.61m (Pounds 4.93m). Property accounted for Pounds 1.56m (Pounds 1.44m) of
profit.
Earnings per share were 0.97p (0.94p) and the interim dividend is 0.5p
(0.45p).
Reflecting recent acquisitions, interest charges soared to Pounds 1.81m
(Pounds 61,000) and should be running at some Pounds 4.6m per annum by
December 31, Mr Wray stated.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4227</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQADXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / UK Company News: Kynoch down at Pounds 380,000
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Profits of Kynoch Group, a manufacturer of medical equipment, fell from
Pounds 460,000 to Pounds 380,000 pre-tax for the half year to June 30.
Based on a full tax charge, earnings per share emerged at 1.6p (2.2p). That
was 33 per cent ahead of the figure for the second half of 1991 and 14 per
cent higher than for the opening half of 1991 after adjusting for the
one-off profit arising from Gulf war related business and losses on the
discontinued textile operation.
Turnover totalled Pounds 6.99m (Pounds 8.33m) and operating profits Pounds
463,000 (Pounds 573,000). Interest charges accounted for Pounds 83,000
(Pounds 113,000).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4228</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQADWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / UK Company News: Goodhead slips 6% to Pounds 721,000
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Profits of Goodhead Group, which has interests in printing, paper,
publishing and marketing services, declined by 6 per cent to Pounds 721,000
pre-tax for the year to May 31.
The result was in line with directors' expectations and came from turnover
on continuing activities down 26 per cent at Pounds 40.3m.
Profits before tax were struck after a Pounds 1.05m reduction in net
interest charges to Pounds 1.29m and exceptional charges of Pounds 257,000
(credit Pounds 660,000) for reorganisation.
Fully diluted earnings emerged at 1.3p (0.8p). The interim dividend was
omitted but a 0.5p final is being paid - last year shareholders received an
interim of 0.5p but no final.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4229</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQADVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / UK Company News: Cost control behind advance at Hewitt
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Close attention to productivity and control of costs helped Hewitt Group,
the industrial ceramics and refractories maker, to stage a recovery.
In the first half of 1992 pre-tax profit came to Pounds 411,000, including a
Pounds 98,000 gain on the sale of a fixed asset.
Turnover amounted to Pounds 3.74m (Pounds 3.58m). Earnings per share were
7.3p (3.8p) and the interim dividend goes up to 1.25p (1p).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4230</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQADUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / UK Company News: Frost up at Pounds 2.57m and shares rise
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
SHARES OF the Frost Group yesterday jumped 16p to 397p in response to
doubled first half profits and an interim dividend of 5.5p.
The UK's largest independent petrol filling station operator was refloated
on the main market at 235p a share last October since when it has increased
the number of its sites from 79 to 122.
On turnover of Pounds 51.5m (Pounds 38.9m), pre-tax profits for the six
months to June 30 rose to Pounds 2.57m (Pounds 1.26m). Earnings per share
improved from 7.1p to 10.5p, covering the dividend 1.9 times.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4231</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQADTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / UK Company News: Scholl advances to Pounds 12.3m
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL TAYLOR
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SCHOLL, the personal healthcare products supplier, yesterday reported
pre-tax profits ahead from Pounds 11.6m to Pounds 12.3m for the six months
to June 30 after making a Pounds 420,000 provision for disposals costs.
The charge was made to cover estimated costs of disposing of a small retail
operation in France and the planned sale of associated shops in Belgium and
Luxembourg.
Turnover expanded to Pounds 85.8m (Pounds 82.9m) bolstered by Pounds 1.1m
from two new acquisitions - the Scholl retail operations in Canada acquired
in February from Schering Plough, and Gerard House, the UK-based herbal
medicines business, acquired in May.
Mr Gordon Stevens, chairman, said trading conditions were poor in all main
markets. 'In the UK we experienced a 14 per cent increase in turnover in
foot and legcare products despite continuing trade destocking which appears
to be deepening in continental Europe.'
Gross margins were maintained, but operating profits fell by some 8 per cent
to Pounds 11.6m (Pounds 12.5m) reflecting increased promotional costs and
R&amp;D expenditure.
The decline, however, was more than offset by the effects of reducing
working capital and a turnround in interest from charges of Pounds 874,000
to income of Pounds 1.1m from the proceeds of last year's rights issue.
An extraordinary gain of Pounds 1m represented the release of a provision
previously held against the sale of the fashion hosiery business.
Since June the group has disposed of the Isabelle Lancray business, acquired
as part of the Valdor cosmetics group in 1989, and said it would incur an
Pounds 800,000 extraordinary charge in the second half.
The interim dividend is 2.6p (2.5p), payable from earnings of 10.4p (11.6p)
per share.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4232</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQADSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / UK Company News: Halls Homes back in the black
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
As foreshadowed in the annual statement Halls Homes &amp; Gardens, the
USM-quoted manufacturer of conservatories, garden buildings and home
improvement products, moved back into the black in the first half of 1992.
Pre-tax profits of Pounds 529,000 compared with losses of Pounds 2.46m 12
months earlier, a figure which included exceptional provisions of Pounds
1.03m, and with a deficit of Pounds 7.53m for the full 1991 year.
However, trading in July and August had been below expectations and
directors warned that it was now 'likely the normally weaker second half
will generate losses that will exceed the profits of the first half'.
First half turnover rose by Pounds 1m to Pounds 12.7m and earnings per share
emerged at 1.1p (losses 5.17p). There is again no interim dividend.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4233</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQADRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / UK Company News: Claremont Garments benefits from strong
link with M and S
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JANE FULLER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE CONTINUING strength of Marks and Spencer's ladies wear sales helped
Claremont Garments (Holdings), the clothing maker, increase pre-tax profit
by 22 per cent to Pounds 2.83m in the six months to June 27.
The comparable pro forma figure of Pounds 2.32m was for Claremont's last six
months as part of the Alexon Group before manufacturer and retailer
demerged.
Turnover advanced to Pounds 21.7m (Pounds 20.7m), of which more than 90 per
cent went to M and S. Leaving aside the discontinued men's wear business,
the underlying sales improvement was 10 per cent. Operating profit also rose
10 per cent, to Pounds 2.91m (Pounds 2.65m).
Mr Peter Wiegand, chairman, said M and S ladies wear was standing up well to
the recession and Claremont was supplying an increasing proportion. With two
acquisitions since the half-year, its share of the M and S ladies clothing
market stood at about 9 per cent.
Although M and S was holding down prices, 'it has given us more quantity to
go with the pricing policy, so we benefit from increased efficiency in the
factory.' Work on garment engineering was also enabling a better margin to
be made on low-priced clothes.
Since J&amp;J Fashions was bought for Pounds 27m, accompanied by a Pounds 22.4m
2-for-5 rights issue, two small factories had been closed.
J&amp;J would double the group's turnover to about Pounds 105m. Its operating
margins of 3 to 4 per cent left plenty of scope for improvement.
At the end of June, gearing (pre-acquisition and rights issue) was similar
to the year-end 15 per cent, when net debt was about Pounds 2m. Gearing was
expected to be near 25 per cent by December.
Earnings per share rose to 6.6p (5.4p). The interim dividend of 3.3p
compared with a demerger payment of 3p.
COMMENT
When Claremont and Alexon started trading as two separate entities in July
last year, Claremont closed at 163p and Alexon at 390p. The idea was that
the solid, efficient M and S supplier would be a nice little yielder and
that the retail brands would sail to a higher rating. Instead it is
Claremont that looks as though it has been unleashed, closing yesterday at
224p, while Alexon (down to 184p) has succumbed to the high street malaise -
a malaise that has not affected M and S with its value-for-money ladies
wear. Even within the M and S cocoon, Claremont has done well to hold its
impressive margins. It really does implement the nostrum that 'there is no
end to cost-cutting'. If it can apply the same rigour to J&amp;J, the rewards
will be considerable. With the second half traditionally stronger, pre-tax
profit is forecast to top Pounds 8m this year, a prospective p/e of 13.5. It
deserves its premium to the textiles sector. While the shares look fully
priced now, acquisition benefits could add 15 per cent to earnings next
year, making the shares a strong hold.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4234</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQADQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / UK Company News: Cupid sees potential in Berkertex moves
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Cupid, the USM-quoted bridal wear company, said at its annual meeting that
last week's receivership of Berkertex would provide the company with
exciting potential to expand market share.
The company added that Pronuptia-Youngs was continuing to trade strongly and
the order book for the Quilty nursery/childcare division had grown
significantly in the last few weeks.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4235</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQADPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / UK Company News: British Vita ahead 11% at Pounds 27m
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD GOURLAY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BRITISH VITA, the polymer, fibre and foam company with most of its sales in
continental Europe, yesterday reported an 11 per cent increase in interim
profits, after acquisitions, but reduced margins.
Pre-tax profits to end-June rose from Pounds 24.17m to Pounds 26.81m but the
Pounds 22m increase in sales to Pounds 372m was all accounted for by
acquisitions.
Earnings per share rose 0.2p to 7.9p after adjustment for last year's Pounds
73m rights issue. The interim dividend is lifted to 3.5p (3.45p).
The results were flattered by a sharp reduction in the interest charge as a
result of the rights proceeds and a staunching of losses in a US associated
company. At the operating level British Vita was marginally below 1991
levels, despite that period being affected by the Gulf war.
Mr Rod Sellers, chief executive, said there was little prospect of more than
zero growth in the UK in the next year and businesses were aggressively
fighting for market share.
Margins were broadly maintained in the industrial polymers division on sales
marginally lower at Pounds 79m, helped by cost cutting in the UK.
About 18 per cent of the group's sales are into the auto industry but
despite the low level of new car registrations, production in the UK remains
fairly buoyant, Mr Sellers said.
About 60 per cent of group turnover is now produced and sold in continental
Europe.
In cellular polymers, the group's largest business area, sales increased as
a result of the addition of European and the US subsidiaries but margins
were hit by increased losses of Pounds 2m in Spain and the drought-affected
Zimbabwe where the group has a long-standing investment.
COMMENT
British Vita's diversity, both in terms of products and spread through
continental Europe, is a strength more UK-centric companies would do well to
contemplate if a true single market is to become a reality. Even with
European economies slowing there is little to support fears that British
Vita has over-extended in Europe; few markets anywhere are, after all, in
really good shape anywhere. On the other hand, with markets flat and the
company pursuing a policy of cutting margins where necessary to protect
market share, there is little prospect of any excitement. Indeed, British
Vita will have to work hard just to stay put. For the rating to be
revitalised, British Vita needs another acquisition for its respected
management team to exploit. But shareholders should hope British Vita will
remain cautious. With the proceeds of last year's rights tucked away in the
bank, the company's greatest mistake could be to race into an acquisition.
For the full year, the company is therefore heading towards Pounds 54.5m of
pre-tax profits, or 15.8p of earnings, and a fairly priced prospective
multiple of about 14.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4236</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQADOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / UK Company News: TV Enterprise buys 15% stake in Portman
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RAYMOND SNODDY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Television Enterprise and Asset Management, a media fund backed by Robert
Fleming and the Rockefeller Company of the US, has made its largest single
investment.
Together with Primetime, the independent producer and distributor of
television programmes, it is paying Pounds 2.9m for a 15 per cent interest
in Portman Entertainment, another UK independent.
Portman holds a catalogue of 1,500 hours of programmes, including popular
dramas such as Home and Away.
Television Enterprise was set up a year ago to provide funding for UK
production in return for minority stakes in independent companies.
The stake in Portman is the fourth it has made. It has also taken strategic
interests in Workhouse, which has an output deal with Meridian, and Tiger
Television, producers of the award-winning Mr Bean series.
As part of the deal, RPTA, Primetime's programme distribution arm, will
handle both the existing catalogue and future output of Portman.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4237</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQADNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / UK Company News: Purchases boost Perkins Foods
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MAGGIE URRY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ACQUISITIONS spurred a 24 per cent rise to Pounds 11.4m in interim operating
profits at Perkins Foods, the fresh, chilled and frozen food manufacturer
and distributor.
However, interest charges of Pounds 445,000 (receivable of Pounds 1.3m) left
pre-tax profits for the six months to June 30 up just 4 per cent at Pounds
10.9m (Pounds 10.5m).
The group spent Pounds 20.6m on four acquisitions with up to another Pounds
17.4m of deferred consideration. It made three significant purchases in the
last two months of 1991 and another in the first half of this year.
The two divisions unaffected by acquisitions suffered profit falls. Fresh
produce saw profits down to Pounds 3.1m (Pounds 3.5m) as good growing
conditions in Europe produced an over-abundance.
Prices began to fall sharply after the period end, falling 20 per cent in
July and August. The division usually makes higher profits in the second
half, but Mr Ian Blackburn, finance director, said that this year the two
halves would produce about the same result.
Profits from the mushroom division fell from Pounds 889,000 to Pounds
583,000 and management changes are being made. Frozen foods profits rose 38
per cent to Pounds 6.5m, all the increase from acquisitions. Profits from
chilled foods rose from Pounds 1.5m to Pounds 2.9m, with about two thirds
coming from acquisitions.
COMMENT
Now that the share price has ruled out acquisitions, Perkins will have to
show it really can generate organic growth from its existing businesses. The
4 per cent decline on an acquisition-adjusted basis in the first half is not
a good start, though other food companies may report even worse news.
Sentiment has turned sharply against Perkins. Mistrust of the fresh produce
business is likely to continue even after the current year's problems end.
To hear that of four earlier acquisitions now past their earn-out deadlines,
only one is performing well ahead of its earn-out profit target is hardly
encouraging. There are still concerns over the deferred liabilities,
especially if these are likely to restrain capital expenditure, and over the
convertibles which now look unlikely to convert. Forecasts are for a fall in
year pre-tax profits to about Pounds 23m (Pounds 24.3m) and an even greater
slide in earnings per share. A prospective p/e of little over 6 is of less
interest than the yield of 9 per cent on an unchanged dividend.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4238</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQADMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / UK Company News: Pressure on margins at Brammer
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL TAYLOR
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BRAMMER, the industrial services company, blamed depressed business
conditions for a 5.5 per cent drop in interim pre-tax profits from Pounds
4.47m to Pounds 4.22m.
Turnover slipped by 2 per cent to Pounds 56.1m (Pounds 57.1m) in the six
months to June 30, and operating profits fell to Pounds 3.91m (Pounds 4.35m)
while earnings per share fell by 7 per cent to 6.7p (7.2p). The interim
dividend was unchanged at 4.5p.
The results reflected pressure on margins in the UK bearings and power
transmission distribution business and tight margins in precision
engineering services.
There was also a small operating loss in the Texas-based Master Pumps
subsidiary due to the reduction in drilling activity. The ESE Rental
business posted a small increase in turnover and flat profits.
Net cash balances at the end of June were Pounds 6.7m compared with Pounds
2.7m in mid 1991.
Since then Brammer has acquired Roulement Service, a Strasbourg-based
bearing distribution business, for Pounds 7.3m cash, of which Pounds 1.1m is
deferred, and assumed its borrowings of about Pounds 5.2m.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4239</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQADLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / UK Company News: BP Chemicals Pounds 20m foam company sale
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
BP Chemicals has sold its Croydon-based foams business to Zotefoams, a
company set up by its management. The price is more than Pounds 20m.
The buy-out has been arranged by 3i, which with Prudential Venture Managers
has provided more than Pounds 9m of equity capital. Debt facilities of more
than Pounds 11.5m had been arranged through Barclays.
Mr Bill Fairservice, general manager of the foams business until last year,
is returning to lead the five-strong management team. The sale is part of BP
Chemicals' strategy of focusing on core activities.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4240</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQADKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / UK Company News: Regal Hotel suspended
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Shares of the USM-quoted Regal Hotel Group were suspended yesterday at the
company's request pending clarification of its financial position.
In January the company announced that it was in discussions about a
refinancing. At that time its assets were less than half its capital
following increasing losses and the placing of its trading subsidiary into
liquidation.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4241</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQADJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / UK Company News: British Bio-tech loss within expectations
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
British Bio-technology Group reported increased pre-tax losses in the three
months to July 31 but was within expectations expressed when the
Oxford-based pharmaceutical company was floated in July.
Turnover for the company's first quarter was more than doubled at Pounds
1.57m (Pounds 796,000) for losses of Pounds 2.9m (Pounds 2.7m).
Losses per share came out at 9.5p (13.1p).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4242</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQADIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / UK Company News: Barclays sells Allied Trust Bank to SA
group
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID BARCHARD
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BARCLAYS, the UK clearing bank, has sold Allied Trust Bank, a loss-making
subsidiary of which it took full control in 1990, to Investec Bank, for
Pounds 25m.
Allied Trust, formerly Allied Arab Bank, has total assets of about Pounds
200m.
Its head office is in Cannon Street, London, and it specialises in marketing
retail investment products and lending to small and medium-sized businesses.
The purchase gives Investec, the fifth largest South African banking group,
a presence in the UK for the first time and access to the rest of the
European Community.
During the last year Allied Trust's interest rates on savings deposits have
been among the highest available in the UK, and the sale will be a blow to
those investors who flocked to it because it was owned by Barclays.
In 1989 the bank incurred pre-tax losses of Pounds 9.4m, which fell to
Pounds 6.4m in 1990. No figures for 1991 are available.
Barclays had increased its stake in the institution, then a consortium bank,
from 20 per cent to 46 per cent in 1984 after heavy losses.
It bought the remaining 54 per cent for an undisclosed sum in 1990 from
Sheikh Kamal Adham, a Saudi investor. It apparently intended to turn it
around and sell it.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4243</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQADHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / UK Company News: Handbag side blamed for 8% fall to Pounds
6.6m at Peter Black
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JANE FULLER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A FALL in sales of handbags and luggage was the main drag on annual profits
at Peter Black Holdings, the Marks and Spencer supplier and provider of
distribution services.
The pre-tax figure for the year to May 30 fell by just over 8 per cent from
Pounds 6.62m (Pounds 7.23m) on turnover of Pounds 106.2m (Pounds 126m).
Mr Gordon Black, joint chairman, said Pounds 17.5m of the turnover fall was
accounted for by the disposal of the home furnishings business.
Like-for-like sales were down by about 2 per cent, mainly in the
Keighley-based soft footwear and accessories operation, which had proved
vulnerable to reduced consumer spending.
With operating profit down by 19 per cent to Pounds 8.35m (Pounds 10.31m), a
cut in interest costs to Pounds 1.73m (Pounds 3.08m) helped the figures. Net
debt fell to Pounds 5.57m (Pounds 13.4m), reducing gearing from 39 to 15 per
cent. Stocks had been cut by Pounds 5.5m.
Personal care contributed Pounds 3.2m to pre-tax profit on sales of Pounds
38.2m. A factory closure led to Pounds 200,000 exceptional costs.
Mr Black said toiletries and the English Grains contract business improved,
but cosmetics declined. Customers included J Sainsbury and Superdrug as well
as M and S. Demand for branded herbal remedies, such as Natracalm and Red
Kooga Ginseng, also held up well.
Footwear and accessories made Pounds 2.6m on Pounds 55.9m sales, again after
Pounds 200,000 of rationalisation costs. Turnover was 5 per cent down in
spite of further progress in the Newbold fashion shoes operation.
The service division produced Pounds 800,000 profit on Pounds 12.1m
turnover. Mr Black said the group handled warehousing and distribution for
30 companies.
While sales at its own factory shops were down, the Hornsea retail park  -
based on a US concept where up-market branded goods are sold at a discount -
was showing considerable promise.
Earnings per share slipped to 8.21p (9.16p). An increased final dividend of
2.17p makes a total of 2.94p (2.84p).
COMMENT
Peter Black has honed its businesses down to a coherent collection and
applied an even sharper knife to working capital. The only exception to the
core-business ethic is the Hornsea park, an exciting concept in a
bargain-hunting era but one that would require a great deal of investment to
extend. It will be an interesting decision for the management whether to
sell it or develop it. Discipline will also need to be applied to the
fledgling distribution business, where the group is so far reaping the
benefits of being a niche operator. All three legs of the business should
make progress this year with the help of the largest customer M and S,
although toiletries and bags have not proved as resilient as ladieswear. A
pre-tax profit of Pounds 7.5m gives a prospective p/e of less than 12. The
shares look far from expensive, but trade is thin because of the family
holding of nearly 40 per cent.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4244</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQADGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / UK Company News: Improving margins aid Calderburn
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
An improvement in margins limited the fall in first half pre-tax profit at
Calderburn, the office furniture and related products group formed through
the merger of Alan Cooper and Mayfield in July 1991.
Pre-tax profit came to Pounds 2.21m (Pounds 2.3m) and operating surplus to
Pounds 2.17m (Pounds 2.19m) on turnover of Pounds 14.9m (Pounds 16.5m).
Improved margins stemmed from action taken on the cost base in 1991 and
benefits of the reorganisation following the merger.
'The results are as we had expected despite a further fall in the office
furniture market', said Mr James Blyth Currie, chairman.
And he warned: 'Since no recovery in our marketplace seems likely this year,
profits for the second half can reasonably be expected to be lower than in
the first six months'.
Earnings per share were 5.7p (5.8p), and the interim dividend is again 2.8p.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4245</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQADFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Sale of Reebok stake boosts Pentland's profits
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANGUS FOSTER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
PENTLAND Group, which in July agreed to buy Adidas from Bernard Tapie
Finance, yesterday announced sharply higher interim profits mainly due to
interest on cash raised from last year's sale of a 32 per cent stake in
Reebok. Pre-tax profits increased more than threefold from Pounds 6m to
Pounds 19.7m in the six months to June 30.
Interest income contributed Pounds 14m after Pentland raised about Pounds
389m from the sale of its stake in Reebok, the US sports shoemaker, in April
and December.
The figures were above analysts' expectations and the shares gained 3p to
130p.
Mr Frank Farrant, finance director, said underlying businesses such as
swimwear group Speedo also performed well.
Pentland acquired the Speedo brand, its European distributor and a 39 per
cent stake in the North American distributor two years ago.
Rationalisation and new product sales from Speedo helped lift group
operating profits 35 per cent to Pounds 4.2m. Profits from associates,
mainly the North American distributor, increased from Pounds 500,000 to
Pounds 1.5m.
Pentland's net cash position improved more than Pounds 100m to Pounds
266.7m. The Adidas acquisition is to be completed in November and Pentland
will pay about Pounds 198m to lift its stake to 95 per cent.
Pentland first took a 20 per cent stake in Adidas last year. Mr Tapie agreed
to sell the remaining shares when borrowings taken on to finance his
purchase of Adidas threatened serious financial problems.
Adidas was also perceived to be slipping behind its main rivals, Nike and
Reebok, and needed new investment.
Mr Farrant said that some of Pentland's leftover cash would be used to
strengthen Adidas's finances and develop its brands.
Pentland does not expect Adidas to make a profit before 1993, but believes
Adidas's margins can be lifted by sourcing from the Far East and cost
cutting. 'Adidas's sales haven't fallen but their costs are expensive,' he
said.
An April agreement for Pentland to source from the Far East for LA Gear, the
US sports shoe and clothing maker, did not contribute during the period.
However, Mr Farrant expected the agreement, which could be worth Dollars
300m (Pounds 150.7m) of sourcing business a year, to show a contribution in
the second half of the year.
Earnings increased from 1.42p to 3.69p. The interim dividend is raised 11
per cent to 1.04p. This follows a trebled final dividend last year.
Lex, Page 24
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 25
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4246</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQADEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Hopes pinned on the bulletin board: Attempts to keep the
market in seldom traded shares alive
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD WATERS and JANE FULLER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Timing, so the saying goes, is everything. This autumn, the London Stock
Exchange plans to unveil its vision of the future of share trading in the
UK. After nearly three years of political in-fighting, its blueprint will
reveal how shares in UK companies will be traded in the years ahead.
Last Friday, however, Warburg Securities, one of the biggest traders in UK
shares, unilaterally decided to stop making markets in 350 small companies.
Just under 100 of these have effectively been left without a normal market
for their shares.
The Warburg announcement may not have been intended to carry any deeper
message about the future of the UK stock market. After all, it was doing
what any company does in a recession - shedding lossmaking product lines and
cutting overheads to concentrate on more profitable business. But against
the background of the stock exchange's overhaul, Warburg's move has been
widely seen as a vote of no-confidence in the future.
'We very much hope the Warburg action will help to focus the exchange's
mind,' said Mr Jonathan Davie, head of equities at Barclays de Zoete Wedd.
'I'm not aware there has been much of a debate on smaller companies
recently.'
Warburg's move has kicked back into life a debate which has lain dormant for
much of the past year. The problem is simple: of the 2,500 or so companies
on the stock market, only a small proportion are actively traded.
Shares in the rest are seldom traded - or if they are, buyers and sellers
are often brought together by a broker, leaving no business for the
marketmakers who quote prices on the stock exchange's Seaq system. With
little business to do, it is small wonder that the marketmakers are throwing
in the towel.
The stock exchange has made various attempts at filling the vacuum, most
recently this spring with the launch of its 'bulletin board'. This
electronic notice board was never intended to be anything more than a
fall-back position for companies which cannot muster at least two
marketmakers to quote prices in their shares.
Investors wanting to trade in the shares of a company which has been
consigned to the bulletin board can opt to have their buy or sell orders
displayed on screen for the rest of the market to see. Other investors can
then deal at these advertised prices or try to negotiate a better deal.
The number of companies on the board could soon nearly double. Warburg's
move has left 93 companies with only one marketmaker: if these cannot find
another by the end of next week, they will be put on the board, swelling the
number in this nether region of the stock market to more than 210.
The bulletin board can do little more than keep a semblance of a market for
the growing numbers of illiquid, or seldom traded companies, the exchange
acknowledges. Evidence so far suggests that companies on the board are
traded no more or less actively than before - at around two bargains in
their shares on average each month, it says.
For some companies, the board may have brought an improvement. Mr Keith
Hall, chief executive of the Hartlepools Water Company, says trading has
picked up. 'Whether this is due to the bulletin board, the publication of
our results at about the same time or the general development of water
industry shares, it is impossible to say. But we welcome any improvement on
what went before, which was next to nothing.'
Other ideas to keep the market in small companies alive have so far failed
to bear fruit.
Nearly two years ago, six of the biggest marketmakers - among them Warburg -
agreed between them to guarantee that every listed company would have at
least two marketmakers. That commitment has come and gone as market
conditions have continued to deteriorate.
Then, a year ago, the exchange first floated privately the idea of creating
'sole traders', or 'matching principals' - traders who would be given a
monopoly in trading a company's shares. That suggestion was criticised by
investors and listed companies who feared this would lead to a deterioration
of the market.
The bulletin board is the exchange's only order-driven system - that is, a
market that operates on the basis of investors' actual orders to buy and
sell shares. As such, it has driven a wedge into the normal quote-driven
system, which is based on intermediaries' quotes of prices at which they are
prepared to buy or sell shares.
Warburg's decision to drop marketmaking in so many companies' shares, coming
as the debate between these two different market systems gathers momentum,
could help to push the exchange further towards an order-driven market.
To many marketmakers, that is heresy: it would allow buyers and sellers of
shares to deal without needing a marketmaker to act as intermediary - and so
could spell the beginning of the end of marketmaking. But as Warburg's move
clearly indicates, making markets in many companies' shares may no longer be
worth the effort.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 25
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4247</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQADDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Rugby's shares rise as payout is held
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW TAYLOR, Construction Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE share price of Rugby, Britain's third largest cement manufacturer,
rebounded by 5 per cent from 160p to 169p yesterday after the group
announced a rise in first-half pre-tax profits from Pounds 27.4m to Pounds
30.2m and held its dividend.
The figures made a welcome start to a week in which several large UK
construction group are expected to announce interim dividend cuts. Half-year
results include figures from Wimpey today, Taylor Woodrow tomorrow and Amec,
John Laing and Blue Circle on Thursday.
Few British construction or building material companies will be able to
announce any rise in pre-tax profits for the first six months of this year.
Rugby, which is maintaining its interim dividend at 2.85p, offset an 8 per
cent fall in UK profits from Pounds 18.9m to Pounds 17.3m with higher
earnings from Australia and the US - aided by a fragile recovery in
construction output in both countries.
Profits were further boosted by Pounds 3.1m of interest received compared
with Pounds 1.8m at the corresponding stage last year. The group had cash in
hand of Pounds 23m at the end of June.
Prospects for UK construction, however, look bleak with no recovery in sight
for housebuilding and commercial property investment. Public spending on
construction remains under pressure in the government's autumn spending
round.
Manufacturers expect UK cement sales to fall about 8 per cent this year
following last year's 16 per cent decline. However, Rugby reported cement
profits only 0.1 per cent lower at Pounds 10.3m.
It was helped by good winter weather for construction in south-east England,
where most of its cement plants are. UK structural steel profits by
comparison slumped 98 per cent to just Pounds 16,000 while UK joinery
profits fell 6.8 per cent to Pounds 7m.
Overseas profits rose 47 per cent to Pounds 9.8m in spite of adverse
currency translations from US and Australian dollars. Profits from
Australian cement and lime, sold to the construction and aluminium
industries, rose 8 per cent to Pounds 5.1m.
Group earnings per share rose from 6.31p to 6.86p. Turnover fell marginally
to Pounds 283.7m from Pounds 270.9m.
Lex, Page 24
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 25
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4248</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQADCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Glut of European produce puts pressure on Perkins
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MAGGIE URRY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A GLUT of fresh produce in Europe and weakening demand for frozen foods was
blamed by Perkins Foods for interim pre-tax profits only 4.1 per cent up to
Pounds 10.9m.
The group, which trades or makes fresh, chilled and frozen foods, is one of
the first food companies to report on a period which is expected to have
seen trading conditions worsening and profits under pressure.
The glut of fresh produce began to be felt towards the end of the first
half, and the company said the impact was worse in July and August when
prices fell by around 20 per cent.
The market for frozen foods was difficult, the company said, and demand in
Germany was now softening. Profits fell in the group's mushroom business
which, like other companies in the sector, has been under pressure since
1990.
Perkins, which had expanded rapidly through acquisitions mainly financed
through issues of shares and convertible securities, suffered a fall in
fully diluted earnings per share from 5.1p to 4.8p. The interim dividend was
held at 1.7p.
Mr Howard Phillips, Perkins' chief executive, said that the group was no
longer looking for acquisitions but was concentrating on organic growth,
based on finding new products and new customers.
He said this change in strategy was 'realistic' in the light of the fall in
the share price from around 150p early in the year to 64p at yesterday's
close.
Group sales rose 42.6 per cent to Pounds 176.3m because of a number of
acquisitions.
Operating profits were 23.1 per cent higher at Pounds 11.4m, but would have
been down 4 per cent if acquisitions were excluded. There was a Pounds 1.7m
swing to interest payable of Pounds 445,000.
Mr Ian Blackburn, finance director, said that interest cover was 25 times,
but was five times if charges on the convertibles were taken into account. A
Pounds 5.1m D-Mark convertible loan note which had been counted in the
balance sheet as equity was now regarded as debt, he said.
Perkins has a potential liability on earn-outs of acquired companies of
Pounds 19.7m, with up to Pounds 10.9m due in 1993 and Pounds 5m in 1994. Mr
Blackburn said these could be met without gearing rising from its current
level of 29 per cent.
Details, Page 26
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 25
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4249</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQADBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / SCA abandons alliance with MoDo
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT TAYLOR
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   HELSINKI
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
SVENSKA Cellulosa Aktiebolaget (SCA), the Swedish forestry group, yesterday
abandoned its attempt to form a strategic alliance with Mo och Domsjo AB
(MoDo), one of its main domestic competitors.
At the end of 1990 SCA paid SKr1.4bn (Pounds 136m) for a 31 per cent stake
in MoDo's voting rights and 16 per cent of its equity. The intention was to
bring about closer co-operation between the two companies, particularly in
the production of printing paper.
SCA said yesterday it had become apparent that the desired co-operation was
no longer possible because of differences of opinion between the two
companies.
It said SCA's influence on MoDo and its strategic development was very
limited as a result.
SCA's president and chief executive, Mr Sverker Martin's Lof, is to resign
from the MoDo board, 'so that he could consider alternative solutions in the
future'.
Mr Bo Rydin, SCA's chairman, will remain on the board to look after SCA's
investment.
SCA said that since it could no longer regard MoDo as an associate, it would
no longer account for MoDo's results on an equity basis.
MoDo contributed a loss of SKr28m to SCA's earnings in the first four months
of this year.
SCA said it would now restate its 1992 earnings to account for its holding
on the basis of the cost of the acquisition.
The company said the value of its holding would be reviewed at the end of
this year.
Analysts speculated that this could involve a substantial write-down.
The shares are believed to have cost around SKr1.4bn, while their present
value is around SKr400m.
SCA pursued an aggressive strategy of acquisition in the late 1980s,
culminating in the Pounds 1.1bn purchase of Reedpack of the UK in 1990. Its
attempt to buy Feldmuhle Nobel of Germany was thwarted by its larger rival,
the leading Swedish paper maker Stora.
At the time of the agreed deal with MoDo, SCA said it did not intend to
increase its shareholding, since its financial position was already
stretched.
Since then the company has been hit by the downturn in the paper industry
worldwide, resulting in large lay-offs and sharply reduced profits.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 25
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4250</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQADAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Observer: Unlucky strike
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Whoever is invited to take over the chairmanship of the London Metal
Exchange at the end of the year may think twice before taking on the job.
The two previous incumbents failed to finish the course.
Christopher Green left suddenly in August 1990 after an argument with the
new owners of Cerro Metals (UK) where he was chairman and managing director.
The LME rules insist that when a board member changes companies he must
resign, so Green handed over to John Wolff.
Now Wolff, marketing director at Rudolf Wolff, has decided to quit the
family company which was sold in two tranches (in 1971 and 1981) to Noranda,
the big Canadian resources group. He says he doesn't particularly like the
big-company style and would rather work for himself.
However, if Raj Bagri, the LME's Indian-born vice chairman, gets the
chairmanship, he should be able to stay the course. Since he owns his own
company he doesn't have to worry about shareholders who think he's spending
too much time on LME business. And since he's estimated to be worth Pounds
74m, he can afford the time.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4251</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAC9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Observer: Omissions
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Meanwhile, it has not gone unnoticed that not all of Europe's heavy hitters
graced yesterday's stage. If the conference - Europe and the World after
1992 - was as big an event as it was supposed to be, a better cast list
might have been expected.
Admittedly, the French could use their forthcoming referendum as an excuse.
It's much better that France's top politicos concentrate on whipping in the
'yes' vote than pontificating in London, and anyway France's European
Commission president, Jacques Delors, was on hand. Swedish prime minister
Carl Bildt and the EBRD's Jacques Attali turned in robust performances. But
where was the big German name?
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4252</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAC8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Observer: Tight-lipped
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
So much for open government. John Major, in his keynote speech on the future
of Europe, dwelt eloquently on the rebirth of freedom and democracy in
eastern Europe. But yesterday's conference seemed to be run along the lines
of a Communist party congress.
Journalists were first barred from the auditorium at which two dozen or so
of the great and the good were spelling out their vision of the future. Then
they were banned from the surrounding areas, presumably to prevent them from
gauging reaction to Major's contribution. The PM was a bit weak on his
history was the word of one man in the corridors.
A few did manage to break through - the Foreign Office reserved some places
for their favourite few - while the half dozen commercial sponsors, such as
British Gas, were kind enough to issue personal invitations to members of
the fourth estate. But the foreign journalists from Brussels were enraged by
the Stalinist barriers.
The vast majority of the press corps was kept at a safe distance. A
blustering Foreign Office official blamed it all on Gus O'Donnell. The
Downing Street press secretary, who once promised to shake off the cobwebs
of secrecy in Whitehall, looked sheepish and muttered something about
security.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4253</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAC7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Observer: Early promise
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Juvenilia have a habit of reappearing at embarrassing times, as Jack Straw
must be reflecting in his grown-up role as Labour's environment spokesman
with responsibility for presenting the party's housing policies. The housing
magazine Roof has unsportingly dredged up an article he wrote for it in 1980
setting out a 'draft Labour housing manifesto'.
In those heady days of clause four socialism, the promises were simple. One,
repeal the law which allowed tenants to buy their council houses. Two,
increase public subsidies to hold down council rents. Three, phase out
tax-relief on mortgage interest.
Twelve years on, Labour's new realism means that Straw's main task is to
present the party as the friend of home-owners and the enemy of profligate
councils. But if it causes him to drop the pledge of abolishing tax-relief
in particular, it is not only the left who'll be sorry.
Housing experts are almost unanimous in agreeing that getting rid of this
expensive subsidy to mortgages is the key to putting the housing market on a
more even keel.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4254</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAC6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Observer: Paramount coup?
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Anyone spotting Michael Heseltine whispering in the Queen's ear need not
suspect a threat to John Major's premiership. Hezza the Prezza will simply
be passing on glad tidings in what has been a wretched summer for Britain's
royal family. The board of trade president himself learned the news while on
holiday in Fiji.
The island's lately elected prime minister Major General Sitiveni Rabuka
would like to rejoin the Commonwealth, from which his country was ejected
after Rabuka led two military coups five years ago.
Although now a republic, it still pictures the Queen's head on its revamped
currency. Moreover, despite the installation of former governor-general Ratu
Sir Penaia Ganilau as president, Fijian diplomats stress that the Queen
remains Tui Viti or paramount chief; this means the citizens get a day off
on her birthday.
Even so, Rabuka's ambitions to rejoin the Commonwealth are likely to be
blocked by India pending a promised review of the post-coup constitution. As
things are, it provides an inbuilt majority for indigenous Fijians at the
expense of ethnic Indians.
As for the rest of the Pacific, apart from New Zealand where the Queen
remains highly popular, the royal outlook is unsettled. To add to the
buffeting from Paul Keating's Labor government in Australia, which deems a
British head of state to be demeaning, it's said that Tuvalu, Papua New
Guinea and the Solomon Islands are considering a turn to republicanism.
If so, they may need to be quick. Given the ways things are going at home,
the British may get there before them.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4255</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAC5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Letter: Gap between road and rail freight costs likely to
remain
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr DAVID SAWERS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, The article, 'How freight hopes have finally been derailed' (September
1), and the subsequent letter from Dr Schimmelpfennig (September 3) showed
some misunderstanding of the system of charging commercial vehicles for the
use of roads in Britain.
The taxation of goods vehicles combines an annual excise licence fee and
duty on fuel. Currently, the excise duty on commercial vehicles of more than
3.5 tons yields Pounds 500m a year and the fuel duty yields Pounds 1,730m. A
lorry of 15 to 17 tons pays excise duty of Pounds 1,280 a year and an
average fuel duty of Pounds 3,400. The heaviest lorries of 36 to 38 tons pay
Pounds 3,100 in excise duty and an average fuel duty of Pounds 10,874.
About 30 per cent of the total costs of the road system are attributed to
goods vehicles, including nearly all structural maintenance. The taxes they
pay exceed these costs by about 20 per cent. Commercial vehicles do not
therefore pay a negligible tax for access to the roads, and they pay a
substantial tax through fuel duty.
There are obvious limitations in this charging system: the estimates of
costs attributable to different classes of road users are imprecise, charges
are not directly based on the actual weight of the vehicle and the distance
it travels, and there is no charge for environmental effects or congestion.
Basing taxation on records of vehicle weight and mileage provided by
vehicle-mounted sensors would be the most practicable improvement;
congestion charges would result from any installation of electronic road
pricing systems. Environmental taxation - unless arbitrary - depends upon
valuing the effects of such factors as noise, which has not proved easy. And
such taxation should be applied to trains as well as lorries.
It is unlikely that any justifiable changes to taxation of road transport
would eliminate the gap between the costs of road and rail haulage. They
could only make rail freight marginally more competitive.
Mr David Sawers,
'Crosby',
10 Seaview Avenue,
Angmering-on-Sea,
Littlehampton, West Sussex
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4256</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAC4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Letter: Look to oneself for explanation of losses
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr C V BISHOP
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, Recent media criticism of the accounting profession may be valid, but
it is surely misdirected. On the basis that accounting standards embrace
all, from sole traders to the largest quoted companies, it is hardly
surprising that standards are flexible.
What is surprising is how many times lenders and investors, having lost
money in a company, try to mask their carelessness and inability by blaming
the accountancy profession. It is improbable that Terry Smith (author of
'Accounting for Growth') is alone in being analytically capable, so how is
it that there is always a much larger body of investors who have not become
involved with these offending companies? The answer cannot exclusively be
good luck; rather, that some of these non-investors work harder.
Consequently, as they are more aware, they avoid these companies, simply
through a more careful and informed scrutiny of the same financial
information which is available to all, and which is based on the same
accounting standards.
My suggestion is not that the accountancy profession, or more precisely, the
Accounting Standards Board, should go uncriticised, but that those who cry
sour grapes should also look to themselves rather than to others for a
reasonable explanation of their losses.
CV Bishop,
managing director,
Capital Value Brokers,
17 Dufferin Street,
London EC1Y 8NJ
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4257</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAC3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Letter: Appropriate index
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr B R PARKS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, I was interested to read of the FT participation in the new indices
('New UK share indices to join existing benchmarks', September 2). They are
bound to be known as the Footsie 250 and 350. It therefore seems appropriate
that the index formed from the difference between the FT-All Share and the
Footsie 350 (suitably weighted, of course]) will be called the Footrest.
Let's hope it's not too long before recovery allows us to use it.
B R Parks,
31 Earlswood Road,
Dorridge, Solihull
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4258</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAC2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Letter: Efficacy of EC proposals to open up banana markets
challenged
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr NICHOLAS P G SAPHIR
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, The letter from Oxfam and Christian Aid (September 1) and your articles
on the subject of the proposed EC banana regime (Commodities and
Agriculture: August 28 and 20), raise important issues. However, they fail
to address the key point of how to protect and transform the economies of
uneconomic banana producing countries, without sacrificing the interests of
the consumer.
As the member of the Fruit Importers Association deputed to represent its
views on this subject, I would point out that the question is not whether
the EC should sacrifice the African, Caribbean and Pacific, and Community
producing countries for Latin American bananas. We accept the need to honour
legal and moral commitments to historic suppliers, but strongly challenge
the efficacy of the current proposal in being able to deliver its other
stated objective of gradually opening the market to free trade for the
benefit of consumers.
The current Commission proposal appears to seek a 10-year transition to free
trade, but wrongly proposes that arrangements based on quota with some
tariff support will provide the best opportunity for success. Transitional
arrangements dependent on quota have never been successful in other produce
areas. Import licence, which marches hand in hand with quota, enables
holders to maximise profit at the expense of consumers, producers and
disadvantaged competitors.
UK banana experience demonstrates the undesirable results of
quota-constrained imports organised through a very small number of
advantaged traders. Artificially high profits for the owners of licence
distort trade in related products, and a cosy lack of competitive activity
penalises consumers while failing to encourage the very transition that is
sought.
The apparently conflicting objectives of opening up the market to the
benefit of consumers, while defending the economies of traditional
suppliers, can best be achieved by a transition based on tariffication with
income support and structural change being funded by the tariffs. This would
have the added benefit of being acceptable to the principles of the General
Agreement on Tariffs and Trade.
If, finally, it is still proposed to introduce a quota-based system, it is
vital that consumers are not disadvantaged by quota volumes that fail to
recognise current consumption and consumption trends.
It would also be of considerable benefit to consumers and the trade if the
necessary import licensing arrangements did not extend the current UK
oligopoly, caused by a 'Catch 22' licensing system that effectively prevents
distributors from importing bananas, unless they have a track record of
importing bananas.
Nicholas P G Saphir,
chairman,
Hunter Saphir,
Northfleet,
Gravesend, Kent
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4259</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAC1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Letter: Not a good attitude on education
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mrs KATERINA PORTER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, What sort of world does your leader writer live in, or want to live in,
if he cannot contemplate the relatively small redistribution of wealth
involved in the state properly funding the higher education system ('College
for all', September 1)?
It reminds me of what the late A H Broderick wrote in the 1940s: when
universal free education was introduced in France in the 19th century it was
because it was the entitlement of every citizen; when it was introduced in
England it was because employers no longer wanted a wholly illiterate
workforce.
This attitude has not done us much good over the years.
Katerina Porter,
17 Redcliffe Road,
London SW10 9NP
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4260</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAC0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Letter: Inflated record
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr E GUY ABEL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, You class Mr Kevin Maxwell as Britain's biggest bankrupt. Aside from
the rather specialised nature of Mr Maxwell's circumstances, no journalist
appears to have applied the retail prices index to the former record
holder's debt. I calculate Mr Stern's 1974 debt of Pounds 118m to be
equivalent to Pounds 632m in 1992. Should we not reinstate Mr Stern with
this, er, honour?
E Guy Abel,
56 Telford Avenue,
London SW2 4XF
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4261</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQACZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Letter: Which pound gives the fullest tank?
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr D ARCHIBALD DOUGLES
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, Driving through Belgium at the weekend, reflecting on the pros and cons
of monetary union, I stopped to fill up the tank only to discover that one
livre anglaise would buy me 52 Belgian francs but that my livre ecossaise
was worth only 50 francs. Is this what Mr Delors means by l'Europe des
regions? The company making this offer? British (sic) Petroleum.
D Archibald Dougles,
managing director,
Amsterdam Institute of Finance,
Herengracht 205,
Amsterdam
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4262</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQACYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / A welcome mat for the rental market: The British government
is rethinking the merits of home ownership as property prices continue to
fall
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN WILLMAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
After a decade in which increasing home ownership has been the flagship of
UK housing policy, the government looks set for a significant switch in
emphasis. Ministers have let it be known that they are contemplating
incentives to revive the privately rented sector, with measures to encourage
investment in rented property.
The signals come from the Department of the Environment, where Sir George
Young, the housing minister, is keen to reinvigorate private renting. The
Treasury, which wants to improve the supply of housing without restarting an
inflationary rise in house prices, is also said to be 'very receptive' to
new ideas about renting.
Stimulating the UK's privately rented sector would be no easy matter,
however, given its apparently inexorable decline. From providing about 90
per cent of housing in 1900, the privately rented sector had shrunk to below
7.5 per cent by 1990.
One factor behind the decline was the regulatory burden of rent controls and
security of tenure for tenants. Another was the growth in owner-occupation,
fuelled by tax breaks such as mortgage interest tax relief and exemption
from capital gains tax. Mrs Thatcher's drive to sell council houses to their
tenants, and her enthusiasm for home ownership, gave new momentum to the
growth in owner-occupation throughout the 1980s.
Increasingly, however, doubts have been raised about the emphasis placed on
ever-rising levels of home ownership. Housing experts point out that the
level in the UK - now approaching 70 per cent - is much higher than in most
other European countries.
This is matched by an abnormally small privately rented sector. Throughout
most of Europe, up to 20 per cent of housing is privately rented, with the
figure as high as 45 per cent in western Germany. In the US and Canada, it
is more than 30 per cent.
Economists argue that this imbalance between different types of tenure
distorts the working of the British economy.
'It is economically efficient for young people to rent housing before they
are settled, so that they can move easily,' says Alan Evans, professor of
environmental economics at Reading University. 'Owner-occupation, almost as
much as local authority housing, discourages mobility and slows down the
adjustment and growth of the economy.'
Two serious attempts were made towards the end of the last decade to
stimulate private renting. The first was the 1988 Housing Act: for new
lettings, this restricted tenants' rights and freed up rentals. The other
was the extension of the Business Expansion Scheme (BES) to provide tax
breaks for investors in housing for rent.
The BES incentives had an immediate effect, with a plethora of schemes
raising Pounds 800m to create more than 15,000 homes according to the Joseph
Rowntree Foundation, the social affairs think tank. However, the tax breaks
last only five years, at the end of which the homes are usually sold.
The boost to private renting, therefore, is only temporary - one reason why
the government has now announced that the BES is to end next year.
The 1988 Housing Act had a less immediate effect, partly because many
potential landlords feared that a future Labour government might reimpose
rent controls and restore tenants' security of tenure (although Labour
denied that it would take any retrospective action).
But there is some evidence that the deregulation of private tenancies has
begun to reverse the decline in the level of private renting. Last year, for
the first time in a decade, there was no decrease in the proportion of
privately rented homes, and managing agents report record interest among
potential landlords and tenants.
Sir George is reluctant to claim success at this early stage. He concedes
that the slump in the housing market has led many who cannot sell their
homes to rent them out. Falling house prices have also increased demand, as
many first-time buyers decide to rent rather than risk buying and losing
their deposit.
The pause in the decline comes at a time when Sir George has been pressing
forward with initiatives to stimulate the private rental sector. These
include the rent-a-room scheme in this year's Finance Act, which allows
householders who let out rooms in their homes to earn rent of up to Pounds
3,250 a year tax-free. He is also trying to encourage shopowners to rent out
the flats over their premises.
Sir George is particularly bullish about a scheme to use housing
associations to tempt financial institutions back into rented property. He
believes that the institutions are currently reluctant to invest in housing
for rent because they do not want to manage the lettings. Housing
associations, with their generally good reputation as landlords, could act
as managing agents, 'taking the hassle out renting', as Sir George puts it.
Critics feel that Sir George's enthusiasm for such schemes avoids the real
issue behind the absence of investment in rented housing: it is a poor
investment proposition.
'Without the large subsidy currently provided by the BES, it just doesn't
stack up,' says Mr Robert Lo of Johnson Fry, the most prolific promoter of
BES property schemes.
One company which has tried to make private renting stack up is Quality
Street, set up in 1987 with finance from Nationwide building society. Mr
Paul Mugnaioni, chairman - and formerly housing director for Glasgow - hoped
to demonstrate that it was possible to be a 'blue-chip' private landlord,
offering high-quality property for rent with first-class management service.
Five years on, with 2,000 homes built and another 1,000 under management, Mr
Mugnaioni believes that the company has achieved the spirit of those
objectives. But he has been able to build far fewer homes than hoped because
the returns are not high enough to attract investors.
'There's a shortfall of about 30 per cent between the returns we can earn
and what the investor wants,' he says. 'We can't provide good accommodation
at rents below Pounds 100 a week without the sort of subsidy which
owner-occupiers enjoy.'
Mr Mugnaioni suggests a package of tax measures to bridge the gap:
sheltering investment in rented property from corporation tax; exempting it
from capital gains tax; and lifting the burden of VAT.
A similar approach is advocated by Mr Neville Lee of the Association of
Residential Letting Agents. He wants tax allowances for the capital and
conversion costs of residential property and a two-year tax holiday on rent
from offices converted into homes.
To pay for such tax breaks, Mr Mugnaioni and Mr Lee both advocate
redirecting some of the Pounds 6bn spent on mortgage interest tax relief
into encouraging private rentals. But while there is plenty of money going
into subsidising homeowners, now is not a good time to raid the
owner-occupier piggy bank to encourage private rentals. Removing mortgage
interest tax relief would almost certainly further depress house prices, and
be politically unsaleable given that up to 1m owners have negative equity in
their homes.
Yet if the economists are right about the negative effects of the weakness
of the privately rented sector, some way needs to be found of shifting the
subsidy from owner-occupiers to private tenants. At the very least, a
replacement is needed for the BES, which offers incentives to those who
invest long-term in property for rent.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4263</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQACXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Observer: Born to the job
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Tibbett &amp; Britten, the contract distribution group, has appointed Maurice
Wood as managing director of its new South African subsidiary. The company
says that Wood, 34, is a senior industry figure who has spent his entire
35-year career in the distribution sector . . .
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4264</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQACWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Observer: Insoluble
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Does the government know more than it is letting on about economic recovery?
In its targets for 1992-93 for the Insolvency Service, it is estimating that
there will be 36,000 new insolvencies. Strange, considering the service
handled 35,097 last year and the rates have continued to rise sharply since.
There again, perhaps it is too reliant on rosy Treasury forecasts. Last
year, it predicted 20,500 insolvencies. Embarrassed officials had to hire
another 150 staff to cope with the extra workload.
If the same underestimates prove true this year, at least a few more civil
servants will have jobs.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4265</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQACVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Dream teams in the fall classic: George Bush and Bill
Clinton have fielded a mix of seasoned veterans and hungry newcomers as
advisers
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JUREK MARTIN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
As life sometimes imitates art, so politics can imitate baseball. Thus it
must be recorded that last Monday, Jose Canseco, the heavy hitter of the
Oakland Athletics, was summarily traded to the Texas Rangers for a less
renowned slugger and a pair of pitchers. Three days earlier David Cone, the
New York Mets' star, was abruptly shipped to the Toronto Blue Jays for two
players of whom only their parents had ever heard. And Jeff Reardon, who has
saved more games than any other pitcher, was moved from the Boston Red Sox
to the Atlanta Braves.
American politics, too, has seen a transfer of serious proportions - with
big Jim Baker, the slugging secretary of state, and the rest of his
departmental infield going to the team of George Bush, the former Yale first
baseman, who promptly sent Sam Skinner, Clayton Yeutter and a host of others
to minor league oblivion.
The new Bush line-up was ready for action in time for the traditional
opening of the 'real' election season, which begins after Labor Day
(yesterday), two months before the country finally votes. But perhaps it
took the field a little late. Although the latest opinion polls vary widely,
all show Clinton holding on to his lead - 46 per cent against 40 per cent
for Bush in a Time magazine survey and 49 per cent versus 40 per cent in a
new NBC poll.
The Baker deal was long-rumoured. But politics, like baseball, can also
suddenly propel to prominence those known only to the true fan. James
Carville, George Stephanopoulos, Mickey Kantor, Betsey Wright, Mandy
Grunwald are not exactly household names. Neither are Rich Bond, Mary
Matalin, Bob Teeter and Charlie Black. However, if Bill Clinton becomes the
next president, a lot of credit will go to the first five, and a few more
besides, and if Bush wins another term he will owe much to the second four,
while reserving the best champagne for Mr Baker.
Good teams can make a difference in elections, though they are not
infallible in their judgments, as two seasoned professionals, Ed Rollins and
Hamilton Jordan, found when they cast their lots with Ross Perot. And they
cannot always pull off the same trick twice, as Mr Jordan and the Carter
team discovered in 1980. Still, until Mr Baker moved over, there was no
question that the hungrier Clinton team, toughened by a bitter primary
season, was running circles around Mr Bush's stodgy lot, which sent him on
disastrous road trips to Tokyo, Panama and Munich. As Mr Clinton's lead over
the president assumed serious proportions, some began to be viewed not
merely as campaign operatives but as leading lights in the next Democratic
administration.
This is more than premature and may be misleading. In 1976, Jimmy Carter
reached out beyond the tight Georgian ship that had helped him win the
presidency when filling senior foreign and economic policy positions in his
administration. The Clinton campaign, still based in Little Rock, is less
stuffed with Arkansas razorbacks than Mr Carter's was with Georgia bulldogs,
but it, too, will get its share of the plum slots in the White House
apparatus. There also remains a residue of a Democratic
government-in-waiting qualified to serve and, after 20 of the past 24 years
in the wilderness, rallying behind the Clinton cause.
His inner circle, together for most of the year, seems tightly knit but is
subject to innumerable sub-divisions. It has its pure political gunslingers,
such as James Carville - the 'ragin' Cajun' who was architect of Harris
Wofford's upset victory in last year's Pennsylvanian Senate by-election.
Another is the deceptively youthful George Stephanopoulos, on the Dukakis
communications staff four years ago and now, in practice, the chief Clinton
spokesman.
The Clinton camp also has its professional experts (Mandy Grunwald, the
hard-nosed media consultant who persuaded Mr Clinton to play his saxophone
on late-night television); old hands from the Arkansas state house (Betsey
Wright, brought back to handle the 'bimbo' factor and now doing much more);
and veteran Democratic consultants (Mickey Kantor, who has advised everyone
from George McGovern to Walter Mondale, including, in 1976, Jerry Brown).
The party itself has a national chairman, Ron Brown, with a feline
diplomatic touch and considerable organisational skills.
The great characteristic of this inner circle so far has been its quick
reactions. Mr Carville considers passivity a crime, while Mr Stephanopoulos
learned to his cost what sitting back did to the Dukakis campaign. It has
done its homework on the Bush record and every charge gets a counter-attack.
A televised exchange of views last week on economic policy between Mr
Stephanopoulos and Charles Black showed both camps at their best, with both
drawing on statistics published only hours before.
Clinton's team has also been careful not to impinge on Mr Bush's
prerogatives as president, especially in foreign affairs. But this artful
deference is currently being severely tested by the president's ability to
hog the domestic headlines and dispense largesse, in an ostensibly
non-partisan manner, in the aftermath of Hurricane Andrew.
The Clinton team also has its Bill and Hillary factions. In the first are
those who, along with Mr Clinton himself, are mostly interested in how
government can solve practical problems; in the second are those who, along
with the candidate's wife, are more interested - to paraphrase Tom Wolfe's
The Right Stuff - in testing the outer envelope of ideas. A measure of
tension between the two camps has been detectable. Mr Clinton has his
academic networks, some input from the media, plus a sizeable leavening from
the conspicuously moderate Democratic Leadership Council. Many of Mrs
Clinton's friends, such as Mr Kantor and Susan Thomases, nominally her
scheduling director, are from those areas of social reform for which Hillary
has long been an advocate.
At the next remove from the inner circle are the policy advisers whose roles
have grown as Mr Clinton has become a national candidate. Here the names are
more recognisable, especially in the areas of foreign and economic policy.
Tony Lake (one of the first outsiders to join the effort) and Richard
Holbrooke, both ex-Carter state department, Michael Mandelbaum and Peter
Tarnoff from the Council on Foreign Relations, and Warren Christopher,
deputy to Carter's secretary of state Cyrus Vance (now UN special envoy to
the former Yugoslavia), stand out in the foreign policy area. For what it is
worth, the popular betting is that either Mr Christopher or Congressman Lee
Hamilton, chairman of the House foreign affairs committee, will end up as
secretary of state, with Mr Lake a likely national security adviser.
The economic policy group has some heavy hitters, though none seems
particularly close to the candidate. They include investment bankers such as
Robert Altman, Felix Rohatyn, and Bob Rubin and Bob Hormats of Goldman
Sachs, Peter Peterson, commerce secretary in the Nixon administration, as
well as academics and authors such as Robert Reich and Lawrence Summers from
Harvard and Rudiger Dornbusch from MIT. One of them may emerge as secretary
of the Treasury or eventually as chairman of the Federal Reserve.
Perhaps more interesting are the ideas emanating from the likes of Rob
Shapiro and Elaine Sciulla Kamarck of the Progressive Policy Institute,
research arm of the Democratic Leadership Council, and Ira Magaziner, a
Rhode Island business consultant with some blue-chip clients. Their
practical and eclectic arguments on the development of human capital in the
economy seem particularly close to Mr Clinton's own philosophies.
At a further remove, and bringing more specific expertise, are Tim Wirth,
the retiring senator from Colorado and authority on the environment, Senator
Sam Nunn and Congressman Les Aspin, both candidates for defence secretary in
a Clinton administration, Jim Jones, the former congressman and now chairman
of the American Stock Exchange, and another congressman, Dave McCurdy from
Oklahoma, with an expertise on international security issues.
Bush's team gets shorter shrift because Mr Baker's assumption of control
reduces the scope of many of its previous leaders. Indeed, until he came
over, it was not always easy to work out who was running the campaign. This
was in sharp contrast to 1988, when Mr Baker fitted in seamlessly with the
late Lee Atwater, the political director who played it rougher than anyone.
That partnership worked because Mr Baker was the strategist and Mr Atwater
the executor with a musician's feel for what the country wanted to hear. It
is not easy to see who will be this year's necessary eyes and ears of Mr
Bush and Mr Baker, both patricians to their marrow. Bob Teeter is an eminent
pollster and, together with Charles Black, he brings a wealth of experience
and knowledge to the campaign, but both are more intimates of the president
than of the man in the street. Atwater acolytes, such as Mary Matalin, the
abrasive political director, and Torie Clarke, the campaign's witty
spokeswoman, do not have his clout, though they may be just as hard to
muzzle.
It is a fair bet that less will be heard in the coming months from Rich
Bond, Ron Brown's opposite number. Mr Bond took over the Republican party
chairmanship after working for Congressman Bill Green of New York, the
quintessential moderate Republican, which sometimes made his fervent support
of the conservative agenda look a little odd. But at least he can claim he
made the convention run roughly on the right time. Vice-president Dan Quayle
will be equally confined to partisan corridors, inveighing only against
Hollywood liberals, the media and other targets of the right.
In the end Mr Baker may decide he is better off with his own instincts and
the advice of his own kitchen cabinet - Margaret Tutwiler, the messenger,
Bob Zoellick and Dennis Ross, the ideas men, and Liz Mullins, the
politician. Certainly the maestro will have the principal role in preparing
Mr Bush for his critical debates with Mr Clinton later this month and next.
He will hope here to emulate his performance in 1988, when he outmanoeuvred
the Dukakis team in all the negotiations over format.
The teams can pump and prime the candidates, but ultimately George Bush and
Bill Clinton are on their own, each as fallible as the other. Baseball knows
this unpredictability; immediately after the great transfers, Oakland, minus
Canesco, could hardly score a run against Baltimore and David Cone was
thrashed in his Toronto debut. Bill Clinton played softball last week - and
his team won - but that hardly counts.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4266</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQACUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Leading Article: The challenge to the east
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THE EUROPEAN Community's introverted agonising over the Maastricht treaty is
having a wholly unwelcome side effect. It is drawing western European
governments' attention away from an issue which will have a significant
bearing on their own political and economic future: relations with the
countries to their east. It is preventing them from elaborating a coherent
strategy to encourage prosperity and consolidate democracy in central
Europe.
As Mr John Major reminded his audience at yesterday's UK presidency
conference in London, events outside the present borders of the EC over the
next 10 years will be just as important to western Europe as what happens
within them. Mr Jacques Attali, president of the European Bank for
Reconstruction and Development, put it more graphically. Without real hope
of economic improvement in eastern Europe and the former Soviet Union, he
said, scores of ethnic and territorial disputes could proliferate in such a
way as to make the Yugoslav conflict seem like a rehearsal. The consequence
would be a political, social and economic upheaval from which western Europe
could scarcely remain immune.
Grudging concessions
Post-communist reconstruction in Europe presents an enormous challenge, but
it is one to which the EC has not even begun to rise. To a lengthening queue
of would-be eastern adherents, the Community has offered the distant
prospect of membership and paltry economic aid. To the three countries that
are closest by geography and level of development - Poland, Czechoslovakia
and Hungary - it has given association agreements that provide somewhat
greater tangible benefits. But even in these cases, the concessions are
limited and grudging, with exports to the Community of goods such as
chemicals, textiles, coal, steel and farm produce subject to severe
restrictions.
Far from a flowering of free trade between eastern and western Europe, EC
governments - such as that of Mr Attali's native France - are allowing
protectionist instincts to prevail. They need to be reminded forcefully that
trade is the east's only viable medium-term means of self-improvement.
That is why the proposals which Mr Attali put to yesterday's conference  -
for a rapid renegotiation of the Community's existing association
agreements, and the launch, preferably at the Edinburgh summit this winter,
of multilateral free-trade negotiations in Europe - deserve a hearing.
Natural markets
His implication is that it is not good enough for EC governments simply to
respond to the clamour for assistance from eastern European countries by
promising eventually to admit them as members or offering half-hearted
economic agreements. Negotiations on enlarging the EC will be long and
tortuous and, in any case, the countries of the European Free Trade
Association are first in line. Even given the political will, no former
communist country has the remotest prospect of joining the Community within
the next 10 years. More to the point, the eastern European states will only
get to that stage by being able to export freely to their natural market,
the EC.
How best to free intra-European trade? And where should the line be drawn?
Mr Attali's proposal - for negotiations to create a North American-style
free trade area involving 40 countries - sounds over-ambitious, not least
because it would stretch to states scarcely identifiable as European.
Inevitably, the EC will have to focus its initial efforts closer to home -
probably on the countries of central and eastern Europe proper, with which
the west's economies have historic links and for which the west has a heavy
political responsibility, rather than the republics of the former Soviet
Union. Ideally, it would elaborate a model free-trade agreement on
favourable but not exclusive terms with Poland, Czechoslovakia and Hungary,
and suggest that other countries join when they are ready.
As Mr Major said yesterday, the EC is based on a simple idea: that by
binding the nations of Europe in a common economic framework, war would be
rendered impossible. It is time that the Community applied this logic to the
nations on its doorstep.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4267</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQACTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Mr Majtricht's logic
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOE ROGALY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Once again we must give the lady credit. The voice was that of Mr John Major
but the essence of the speech the British prime minister delivered in London
yesterday could have been enunciated by Lady Thatcher. He spoke as a
European leader, the current president of the EC. Seen through the eyes of
his predecessor's acolytes, he has become Mr John Majtricht, the
Conservative who would sell out to the centralisers. Yet they should look
again. Europe is coming round to her point of view.
Take, as a comparative text, the celebrated speech she made at Bruges in
September 1988. She spoke of the community as a 'family of nations,
understanding each other better, appreciating each other more, doing more
together but relishing our national identity no less than our common
European endeavour'. Yesterday Mr Majtricht acknowledged that many European
citizens fear for their national self-identity, and wonder whether it will
be lost. 'You could sense that debate in Denmark, . . . in France, . . . in
the new German Lander, . . . in the UK,' he said. 'The Community must show
that these fears are phantoms, . . . it must recognise . . . national
identity and national pride, not appear to ride roughshod over them.'
The rhythm persists. In 1988 she said: 'Our future must lie in willing and
active co-operation between independent sovereign governments, each
answerable to their national parliaments.' Yesterday he said: 'European
democracy begins with the traditional institutions that people understand
and feel close to; these are the parliaments, assemblies, folketings,
bundestags of each of their own countries.' She said that Europe must
'continue to maintain a sure defence through Nato'. He said that Maastricht
'maintains the primacy of Nato while building up the European role within
Nato'. He wishes to maintain the American presence in Europe; so did she.
She said, before the collapse of the Soviet empire, 'we shall always look on
Warsaw, Prague and Budapest as great European cities'; he reaffirmed that
'all of us have decided that it is essential to embrace the democracies to
the east'.
Historians will decide how many of Lady Thatcher's prophetic phrases were
hers and how many must be ascribed to her foreign affairs Rasputin, Sir
Charles Powell. What we can now see - but curiously, she now cannot - is
that the idea of a united states of Europe is at worst a distant nightmare.
The Community is a congeries of sovereign states, perpetually concluding new
treaties that, so long as they endure, are binding upon all members.
The political half of European union, as envisaged in the Maastricht treaty,
would be an extension of this concept. It would not be an irrevocable step
towards the supranational monolith still irrationally feared by the
Conservative Europhobes. The economic half of the treaty is something else
again. If it were to be cemented by a single currency and a single bank,
national sovereignties would indeed be diminished. If you fear that, take it
easy. The cries of those who say that such an outcome is inevitable are
beginning to sound less convincing with every creak and groan of the
exchange rate mechanism.
Mr Major is aware of this, but does not let himself get carried away. He
must take credit for an important rule of European behaviour that it was
never in her nature to accept. It is: try to sound like a team player, even
when you are not. He was thus able to attract praise as a good European
yesterday while enunciating the principles of a Europe des patries.
Indeed, the ability to utter sincere phrases with a forked tongue is the
prime minister's unique contribution to contemporary political debate. For
example, yesterday he rejected the accusation that Britain wants no more
than a large free-trade area. Then he devoted half a page of close-typed
text to the merits of the case for Europe as a large free-trade area,
'binding together the nations of Europe in a common economic framework'.
Again, he spoke of working 'with the grain of the market and not against
it', and then, straight-faced, went on to assert that 'this is of course
what the ERM does, and will continue successfully to do, whatever happens to
the Maastricht treaty'. With logic like that, our prime minister could sell
raincoats in the Sahara.
The underlying purpose of it all is, naturally, to cover the government's
tail. If the French vote No, yesterday's speech will have prepared the way
to save face. If they vote Yes, the same speech will, in retrospect, sound
like a brave and successful stand on principle. The identical insurance
policy is being taken out against either a solution to the Danish No vote,
or no solution to it. That is the difference between Lady Thatcher and her
successor. She went against the grain of contemporary opinion. He smoothes
it over. Funny. She was eaten up by the European debate. He, so far, has
survived.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4268</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQACSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Leading Article: Doubts about the hard ERM
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
YESTERDAY, Mr John Major insisted that the ERM would continue to be
successful, 'whatever happens to the Maastricht treaty'. In this the prime
minister echoed the European Community's finance ministers at their weekend
meeting in Bath. But they all protest too much.
How can the prime minister be so confident of the future of the ERM?
'Changes in economic and monetary arrangements must,' he claims, 'reflect
real changes in economic behaviour in the marketplace and must work with the
grain of the market and not against it.' The ERM meets this criterion, he
asserts.
This is a noteworthy proposition. Compare, for example, his predecessor's
view that 'you can't buck the markets'. Consider also the notion that
official foreign exchange speculation, to the tune of at least Pounds 7.3bn
this financial year alone, is in 'the grain of the market'.
The proposition is more than noteworthy. The economic merit of ERM, by
comparison with Emu, is only its flexibility. As a fixed exchange rate
system the ERM is half-baked, because of the price it imposes for a
flexibility governments say they do not want.
Ministers insist they will not realign, but only one thing is believed for
certain: that the D-Mark will never be realigned downwards. D-Mark interest
rates are the floor, therefore, with all other currencies paying an interest
rate premium, its size depending on the credibility of the commitment not to
realign. In some cases - Italy's today, for example - that premium is so
large that it damages credibility itself. In Emu, by contrast, there would
be no premia, because only then could the pre-commitment to fixed parities
be credible.
Half-baked Emu
Nor is this all. German policy oriented towards German conditions sets the
floor in the ERM. This is partly because of the ERM's rules on exchange rate
intervention, partly because of Germany's muscle in the EC and partly
because of German sensitivity over inflation.
The Bath meeting merely underlined the point. The Bundesbank was begged to
promise not to raise interest rates. But its representatives cannot make
such a promise. EC ministers reaffirmed their commitment to fixed exchange
rates, but Mr Helmut Schlesinger, the Bundesbank's president, declined to
add full support. Mr Theo Waigel, the German finance minister, refused to
accept criticism of German fiscal policy.
The hard ERM is, in short, a half-baked Emu under German management. It is
also unlikely to endure. As the gold standard showed, fixed exchange rates
can be sustained among open economies without exchange rate controls. But a
system like the ERM, with theoretical flexibility, can never enjoy the same
credibility. Exchange rates will be under pressure again and again. Sooner
or later one is bound to give. With it will go the credibility of the hard
version of the ERM.
Imperfectly credible
Ministers must know this well enough. But they cannot say so, because they
are caught in the logic of an imperfectly credible fixed exchange rate
system. The more doubtful the commitment, the more it must be reasserted.
But the costlier the commitment, the more it must be doubted. Interest rates
of 15 per cent in Italy, borrowings of Ecu10bn in the UK are not only ways
of demonstrating commitment. They are also signs of how deep doubts already
are.
The hard ERM is not a permanent solution to Europe's monetary problem.
Without early Emu, it will have to be redesigned. Those who wish to stay in
a fixed relationship with the D-Mark, will need to tie themselves more
closely. For them abolition of the fluctuation bands would be the obvious
route. Those who feel that the exchange rate flexibility of an adjustable
peg system is useful need to consider how flexibility might be used without
destroying credibility. Part of the solution would be changes in domestic
policy arrangements, including an independent central bank.
Ministers have to say that exchange rates will never be realigned. But they
cannot say it credibly, because markets know they have to say it. Mere
assertion, even along with high interest rates and sustained intervention,
will not preserve the hard ERM in the long run.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4269</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQACRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Arts: Mahler, Bruckner and Beethoven - London Promenade
Concerts
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD FAIRMAN and DAVID MURRAY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE audience for Mahler has not changed since he became popular in the
Sixties. Last Friday, the Albert Hall was packed to the rafters and it was a
sea of young faces, the second generation to have been raised on the
composer's gigantic symphonies.
It can be a problem to know what to put with the larger of them, but this
programme neatly paired the Fifth Symphony with Berg's Violin Concerto,
which can claim a direct Mahlerian line of descent. The soloist was
Anne-Sophie Mutter, who has spent the past year on sabbatical. The Berg
concerto is the work with which she has chosen to make her return, and her
tender performance of it could almost have been intended to link with the
favourite Mahler adagietto to come.
In recent recordings of concertos by Bartok and Mozart, Anne-Sophie Mutter's
playing had started to sound larger-than-life to an unpleasing degree, but
this Berg marked a return to a subtler kind of musicianship. The quiet
playing shimmered with colours. The portamentos, of which she is fond, were
delicately done. Recent research has claimed to find a hidden
autobiographical programme behind this concerto and in Mutter's performance
it was possible to believe that this is indeed music of a secret love.
After the interval, the symphony revealed few hidden charms. Michael Tilson
Thomas likes his Mahler to be crisp and alert, if not going so far as to be
a mere orchestral showpiece. On that level, his ideas about the Fifth
Symphony are well sorted out and the performance might have succeeded if the
London Symphony Orchestra's playing had been as consistently brilliant as he
needed.
It is good to hear the LSO away from the Barbican, but on this showing it
did not sound a great orchestra. The best passages were the latter part of
the scherzo and the finale, where conductor and orchestra alike were in a
high state of alertness. The adagietto also started well, brisk, purposeful,
unsentimental, although it lost momentum later. But in the rest, tension was
relaxed and the ensemble lost the edge which was the performance's raison
d'etre.
On Saturday, another capacity audience gathered to hear a second big,
romantic symphony. Last year, Gunter Wand was forced to cancel a concert of
Bruckner's Eighth Symphony with the BBC Symphony Orchestra because of
ill-health. Those who were disappointed then will have been delighted that
he was able to take up the same programme at this season's Proms.
At the age of 80, Wand is in no hurry to score points off the music he
conducts. His performance of the Eighth Symphony was patient and spacious,
although not excessively slow judged against the history of Bruckner
interpretation.
It was the music-making of a man who has spent his life working in the
Austro-German musical tradition, who knows what is important and what is
not. Listening at home on the radio, I found the resonant Albert Hall sound
almost ideal.
                         *      *      *
Beethoven's 'Choral' Symphony, his Ninth, is an indispensable Prom offering.
On Sunday, Vladimir Ashkenazy conducted it, apparently to mark Britain's
turn at the EC presidency, with the Berlin Radio Symphony, the London
Symphony and Brighton Festival choruses, and four solo singers from EC
countries. By way of a more specific salaam, Ashkenazy prefaced it with
Elgar's Falstaff, a near-hermetically English piece. I thought its jauntily
skewed rhythms never quite found a convincing pulse here, but Ashkenazy paid
tender attention to its crepuscular details.
The 'Choral', in his open-hearted treatment, sounded more cheerful than
visionary. His tempi were brisk: the first movement went at a lithe allegro
with little hint of 'maestoso', the great adagio sang sweetly and steadily.
With sterling soloists in Margaret Price, Martine Mahe, Jan Blinkhof and
Kurt Moll, as well as the intrepid choirs, the finale made the stirring
effect that it usually does in the Albert Hall. Ashkenazy's tearaway ending,
however, sounded like a last-minute bid to add glitter to an honest,
good-natured performance. As a pianist, he can show his true mettle as a
Beethoven interpreter better than on the podium.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4270</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQACQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Arts: Hecuba
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID MURRAY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
WRITTEN a decade earlier than his Trojan Women, Euripides' Hecuba is in
story-terms a sequel to it - and even grimmer. Within the past 20 years, The
Trojan Women has become almost a staple of modern-Ancient theatre, while
Hecuba is known mainly by classicists. For the sake of the rediscovery,
Laurence Boswell's fine production at the Gate is greatly welcome; but it
has many virtues besides.
The Trojan Women is a chain of laments and denunciations by the ladies of
the fallen Trojan court (including Helen), about to be shipped off to Greek
exile and slavery. In Hecuba, they and their captors have reached Thrace,
where their ships are becalmed for a while - and where King Priam's widow
expects to find her last surviving son Polydorus, sent long ago into safe
asylum there.
But we know from the start that he has been murdered by the 'friendly' King
of Thrace, for his mud-stained shade (John Straiton) has risen from the
underworld to tell us. This and other dreadful things remain for Hecuba to
face, though she thinks her despair complete. Before the end, she contrives
a ghastly retribution upon the King.
A note by the translator Kenneth McLeish suggests that the tragedy does not
fit Aristotle's famous formula (no o'er-reaching hubris here); but the more
general rubric of 'pity and terror' holds good with a vengeance.
McLeish's Englishing is pithy, sometimes modern-colloquial but never slangy,
often planting single words like speaking wounds - PAIN] - but leaving room
too for great formulaic howls. Translation into a tiny arena like The Gate
has to be radical; Euripides wrote the agonised central role for a male
actor (possibly himself) to deliver through a mask to an amphitheatre crowd
of 14,000 strong. Here Ann Mitchell opts for tight-lipped, beady-eyed
British control, broken by rare convulsive outbursts. It works.
Since it matters that the treacherous Thracians should be deeply non-Greek,
Boswell has cast them as black. That works too, and we get the bonus of Don
Warrington's impeccable performance as the guilty King  - first suavely
gracious, brought later to pitiable ruin.
Every other role is strongly filled: Hecuba's doomed daughter Polyxena by
Sara Mair-Thomas, a temporising Agamemnon from Sylvestor Morand, Christopher
Robbie as the Greeks' doubt-free executive Talthybius. Kevork Melikyan's
single appearance as Odysseus (classically, 'the wily. . .') leaves a
potently dismaying impression: alert, unwinking intelligence without
sympathy.
Somehow Boswell has managed to deploy a cast of 25 in this unlikely space.
It is no extravagance, for the dozen Trojan women - as distinct from the
ladies - sing their choruses in as many as three parts with solos, in Mick
Sands' astringently fresh settings: ethnic-flavoured (pipes and drums),
dateless and economical, but laden with Affekt. Anyone about to stage an
Ancient Greek play should enlist Sands at once.
The costumes are an apt motley of plain robes, homespun tunics, eastern
embroidery and shawls. If there is some influence from Declan Donnellan's
celebrated production of Vega's Fuente Ovejuna, that is all to the good. The
show takes less than an hour and three-quarters, without an interval. It is
not 'popular entertainment'; but one is seldom so forcibly persuaded that a
Greek reconstruction has hit the jugular vein of the scarifying original
text.
The Gate, Pembridge Road, London W11, until 3 October
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4271</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQACPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Arts: Britain's best kept secret hews to his own line -
Sculpture
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By WILLIAM PACKER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
PETER Randall-Page's public career as a sculptor began about a decade ago,
and now, in his thirties, he is established as one of the most distinguished
artists of a not unremarkable generation.
Yet in terms of the public vaunting of a reputation, his might almost appear
to be a career hardly begun. This is in marked contradistinction to what
certain of his peers and near contemporaries have enjoyed, including Kapoor,
Deacon, Cragg or Nash, Wilding, Mach or Goldsworthy, to say nothing of such
younger luminaries as Hurst - of the shark in formaldehyde - or Whiteread -
of the cast baths and mattresses.
In international terms, his reputation does not exist. Where others have
enjoyed British Council tours abroad and the concomitant international
interest and support of dealers, critics and collectors, Randall-Page has
stayed emphatically at home.
It is not as though he has not achieved a considerable success after his own
fashion, being ever ready to participate in group schemes and exhibitions,
and having a string of public commissions around the country to his credit.
Yet he is represented by no major dealer; the Arts Council has barely
noticed him; the Tate has yet to acquire any of his work. Indeed the
commentator who lately described him, in the light of this current touring
retrospective, as British art's best-kept secret, got it just about right.
Randall-Page stands, in short, somewhat apart from the system, and if the
nature and practice of his work of themselves have contributed to such
official indifference, he, for his part, deep in the Dorset countryside,
seems content enough that it should be so. Indeed, it could hardly be
otherwise, for we have only to consider the work as it is for a moment to
recognise the difficulties it lays before current curatorial orthodoxy of
expectation and prejudice.
For, sophisticated as it is in the formal vocabulary of modernism it
employs, and up-to-the-minute in its evident ecological and environmental
sympathies and preoccupations, it is work that is all too significantly
old-fashioned.
Here is a young sculptor who is before all else a carver and a modeller.
Everything is made directly under his own hand. He is no re-arranger of
found material, no collagist or assembler, no scene-builder,
installation-maker or window-dresser. His work is justified by no programme
of material transformation or extraneous polemic, no idea or theory to be
propounded before the event. It makes no comment on society, enters into no
debate on the nature of art, makes no fashionable proposition on process or
status.
It is about nothing at all but itself, in its material form and imagery. We
may take it or leave it - and the poor curator is left with nothing to put
in his catalogue but his own physical and imaginative response. We can see
his difficulty.
Randall-Page carves not merely to demonstrate or exploit the character of
his material, in the way that Kapoor hollows out his impressive lumps of
rock, or Long sets them out across the floor, but to put it at the service
of an image which, in its turn, repays the compliment.
He stands firmly in the earlier modernist tradition of direct carving and
truth to material, direct heir to Brancusi, Gaudier and Modigliani, Epstein,
Gill and Dobson, Barbara Hepworth and, most obviously of all, Henry Moore.
The image is stated and carried through to a full resolution, yet always
accepting and celebrating the determining, particular qualities of the
stone, whether it is the hard smoothness of marble or Kilkenny limestone, or
the softer roughness of Hopton stone.
The imagery itself is often obviously representational and, when abstract,
more abstracted than abstract in the purest sense. The weighty simplicity
and surface finish may owe much to Barbara Hepworth, but it is in this
quality of particular suggestion, no matter how ambiguous, that he is always
closer to Moore.
Like him, the reference is to natural and organic forms, but where Moore's
fundamental imaginative resource was the human, most especially the female
figure, Randall-Page looks more generally to nature. The reference is to
seeds and pods, fruit and cones, shells and fossils, visceral and serpentine
coils and extrusions, lips and pudenda.
The sexual connotations are inescapable, but more ambiguous than explicit
and entirely unprurient, the implicit celebration one more of generalised
fertility and growth than of any active sexuality. It is rather to the
archaic fertility fetish of the Willendorf Venus that the nod is given, than
to any Hellenistic or Renaissance image of perfection.
This oddly sacerdotal function of the work, overlaid with a sense of ritual
or purpose, albeit ambiguous and unspoken, is its strongest character. We
think at once of ancient standing-stones, of tombs and temples, and the
legends that accrue to them, of the hearths and thresholds, altars and
anvils of the gods, as it might be Wayland's Smithy or the Hele Stone.
It is by no mere opportunism that Randall-Page was a notable contributor to
that admirable organisation, Common Ground's 'New Milestones' project of a
year or two ago, nor that more recent monumental carvings should carry such
names as 'Font', 'Vessel', 'New Touchstone'.
He was a carver before ever he was a modeller, steeped in the craft, and is,
again like Moore, never so assured and consummate an artist as when working
directly on the stone. His carved objects, large and small alike, singly and
groups, are quite extraordinary, visitations from another imaginative world
that are yet deeply, unsuspectedly familiar - fruit of long-forgotten trees.
And they are very beautiful.
Peter Randall-Page - Sculpture and Drawings 1980-1992: Arnolfini Gallery,
Narrow Quay, and the Temple Church, Victoria Street, Bristol, until October
4. Organised by the Henry Moore Centre for the Study of Sculpture at Leeds
City Art Gallery
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4272</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQACOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Arts: Elisabeth
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MALCOLM RUTHERFORD
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IT IS rare to attend a musical where practically every song, every
scene-change is applauded and the audience stays behind for a good half an
hour at the end to show its enthusiasm. So it was at last week's first night
of Elisabeth at the Theater an der Wien in Vienna.
To be sure, there is something peculiarly Austrian about Elisabeth. She was
the wife of Franz Joseph, the last Austrian Emperor. She came from the
Wittelsbach family in Bavaria and perhaps had a touch of its legendary
madness. She did not take easily to the conventions of court life and for
much of the time lived apart from her husband. She was assassinated by an
Italian anarchist in Geneva in 1898.
At one level, there is a touch of banality. Much of the trouble seems to
have stemmed from her inability to get on with her mother-in-law. On the
other, she was a genuinely romantic figure.
Johann Strauss died shortly after Elisabeth was murdered and it was said
that an age of imperial splendour was sinking into twilight. Recently, there
has been an attempt to restore the musical tradition in modern form. This
consists of translating Sondheim and Lloyd Webber into German. Some of those
who saw Cats in Vienna said that it was the best production of the show they
have seen.
Elisabeth supplies the Austrian gloss and sugar. The lyrics and book are by
Michael Kunze and the music by Sylvester Levay, both of whom pioneered the
German-language work on Anglo-American musicals. Direction is by Harry
Kupfer of Bayreuth fame, so there is no shortage of experience.
No shortage of staging techniques either. The speed and variety of some of
the scene and costume changes are breathtaking: the depth and height of the
stage are used to the full. The principal device is a kind of suspension
bridge from which the figure of Death, who haunts Elisabeth from the start,
periodically descends.
Beneath is a symbolic drawbridge which can be transformed into a gondola.
Then suddenly the stage is cleared, as the peasants and workers begin to
revolt against a decrepit empire.
One point in the story is notably modern. The decline of the royal house is
hastened by the interest of the media. An old-fashioned news reel camera is
shown looking into the Hofburg: a huge red arrow pinpoints a particular room
just as it might in a tabloid photograph.
For the outsider, there is one fascinating insight. A late scene in
Elisabeth shows the rise of Austrian nationalism with the fascists on the
march. Although it is at least as well executed as any other piece of
choreography, it throws the audience into an embarrassed silence. It is the
only scene that is not applauded.
The musical influences come from all over the place, including Beethoven's
ninth symphony. Dramatically, there is a Brechtian influence in the figure
of Lucheni, Elisabeth's assassin. Dominant, however, is The Phantom of the
Opera, from which the figure of Death seems to be partly drawn. Played by
Uwe Kroger with flowing blond hair, this is a striking if melodramatic
performance: rather like the whole show - corny, but effective.
As Elisabeth, Pia Douwes does not quite show what a strange figure the
empress must have been. If you are in Vienna, you should see Elisabeth, for
it goes with the place: I am less certain that it would translate
successfully into English.
Theater an der Wien, Vienna 587 05 50
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4273</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQACNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Arts: Today's Television
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTOPHER DUNKLEY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IT IS difficult to believe that the wartime RAF movie The Way To The Stars
(6.00 BBC2) was made in my lifetime, since it seems part of a world long
lost in the mists of history, and yet it was - just. The evening ends with
an even better film which is four years older yet timeless: The Maltese
Falcon (11.20 BBC1). Bogart gives his best performance as Sam Spade, and
John Huston made a stunning debut as director.
In The Company Of Whales (9.00 C4) is a documentary in which conservationist
Roger Payne, who brought us the whales' 'songs', gives an update on the
global state of the whale and dolphin population. It seems like a saddening
story: the polluted oceans and a whale disease akin to Aids. Payne wonders
whether it is too late to save not only the whales but the very oceans.
The drama which follows, Gummed Labels (10.30), promises 'a bafflingly
convoluted plot' about the disappearance of a young girl, with her sister, a
detective, a psychiatrist, and a porn-movie director all looking for her.
'The audience becomes increasingly uncertain about where they are going and
who they are', we are told. Hmmm.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4274</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQACMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / People: Yurko is Siebe's heir-apparent
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Will Allen Yurko, yesterday revealed as the heir-apparent at controls
manufacturer Siebe, exhibit the same sureness of touch as Welshman Barrie
Stephens, who has inhabited the chief executive seat for the past 29 years?
'Any company that is dependent on one man has not been structured properly,'
says Stephens, who has taken sales from Pounds 370m to Pounds 1.6bn in the
past six years alone and presided over one of the few engineering companies
to continue to defy the ravages of recession.
The City has been awaiting confirmation of Stephens' promise at the time of
the half year results in June that his successor was in place.
At yesterday's AGM, he announced that he has picked Yurko, a 41-year-old
American who is president and chief operating officer of Siebe's temperature
and appliance controls division - 'a warrior' he says, which from Stephens,
64,with his reputation for boundless energy and toughness, is praise indeed.
Yurko moves to London next month, into the new position of managing director
and chief operating officer. Stephens says all reporting lines will then
filter into Yurko - save the chief financial officer who will continue to
report to him.
While Stephens, who took on the role of chairman in December 1990, says he
had intended to retire from his executive role this Christmas, his board has
'prevailed' upon him to defer his departure. At the end of 1993 Stephens
will step down as chief executive, but remain as non-executive chairman.
Born in Canada, into a family of Romanian and Ukrainian stock, Yurko has
been at Siebe in the US for the last three and a half years, joining the
main board in June 1991. He had earlier worked with Mueller Holdings and
Eaton Corporation.
*****
Steve Ireland, controller of regional programmes at TYNE TEES TELEVISION, is
appointed director of programmes on the resignation of Adrian Metcalfe.
Metcalfe becomes a programme consultant. James Lancaster, currently director
of resources, takes on the new position of deputy MD.
*****
Michael Marriott has been appointed company secretary of SUTCLIFFE SPEAKMAN
in place of Peter Norman.
*****
Gerry Arnold has been appointed director of sales of HOOVER EUROPE; he moves
from Unilever.
*****
Mark Gravatt (above), a senior consultant at Touche Ross, returns to Welton
Packaging, part of BOWATER, as finance director. He had been management
accountant at Welton from 1985-1987.
*****
Brian Baylis is the new chief executive of CHESSBOURNE INTERNATIONAL. He had
been chief executive of Dewhurst.
*****
Kevin Bryett has been promoted to MD of MERIEUX UK.
*****
Frank Cooper has been appointed engineering director of Smith Flow Control,
a HALMA subsidiary.
*****
Sir Dennis Landau, the recently retired chief executive of Co-operative
wholesale society, takes over this month as chairman of Unity Trust Bank,
the small bank set up by the CWS and a number of trade unions in 1984.  He
succeeds Terry Thomas, the managing director of Co-operative Bank, who is to
remain on the Unity Trust Board.  Co-op Bank currently owns about a third of
the equity of Unity Trust.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4275</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQACLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / People: Wolff leaves Rudolf Wolff
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
John Wolff is to leave Rudolf Wolff, the metal and commodity broker where he
is marketing director and which his family sold to Noranda, the Canadian
natural resources group in 1981.
His departure at the end of December means he also has to give up the
chairmanship of the London Metal Exchange, where he is the third member of
his family to hold an executive position in the management of the exchange
since his great-grandfather, Rudolf, helped to form it in 1877.
Wolff, now 52, joined the family company at the age of 18. He said
yesterday: 'When you have been brought up in an entrepreneurial family
company the changes involved in becoming part of a huge, public group - the
systems and planning - inevitably grate slightly.'
So, 'after a lot of hard thinking', he has decided the time has come to
go-it-alone. He is to provide investment advice and merchant banking
services on the metals business. 'I have been in the business for 32 years
and I will be selling my expertise to people who want to tap into it.'
The company also announced that Bill Harker, 52, who joined Wolff as
managing director from the Royal Trust, Canada's largest trust bank, in
January is to succeed Francis Holford as Wolff's chief executive with
responsibility for its direction and management. Holford, 54, who married
into the Wolff family, stays on as chairman.
John Wolff insisted last night there had been no row and that his departure
was amicable. 'You have only one life and I have decided I must get on and
change mine now.'
Observer, Page 23
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4276</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQACKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Business Law: Legal maze of Maastricht
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CELIA HAMPTON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
From a legal point of view, the Maastricht Treaty on European is rather a
mixed bag. Provisions on economic and monetary union in the treaty are of
immediate concern to governments and the money markets, but at this stage
they say little to lawyers or businessmen. This is also largely true of
provisions on foreign policy and home affairs.
One significant legal change is the entrenchment of 'subsidiarity' in the
text of the treaty. Changes to the rules on capital movements include power
to act collectively on inward investment into the Community. Of the
remaining legal provisions, three examples will serve to show what a maze
the treaty really is:
a new legislative method,
new Community objectives,
exclusion of the UK from the social agreement.
Only the first helps business in any way; the second and third will add
little or nothing to the coherence of Community law in principle or in
practice.
Legislative method is important for business because the parliament is the
most accessible channel for lobbying. The convoluted new procedure under
article 189b, giving the parliament the right ultimately to reject a
measure, is therefore a positive development.
A welcome improvement connected with this is the identification of the
correct legislative method for most of the treaty powers. Litigation
challenging the adoption of directives and regulations for having followed
the wrong path became an unnecessary burden on the Court after 1986 when the
Single European Act enhanced the parliament's role. If the ministers adopted
unanimous decisions when they could have voted by majority, they relegated
the parliament to its old role of bare consultation: its opinion had to be
sought but no notice had to be taken of what it said. The Court put this
right by insisting that the correct procedure be followed, though the effect
of an invalidated measure can be preserved pending proper adoption.
Examples of measures that will have to use the new procedure are 'single
market measures' under article 100a, rules on the free movement of workers,
the freedom to establish a business, and consumer protection. Examples for
the present co-operation procedure (which allows the Council of Ministers to
override the parliament's amendments only by unanimous vote) are rules on
health and safety at work, transport and the environment.
The Community's objectives under the new Article 3 have a hint of political
compromise about them. They are central to Community law because the
European Court refers to them when spelling out the meaning of more specific
rules. Moreover, they embody the goals for the EC countries' domestic
lawmaking and may influence the Court when deciding whether a national rule
is contrary to Community law.
The Maastricht treaty adds a number of new interests - immigration and
freedom of movement of non-EC nationals, the competitiveness of European
industry, trans-European networks, education and training, the 'flowering'
of national cultures, energy, civil protection and tourism. Economic and
social cohesion, research and development, the environment, health, consumer
protection and the fisheries policy are given full-blown status as
objectives. These are added to familiar items such as competition and the
free movement of people, goods, services and capital.
The different interests are accorded relative importance by a wide variety
of qualifying words. For example, cohesion and industry's competitiveness
are to be 'strengthened', R&amp;D is to be 'promoted', and the establishment and
development of networks are to be 'encouraged'. The negotiators seem to have
been nervous about health and consumer interests: the treaty will aim for
'contributions' to 'the attainment of a high level of health protection' and
'the strengthening of consumer protection'. For non-EC nationals and for
energy, civil protection and tourism, it will aim for 'measures'. The
environment is to be given a 'policy' in place of a requirement for
Community action.
The European Court will be called upon to give practical meaning to these
expressions. Some of them are little more than statements of good intent and
others simply empower the Community to act in a particular field.
For example, no indication of the type of action to be taken could be
implied from the Community's duty to take 'measures in the sphere of
energy'; nothing more seems to be said about energy in the treaty.
Interests that call for measures or a policy generally call also for action
by the Council of Ministers. The Court can give some effect to these,
provided a positive purpose can be identified, even if the ministers prove
unable to agree on what to do. How the Court would treat the need to make a
'contribution' remains to be seen.
An obviously troublesome item is industrial competitiveness. Admittedly, the
follow-up provision states that it may not be used as the basis for any
measure which could lead to a distortion of competition, so the Commission
will be able to continue its competition-based approach to mergers and
competition law generally.
It augurs badly in relation to issues where no clear-cut distortion of
competition is threatened. It could also weaken the hand of those
commissioners who take a sternly free-market view in arguments over
industrial subsidies. Although it might be possible to say that a
competitive company is one which has been made muscular by vigorous
competition on its home market, conventional wisdom would say that, to
compete internationally with US and Asian megaliths, a European enterprise
needs size and domestic market power.
Other ambiguities could arise. For example, could not a higher-than-normal
health precaution in one EC country be said to 'contribute to the attainment
of a high level of health protection'? Could the more protective country
justify its standards on, say, the labelling of pharmaceutical products,
even though other countries considered such precautions unnecessary?
Again, does 'culture' include national cuisine? If so, could the name of a
dish be culturally protected despite the present rules confining protection
quite strictly to geographical origin?
These riddles may prove simple compared with those resulting from the
partial implementation of the treaty. The UK's refusal to sign the the
agreement on employment law will dilute the uniform, mandatory nature of
Community law and confuse UK businesses that are active in other EC
countries.
The present articles 117-122 of the Treaty remain almost unchanged. Article
118a allows directives to be issued on the health and safety of workers, and
article 119 directly requires equal pay for equal work by men and women.
These overlap some of the issues covered by the social agreement between the
other 11 countries (for example, equality of the sexes in treatment at
work). The agreement also restates article 119, but with an addition
allowing advantages to be granted in favour of women to compensate for
disadvantages in their careers. This safeguard against wayward claims of
discrimination by men will not be available to UK employers.
On their own, the legal divergences between EC countries caused by this
schism might be manageable. They have, however, to be combined with whatever
compromise is reached with Denmark, which rejected the Maastricht treaty but
is still a full member of the Community, and with the extension of Community
law to the Efta countries up to the date of signature of the EEA Agreement
(May 2 1992).
Dealings in other European countries will not be made any easier by having
to refer to several different Community laws. The business traveller's
overnight bag will more than ever need to include a lawyer.
The author is executive editor of Financial Times Business Law Brief.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4277</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQACJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / People: Pinches on phone to DTI
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Mike Pinches, managing director of Orbitel, the mobile communications
manufacturer owned by the Vodafone group and Sweden's Ericsson, is being
seconded to the Department of Trade and Industry at the beginning of next
month.
He will act as an industrial adviser to the division of the department which
deals with posts and telecommunications, and will initially produce a report
on the international competitiveness of the UK mobile communications
manufacturing industry.
The secondment is seen as an instance of the closer co-operation between
government and industry being instituted by Michael Heseltine, president of
the Board of Trade.
Pinches has been at Orbitel for five and a half years and is being replaced
as managing director by David Sims, currently managing director of Meggitt
Electronic Components, a subsidiary of Meggitt, the engineering group.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4278</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQACIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Technology: Safer plug for electric appliances
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By TIM BURT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A new invention could mark the death knell of one of the most tedious chores
in the British home - the fiddly pursuit of fitting a plug to an electric
appliance.
Long regarded as the basic test of any do-it-yourself enthusiast, the
standard electrical plug has been the downfall of many budding electricians,
often with tragic consequences. Twenty-eight people were electrocuted in
their homes in 1990 and a further 2,000 treated in hospital as a result of
wrongly-wired appliances.
Concern at the dangers this year prompted the government to announce
legislation - due to come into effect next summer - requiring manufacturers
to fit plugs to domestic appliances.
In turn, the manufacturers have increased calls for a fail-safe plug which
can be fitted quickly and easily, thus protecting them against insurance
claims for faulty wiring and avoiding increased labour costs involved in
fitting appliances.
The result is the Rotaplug: a plug wired in seconds - without a screwdriver
 -which has passed the stringent British Standard tests and is about to be
launched on the UK market.
Hugh Gilbert, the designer, claims the invention could revolutionise the
methods used to connect electrical appliances and envisages strong demand.
More than 60m plugs are sold each year in the UK.
His design is simple. The wires of the appliance are inserted into a socket
at the base of the three-pin plug. The whole centre of the plug, where the
pins protrude, twists through 90 degrees locking the wires into place.
The fuse is fitted in a separate pop-up container and can be replaced
without opening the plug or exposing the wires.
The plug, which can be wired in less than 10 seconds, has taken about seven
years to develop. 'The Rotaplug is aimed at both the retail and the
appliance manufacturers market,' says Gilbert.
'The appeal to appliance manufacturers is partly due to the significantly
decreased labour costs in fitting the plug, but also providing consumers
with the flexibility of a plug that can easily be unwired and refitted.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4279</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQACHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Technology: Acquiring new tricks - Geof Wheelwright
describes how the humble fax machine has become an indispensable part of the
office
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By GEOFF WHEELWRIGHT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Since the facsimile machine first started to become a popular business tool
in the early 1980s, it has changed out of all proportion. Once a slow and
limited form of sending documents from one place to another over the phone
line, it has become the heart of many office data and telecommunications
operations.
A number of important functions have given the humble fax machine much
greater responsibility. These include:
Corporate document management. When you circulate copies of a document
around the country using the postal system or even a company's interbranch
mail system, you can never guarantee exactly when the document has been sent
and when it will arrive. With a fax machine, you can not only be sure that a
copy of your document arrives moments after it is sent, but the built-in
'log' facility on most modern fax machines will automatically track which
documents were sent, how many pages were in each document and when it was
successfully received.
Telephone management. Most modern fax machines incorporate a number of
telephony functions. These include the ability to determine whether an
incoming call is from another fax machine or a voice call, unattended
answering of voice calls using an 'answering machine' mode, storage of large
numbers of telephone numbers in the fax machine's internal memory and
allowing the fax machine to double as a standard business telephone.
Personal photocopying. Surprising as it may seem, fax machines are generally
cheaper than photocopiers. For this reason many smaller enterprises use the
'copy' function of their fax machine to prevent laying out unnecessary cash
for costly and more bulkier photocopy machines.
Personal computer connectivity. Upmarket fax machines are starting to
snuggle up to PCs. Major telecoms manufacturers such as Panasonic now offer
computer interfaces at the back of their machines.
These computer interfaces allow PCs to control the operation of the fax
machine and hook up via a parallel or serial port. The software which
usually comes with such PC connections allows the fax machine to act as a
'printing' device so that anything generated on the PC's screen can be sent
as a fax. Anything received on the fax can either be printed out or saved as
an image file on the PC.
Using some innovative software from Xerox, you can even use a fax machine to
give instructions to a PC. Known as PaperWorks, this software operates by
having you fax a special form to your computer containing details of what
you want it to do. The computer will then act accordingly on the
instructions - which would most commonly be to fax back information stored
on the computer itself.
It is designed for people who often need to get at the information on their
desktop computer, but do not want the encumbrance or cost of carrying a
portable PC around with them when they travel. Xerox expects the system to
have great appeal for people who are self-employed and work from home.
Meanwhile, computers and fax machines are converging into one single system
in many cases - eliminating the need for a dedicated fax machine altogether.
The simplest example of this is a fax machine that uses PC and laser or ink
jet technologies to produce what are called 'plain paper' faxes. These are
ordinary fax machines with slightly more processing power and the ability to
produce faxes on plain plain, rather than the thermal paper used in most
machines.
The second category of computer integration comes with fax devices that hook
up to PC laser printers. These are miniature PCs in their own right but are
dedicated solely to the purpose of handling faxes.
JetFax's JetFax II, for example, will hook up to any Hewlett-Packard
LaserJet or compatible laser printer and allow you to print incoming faxes
out on the laser printer or send anything generated on-screen as a fax.
HP has its own fax attachment, known as the LaserJet Fax, which does the
same thing but allows you to send ordinary paper documents as faxes along
with anything generated on screen.
If you have little need for a printer, there is a huge variety of fax modems
which will accomplish the same task - and many start for as little as Pounds
150.
These are generally Hayes-compatible internal modems which come with fax
'send and receive' software. They allow you to fax documents directly from
the PC which you would normally print out on a printer, and also take
whatever is received from a standard fax machine and turn it into a computer
graphics file that can be incorporated into other documents.
According to a recent study by Norwell, Massachusetts-based BIS Strategic
Decisions, 1991 fax modem sales in the US exceeded 500,000 units - more than
double the number sold in the previous year. BIS says that fax modems
currently make up 13 per cent of all fax products sold and predicts that
modem sales will rise to 47 per cent of all fax products sold by 1995.
Meanwhile, leading California-based market research firm Dataquest predicts
that 8m fax modems will be installed by 1995 - something like five times the
number in use today. By then the value of annual sales will reach Dollars
1.1bn.
All of this has Intel Corporation - which has a strong business selling fax
modems in North America - optimistic about the future of the technology.
'The conventional modem capable only of handling data is a dying breed,'
says Dick Gough, desktop enhancements business unit manager for Intel's PC
enhancement division. 'Today's users expect data and fax functionality when
they buy a modem.'
The only area where fax modems really fall down is that they are not ideal
for transmitting documents that you did not create on the computer. If, for
example, your lawyer faxes over a document which needs a signature, you will
have a hard time providing that with an on-screen copy of the fax.
The short message is that although fax machines, printers, scanners and
computers are fast coming together - they are not quite there yet. And
before you decided to junk your traditional fax machine in favour of a
PC-based alternative, take a long hard look at what you expecting it to do
first.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4280</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQACGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Technology: Getting heated about insurance - Technically
Speaking
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID LASCELLES
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
LIKE many people who buy home computers knowing little about technology, I
was persuaded to sign up for an extended warranty policy to cover repairs
once the original guarantee ran out. It turned out to be a costly mistake -
though I also learnt that there is a remedy.
In my case, the two-year policy was from Restart, an insurance package sold
by Dixons, the retailers, for which I paid Pounds 182. This entitled me to
have a repairman call at my home within 24 hours. I use my computer a lot as
a word processor and as a remote terminal for the FT's computer and
database, so I need this reassurance.
For the first 18 months, everything was fine. But last November the screen
started bouncing up and down. The problem got so bad that I decided to call
in Restart. Within 24 hours, as promised, a man came from ACT, the servicing
firm which carries out the work for Restart. He took one look at the screen.
'It's too close to a radiator,' he said. 'It should be all right if you move
it away.'
That was all. He spent the next quarter of an hour using my phone to fix up
new appointments, and left. I thought that was the end of it. But two months
later I received a letter from a company called London General Holdings
which, it turned out, were the underwriters on the insurance policy. Their
claims assessor, Michael Springer, said they would not pay up because the
policy 'does not include coverage of faults that are caused by a wilful act
or neglect or failure to follow the manufacturer's instructions'.
He enclosed ACT's bill for Pounds 130 and told me to pay up. I was, to put
it mildly, flabbergasted.
I searched the operating manual for an instruction to keep the computer away
from a radiator but could not find one. So I wrote to Springer asking him to
direct me to it. He wrote back: 'I cannot give a precise reference in your
manufacturer's operating instructions where you are advised to install your
computer away from a heat source.' In other words, he could not support the
reason for rejecting my claim. I then wrote to his boss asking him what
wilful act or neglect I had perpetrated. He was unable to substantiate that
charge either.
I was obviously at an impasse, and ACT was writing impatient letters asking
for payment. But I was determined not to let the matter rest.
To cut a long story short, I complained to the Insurance Ombudsman who
arbitrates in disputes between insurance companies and their customers. I
sent him copies of all my correspondence, and he agreed to look into my
case. After about three months, I received a brief letter from Springer
saying that 'as advised by the Insurance Ombudsman' he was settling my
claim.
It was a sweet victory, but not, I have to say, one that surprised me. The
case put up by London General (which despite its name is a subsidiary of
Chicago-based Aon Corporation) was obviously weak, and the long
correspondence I had with them yielded little but their repeated assertions
that I had misinterpreted their policy.
I gather from ACT that my problem with London General was not an isolated
one: many customers received bills for Pounds 130, and complained. Since
then, Restart has switched to different underwriters, which suggests that
there were deeper problems in the relationship as well. (Springer declined
to make any comment for this article.)
For me, the case exposed worrying differences in understanding over the
purpose of an extended warranty contract. If I pay a lot of money for a
policy to have a repairman call, I do not expect to be told two months later
that the call was not justified.
Policies should either be more clearly written, or policyholders should be
advised beforehand that there is a risk that the insurance company will
reject the claim, and the cost that entails.
The Insurance Ombudsman obviously has some sympathy with this view. But I
have not renewed the policy.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4281</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQACFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Management (In a Nutshell): Looking to Europe for growth
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The UK is to host a small firms conference as part of its presidency of the
European Community. The conference, Gateways to Growth, will be held at the
International Convention Centre, Birmingham on October 29 and 30.
Participants will include small business owners, organisations which support
and advise them and government officials from EC member states.
Contact Small Firms Division, DTI. Tel 0742 593770.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4282</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQACEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Management (In a Nutshell): Piece of the action in the
Italian job
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Four hundred small and medium-sized Italian companies will be looking for
links with businesses in other parts of the European Community at
Europartenariat Mezzogiorno, in the southern Italian city of Bari on
December 3 and 4.
Non-Italian companies will be able to book private meetings with local
companies seeking links including distribution agreements and technology
transfer deals.
Introductory seminars will be held around the UK later this month and in
October. The event is organised by the European Commission.
Contact Business Briefing Consultants. Tel 0444 416678.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4283</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQACDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Management (In a Nutshell): Library directory is just the
ticket
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
A comprehensive guide to the business information available in public and
academic libraries is to be published by the Business Information Network
(BIN), an association of libraries and other information providers.
The Directory of Members, to be launched later this month, will include
information on the availability of statistics, trade journals and on-line
services. The network, set up last year, now has 60 members in the UK as
well as contacts with libraries in Denmark and Czechoslovakia.
The directory costs Pounds 150 including four quarterly updates.
Contact BIN, 25 Southampton Buildings, London WC2A 1AW.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4284</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQACCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Management (The Growing Business): Cashing in on a good
relationship with the bank manager
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHARLES BATCHELOR
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Many business owners no doubt imagined that the worst would be over by now
but still find themselves mired in the recession. Tight financial controls
and good relations with the bank manager are more than ever important for
survival, writes Charles Batchelor.
A 10-point plan of corporate survival has been devised by Business Banking
Review (BBR)*, a specialist consultancy.
Make sure that the way you present financial information to the bank is of a
high standard. It is no longer adequate to provide the numbers on the back
of a cigarette packet.
Keep your management accounting up to date so that you can raise funds
quickly to take advantage of bargains created by the recession. BBR came
across three companies which missed profitable opportunities because they
could not provide the numbers to raise the money quickly enough.
Forecast and monitor cash flow on a weekly or even daily basis.
Check the terms and renewal dates of bank facilities and make sure that your
bank's reporting requirements are being met. Plan carefully the negotiating
position you will take at the next renewal meeting.
Maximise cash flow by reducing stocks and keeping a tight control of
debtors. Cut costs where possible and dispose of surplus assets.
Review the profitability and cash generation capability of each part of your
business. An activity may be making a profit but at the same time swallowing
large amounts of cash.
Maintain good communications with your bank manager. If there is bad news,
make sure the bank knows but ensure you have a plan to put things right.
Make sure you get a facility letter from your bank to cover any financing
you have arranged. Check its contents to see it matches what you have agreed
verbally. Sign it and return it to your bank.
One company borrowed Pounds 1m from its bank to finance the purchase of a
factory site over 20 years but signed a facility letter which allowed the
bank to force repayment 'on demand'. Since the land could not be sold at
short notice it had effectively given the bank control of its business.
If necessary seek outside advice. New structures, facilities or institutions
can often solve apparently impossible problems.
Broaden the range of financial products and sources of finance you use.
Businesses frequently make use of only a limited number of the available
financing options.
*Gota House, 70-74 Cannon Street, London EC4N 6AE. Tel 071 528 8530.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4285</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQACBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Management (The Growing Business): Legal advisers go on
trial - Solicitors are trying to make themselves more accessible to
entrepreneurs
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHARLES BATCHELOR
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
The need for an audit ensures that most business owners are familiar with
accountants. But with no regulatory requirement to employ a solicitor,
businessmen and women frequently regard the legal profession with distrust
and incomprehension.
Only 14 per cent of small businesses made regular use of a lawyer, according
to a survey by the Small Business Research Trust. A further 78 per cent made
occasional use of solicitors but most small business owners remained
extremely cautious in their dealings with the law.
'People don't want to consult a solicitor because they are worried about the
cost, the time it will take and a fear that they won't get a clear answer,'
says Hugh Elder, litigation partner at London solicitors Gordon Dadds.
The legal profession has responded with schemes intended to make the law
more accessible to the small business owner. The Law Society runs a Lawyers
for Enterprise scheme which puts business people in touch with a local
solicitor and provides a free introductory half hour of advice. More than
half of the questions handled by the 2,500 solicitors in the scheme relate
to business start-ups.
The Institute of Directors (IOD) provides free legal advice to members as
part of its business advisory service. It handles about 50 legal queries a
month, half relating to employment issues. The Federation of Small
Businesses (FSB) has a phone-in legal advice line which is extensively used
by its 50,000 members.
Small business owners may want to start their search for a lawyer through
one of the directories to the legal profession. These vary in their
usefulness to the business reader - some are intended more for lawyers or
aspirant lawyers - but one, The Legal 500, is subtitled The Client's Guide
to UK Law Firms. It lists law firms by region and by specialism.
The directories may provide a start but personal recommendation probably
remains the most common method of finding a law firm.
It needs, however, to be backed up by visits, preferably to two or three
firms, to compare the service they offer. These visits will not be charged
for. 'If you don't know a firm, say you want to meet one of the partners for
half an hour,' says Vincent O'Callaghan, commercial and litigation partner
at the London firm of Davies Arnold Cooper. 'You will soon see if they are
any good and whether they have the necessary expertise.'
'Most solicitors would be happy to talk to a prospective client so he can
assess how they would handle things, who would be involved, what they would
charge and whether they were the right size of firm,' explains Elder. 'If a
small company goes to a large firm of solicitors, it is likely to find that
its affairs are dealt with by a junior member of staff.'
Large companies frequently entrust their legal affairs to several different
specialist firms though most small businesses would be better off
establishing a long-term relationship with one law firm.
The better the solicitor knows their business, the more useful the legal
advice can be. But companies should beware of keeping their legal affairs
with a solicitor if the nature or scale of their business changes and their
original lawyer is no longer appropriate.
Finding a lawyer is only the start. It is equally important to manage the
relationship. Many businesses are poor at this and end up paying too much or
obtaining a less efficient service.
Responsibility for dealing with the lawyers should be allocated to one
person in the company, advises Elder. This might be the company secretary,
finance director or, in the smaller company, the managing director. This
prevents confusion over who has said what to the lawyer and means the lawyer
does not run up large bills telling the same story to several different
people.
If the company has called in a lawyer to handle a dispute, then it is best
not to make the manager most closely involved responsible for dealing with
the solicitor. The manager will be too close to the issue, may want to
protect his or her position and may not prove an objective intermediary.
A solicitor will normally be happy to give advice over the phone if the
matter is simple and all the background is known, says Elder. But it does
not make sense to attempt to handle a long-running, complex issue by
telephone. Messages may not be passed on to all the people involved and
there may be arguments later over who said what. Better to write, fax or
meet.
Businessmen cannot be expected to discuss every contract with their lawyer
before signing but if a deal is unusual, valuable enough to damage the
company if something went wrong, or is carried out under the other party's
terms and conditions, then it makes sense to check with your lawyer, says
Elder.
It is best to involve the lawyer at an early stage before a dispute arises
or before relationships with the customer or supplier have broken down
irretrievably.
Businesses frequently do not provide proper instructions or proper
documentation to their lawyers. The company and its lawyer need to agree a
common strategy and the company must then provide all the information to
help the lawyer. Trickling out documents over a period of weeks or months
means the lawyer cannot take early action.
Companies are sometimes reluctant to give their lawyer access to an employee
who has already made a statement to the company or who works in a far-flung
location.
But the lawyer frequently needs to speak directly to the employee involved
to find out what happened.
The client must get the solicitor to provide an estimate of costs. They
should agree in advance the likely overall cost or the hourly fee - though
it is difficult to forecast litigation expenses - and the client should
insist on receiving quarterly or even monthly bills.
Regular bills not only avoid unpleasant surprises, but they are a reminder
of the cost of pursuing a particular action.
'It is sometimes difficult to tell a client who has got the bit between his
teeth when to stop,' says O'Callaghan.
Clients sometimes forget that going to court should be the last resort and
that a settlement may make more commercial sense.
Finally, says Elder, don't hand over the decision-making to your lawyer. He
or she is there to give advice but not to decide whether the risk of a
particular course of action is worth taking.
'If you rely too much on lawyers you would never do anything,' he says.
Useful contacts and reading. Lawyers for Enterprise. Tel 071 405 9075. IOD
Tel 071 839 1233. FSB Tel 071 928 9272.
The Legal 500. By John Pritchard. Legalease. Tel 071 286 1890. Pounds 39.
The Barclays Guide to Law for the Small Business. By Stephen Lloyd. Basil
Blackwell. Pounds 7.95.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4286</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQACAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Small decline reported in rate of company failures
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW JACK
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THERE IS little prospect of UK economic recovery before spring next year
according to figures on business failures released yesterday by Trade
Indemnity, the trade credit insurer.
The number of companies becoming insolvent in the second quarter of this
year was 1,911 compared with 2,074 in the first quarter, a drop of 8 per
cent. They stood at 1,969 in the second quarter last year.
But Mr Clive Brand, senior economist with Trade Indemnity, warned that the
decline was minimal and had been predicted by the company since July last
year.
'We should not read too much into it,' he said. 'The trend is fairly stable
for the year as a whole. We can take some encouragement that failures appear
to have levelled off. There will be no recovery until next spring at the
very earliest.'
He estimated that failures in 1993 would be 10 per cent lower than this
year, although the improvement could be jeopardised by any interest rate
rise.
The figures show the number of failures among the companies that are
customers of the more than 5,000 clients for which Trade Indemnity writes
insurance.
Failures were greatest in the building and construction sector, in
engineering and metals and retail and wholesale distribution. They were
lowest in chemicals, food and agriculture.
The west Midlands secured the greatest reduction in failures compared with
the previous quarter while figures continued to rise in the north of England
and Scotland.
The statistics echo the pessimism of Trade Indemnity's most recent quarterly
financial trends survey which suggested that 31 per cent of companies are
working at less than half capacity.
The business review said that extended payment was a big cause of concern,
although the situation had not deteriorated any further during the last
quarter. Domestic invoices are being paid on average 26 days late and export
invoices 28 days late.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4287</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAB9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / DTI gains Pounds 62m insolvency spin-off: Figures show rise
in bankruptcies and liquidations
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW JACK
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE government generated Pounds 62m in fees and income from interest last
year from the assets of insolvent companies and individuals, the annual
report of the Insolvency Service showed yesterday.
The unaudited figures appear in the accounts for the year to March 31 from
the Insolvency Service, an executive agency of the Department of Trade and
Industry under the government's Next Steps initiative.
Net income from interest on the proceeds of assets held in the Insolvency
Services Investment Account totalling Pounds 27m was retained by the agency
in 1991-92. That compared with Pounds 26m last year.
The agency paid the DTI fee income of Pounds 20m generated from accounts
held on behalf of insolvency practitioners and Pounds 16m from charges
levied by the official receivers. That compares with Pounds 16m and Pounds
8m respectively in the previous year.
Receipts into the official insolvency service account - in which all
realisations of assets from bankruptcies and liquidations must be held under
UK law - were Pounds 397m in 1991-92 compared with Pounds 329m in 1990-91.
The agency's costs rose by 15 per cent to Pounds 56.9m last year, including
a 14 per cent increase in staff costs to Pounds 30.8m.
Mr Peter Joyce, inspector general and chief executive of the service, said
the growing number of cases meant that the maintenance even of minimum
standards of case administration had 'proved increasingly difficult'.
There were 26,186 bankruptcies and 8,911 compulsory liquidations in 1991-92.
That compared with 14,359 and 6,777 respectively in the previous year, and a
projected estimate for bankruptcies and liquidations of 20,500.
The number of cases forwarded to the courts to rule on disqualifying or
prosecuting directors and bankrupts rose as a proportion of all cases
considered by the service.
Mr Joyce said this was the result of increased targeting and recent case law
which had clarified the circumstances under which courts were prepared to
take action.
Four insolvency practitioners and two managers were convicted of criminal
offences during the year. A further five professionals had been charged and
were awaiting trial.
Report available from: John Griffiths, The Insolvency Service, Room 706,
Bridge Place, 88-89 Eccleston Square, London SW1V 1PT.
Observer, Page 23
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4288</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAB8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Valleys scheme condemned
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANTHONY MORETON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE VALLEYS programme launched four years ago to revitalise the economic and
social life of south Wales has failed, according to a paper to be presented
to a Labour party conference in Neath tomorrow.
Mr Kevin Morgan and Mr Adam Price of the University of Wales College of
Cardiff, say the Pounds 800m funding was largely recycled money and had not
tackled the core problems. They call the scheme 'essentially a marketing
exercise'.
'Some of the problems the programme sought to address are as bad now as when
the initiative was launched.' New priorities are needed if south Wales is to
prosper after the recession, they argue.
Mr Morgan and Mr Price call for a firm political commitment to the
industrial valleys for the creation of a balanced economy - the valleys must
not be seen merely as commuter belts for the M4 corridor between Newport and
Llanelli.
They say the programme 'has done nothing to temper the decline in regional
policy expenditure, nothing to prevent the attrition in government support
for the the training and enterprise councils and nothing to alleviate the
chronic financial weaknesses of local government in the valleys.' The aim of
reducing unemployment by between 25,000 and 30,000 has been rendered
'hopelessly unrealistic' by the recession.
Rebuilding our Communities, University of Wales College of Cardiff, CF1 3YN.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4289</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAB7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Ambulance trust bid wins backing
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRIS TIGHE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
PROPOSALS by Durham ambulance service to become a self-governing trust next
April won the backing of the Northern Regional Health Authority yesterday
even though the Northumbria service, already a trust, had proposed a merger
with the Durham and Cleveland services.
The health authority, which described the Durham application as sound from a
financial and management point of view, was also influenced by strong
support during the public consultation for Durham's proposal.
A spokesman for the authority said that it did not feel this was an
appropriate time to consider merger plans, although it could not rule out
such a move in the future.
It said it did not have the information to comment on the validity of
Northumbria Ambulance Service's claim that its proposed merger with Durham
and Cleveland would save Pounds 2.4m a year without cuts in provision.
Durham's application was among 11 approved by the authority yesterday; all
will go to Mrs Virginia Bottomley, health secretary, for her endorsement.
Cumbria ambulance service was another of the 11.
The Durham decision follows more than a year's speculation over the
service's future.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4290</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAB6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / River Tees between Stockton and Middlesbrough diverted
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRIS TIGHE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE River Tees between Stockton and Middlesbrough was diverted yesterday as
part of the construction work on the Pounds 47m Tees barrage, Chris Tighe
writes.
An earthbank 'plug' edging the river was removed by excavator, allowing the
water to gush into a newly built 400- metre navigation channel through which
it will flow until the barrage is completed in two years.
Next week an upstream 'plug' will be also be removed, completing the
temporary diversion of the river at a point where it is more than 60 metres
wide. The changed course of the river will allow Tarmac, the contractors for
the barrage, to drain the riverbed and build the barrage in the dry.
Mr John Franklin, Tarmac project manager, said: 'It's very unusual to divert
a river of this magnitude. Normally you don't have enough room beside a
river to divert it.'
The diverting of the Tees was financially viable, he added, because a
navigation channel is part of the scheme.
The project, funded by the Teesside Development Corporation, will raise the
level of the Tees at Stockton, covering mudflats, creating leisure
facilities and providing a new road crossing. It will also feed canals cut
through the adjacent Teesdale site, scene of Mrs Thatcher's celebrated 'walk
in the wilderness' in 1987 and now targeted by the TDC for Pounds 500m
public and private investment.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4291</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAB5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / The answer might just be blowing in the wind: The long
search for a cure to 'sick buildings'
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CATHERINE MILTON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
DUST from insulation used in most air-conditioned offices has been strongly
linked to 'sick building syndrome', the flu-like symptoms which afflict
thousands of office workers.
US scientists claim to have found a significant link between a single
physical factor and the problems reported by staff. The factor is said to be
a particular type of man-made mineral fibre used in non-domestic insulation
products.
The World Health Organisation estimates that 'sick building syndrome'
affects a third of offices in Europe and north America.
Dr Alan Hedge, who led the study of nine large private-sector buildings at
the design and environmental analysis department of Cornell University in
New York said: 'It is now clear that there is a link between mineral fibres
in ceiling tiles and ventilation ducts common to air-conditioned buildings.'
Construction analysts say products which use man-made mineral fibres account
for 65 per cent to 70 per cent of the insulation market in Europe and that
the figure is likely to be higher in north America.
However, Mr Charles Rossiter, London University's emeritus professor of
occupational health, said: 'I have serious reservations about the
conclusions in the paper based on the information in the working draft.' All
non-domestic insulation products which used man-made mineral fibres would
contain some superfine man-made mineral fibres. The proportions could vary
from as much as 40 per cent or 50 per cent to less than 1 per cent.
Several large manufacturers of non-domestic insulation denied that their
products use man-made mineral fibres and questioned the scientific basis of
the study.
Dr Hedge said man-made mineral fibres were unlikely to be the sole cause of
the symptoms of the syndrome, which include eye, nose, throat and skin
irritation, as well as coughing, sneezing and breathing difficulties.
Dr Leslie Hawkins, director of the occupational health service at Surrey
University's Robens Institute, said the study may have identified an
important factor. But he stressed that identifying a single cause or cure
for the syndrome was unlikely.
Man-made mineral fibres are produced by spinning molten rock or glass into
fine fibres which are then woven into thick insulating 'blankets'. These are
used to line ceiling tiles and ventilation ducts.
Dr Hedge says: 'Only when the fibres are mechanically disturbed is there a
danger of fibres being released into the air. As the building starts to age,
and work is done on the building, the problem begins.'
He said the identification of insulation fibres as strongly linked to 'sick
building syndrome' fitted the history of the syndrome which was first widely
reported in the 1970s. He pointed to the introduction of computer terminals
and changes in the design of air-conditioning which allowed minerals into
ventilation systems.
Computer operators report 'sick building syndrome' more often than other
workers. That may be because terminals attract dust which settles on the
faces of the operators.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4292</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAB4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Doubts rise over pit by pit coal sale
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALISON SMITH
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
PRIVATISATION of British Coal on a pit by pit basis is emerging as the
least-favoured option in the government's plans to sell the industry.
Ministers have doubts about the viability of individual pits taking on
contracts they might later be unable to fulfil.
There is also concern that National Power and PowerGen, the electricity
generators, would have an unfair advantage if they were negotiating with a
number of small individual companies.
While the present board of British Coal would like the industry privatised
intact, there are pressures on the government to privatise it in regional
units, providing greater flexibility than if the industry were left as a
single entity, even in the private sector.
Moreover, a suitable buyer for the corporation as a whole might be hard to
find.
Ministers emphasise that no final decisions have been taken about the form
in which the industry would be sold. Nothing could be decided anyway until
agreement was reached on the contracts between British Coal and the
electricity generators which will come into effect in April.
Mr Tim Eggar, then energy minister, said earlier this year that he hoped
agreement could be reached before the House of Commons dispersed in July,
but ministers are now more wary of setting a deadline.
The new contracts will inevitably be less advantageous to the industry than
those now in force. Those agreements, put in place by the government before
the electricity industry was privatised two years ago, enable British Coal
to earn almost all its money through selling 65m tonnes of coal a year to
the generators at artificially high prices.
The shape of the industry will be critically affected by the scale of the
reduction in amounts that the corporation is able to sell to the generators.
The volume of coal in the contracts is expected to be 45m tonnes in the
first year, falling to 30m in the third year and possibly less after that.
Estimates of the size of a slimmer industry range from 10 to 30 of the
existing 50 pits. Both the government and British Coal have said they are
keen to privatise the largest possible viable industry.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4293</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAB3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Some teenagers 'paid 90p an hour'
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LISA WOOD, Labour Staff
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SCHOOL-LEAVERS, who since 1986 have not been covered by minimum wage
legislation, are working for as little as 90p an hour, the Greater
Manchester Low Pay Unit said yesterday.
The survey was compiled because parents had complained to the unit about the
jobs their children were obliged to accept.
The unit said youngsters faced pressure to accept poorly paid jobs because
the alternatives were bleak, particularly as there were waiting lists for
Youth Training places.
'Those unable to get a Youth Training place or a better job face poverty
and/or dependence on friends and family,' the unit said. 'Income support is
no longer available to most 16 and 17 year-olds.
'They are not entitled to claim unemployment benefit, and child benefit for
young people leaving full-time education this summer will be payable only
until January 3 next year.'
Examples of low pay cited by the unit included:
A 16-year-old youth from Stockport who worked a 50-hour-week in a
supermarket for Pounds 1.40 an hour. The adult legal minimum for food shops
is Pounds 3.08p an hour.
A 16-year-old youth from Wigan whose 47 1/2 -hour week in a garage earned
him Pounds 1.26 an hour.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4294</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAB2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Faith in City churches faces a financial test - Alan Pike
considers the challenge posed by empty pews
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALAN PIKE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A YEAR ago a building-site crane collapsed through the roof of the Wren
church of St James Garlickhythe in the City of London, uncannily following
the path of a Second World War bomb. Therefore painstaking restoration work
had to start yet again.
Neither cranes nor bombs have managed to destroy St James and nearly 40
other famous churches in the Square Mile. The churches may, however, prove
less resistant to a modest document produced by Dr David Hope, bishop of
London, on the future of the Church of England in the diocese.
Some of Dr Hope's Victorian predecessors are remembered for the many new
churches they opened in the diocese. Dr Hope's term will almost certainly
lead to church closures, the result of shifts in population, fewer
worshippers and cost pressures.
There are, he says, 'too many church buildings for our needs either now or
into the future'.
This assessment - true in many parts of the country - is uniquely valid in
the City where, in addition to St Paul's Cathedral, there is a church for
about every 100 members of the tiny resident population. Fewer than 5,000
people live in the City today compared with well over 100,000 in the middle
of the last century.
The Church of England is no more immune from recessionary and financial
pressures than commercial organisations. The Church Commissioners, who are
responsible for the church's main investments, have warned that the
proportion of clergy stipends met from investment income will decline from
45 per cent to as little as 30 per cent by 1995. They foresee little growth
in their investment income, while other costs such as clergy pensions are
expected to rise.
Dr Hope wants to make the London diocese, which has an annual bill for
clergy pay of Pounds 7.5m, capable of paying stipends without any support
from the Church Commissioners. Where a parish is unable to contribute
adequately to the funding process there should, he says, be an assessment of
its future. It might become part of a 'larger unit' or, if it is carrying
out important work, be designated a mission area with special support from
central funds.
The bishop's strategy document proposes a survey of all churches in the
diocese, leading to decisions on how many and which buildings are needed.
Decisions on church closures are often controversial. Proposals in the
Liverpool diocese to reduce the number of inner-city parishes and close
seven churches have provoked an outcry.
The diocese of London faces a particularly delicate task with the
historically and architecturally famous City churches.
Dr Hope has asked Lord Templeman, a law lord, to chair a diocesan commission
on the City churches. A judge is an apt choice: there is little argument
about the architectural merits of the churches - the issue is one of
judgment about their future viability.
If the Church of England's present needs were the only factor taken into
account by the commission, it would be easy for it to conclude that the
Square Mile contains about three dozen churches surplus to requirements.
The population of 5,000 is scarcely enough to justify a single Anglican
parish church elsewhere in the country. While they minister to the City's
huge weekday working population, many of the churches do not hold Sunday
services and lack regular congregations. Frequently well-endowed by ancient
charitable foundations, their incumbents attract uncharitable comments from
fellow clergy for being protected from the reality of modern church life.
None of this, however, helps to determine what should happen to the
buildings, which include the handful of medieval City churches that survived
the Great Fire of London in 1666, and the equally small handful of Wren
churches to have survived the Blitz intact.
The Church Commissioners will make the final decisions on the future of
Anglican buildings that are no longer needed. Since 1969, decisions have
been reached on 1,317 churches. Some 55 per cent have been converted to
alternative use, such as low-cost housing and art centres. A further 23 per
cent have been demolished and 22 per cent preserved in their existing form
with financial support from the Redundant Churches Fund, financed jointly by
the Church and the government.
Whatever ideas the commission produces for the City churches, it is unlikely
to regard the crane at St James Garlickhythe as a divinely-inspired hint and
propose knocking them down.
Dr Hope's Victorian predecessors had fewer scruples. Some 20 City churches
were demolished during the second half of the 19th-century, either to make
way for new buildings or simply because they had become surplus to
requirements.
Most of them, like the surviving City churches, were architectural glories
built by Wren after the Great Fire.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4295</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAB1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / School link backed
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
TOYOTA, the Japanese motor manufacturer, is to spend at least Pounds 130,000
this year on a pilot scheme for linking schools with local companies.
Schools will be eligible for grants of between Pounds 500 and Pounds 1,000.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4296</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAB0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Plastics plant move
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
A NEW plastics plant is to be set up by US-based Contico International in
Redruth, Cornwall, creating more than 100 jobs. Contico aims to start
production early next year of containers and tool boxes.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4297</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQABZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Survey highlights travel time
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
PROFESSIONAL and manag-erial workers spend more than three years of their
working lives travelling - time estimated by British Telecommunications to
be worth more than Pounds 7.5bn a year.
A BT survey of 300 executives found they spent their travel time dozing,
daydreaming or reading the sports page. Fewer than two in five said they
worked while travelling.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4298</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQABYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Zoo shelves closure plans
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
LONDON ZOO is shelving its plan to close at the end of this month. The zoo
said it was set to break even on running costs in the current financial
year, allowing the council of the Zoological Society of London to drop its
decision to close.
A significant increase in visitors had generated an extra Pounds 500,000 in
revenue since the society's announcement in June that the zoo would have to
close by the end of this month, the zoo said.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4299</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQABXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Premier league sponsorship row
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
SEVEN MEMBERS of the Premier League, the top English football division,
walked out of a meeting of the clubs yesterday after a Pounds 13m
sponsorship deal with Bass, the brewer, had been blocked.
Eight of the league's 22 clubs had voted against accepting the deal because
they felt it might conflict with their own sponsorships by brewers.
The seven clubs which walked out argued that the action by the eight was
against the interests of the Premier League as a whole.
Fourteen clubs voted to accept the deal - one fewer than the number needed
to carry the motion.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4300</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQABWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / 800 pairs of fake Levi jeans seized
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD EVANS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A POSSIBLE cross-Europe racket in fake brand-name jeans has been uncovered
with the seizure of more than 1,000 pairs of jeans marked as Levi 501s in
London and 300 pairs in the Netherlands, Richard Evans writes.
The seizure followed a joint operation between the central detective agency
of the Dutch economic investigation service and the trading standards office
of Haringey Borough Council in London.
Haringey put the goods found in a London wholesale warehouse on display
yesterday. Mr Tony Northcott, the council's trading standards officer, said
they had a street value of around Pounds 50,000.
Mr Northcott added that the jeans were of sufficient quality to sell for
Pounds 30 a pair, but with the fake Levi logo the price would be Pounds 45.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4301</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQABVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Public spending negotiations start
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALISON SMITH
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE face-to-face negotiations between ministers in this year's public
spending round has opened with renewed warnings that nothing in departmental
programmes was sacrosanct.
One sign of the toughness is that ministers in the Scottish and Welsh
offices are hinting that even the previously automatic formula for spending
in their department could be questioned. The formula guarantees they will
have a proportion of the public spending in England.
Mr Michael Portillo, the chief secretary to the Treasury, has yet to meet
either Mr Ian Lang, the Scottish secretary, or Mr David Hunt, the Welsh
secretary, for the bilateral talks.
Proposals arising from the talks will go before the new committee chaired by
Mr Norman Lamont, the chancellor, as part of the new 'top down' system of
controlling public spending agreed by the cabinet in July.
Although a change to the spending formula had not been proposed by the
Treasury earlier in the summer, the floating of the idea that it might be
scrapped is seen as an attempt to soften Scottish and Welsh public opinion
if the formula is a casualty of the spending discussions.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4302</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQABUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Lib Dems call for reforms in education
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW ADONIS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ABOLITION of England's local education authorities was proposed yesterday by
the Liberal Democrats, making theirs the first opposition party to accept
the end of the structure under which the schools system has been managed
since 1902.
The Liberal Democrats wish to see elected 'education departments' with
closely circumscribed responsibility for monitoring standards, promoting
quality and strategic planning and for arbitrating in disputes between head
teachers and school governors.
However, the party rejects the government's plan for a single national
education quango to oversee grant-maintained schools. Its departments would
be elected and based on local communities.
The Liberal Democrats also advocate the replacement of A-levels with an
'English baccalaureate' bringing vocational and academic subjects together
in a single structure. Students at the post-16 level would study a
compulsory core of English, maths, a science and a modern language.
Employers would be obliged to give all employees up to the age of 19 at
least two days a week off to study for national vocational qualifications.
A general teaching council would be established to promote the professional
status of teachers, oversee standards and advise the government.
The party calls for the teachers' pay review body to assess 'realistically'
the need for improved salaries, but rejects government proposals to link
teacher appraisal to pay.
Excellence for All. Liberal Democrats, 4 Cowley Street, London SW1. Pounds
4.25.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4303</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQABTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Rover enforces immediate cut in list prices
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KEVIN DONE, Motor Industry Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ROVER is cutting the list prices of most of its cars by up to 7 per cent
with immediate effect to introduce greater 'transparency' into its new car
pricing.
The reductions will not necessarily cut the price of a new Rover car to the
customer as the company is simultaneously cutting dealer profit margins from
17 per cent to 10 per cent, which will reduce dealers' scope for
discounting.
The move is expected to cut customer 'haggling' with dealers and extends the
system introduced experimentally earlier this year for the Rover 800
executive car range.
The cuts are expected to bring list prices more into line with actual
transaction prices and reduce uncertainty over new car prices.
The Rover initiative follows initial steps taken by Vauxhall late last year
to cut dealer profit margins from 17 per cent to 10 per cent on three of its
new model ranges, the Astra, Frontera and Carlton. At the time Vauxhall said
that the industry and car buyers alike would benefit if other manufacturers
adopted a similar approach.
List prices for new cars in the UK have been far out of line with actual
transaction prices for some time, but the confusion has been exacerbated
during the recession with most carmakers launching a series of discounting
and price-cutting campaigns, often in order to sell old stock.
Rover said that its changes would reduce the list prices of some its models
by more than Pounds 1,000. The list price of a Rover 420GSi will be reduced
by Pounds 1,082 to Pounds 14,120, while the price of a Metro 1.1S will be
cut by Pounds 753 to Pounds 8,550.
Rover yesterday attacked carmakers such as Ford and Vauxhall for confusing
customers 'by offering limited discounts and other short-term incentives on
some stock, while at the same time recently increasing list prices'.
In spite of this attack Rover admitted that its dealers will also be
mounting 'special campaigns' to sell currently held stock. These campaigns
are being undertaken as part of radical changes that Rover plans for its
system of stocking and distributing cars in the UK. The aim is to cut the
number of vehicles in the pipeline and Rover believes the new system could
produce savings totalling up to Pounds 80m a year for it and its dealers.
From the end of the month it is opening a group of seven wholly-owned
regional distribution centres, which will hold most of its stock of new cars
in the UK and will remove this function from the dealer network.
The new distribution process means that Rover dealers will no longer carry
bulk stocks in their compounds, but will call up cars as they are ordered
from regional distribution centres. The dealers will carry only showroom
stock and test vehicles.
The focus of cost-cutting in the motor industry, which previously has
chiefly concerned manufacturing and engineering, is turning to distribution.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4304</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQABSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Lloyd's expands link with France
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD LAPPER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
LLOYD'S of London hopes to increase its share of the French commercial
property insurance market following an agreement to make greater use of a
computerised direct trading facility linking it with the Paris bourse, the
French commercial insurance exchange,
Cater Allen syndicate 190 developed the computer link-up, known as Linkline,
in 1990 to increase the efficiency of its French underwriting operations.
The syndicate heads a facility backed by 15 other syndicates expecting a
turnover of FFr30m (Pounds 3.14m) this year. Yesterday's agreement entails
other syndicates making more use of the facility, which in exceptional cases
enables French risks to be underwritten in less than 24 hours.
Twenty-five syndicates including 190 are expected to participate on the new
facility, known as the BCR lineslip, which can accept a further FFr50m in
premium income.
Overall Lloyd's premium income from the French market was about Pounds 200m
last year, of which Pounds 119m was in the form of reinsurance premiums.
Mr John Worsfold, underwriter of syndicate 190, warned that French
commercial risks were highly competitive and largely dominated by domestic
French insurers.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4305</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQABRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Holidaymakers buy dollars in advance
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Holidaymakers are buying dollars even though many of them do not intend to
travel to the US until next year, Mr Ian Spight, director of Thomas Cook
Financial Services, said yesterday.
Mr Spight said many clearly did not believe they would see a two-dollar
pound again for some time. Thomas Cook estimates the total UK market for
currency and travellers' cheques will be Pounds 4.5bn this year compared
with Pounds 4.1bn last year.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4306</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQABQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Coach travel company collapses
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL SKAPINKER, Leisure Industries Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MED INTERNATIONAL, a North Yorkshire coach company, collapsed yesterday. It
was the 43rd member of the Association of British Travel Agents (Abta) to go
out of business this year.
Abta said, however, that this figure represented a considerable improvement
over 1991. By this time last year, 78 of its member companies had collapsed.
Med International, based in Selby, North Yorkshire, had 300 travellers on
holiday. Its sister company, Impact Holidays, based in Carlisle, collapsed
last Friday with 3,000 customers still on holiday. As both companies had
bonds arranged through Abta, none of the customers will lose their money.
Those already away will be able to complete their holidays - ferry companies
and hoteliers will be paid from the bonds. Those that have bookings will
receive refunds.
The collapses come just a few days after the Civil Aviation Authority
announced that DHG (UK), a bonded tour operator which specialised in package
holidays to Turkey, had ceased trading. The CAA said an estimated 3,000
customers abroad would be able to complete their holidays.
Abta said eight of the 43 companies which had collapsed so far this year
were tour operators, 31 were travel agents and four performed both
functions. Of the 78 which had gone out of business by this time last year,
14 were tour operators, 60 were travel agents and four were both. Last
year's casualties included Mr Harry Goodman's International Leisure Group,
then the second-biggest tour operator.
This year's Abta figures do not include Land Travel, the Bath-based coach
company which went out of business in July. As it was not bonded, more than
40,000 customers who had booked holidays have no possibility of receiving
any money back through Abta.
Throughout the summer, travel industry executives have warned that a
relatively large company might go out of business as a result of the
excessive number of holidays being offered for sale and also the fierce
price-cutting.
Although the number of companies that have ceased trading this year is lower
than in 1991, the autumn represents a dangerous period for travel groups.
Bills from hoteliers and other suppliers fall due during this period, while
the money companies receive in deposits and advance payments falls as the
season draws to a close.
Warnings of further collapses resulted in the government announcing last
July that it intended to impose a levy on the travel industry to replenish
the Air Travel Trust Fund, which repatriates air charter holiday-makers and
provides refunds if company bonds prove inadequate.
The CAA, which administers the fund, said yesterday only Pounds 3m remained.
The government has said that until the levy is imposed, the fund will be
able to borrow money if necessary.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4307</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQABPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Labour warning on council tax
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALISON SMITH
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
EXTENSIVE appeals against the valuations carried out for the council tax are
likely to dog the introduction of the new property-based tax next April, Mr
Jack Straw, the shadow local government minister, warned yesterday.
Publishing the valuation figures for each district authority, Mr Straw said
that the combination of being able to make easy comparisons between houses
and of the notable differences between the bills each band would face
provided much more of an incentive to appeal than any time under the former
rates system.
Even if those appeals were rejected, the prospect of appealing increased the
risk that people might delay paying the tax until they were certain what
band their property would fall into, Mr Straw said.
Labour warned that confidence in the valuations would be diminished by the
wide range of overestimates and underestimates in the original figures
released last year compared with the most recent valuation figures.
The most recent figures, were provided last week by the Labour-controlled
Association of London Authorities after the Department of the Environment
had decided not to release them.
Underestimates are most notable in urban areas. In total, 45 English
councils have total property valuations on which the tax will be based that
are 10 per cent or more below the government's earlier figures. Nine
councils in England have a total 15 per cent or more above the 1991
estimate, and a further 25 have a total 10 per cent or more higher than
expected earlier.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4308</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQABNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / 6% fall in private housing starts
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW TAYLOR, Construction Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE NUMBER of new private homes started by builders fell by almost 6 per
cent during the first seven months of this year compared with the
corresponding period last year, according to figures published yesterday by
the Department of the Environment.
If this trend continued for the rest of this year the number of homes
started by private builders would be the lowest annual total for more than a
decade.
The department said starts of houses in the private sector during the three
months to the end of July were almost 9 per cent lower than in the
corresponding quarter last year.
The figures, which have been adjusted to take account of seasonal
variations, underline the deepening recession in the private housing market.
The downturn still shows no sign of slackening - almost four years after
house prices peaked in southern England.
House prices published last week by Halifax and Nationwide, the country's
two largest building societies, showed that the cost of an average UK home
has continued to fall during the summer although the rate of decline has
slackened.
Halifax warned that any recovery in prices next year would at best be muted
and would depend upon an improvement in the general economy.
The environment department said builders started work on 77,900 private
homes during the first seven months of this year compared with 82,600 in the
corresponding period last year.
During the whole of last year builders started work on 134,900 private
homes, the lowest figure for more than a decade. It compared with a peak of
221,000 recorded in 1988.
Building by housing associations, by comparison, has continued to advance
rapidly. Starts made by associations during the first seven months of this
year rose by more than half from 13,000 to 19,800. Associations are expected
by the government to take over from local authorities the central role of
providing social housing.
Overall builders started work 14,400 private and public sector homes in July
compared with 16,000 in the corresponding month last year.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4309</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQABMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Electoral jostling likely to distract US legislators
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By GEORGE GRAHAM
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   WASHINGTON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE US Congress reconvenes in Washington today for a final session that is
likely to see more jockeying for political position than efforts to enact
legislation.
With a fiercely fought presidential election entering its closing stages - a
last flurry of campaigning traditionally launched during yesterday's Labor
Day holiday - the tussle between the Democratic-controlled Congress and
Republican President George Bush has already assumed a central role in the
contest.
Mr Bush yesterday continued his campaign attack on the 'gridlocked
Democratic Congress', which he blames for not passing his legislative
proposals. The topics on which he and Congress are likely to clash in the
next few weeks include the North American free trade agreement (Nafta),
which some leading Democrats fear could cost US jobs; the mismanagement of
federal disaster relief to Florida and Louisiana in the wake of last month's
Hurricane Andrew; and a bill to guarantee the same rights to choose an
abortion as are currently protected by the Supreme Court's Roe vs Wade
decision.
In his battle against Congress, Mr Bush has sought to don the mantle of
President Harry Truman, whose come-from-behind victory in 1948, with a
campaign against the 'do-nothing Congress', has become his favourite
reference.
But Governor Bill Clinton, the Democratic candidate who in recent opinion
polls leads the incumbent president by a margin of between 6 and 15
percentage points, yesterday hit back with a visit to President Truman's
hometown of Independence, Missouri.
The visit was designed to remind voters that Mr Truman was a Democrat and
that the Congress he railed against was controlled by Republicans.
Dream teams, Page 22
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4310</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQABLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / President keeps date with Brazil military
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTINA LAMB
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   RIO DE JANEIRO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
BRAZILIAN President Fernando Collor made his first public appearance
yesterday since being accused in a congressional report of involvement in a
multi-million-dollar corruption scandal.
Defying threats of mass demonstrations calling for his impeachment, Mr
Collor attended the yearly military parade to mark Independence Day. The
occasion was marked by tight security, and Mr Collor arrived by helicopter
rather than the traditional open-top car. He did not inspect troops.
The opposition dropped planned demonstrations as they did not want to upset
the military. Instead they have called for a day of national protest against
Mr Collor on Friday. However, the end of yesterday's ceremony was marked by
boos. Mr Etewaldo Dias, Mr Collor's spokesman, said that 'this is a normal
part of democracy. I heard applause as well as boos.'
All but four of Mr Collor's ministers were present, in an apparent show of
unity. They have reiterated their decision to stay on until the
congressional vote on whether to impeach Mr Collor, due in the next few
weeks. The latest poll of congressmen, by the Jornal do Brasil newspaper,
found 342 in favour of impeachment - more than the two-thirds necessary.
Mr Collor's most immediate threat could come from the attorney-general's
office, which is considering opening a criminal case against the president.
The police are investigating a computer disc obtained by the Inland Revenue
from the offices of Mr Paulo Cesar Farias, the president's former campaign
treasurer, who is at the forefront of the corruption investigation. The disc
apparently lists government contracts, successful bidders, the percentage of
alleged kickbacks and names of those who received payments.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4311</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQABKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Cavallo firm on Argentine austerity
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN BARHAM
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BUENOS AIRES
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
MR Domingo Cavallo, Argentina's economy minister, yesterday lashed out at
critics who are seeking to soften his strictly orthodox policies by
demanding an increase in government spending.
In a hard-hitting speech at a conference of bankers, Mr Cavallo warned that
Argentina's disastrous experience with inflation meant that 'we cannot have
a fiscal deficit for many years. We must revive the idea of budgetary
restrictions: that we only spend what we raise in taxes. It would be foolish
for us to throw away all we have achieved and return to inflation. That
hurts the poor most of all.'
His speech comes after a week of vicious infighting within the government,
in which even President Carlos Menem seemed to withhold support from the
minister. Mr Cavallo is being blamed by the opposition and some cabinet
colleagues for worsening poverty.
Mr Cavallo said: 'In September we have reached the maximum bearable level
for public spending in Argentina.' Spending in 1993 would be held at its
present level.
Earlier this year he told the International Monetary Fund (IMF) he would
boost current spending in line with economic growth. In 1993 it was to rise
7 per cent over 1992 to about Dollars 35bn (Pounds 17.5bn).
However, Mr Cavallo said a Dollars 300m monthly increase in pensions now
meant that spending would be frozen.
Just as spending has reached the limit, so has the tax burden. He said that,
while his campaign against tax evasion would continue, added revenue would
not be used to increase spending but to eliminate inefficient taxes.
The minister also called on the private sector to make greater efforts to
become competitive, instead of demanding protection. However, the business
community accuses Mr Cavallo of inaction in reforming the labour market,
which they say is the principal source of Argentina's poor international
competitiveness.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4312</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQABJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / World Trade News: China in deal to launch satellites for
Intelsat - The Farnborough Air Show
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DANIEL GREEN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
CHINA has signed a contract to launch satellites for Intelsat, the
international telecommunications co-operative, Prof Yue Zhuzhen, deputy
general manager of the China Great Wall Industry Corporation, said
yesterday.
The contract is a coup for China in its efforts to break into western
markets, because Intelsat, the international satellite consortium owned by
national telecommunications bodies including British Telecom, AT&amp;T and
Deutsche Telekom, is the world's biggest buyer of international telecoms
satellites.
It is also a warning to European and US launchers that competition will
intensify; Russia has this year tendered for commercial launches of western
satellites, for the first time. Ariane, owned by a French-led consortium, is
market leader, followed by McDonnell Douglas, General Dynamics and Martin
Marietta, all of the US. The launch of the Intelsat 7A on China's Long March
3B rocket is scheduled for 1995. The 3B, an untested variant of the Long
March 3, will be the biggest space launcher yet developed by China.
Last month, China completed its second international commercial satellite
launch - a US-built satellite operated by Aussat, an Australian company
half-owned by C &amp; W of the UK. Go-ahead for the Intelsat contract still
depends on US goodwill. Washington must first give an export licence for the
satellite built by Loral of the US, and agree to extending an agreement
between the US and China over the prices and frequency of Chinese launches.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4313</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQABIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / World Trade News: Sweden ready for smaller EFA - The
Farnborough Air Show
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID WHITE, Defence Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SWEDEN will be ready to take part in producing a smaller version of the
European Fighter Aircraft (EFA) as proposed by the German government, it
said yesterday.
Mr Anders Bjorck, Swedish defence minister, said it would not be realistic
to expect the current EFA partners (Germany, Italy, Britain and Spain) to
buy Sweden's new single-engined JAS39 Gripen fighter. But the JAS
consortium, including Saab and Volvo, might share in producing a redesigned
EFA.
Mr Bjorck said at Farnborough that many elements of the two aircraft would
be 'more or less identical'. The EFA partners are studying ways of cutting
costs after Bonn's declaration that it would seek co-operation on a cheaper
and lighter aircraft. Britain is resisting big changes in the EFA design,
saying performance targets must be kept.
Sweden's order programme for the Gripen, involving 140 aircraft, would be
completed by 2001, Mr Bjorck added.
The Swedish partners would then be able to take part in collaborative
production. Sweden wanted its aircraft industry kept independent, with more
room for foreign involvement.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4314</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQABHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Reformist zeal tests the public's patience: Initial euphoria
over Domingo Cavallo's economic reforms might be wearing thin
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By STEPHEN FIDLER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IN A country where economy ministers are usually despised, Mr Domingo
Cavallo is one of Argentina's most popular public figures. Twenty months
into his stewardship of Argentina's inflation-prone economy, Argentina's
economic prospects appear transformed.
After a decade of slow growth and world-beating inflation rates, growth is
healthy - perhaps 7 per cent this year - and inflation has collapsed.
With President Carlos Menem allowing him political room for manoeuvre, Mr
Cavallo continued and improved the programme of deregulation and
privatisation started soon after Mr Menem assumed power in July 1989.
But he has done more. He has boosted tax revenues, mainly through assertive
application of a value-added tax, and has cut government spending,
abolishing subsidies to state-owned industries and shrinking the
bureaucracy. There are signs the government was in overall surplus for the
first half of this year, for the first time in memory.
His most controversial action was to fix, by law, the Argentine currency to
the US dollar. The move forbade the central bank from issuing currency
unless backed by inflows of foreign exchange. The law, which took effect on
April 1 last year, also meant any devaluation required an act of Congress.
Curbing the chronic deficit and reining in the central bank have been the
key to lowering inflation.
However, there are signs that the early euphoria which greeted Mr Cavallo's
programme is wearing thin. After quadrupling investors' money in 1991 and
surging ahead in early 1992, the Argentine stock market has collapsed,
falling by more than 50 per cent between early June and late August. The
fall does not yet appear to have shaken confidence in the economy.
International reserves have continued to rise, signifying that inflows of
private capital have not been choked off.
These inflows are necessary to offset the country's worsening current
account position, caused in part by a consumer boom which has followed the
ending of import controls and reduction of tariff barriers. The current
account has swung into deficit as the trade surplus has narrowed: the
surplus for the first five months of 1992 was about Dollars 700m (Pounds
351.7m) against Dollars 2.4bn in the same period of 1991.
Mr Peter West, economist at the Chartered WestLB merchant bank in London,
says there are signs the import surge is levelling off, partly reflecting an
easing in consumer spending.
While that suggests some relief for Mr Cavallo's programme, its medium-term
prospects for success will be determined in large part by whether the
country can improve on its poor investment record.
According to JP Morgan, the New York bank, Argentina's gross investment as a
proportion of GDP fell to 8.9 per cent in 1990, a level at which it would
barely be replacing depreciation. Last year the rate was 10 per cent.
Morgan suggests the gross investment over the next five years needed to
secure 5 per cent annual growth in Argentina is Dollars 125bn, against the
Dollars 51bn actually invested between 1987 and 1991.
Mr Cavallo has said the investment rate is rising sharply, perhaps to 18 per
cent this year (although his figure may not be directly comparable with
those provided by Morgan). However, as Mr West points out, it is important
to know where that investment is going. If much of it is headed - as has
been suggested - for the fast-growing services sector, it would not provide
the platform for the export of manufactured goods or agri-products that Mr
Cavallo must be hoping will stir growth.
Service industries are more lucrative as, unlike the traded goods sector,
profits have not been squeezed by imports. This is a potential problem for
Mr Cavallo; the lack of competition in services explains why retail prices
have risen about 19 per cent in the year to August, while wholesale prices
have gone up only 3-4 per cent.
He can argue that this is not affecting Argentine competitiveness because
businesses pay wholesale prices, and inflation compares favourably with that
in the US. But there are signs the inflation rate is causing rumblings in
the labour market. If Argentine producers give in to wage increases, this
will damage competitiveness and bring shriller calls for a devaluation.
Mr Cavallo believes that the competitive benefits of devaluation will be
dissipated in weeks through higher costs. However, sooner or later he or a
successor will have to confront the issue of devaluation.
By its own admission the government needs to do more to provide long-term
balance to its finances. It has already reached agreement with provincial
governments to provide a share of its tax receipts to the state pension
scheme. This will allow the government to raise pensions to minimum levels.
More fundamental reform, including a partial privatisation of the system,
has been delayed until late in 1993.
Privatisation of enterprises is going ahead, although some sell-offs have
hit difficulties.
The government's debt accord with international banks has also met a hitch,
as banks have overwhelmingly chosen one option - which demands most in
guarantees from the government. Few observers believe the deal will be
allowed to fail over this.
The central question, however, is whether the will of the Argentine
electorate will hold out over the rest of the reform programme, likely to
take at least 18 months to complete.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4315</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQABGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / World Trade News: Slow embrace of former rivals - Growing
trade links between Russia and Turkey
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LEYLA BOULTON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
RUSSIA and Turkey next month celebrate the 500th anniversary of diplomatic
relations between once great empires whose former rivalry has been replaced
by political co-operation, grandiose investment projects - and debt
squabbles.
Catapulted to the status of a regional power by the break-up of the Soviet
Union last December, Turkey is aiming to achieve what its ambassador in
Moscow calls a 'strategic partnership' with Russia, embracing both politics
and economics.
While building up close links with the central Asian republics, Turkey is
already co-operating with Russia on finding solutions to ethnic conflicts in
the Trans-Caucasus. Both Turkey and Russia have a common interest in
preventing strife between Azerbaijan and Armenia spilling over their
borders.
Turkey also wants to harness Russian energy supplies and high technology to
Turkish trading skills and industrial potential.
'Our objective is to reach within five years Dollars 10bn in annual trade
with the Russians,' says Ambassador Volkan Vural. That is an ambitious
target, given that trade in the first six months of this year came to just
Dollars 644m, and Turkey has frozen official credit lines until Russia
catches up on its arrears.
But a Russo-Turkish trade fair which opened in Moscow last week summed up
the potential of what an ideal trading relationship would look like. One end
of the historic Manezh exhibition hall exhibited food and consumer goods
which Russia so badly needs and which Turkey has been supplying at much
lower cost than western companies. The other end featured Russian defence
enterprises seeking buyers for weapons and investment to help them convert
to civilian output.
Mr Vural said that Turkey was looking into buying weapons from Russia and
developing its own defence manufacturing capacity after decades of being
supplied by its allies in the North Atlantic Treaty Organisation. The two
sides are said to be negotiating a Dollars 200m package to supply Turkey
with helicopters, armoured personnel carriers, and other conventional
weapons.
Projects designed to make Turkey an international channel for transferring
oil and gas from the former Soviet Union to the rest of the world are also
on the drawing board.
They include talk about Turkey helping to develop the Russian port of
Novorossisk on the Black Sea following Moscow's loss of free access to
Odessa, which is now part of an independent Ukrainian state.
Although its credits were frozen after the Soviet Union's collapse,
Eximbank, Turkey's official export credit institution, has earmarked 85 per
cent of all its lending to the Commonwealth of Independent States, with most
destined for Russia.
Not a penny of a Dollars 1.15bn commitment has been allocated outside Russia
and the largest central Asian republic of Uzbekistan. Despite a big Turkish
political presence in this part of the former Soviet Union, credit for the
other central Asians and Azerbaijan, a Turkic-speaking republic on the
Caspian Sea, are still only being negotiated.
Russia is supposed to spend 70 per cent of revenues from sales of natural
gas to Turkey to cover the import of Turkish goods and construction work. In
1991, the former Soviet Union sold 4.2bn cu metres of natural gas to Turkey,
and deliveries this year are expected to reach 4.7bn cu metres. In May Mr
Suleyman Demirel, the Turkish prime minister, agreed to increase gas imports
to 6bn cu metres a year by 1995.
But even this original formula of helping Russia generate revenue to pay for
its Turkish imports has broken down because Moscow, pleading more urgent
spending priorities, is not keeping its side of the bargain. It has already
run up Dollars 48m in arrears to Eximbank this year.
Mr Ahmet Ertugrul, Eximbank's chairman, said in Moscow last week he hoped
what he called 'this default situation' would be cleared up soon so that
credits could resume. Eximbank had expected that repayments would begin
immediately after Mr Demirel visited Moscow in May.
Turkey's politicians have made a brave choice of pressing ahead with
political priorities and attempting to overcome what they hope will be
short-term economic problems. Russia has yet to put itself in a position
where it can fully benefit from such friendship.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4316</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQABFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Mexican textile and oil disputes resolved
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAMIAN FRASER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MEXICO CITY
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
TWO of Mexico's longest and most bitter labour disputes have been resolved,
with the bulk of 22,000 striking textile workers returning to work yesterday
and another 15,000 former oil workers ending their civic protests in return
for compensation from the state oil company, writes Damian Fraser in Mexico
City.
A few thousand of the former oil workers had occupied Mexico's central
square for 39 days, bringing further chaos to Mexico's congested historical
centre. The workers were protesting against their dismissal and demanding
severance pay.
The oil workers were joined by fishermen and farmers demanding compensation
for the pollution caused by Petroleos Mexicanos (Pemex), Mexico's state oil
company, to their lands and fishing waters.
Under the agreement Pemex has agreed to compensate 'temporary' workers who
had been with the company before 1990 and consider the demands of others,
including those of the fishermen.
On Friday the textile workers agreed to a 14 per cent wage increase and some
modifications in work rules, ending a 59-day strike. The textile owners had
originally offered a 10 per cent wage increase, while the workers had
initially demanded 50 per cent and then 15 per cent. About 30 per cent of
the textile mill owners refused to sign the agreement.
During the strike about 60 mills filed for bankruptcy, according to the
national textile chamber, and another 50 may file soon.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4317</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQABEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / World Trade News: Germany aims to lead in aerospace - The
Farnborough Air Show
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL BETTS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
GERMANY sees the weakness of the world aerospace business as a chance to
take the lead there again.
Mr Jurgen Schrempp, chairman of Deutsche Aerospace (Dasa), aerospace arm of
Germany's Daimler-Benz group, said it aimed to be Europe's new regional jet
leader, a senior partner in the Airbus programme, an equal one in European
military aircraft collaboration, and take a key role in Europe's space
industry.
Dasa would be a junior partner in Europe's turbo-propeller aircraft market,
now led by the Franco-Italian ATR partnership.
'The current problems of the industry are not good for our profits, but
there is a strategic opportunity for us and for European collaboration as a
whole,' he said. When other European aerospace companies are retrenching,
Dasa is continuing its drive to restore the German aerospace industry to
European leadership, a source of concern to UK aerospace officials.
Mr Schrempp said Dasa expected to complete its agreement to take a 51 per
cent stake in Fokker, the Dutch group, by the end of November. Partnership
with Fokker would form a basis for a new European grouping in the regional
aircraft field, eventually extending to Aerospatiale of France and Alenia of
Italy.
Collaboration on regional jets was Europe's only chance of survival in this
sector. British Aerospace is reviewing its own regional jet activities.
Dasa has now taken control of Germany's 37.9 per cent Airbus stake. Airbus'
next challenge was to develop the new 600-seat jumbo jet. He suggested
Airbus partners should consider links with the Russian aerospace industry to
study developing a super jumbo. Dasa Daimer-Benz now had links with
Mitsubishi of Japan. The EFA programme would have to cut costs, but he
believed it would fly, probably in a modified version.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4318</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQABDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / World Trade News: Boeing set to sign a contract with Tarom -
The Farnborough Air Show
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DANIEL GREEN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BOEING IS set to sign a contract to sell commercial aircraft to Tarom, the
Romanian state-owned airline, this week, Daniel Green writes. Boeing has
already sold aircraft to a string of other former east European communist
countries. The contract is possibly for fewer than five Boeing 737s, the
model sold to CSA Czechoslovakian Airlines, Malev of Hungary, Lot of Poland,
Balkan Bulgarian Airlines, and JAT of Yugoslavia.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4319</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQABCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / World Trade News: Canada counters E Asia's Nafta fears
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KIERAN COOKE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MR Michael Wilson, Canada's industry and international trade minister, has
rebutted statements by Malaysia and other East Asian countries about the
North American Free Trade Area (Nafta) being a trade bloc and barrier to
trans-Pacific trade growth.
'Nafta is a free-trade agreement. It's not our intent to see any increase in
barriers with other countries,' he said in Kuala Lumpur.
Japan and Malaysia, meanwhile, agreed yesterday to issue a 'strong warning'
to the US, Canada and Mexico over Nafta. Mr Kozo Watanabe, minister of
international trade and industry, said he had agreed with his Malaysian
counterpart, Mrs Rafidah Aziz, to issue the warning. Asked to elaborate, Mr
Watanabe said: 'We will express our opposition to regionalism and
protectionism in all cases.'
The Japanese have expressed concern that Nafta could lead to the world
splitting into trade blocs. Mr Watanabe said the warning would be issued at
the Asia-Pacific Economic Co-operation (Apec) talks in Bangkok on Thursday.
Asked if he discussed a two-year-old proposal for an East Asian Economic
Caucus (EAEC) aimed at economic and trade co-operation, Mr Watanabe said:
'We discussed the future of Asia from a broader perspective, including all
of these matters.' Japan has not supported the EAEC concept.
Dr Mahathir Mohamad, Malaysian premier, has been pushing for EAEC. The US
opposes it, saying it would 'draw a line through the Pacific'. The issues
are likely to head talks at the Apec talks.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4320</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQABBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / World Trade News: GEC-Marconi secret contract - The
Farnborough Air Show
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID WHITE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
GEC-MARCONI is keeping secret the identity of an overseas government which
has placed an order for sophisticated air-to-ground weapons.
The order is the first new contract for guided weapons received by the UK
company since it completed takeover of Ferranti International's missile
operation earlier this year.
The sale involves weapons developed under a contract with the United Arab
Emirates. Ferranti inherited this programme from International Signal and
Control, the US contractor it took over in 1987.
The programme involves a specially designed family of air-launch weapons,
from guided bombs to missiles.
Mr David Fletcher, GEC-Marconi managing director, confirmed there was
'another customer' for the system besides the UAE. GEC-Marconi has been
trying to build on the former Ferranti division to establish itself as a
prime contractor for guided weapons. Its activities in the sector were
previously limited to guidance systems. Mr Fletcher said further
acquisitions were planned in the next year, both in the UK and abroad, to
strengthen the business. The company's ambitions were set back earlier this
year when a joint bid with Matra of France for an RAF air-to-air missile was
beaten by British Aerospace.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4321</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQABAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Tajikistan power upheaval as Nabiyev resigns
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By STEVE LEVINE and REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   DUSHANBE
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
MR Rakhmon Nabiyev resigned yesterday as president of Tajikistan in the
first power upheaval in the central Asian republics since the disintegration
of the Soviet Union.
Looking strained and speaking in a shaking voice, he said in a televised
statement that he was resigning to stabilise the political situation and
halt 'fratricide' between rival clans in the south of the republic. He was
then shown signing a resignation statement. Diplomats and journalists said
it appeared that he had resigned under duress.
A Reuter correspondent at Dushanbe airport saw him being driven away,
escorted by troops of the Commonwealth of Independent States and the Tajik
interior ministry. His whereabouts last night were not known.
Mr Nabiyev was taken away after holding several hours of talks at the
airport with government and parliamentary leaders who declared no confidence
in him last week and demanded that he quit.
Three tanks and seven armoured personnel carriers surrounded the airport to
protect Mr Nabiyev after opposition members with guns and grenades seized
part of the complex and several shots were fired. He had gone to the airport
to travel to the north for talks with local leaders.
The talks took place in a VIP lounge guarded by paratroopers and crack
soldiers, while the tanks took up position in front of the terminal with
their guns pointing directly at it.
Earlier yesterday Mr Nabiyev, communist leader from 1982 to 1985, who was
elected president last November, had reappeared for the first time since
armed opponents stormed the presidential palace a week ago to demand his
resignation.
Mr Nabiyev's removal leaves four political groups vying for power, of which
two are Islamic, well organised and apparently popular.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4322</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAA9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Russia presses for arms sale to India
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MOSCOW
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Russia hopes for an early agreement on arms sales to India, which have
slumped after months of argument about deliveries and pricing, Itar-Tass
news agency said yesterday, Reuter reports from Moscow. Tass quoted Mr Pavel
Gravchev, the Russian defence minister, saying he and Mr Sharad Pawar, his
Indian counterpart, hoped to restore military links between their countries.
Mr Gravchev hoped agreement would be reached before President Boris Yeltsin
of Russia visits India in January.
Russia, India's main arms supplier, has faced economic turmoil since the
Soviet Union collapsed. Indian officials say exports to India have fallen
short of agreed figures.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4323</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAA8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Moscow presses Japan over Kuriles: Yeltsin seeks
'imagination' over disputed islands
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LEYLA BOULTON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MOSCOW
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
PRESIDENT Boris Yeltsin's personal spokesman yesterday urged Japan to show
'imagination' in order to solve the territorial dispute over the Kurile
islands which will be at the centre of talks with the Russian leader in
Tokyo next week.
'Japan is doing an imitation of flexibility. If they showed real flexibility
we could find an effective compromise solution,' Mr Vyacheslav Kostikov said
in an interview yesterday.
He said that President Yeltsin, whose position would remain open until he
heard Japanese leaders on the first day of the talks, could produce a
breakthrough on the issue if Tokyo made it possible for him to do so.
'I think he will go on looking for a solution even while is he is on the
plane (to Tokyo). . .His position is like molten lava which can change
shape. Japan needs to find a suitable channel for this lava but for the time
being this has not happened.'
A solution to the dispute over territory seized by the Soviet Union in the
closing days of the second world war and which was never sealed by a peace
treaty, would take into account both Russian feelings and the country's
economic problems.
Japan says it is willing to be flexible on timing and details of how Russia
returns the disputed southern-most four of the Kurile islands - but that
large-scale economic assistance will be conditional on getting them back.
Mr Yeltsin has said he wants to solve the issue on the basis of legality and
justice but faces fierce domestic opposition to an explicit handover of
territory for money.
'We are willing to give something in return for such help but we don't see
this help as the be all and end all,' Mr Kostikov said.
While Japanese help was desirable for 'resolving tactical problems' to speed
Russia's march towards capitalism, Moscow would be less prone to make
compromises in future.
'The Japanese do not understand this. They talk to us like a chronically
sick child. But we are not chronically sick. We are just ill with communism.
When Russia gets better it will surprise the world with its dynamism.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4324</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAA7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Sudan relief airlift halted
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   KAMPALA
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Rebels gunner have forced the United Nations to halt a relief airlift to the
besieged south Sudan city of Juba, where some 300,000 people are short of
food, Reuter reports from Kampala.
It is the third time in two weeks the flights have been halted by rebel
fire. A World Food Programme official, Mr Ben Martinson, said they would not
resume until both sides in the eight-year civil war guaranteed their safety.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4325</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAA6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / US tries to explain to China
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Mr William Clark, the US assistant secretary of state, arrived in Beijing
yesterday, beginning a one-day mission to try to explain to China's leaders
why Washington has decided to sell F-16 jets to Taiwan, Reuter reports.
A US Embassy spokesman said Mr Clark had arrived on a military aircraft from
Tokyo, where he had been waiting since last Friday for Beijing to approve
his visit.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4326</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAA5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Three hanged in Kabul
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   KABUL
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Afghanistan's government hanged three men yesterday in front of a crowd of
thousands in its most dramatic implementation of Islamic law since it came
to power in April, Reuter reports from Kabul.
Mr Yunis Qanuny, the defence ministry spokesman, said the men had confessed
to murder, looting and robbery before a special court to which there was no
public access.
Their deaths were a necessary example to others as the four-month-old
mujahideen government tried to restore order in the capital after weeks of
bloody factional fighting, he said.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4327</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAA4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / UN nuclear team flies out of Iraq
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BAGHDAD
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
A United Nations nuclear inspection team left Iraq yesterday without laying
to rest the ghost of a secret underground plant but having agreed a plan to
keep an eye on whether Baghdad is reviving its nuclear programme, Reuter
reports from Baghdad.
Mr Maurizio Zifferero, head of the 14th mission charged with destroying
Iraq's nuclear weapons capability, said Iraq's rivers, lakes and canals
would be monitored for radioactivity levels, making possible the detection
of any resumption of nuclear activities.
Mr Zifferero said Baghdad had to do more to satisfy the UN it was complying
with the terms of the Gulf war ceasefire, requiring elimination of all
Iraq's weapons of mass destruction. But after the recent strained relations
between Iraq and the UN, Mr Zifferero praised the co-operation he received,
and said he had laid the groundwork for long-term monitoring.
President Saddam Hussein's eldest son, Uday, was yesterday quoted as saying
it was time democratic reforms were introduced in Iraq to thwart western
attempts to dismember the country.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4328</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAA3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Apartheid's rural ghettoes that hold the key to power: The
grassroots battlegrounds of South African politics in Ciskei and the other
homelands
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PATTI WALDMEIR
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE massacre of African National Congress supporters in the nominally
independent black 'homeland' of Ciskei yesterday was a catastrophe waiting
to happen.
For while international attention has focused on the political struggle
between South Africa's white rulers and the ANC, the battle for power in the
country's 10 black homelands has become ever more violent.
Given that 17m of the country's 28m Africans live in these largely rural
territories carved out of South Africa and intended to become independent
countries as part of the National Party's Grand Apartheid policy, political
support there will be crucial to the ANC's success in any future election -
but their conservative leaders, including Ciskei's, have made it clear they
will not give up without a fight.
Yesterday, the ANC took the homeland battle to Ciskei, where Brigadier Oupa
Gqozo has ruled by military diktat since taking power in a coup in March
1990. Some 50,000 protesters - one of the biggest ANC marches ever -
converged on the Ciskei with the stated aim of overthrowing Brig Gqozo's
government. Ciskei security forces opened fire, despite the apparently
disciplined behaviour of the unarmed marchers, leaving many of them dead.
ANC officials defend their decision to stage such an obviously provocative
march (largely with demonstrators from outside Ciskei) by pointing out that
Brig Gqozo's government has prevented free political activity in Ciskei and
made it impossible for the ANC to organise among its 850,000 residents.
But the march was part of a larger strategy: to weaken the conservative
alliance being forged by President F W de Klerk, which would include not
only the ruling National party, but conservative blacks who have built up
local fiefdoms in several black homelands, with the financial and political
support of Pretoria.
Indeed, as the Ciskei security forces opened fire, Mr de Klerk was hosting a
conference of this fledgling alliance in Pretoria, called to form a united
front behind the demand for a federal form of government which would allow
homeland leaders to retain a measure of power in the new South Africa.
Mr Pik Botha, the foreign minister, last week claimed that such an alliance
could win a multiracial election in South Africa: he said he believed 5m to
6m people - whites, coloureds, Indians and moderate blacks - would support
such an alliance, out of an estimated turnout of perhaps 14m voters (70 per
cent of the voting population of 20m).
While his claims are almost certainly exaggerated, even the ANC acknowledges
that the National party, now open to all races, and its allies could garner
significant support in a multiracial election. They chose to attack this
unofficial alliance at what they see as its weakest link: Ciskei, led by an
unelected dictator whose popular support appears weak.
ANC officials say their next target will be Mr Lucas Mangope, president of
Bophuthatswana in the Transvaal, one of the few homelands with at least a
potentially viable economy. He is likely to prove a much more difficult
opponent.
And the ANC's most powerful opponent of all - Chief Mangosuthu Buthelezi of
KwaZulu, head of the Zulu Inkatha Freedom Party, whose Natal stronghold
includes the KwaZulu homeland - has proved amply over the past two years of
bloodshed that he will not readily give up power.
But while the grassroots battle continues for political support in the
homelands, the constitutional future of the homelands must in the end be
settled by negotiation at the national level. Indeed, it is likely to prove
one of the most difficult issues when multi-party talks eventually resume.
The ANC, for its part, would like to abolish the homelands altogether. It
last week published constitutional proposals calling for the 10 homelands to
be subsumed within South Africa during the transition to a new constitution,
depriving homeland leaders of their political base at one fell swoop. The
National party proposes a large measure of devolution to regional
governments, which would be multiracial, but which would inevitably be based
partly on the old homelands and would preserve a measure of power for
homeland leaders through new regional administrations.
The march yesterday also marked another phase of the ANC's policy of mass
action, aimed at putting pressure on Pretoria, not just over the homeland
issue, but over security force violence which has so far blocked progress on
a new constitution. In this sense, the Ciskei security forces played
straight into the ANC's hands: they demonstrated, with appalling brutality,
the ANC's claim that homeland security forces (which are often commanded by
white South Africans and are indirectly funded by Pretoria) must be brought
under multi-party control in the transition to democracy.
The ANC has made its point but at a terrible price. Mr John Hall, chairman
of the National Peace Secretariat, the multi-party body set up a year ago to
combat violence, voiced the sentiments of many when he said of the massacre:
'It seemed so absolutely unnecessary. If this is a taste of things to come,
then God help us all.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4329</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAA2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Thai election campaign promises more of the same: Democratic
idealists find little support against patronage politics in the provinces
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By VICTOR MALLET
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE 30-year-old Thai peasant woman sitting on the concrete floor of her
house in the village of Nong Nok Kwak is the kind of voter who brings
pro-democracy activists in the faraway capital, Bangkok, to the brink of
despair.
At the last general election in March, Somjai gave her vote to a local
politician in exchange for 20 baht in cash (less than a dollar) and a
special 3,000-baht meal for the local schoolchildren financed by the
candidate.
On Sunday there is another general election and she is ready to sell her
vote again. She does not have much choice.
It has all been arranged at a meeting between the candidate and the village
headman, and the headman will be at the polling booth to ensure that she
puts her mark in the right place.
Somjai has never seen her candidate but she knows a bit about politics from
the black and white television in her living room, and she knows that there
was a fight between soldiers and protesters on the streets of Bangkok in May
in which people were killed.
She knows that the soldiers are good people, because when the dry season
comes in April or May, the troops will bring water to the village in tankers
on the orders of the King. She has no piped water in or near her house.
She knows that the leader of the Bangkok demonstrators, Mr Chamlong
Srimuang, is a bad man, because she heard from the television news that he
led people to their deaths. What she does not know is that the television
stations she watches are controlled by the army.
Asked what she would like from her member of parliament, Somjai - not her
real name - responds immediately: new and improved crop varieties to
increase her harvests of rice and cassava, and running water.
Somjai's views are typical of Thailand's rural north-east, a region known as
Isarn. The soil is often stricken with drought and salinity. The inhabitants
are poor, and many migrate to Bangkok to find work. Those who stay are
likely to end up owing money to the state agricultural bank or to local
middlemen; some have forfeited their land. National politics and the
struggle for democracy are not a priority.
Forgotten for much of the time by the increasingly wealthy inhabitants of
Bangkok, Isarn suddenly springs to prominence during election campaigns.
The region is heavily populated, and the voters in its 17 provinces elect
128 MPs, more than a third of the total. Isarn MPs are a vital source of
support for any party leader who fancies himself as a national figure.
It was not surprising, therefore, that Mr Chavalit Yongchaiyudh, a former
army commander who heads the New Aspiration Party, was greeted by Mr Sia
Leng, an influential ethnic Chinese 'godfather,' when he arrived at Khon
Kaen airport to campaign in the north east the other day.
'I am a merchant,' said Mr Sia Leng, a deceptively insignificant-looking
businessman with an Adidas jacket and a passion for gambling. 'I have many
subordinates to support Chavalit.' Mr Chavalit said he wanted to fight
poverty and do his job for the people. Asked what the job was, he replied:
'To make them happy.'
Such is Thai politics. The powerful local warlords and businessmen -
laughingly labelled as 'traditional politicians' by the Thai liberal press -
know how to woo the Isarn electorate, and they are wooed in turn by the
various parties.
First the candidates seek to strike a deal with the local middlemen and
village headmen to bring in bloc votes.
Second, they promise to help farmers, by building a bridge or bringing water
to a village, a tactic which is particularly effective if they have inside
knowledge that the central government is already planning to build the
bridge or bring the water anyway.
Third, they buy votes, and if this becomes too obvious they distribute
'travel allowances' to supposed party workers or pay villagers to 'look
after campaign posters' stuck on the walls of their homes.
Successful candidates will hope to participate in a coalition government and
use their influence to divert funds to their constituency - and perhaps to
their own pockets.
Ranged against these unscrupulous practitioners of old-fashioned patronage
politics are Thailand's democratic idealists. Increasing in numbers, mainly
urban, educated and middle class, they have been galvanised into action by
their victory in May over the armed forces and traditional politicians who
supported the military.
After troops shot dead at least 50 pro-democracy demonstrators, Gen Suchinda
Kraprayoon, former coup leader and army commander, was forced to resign, and
the coalition government of traditional politicians was dissolved, paving
the way for Sunday's elections.
A typical young liberal is likely to support the Democrat Party or Mr
Chamlong's Palang Dharma, and might want to help Pollwatch, the independent
organisation charged with monitoring the election and educating people in
the democratic ways.
There are signs that the liberal parties, already powerful in Bangkok, are
beginning to increase their strength in provincial towns and may even win
enough seats in the election to lead a coalition. But the transformation of
village politics in the north-east is expected to be slow.
A Thai aid worker in the area around Somjai's home described a recent
attempt to show an anti-military video of the May shootings in another
village.
'The headman said 'Stop] or I will shoot the TV',' the aid worker said.
Somjai may be selling her vote in a few more elections yet.
Uneasy peace reigns at Thailand's national airline, Page 30
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4330</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAA1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Kazakhstan calms Israeli N-weapon fears
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By HUGH CARNEGY
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   JERUSALEM
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
MR SERGEI TERESCHENKO, prime minister of Kazakhstan, said during a visit to
Israel yesterday his country had no intention of selling any of the nuclear
arsenal it inherited after the collapse of the Soviet Union.
Israeli leaders were understood to have voiced their concern to Mr
Tereschenko that none of the central Asian republic's nuclear expertise or
weaponry, which includes multi-warhead SS-18 ground-to-ground missiles and
nuclear bombers, should fall into the hands of Iran or Arab states hostile
to Israel.
Kazakhstan has entered an agreement, along with Ukraine and Belarus, to
return its nuclear arsenal to Russia by the end of 1994. Mr Tereschenko said
fears that economic difficulties might tempt Kazakhstan to sell some of its
arsenal 'to Iran or any other country' were unfounded.
The prime minister's three-day visit is the highest-level exchange so far in
a growing effort by the Jewish state to develop trade and diplomatic links
with the former Soviet Moslem republics. Israel is anxious to blunt the
influence of Iran and Arab countries over the newly independent regimes, as
well as lay the groundwork for what it hopes will be lucrative long-term
trade ties.
It has made considerable progress with Kazakhstan, run by secular former
communists. Mr Tereschenko, who was due to sign several agreements covering
trade, technology and cultural exchanges during his visit, held talks with
Mr Yitzhak Rabin, the Israeli premier, and Mr Shimon Peres, the foreign
minister. They decided to set up a committee to study joint economic
projects.
Two Israeli private-sector companies, Merhav and Mr Shaul Eisenberg's Israel
Corporation, have together already established contracts in Kazakhstan,
mainly in upgrading agriculture, worth about Dollars 65m (Pounds 33m) a
year, officials estimated. A joint US-Israeli team is now in Kazakhstan
studying possible agricultural aid schemes.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4331</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAA0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Stronger Iran-Pakistan links
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By FARHAN BOKHARI
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   ISLAMABAD
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
President Ali Akbar Hashemi Rafsanjani of Iran yesterday called for closer
co-operation with Pakistan, as a way to resist 'domineering arrogant
powers', Farhan Bokhari reports from Islamabad.
In an address to members of Pakistan's parliament on the second day of his
state visit here, he said, external countries did not want Pakistan and Iran
to become more independent and powerful.
Mr Rafsanjani said both countries must further build upon the existing
historical relations and Islamic ties. But he also warned against external
threats towards Islamic countries especially in a changed international
environment after the collapse of communism. 'Today, the Islamic world is
the only centre that can stand up against arrogant powers'.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4332</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAAZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Hizbollah emerges as top party
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BEIRUT
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
The pro-Iranian Hizbollah (Party of God) is likely to control the biggest
single bloc in the Lebanese parliament after scoring sweeping victories in
the country's first election in 20 years, Reuter reports from Beirut.
Hizbollah and its pro-Syrian allies were well ahead of their political
opponents in early results yesterday following Sunday's third and final
round of voting in an election boycotted by most mainstream Christians.
Diplomats said the once politically dominant Christians had thrown away much
of their power by boycotting the election in protest at the presence of
Syrian troops in Beirut.
Diplomats and political analysts said it was unlikely that a Hizbollah
victory would radicalise parliament with demands for an Islamic state and
the elimination of Israel, which controls a security corridor in the south.
Christians, arguing the poll would only strengthen Syria's hold over
Lebanon, failed to win a delay in the election until after the planned
Syrian withdrawal from Beirut later this month.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4333</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAAYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / European attack on Japan's barriers
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KEVIN DONE, Motor Industry Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE European Business Community in Japan has attacked the Japanese car
market for being 'de facto a closed shop'.
In a recently published report it maintains that 'many non-tariff barriers
and structural impediments remain.'
According to the EBC's automotive committee the share of imported cars in
the Japanese new car market has only risen to 4 per cent despite the removal
of tariff barriers since the 1980s.
The committee claims that the European Community's automobile trade deficit
with Japan has continued to grow significantly and reached almost Ecu4bn
(Pounds 2.9bn) in the first half of 1992, accounting for about 30 per cent
of the EC's total trade deficit with Japan.
The EBC automotive committee maintains that an import market share of 17.5
per cent of the total Japanese new car market is 'an essential and realistic
target' for all importers by the year 2000.
Acea, the association of European vehicle makers in Brussels, yesterday
urged the European Commission to press for 'enhanced market access' in
Japan.
Acea is urging the Commission to make 'reciprocal automotive competition'
the key to further progress in EC-Japan automotive trade relations.
The call comes as the European motor industry faces the start of a
challenging new era for Japanese vehicle imports from January with the
advent of the single European market.
From the beginning of 1993 the present system of bilateral restraints on
Japanese direct vehicle exports to five EC countries - France, Italy, Spain,
Portugal and the UK - is to be replaced by a joint monitoring system
administered by Brussels and Tokyo.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4334</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAAXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / UN seeks go-ahead for Sarajevo airlift
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By FRANCES WILLIAMS and JUDY DEMPSEY
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   GENEVA
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
UNITED Nations officials warned yesterday that suspension of relief flights
into the besieged Bosnian capital of Sarajevo threatened efforts to build up
essential winter stockpiles of food, medicine, fuel and shelter materials.
The airlift was suspended last Thursday after an Italian relief aircraft
crashed near the Bosnian capital, killing all four crew.
Mrs Sadako Ogata, UN High Commissioner for Refugees, Mr Cyrus Vance and Lord
Owen, co-chairmen of the conference on the former Yugoslavia and
representatives of the warring parties held urgent talks yesterday on how
the airlift could be safely resumed.
The UNHCR is seeking security assurances both for future flights and for
deliveries of supplies on the ground. A UN warehouse in Sarajevo was shelled
on Sunday in what appeared to be a deliberate attack.
Mr Vance, representing the UN, and Lord Owen, for the European Community,
plan to visit the region later this week, shortly before the deadline of
midday next Saturday which they have set for Bosnian Serb forces to put
heavy weapons around four cities under UN supervision.
Mr Fred Eckhard, spokesman for the co-chairmen, said the deadline was not an
ultimatum but a 'nailing down' of the offer first made by Mr Radovan
Karadzic, leader of the Bosnian Serbs, at last month's London conference on
the former Yugoslavia. Talk of sanctions if the deadline was not met was
'not in the spirit of what is going on', he said.
Under the terms of the accord, Bosnian Serb forces will concentrate their
heavy weapons around Sarajevo, Bihac, Jajce and Gorazde at declared sites
where their use will be monitored by UN military observers. The deal covers
tanks, multiple rocket launchers, 82mm mortars and field guns of 100mm
calibre or more.
The UN already monitors about half the heavy weapons around Sarajevo under
an earlier accord that opened the airport for relief flights. The number of
sites, now thought to be about eight, may rise to 10 or 11 under the new
agreement. Mr Eckhard said the airport agreement had succeeded in reducing
the amount of shelling suffered by the city, despite several tragic
incidents. However, most of the remaining bombardment came from undeclared
weapons sites in the hills to the east of the city away from the airport.
Croatian forces in Bosnia-Hercegovina yesterday stepped up their attempts to
consolidate their grip on occupied areas by threatening to expel Moslems
living in the region, writes Judy Dempsey.
The expulsion threat comes after months of mass deportations of Bosnia's
Moslem community by Serb forces. It also comes in the wake of Croatian
expulsions of ethnic Serbs living in Croatia.
But the latest move by Croat forces indicates that Croatia and Serbia are
determined to divide Bosnia leaving the Moslems, who make up 44 per cent of
the 4.3m population, without a homeland.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4335</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAAWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Coalition feels the strain over beef: Irish government says
it is business as usual
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By TIM COONE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   DUBLIN
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
IRELAND'S so-called beef tribunal resumes today after a summer recess, with
the prospect of the country's present and immediate past prime ministers
appearing on the witness stand in the next few weeks.
Government spokesmen insist that the atmosphere in the coalition cabinet of
prime minister Albert Reynolds continues to be one of business as usual, but
it is clear that the coalition came under increasing strain before the
summer as the tribunal started to hear testimony from key witnesses. That
strain could reach breaking point this autumn.
Last month the Supreme Court granted an injunction to the attorney general
which in effect prevents the tribunal from investigating past cabinet
decisions relating to the beef industry. It did so just as key witnesses
such as Mr Reynolds and former prime minister Charles Haughey were due to
take the witness stand.
The Tribunal of Inquiry into the Beef Industry was established in June last
year as a parliamentary inquiry to investigate allegations of fraud,
malpractice and political favouritism in Ireland's multi-million pound beef
industry. Many of the allegations have focused on Goodman International, a
private company headed by Mr Larry Goodman, and Europe's biggest beef
processor.
The allegations had been made in parliament and in a TV documentary screened
earlier in 1991. Then prime minister Mr Haughey described them as 'one of
the most persistent and venomous political campaigns ever waged in an
attempt to discredit the government over the affairs of the Goodman
companies. . .'
Mr Haughey has since been swept away by a wave of scandals, some of which
are still the subject of official inquiries. A number of political careers
remain on the chopping block, not least that of Mr Reynolds. He was industry
minister at the time of the alleged wrongdoings and is likely to be called
to the witness box within the next two weeks.
The proceedings have provided an intriguing insight into the process of
decision-making in the Irish civil service and the way in which powerful
business interests have helped shape government policy and decisions
involving hundreds of millions of pounds of taxpayers' money. The question
of whether the influence that was exerted lay within the bounds of normal
commercial practice lies at the heart of the inquiry.
The tribunal has heard of official documents being altered, apparently by
civil servants, statistics from different government departments flatly
contradicting each other, ministers making statements to parliament on the
basis of erroneous information provided to them by their department
officials, and apparently key meetings taking place between ministers and
businessmen for which no official minutes were kept.
A report published in the Irish Times last weekend that 70 per cent of the
beef sold to Iraq under insurance cover was in fact sold out of EC
intervention stocks has added a further twist to the saga, and a new point
of attack for Mr Reynolds' opponents. He said on local radio yesterday: 'It
was a revelation to me.'
In July, the first cabinet minister gave evidence to the tribunal - Mr Des
O'Malley the industry minister, and the leader of the Progressive Democrat
party which is in coalition with Mr Reynolds' Fianna Fail party. He made
clear he believed Mr Reynolds had exhibited serious errors of judgment in
allegedly going against civil service advice in approving up to IPounds 325m
of export credit insurance to Goodman companies for beef exports to Iraq in
1988, while curtailing the availability of insurance cover to other
companies in all sectors of Irish industry.
It all squares rather poorly with the promise of open government made by Mr
Reynolds when he took office last February. That promise helped keep the
coalition together immediately after Mr Haughey's demise.
The tribunal is due first to investigate contributions made to political
party funds by the beef industry before Mr Haughey and Mr Reynolds are
called to give evidence later this month.
It is perhaps no coincidence that insistent rumours of an early general
election, perhaps before next spring, are circulating in Dublin's corridors
of power.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4336</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAAVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Moscow tackles state enterprises' arrears
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LEYLA BOULTON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MOSCOW
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE Russian central bank has moved to tackle arrears accumulated by Russian
state-owned enterprises in dealings with those in other former Soviet
republics but denied this signalled a further expansion of central bank
credits.
It said a 'netting out' of debts would be completed by the end of November.
But it was not clear how the net arrears still outstanding after that to
Russian enterprises by republics in the rest of the Commonwealth of
Independent States and Georgia would be financed.
The Russian central bank plans to issue guarantees for Russian enterprises
to receive credit to get over the non-payments by other republics.
All republics can issue central bank credits and all of them are short of
budget revenues.
In another deal stressing creativity in relations with republics, Russia
said it would give Lithuania two torpedo boats and two small anti-submarine
vessels for undertaking to build flats for some of the army officers who are
to due be pulled out of the Baltic republics.
Moscow, which also undertook to supply Lithuania with oil this year and the
next, yesterday signed a trade pact with Estonia to guarantee free trade and
energy supplies. The agreement has been reached despite Moscow's continuing
unhappiness with the treatment of Russians in Estonia as second-class
citizens.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4337</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAAUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Lithuanian N-plant scheduled to restart
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BRONWEN MADDOX, Environment Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
LITHUANIA'S nuclear power plant, which runs the world's largest remaining
Chernobyl-type reactors, was scheduled to restart last night after an
emergency shutdown on Saturday morning.
The alarm comes a week before the 24 OECD countries meet in Brussels to
discuss who should foot the bill for repairing dangerous eastern European
nuclear reactors. A July meeting of the Group of Seven industrialised
countries failed to agree a plan.
The closure of the Ignalina plant near Vilnius followed the rupture of a
tube in the main circuit of the two 1500 MW reactors, which produce half of
Lithuania's electricity.
Mr Heikki Reponen, head of Finland's nuclear security authority, was given
assurances by Ignalina officials that no radioactivity had been released but
commented: 'The technical and control standards are extremely low.' The
International Atomic Energy Agency added: 'The reactor is not in the best of
shape.'
Last night Russian authorities were also denying access to the
Norwegian-Russian research ship Viktor Bujnitskij, which was monitoring
radioactivity in the Kara Sea north east of Norway. Norway estimates that 13
reactors from former-Soviet atomic submarines and nuclear-powered ice
breakers were dumped over a decade ago and it fears radioactivity could
leak.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4338</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAATFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Norway moves to protect currency
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KAREN FOSSLI
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   OSLO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
NORWAY'S central bank raised its key overnight lending rate yesterday by one
percentage point to 11 per cent. The aim was to relieve pressure on the
krone caused by recent European interest rate rises, especially in Sweden
and Finland.
The overnight rate was last changed in September 1991 when it was raised
from 9.5 per cent. The central bank also raised the credit rate - the
interest rate the banks receive on central bank deposits - from 9 to 11 per
cent.
Mr Hermod Skaanland, Norway's central bank governor, rejected suggestions
that devaluation has been considered as an alternative to defend the krone.
He said the central bank in August bought NKr7.5bn (Pounds 682m) to support
the currency and had waited as long as it could before raising rates.
Den norske Bank, Norway's biggest bank, did not raise lending rates
yesterday but said it could not rule out a future increase.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4339</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAASFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Treuhand tries to haltfall in east's output
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LESLIE COLITT and DAVID WALLER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BERLIN, FRANKFURT
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE Treuhand, the German government agency charged with privatising former
state companies in east Germany, yesterday launched a new drive to stem the
steep decline in output in the five new Lander.
The programme will include revised guidelines to encourage capital
investment. The Treuhand, which is struggling under a cumulative debt which
will reach DM137bn by the end of this year, will make its debut in the
international bond markets next month to borrow up to DM10bn (Pounds 3.5bn).
A 10-year bond is expected to raise between DM8bn and DM10bn, depending on
the acceptance by the markets.
Mrs Birgit Breuel, the Treuhand president, announced the bond issue against
the background of plummeting sales by Treuhand companies and a darkening
outlook for the German economy.
Mr Hero Brahms, a member of the Treuhand executive board, said Treuhand
companies this year might achieve only 70 per cent of 1991 turnover. The
chief reason was the almost total collapse of the former Soviet market.
Mrs Breuel said the Treuhand's remaining 3,810 companies - 9,000 were
privatised to the end of July - need to boost investment for urgently-needed
restructuring. Last year's investment level of 10 per cent of sales was the
minimum needed but companies, anticipating further steep falls in sales, had
signalled they would invest less next year.
'We are telling the companies to scrutinise their investment plans and are
issuing them guidelines.
'They have until September 30 to come up with new investment plans,' she
said.
The Treuhand would continue to provide equity capital and liquidity to
companies which presented a workable restructuring concept and would assume
their past debts. Mrs Breuel said the Treuhand aimed to find new owners by
the end of next year for all its companies found suitable for restructuring.
The large companies among those remaining could be placed under limited
partnership management, while the smaller ones would be placed in
privatisation funds, which could be run by banks or other financial
institutions.
Mrs Breuel said that in recent months many of the Treuhand companies had
assumed that a breakthrough was imminent in Bonn's negotiations with Moscow
to revive trade. Although the Russian government pledged payment of DM5bn
for goods covered by German export credit guarantees the pledge was not
implemented.
She said the situation was complex. The Treuhand would support its companies
in long-term efforts to detach themselves from markets in the Commonwealth
of Independent States, which 'obviously will remain difficult', according to
Mrs Breuel. There was no sense in trying to revive trade by means of
subsidies, she added.
The Treuhand already has a DM10bn German commercial paper programme of which
about DM7bn has been issued. This existing short-term debt has been assigned
a top credit rating and both rating agencies (Standard &amp; Poor's and Moody's)
have said that bond issues by the Treuhand would be rated triple A.
Traders said yesterday that the Treuhand's bonds were likely to be priced at
a narrow discount to the existing 7.78 per cent yield on 10-year Bunds,
reflecting the fact that the new issue will be guaranteed by the federal
government. The yield is thought likely to be set at around 7.85 per cent.
The new issue will be traded on all German stock exchanges, and the bonds
will be 'deliverable' into the German government bond futures contract
traded on the Deutsche Terminborse, the German futures and options exchange.
This means that the new bonds will be used to settle Bund futures contracts
when they expire, thus enhancing the appeal of the new paper to
international investors. Mrs Breuel's critical remark coincided with a plan
put forward yesterday by Mr Otto Wolff von Amerongen, chairman of German
industry's Eastern Board of Trade. Mr Wolff proposed that roubles be used in
addition to hard currency in order to boost German-CIS trade. He said the
German companies would need to be able to invest rouble proceeds in Russian
property and factories.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4340</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAARFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Far-right violence continues unabated
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LESLIE COLITT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ATTACKS on asylum-seekers in east and west Germany failed to abate over the
weekend despite official demands that assailants be punished more harshly.
Ten persons, including six Vietnamese asylum-seekers, were injured late on
Sunday night when right-wing east German youths threw petrol bombs at their
flat in the city of Halle. Three Germans also received burns in the attack
which set the flat on fire as well as other parts of the apartment building.
Police said nearly 20 youths between the ages of 14 and 16 were believed
responsible.
Earlier in the evening 15 men gathered before a flat occupied by Vietnamese
and threw stones and flaming objects through the window. A Vietnamese woman
suffered burns. Four men were arrested in Hanau, west Germany, and accused
of attempted murder and arson. They were said to have planned to set ablaze
a nearby barracks housing nearly 1,000 asylum seekers. The men, aged 19 to
23, were said to be skinheads but did not belong to a political group.
Spiegel TV said it had new documents from the files of the former East
German Stasi security police showing that Mr Manfred Stolpe, prime minister
of Brandenburg state and east Germany's most prominent politician, was given
the East German Medal of Merit at the personal order of Mr Erich Mielke, the
Stasi chief, who is standing trial in Berlin.
Mr Stolpe said last week that he regretted having accepted the medal.
Spiegel TV said the Stasi document contained Mr Stolpe's code name
'Secretary' and number under which he was registered as a Stasi informer.
Mr Stolpe previously said he never knew that he was registered by the agency
as an informer, although he admitted to frequent meetings with Stasi
officers.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4341</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAAQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / New Polish cabinet eases IMF doubts
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANTHONY ROBINSON and CHRISTOPHER BOBINSKI
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   WARSAW
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE NEW Polish government, headed by Ms Hanna Suchocka, appears to have
restored Poland's credibility with the International Monetary Fund, despite
a much higher than projected budget deficit for this year.
An IMF team, led by Mr Michel Deppler, was 'impressed by the package of
government policies which represent a substantial attempt to get to grips
with its serious problems,' said Mr Mark Allen, head of the fund's Warsaw
office.
The IMF suspended disbursements on its original Dollars 1.7bn (Pounds 850m)
three-year extended loan facility a year ago after Poland failed to meet a
series of performance targets. But the new government's refusal to be
stampeded into wage concessions by the recent wave of strikes, and its plans
to raise new taxes and cut social spending, have given substance to its
pledges to cut next year's budget deficit to around 5.5 per cent from an
expected 8 per cent this year.
The IMF team leaves Warsaw today after paving the way for a new lending
agreement during a week of talks with government officials.
A full Fund mission is expected in Warsaw next month to negotiate a new
18-month stand-by agreement.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4342</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAAPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Waigel to orchestrate budget debate: Any doubts the
opposition cares to voice will be brushed aside
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By QUENTIN PEEL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A strange air of unreality hangs over the great budget debate which will
open today in the German Bundestag.
Mr Theo Waigel, the irrepressible finance minister, will produce his plans
for 1993 and medium-term targets until 1996 with the self-satisfied air of a
man who has fought and won to impose strict savings on his fellow ministers.
He will mock all attempts at questioning or interruption with his earthy
Swabian sense of humour, refusing to give any straight answers.
Then the opposition Social Democrats, led by the eminently reasonable Ms
Ingrid Matthaus-Maier, will declare the whole exercise outdated and
irrelevant, and demand that the finance minister return to the drawing board
and redraft the entire plan.
She will declare that the whole budget exercise grossly underestimates the
medium- and long-term needs of the east German economy, and that urgent
action is needed to cut the budget deficit and finance investment spending
there to create new jobs and revive production.
The minister will win the day, but the opposition may well have justice on
its side.
For the truth is that since Mr Waigel proudly pushed his DM435.7bn (Pounds
156.1bn) 'austerity budget' through the cabinet last July, cutting total
spending to a strict 2.5 per cent growth rate (and an average 2.3 per cent
per year to 1996), a new debate on financing investment in eastern Germany
has blown up.
The budget as tabled is in line with Mr Waigel's absolute insistence -
backed by Chancellor Helmut Kohl - that the costs of unification can be
financed without new tax increases, based on strict spending control and
economic growth.
He has succeeded in cutting key areas like defence spending (down 2.5 per
cent to DM50.8bn), family spending and pensions (minus 0.5 per cent), and
regional subsidies paid by the economics ministry (down 4.8 per cent).
By far the biggest increases, inevitably in view of the rampant unemployment
and demand for retraining and comprehensive new infrastructure investment in
the east, go to the employment ministry (up 8.8 per cent to DM98.78bn) and
transport (up 10.7 per cent to DM44.25bn). That is not to mention the 14.1
per cent increase in the cost of servicing the federal debt, up from DM12bn
to DM13.7bn. Overall it shows creditable restraint. Yet as soon as the
budget, and the medium-term finance plan, were approved by the Cabinet,
concerns started to emerge that they were hopelessly unrealistic in spurning
new sources of finance.
Mr Waigel's medium-term restraint has only been achieved by assuming zero
growth in spending in 1995, thanks to a forecast end to federal payments to
the German Unity Fund (running at DM24bn a year), and to DM6bn in federal
subsidies for Berlin.
At the same time he is setting aside just DM13bn from those savings as a
reserve to cover the debts of the Treuhand privatisation agency - a figure
described as 'totally unrealistic' by Mr Helmut Wieczoreck, the SPD budget
spokesman. He reckons a minimum Treuhand reserve of DM30bn will be needed.
The Treuhand is supposed to be wound up in 1995, and its debts taken over by
the public purse: Mr Waigel assumes that at least half the debts (currently
forecast at DM250bn) will have to be taken over by the five eastern states,
although they are unanimous that they have no hope of financing them.
Thus the real hole in state spending - which a compulsory levy or Germany
bond might finance - falls from 1995 onwards.
The government has produced plans for an autobahn toll, and possible petrol
tax increase, dressed up to be anything other than tax rises to finance
unification. They might help pay for the huge task of restructuring the
German railway system, including the amalgamation of the western Bundesbahn
and the eastern Reichsbahn. Then late last month, under urgent pressure from
its eastern members, the joint parliamentary group of Mr Kohl's Christian
Democrats (CDU) and Mr Waigel's Bavaria-based Christian Social Union (CSU)
suddenly proposed a compulsory bond or levy, to be imposed on the
better-paid if they were not already investing in east Germany. It was a
rabbit out of a hat, produced by Mr Wolfgang Schauble, the CDU parliamentary
leader, to appease the east.
Instead it has caused a new bout of blood-letting within the ruling
coalition, divided the CDU itself, and launched a raft of rumours about Mr
Schauble seeking to destabilise the chancellor himself.
There will be repeated demands for Mr Waigel to spell out his best estimates
of the full long-term cost of reviving the east German economy, and then to
say precisely how he hopes to finance it.
That is where Chancellor Kohl's move to summon a new conference of
government, opposition, employers and trade unions, to negotiate a
'solidarity pact' to finance the future needs of the east, comes into play.
It will buy the coalition time to get its budgetary house in order. It may
even produce a few ideas on how to bridge the budgetary gap in the years to
come.
 ------------------------------------------------------------------
          MEDIUM-TERM FINANCE PLAN 1992-1996 (in DMbn)
 ------------------------------------------------------------------
                                 1992   1993   1994   1995   1996
 ------------------------------------------------------------------
Expenditure                     425.1  435.7  452.0  452.0  465.0
Increase over previous year (%)     -   +2.5   +3.8      0   +2.9
Income:
a. tax income                   350.2  367.5  394.1  401.0  421.4
b. other income*                 34.4   30.2   28.6   25.0   21.6
Net borrowing requirement        40.5   38.0   29.3   26.0   22.0
 ------------------------------------------------------------------
* Includes Bundesbank profits, post office transfers, etc.
 ------------------------------------------------------------------
Source: Federal Ministry of Finance.
 ------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4343</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAAOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / The French Referendum: Danes may seek special status
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By HILARY BARNES
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   COPENHAGEN
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
DENMARK must be given a special status within the European Community
following the country's rejection of the Maastricht treaty in its June 2
referendum, Mr Poul Nyrup Rasmussen, the leader of the Social Democratic
party, said.
The Danes stunned Europe in June by narrowly rejecting the Community's
Maastricht Treaty in a referendum.
Mr Rasmussen said Denmark must be allowed exemption from a common defence
policy or a common defence force, and a common currency or economic policies
which follow from the common currency.
The Social Democratic party, currently in opposition, is expected to play a
significant role in Denmark's negotiations with the EC because of the
fragmented state of the eight-party governing coalition.
Mr Rasmussen argued that Denmark could not stop the other 12 member states
from proceeding with the Maastricht Treaty, if it was endorsed by the French
electorate, and Denmark must therefore aim to negotiate a special status.
Mr Poul Schluter, the prime minister, told Conservative party delegates at
the weekend there would be a second referendum in Denmark on a new basis for
Denmark's European policy, perhaps in the first half of 1993. It would offer
a different agreement with the Community, since the voters could not be
asked to vote twice on the Maastricht Treaty.
He said his minority Conservative-Liberal coalition government would seek
parliamentary approval for a new popular vote. The Social Democratic party
said it would support a new referendum, giving the prime minister the
majority needed to call the vote.
'We now wait for the 12 EC members to come up with an agreement proposal,'
said Mr Bjorn Westh, the Social Democrats' EC affairs spokesman.
Mr Schluter also repeated the government's view that the Maastricht Treaty
could not come into force without Denmark's signature and said the other 12
member-states would thus have to wait for negotiations with Denmark before
the treaty was implemented.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4344</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAANFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / The French Referendum: EC urged to renegotiate trade deals
with eastern Europe - EBRD chief Attali warns of 'slide into tribalism'
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID MARSH
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE EC was urged yesterday to renegotiate its trade association agreements
with Czechoslovakia, Hungary and Poland to overcome protectionism in
dealings with eastern Europe.
Mr Jacques Attali, president of the European Bank for Reconstruction and
Development, painted a sombre picture of a 'slide into tribalism' in the
former communist bloc which could disrupt both eastern and western Europe.
He underlined the link between economic dislocation and social and political
unrest, saying the Yugoslav conflict 'may only be the beginning' of fresh
turmoil elsewhere.
Mr Attali, a former adviser to President Francois Mitterrand, used his
speech and Britain's EC conference to deliver a ringing endorsement of the
Maastricht Treaty. If the French failed to ratify it - which he was
convinced would not happen - this would be 'a disaster for the whole
continent'.
Once the treaty had come into effect, the EC should draw up better terms for
the trade agreements with the former communist states of central and eastern
Europe. They should be seen 'as future members, not as competitors to be
kept out'.
The accords lay down strict quotas for exports of goods such as chemicals,
textiles, coal and steel from Poland, Czechoslovakia and Hungary. These were
the products where these countries' chances of earning foreign exchange were
highest, Mr Attali said.
He omitted to mention that in another field - agriculture - the French
government has taken a tough line on limiting access from the east to the EC
market.
'I would not like historians to conclude that the agreements were conceived
to help the EC by seeking protection,' he added.
Mr Attali pointed out that since the events of 1989, the Czechoslovak and
Polish economies had shrunk by about 20 per cent, with the economy in
Bulgaria declining 30 per cent.
He called on the British government, as current president of the EC, to
signal a more open stance towards EC trade with eastern Europe in general.
He suggested the Community hold multilateral talks between up to 40
countries on free trade within Europe after the Edinburgh EC summit this
winter.
Editorial comment, Page 22
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4345</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAAMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / The French Referendum: UK Euro-sceptics step up referendum
calls
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALISON SMITH
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MR John Major's firm rejection of a British referendum on the Maastricht
treaty failed to deter Euro-sceptic Tory MPs yesterday from stepping up
their campaign to make him change his mind.
Sir Teddy Taylor, Tory MP for Southend east and secretary of the
Conservative European Reform Group, said he was asking the prime minister to
meet a delegation of MPs to discuss a UK referendum, in the light of a
public opinion poll showing two-thirds in favour of one.
Not to grant a referendum would, he said, be a 'denial of democracy' and
having one would be a way of relieving tensions with the Tory party.
There are signs that some Tory dissidents who originally opposed the idea of
a referendum on constitutional grounds have now become reconciled to it, and
that if the demand for one became the main thrust of the Euro-sceptic
campaign, it would not cause it to splinter, as it would once have done.
Mr Bill Cash, another Tory MP, said it was a 'disgrace' that there had been
no British referendum, and that the treaty should be renegotiated whatever
the result of the French vote.
Mr Michael Spicer, the Tory MP who organised the House of Commons motion
calling for a 'fresh start' on Europe, called for renegotiation of the
treaty of Rome, to remove the European Commission's law-making capacity.
And he warned that given yesterday's newspaper poll showing that
three-quarters of the public would not vote for closer ties with Europe, it
was 'very worrying that the political leaders of all parties are getting
increasingly out of touch with what the people want on this matter.'
About Mr Major's speech itself, there was little enthusiasm. 'Mr Major
cannot ride more than two horses at once,' Mr John Biffen, a former Tory
cabinet minister, said, adding that it did not suggest he had 'a clear and
decisive European policy'. Another senior Euro-sceptic commented: 'The UK
presidency is obviously a constraint on what he can say.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4346</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAALFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / The French Referendum: 'Good for Britain and good for
Europe'
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Following are highlights from Mr John Major's speech to the UK presidency
conference.
TWO weeks from now we will know the result of the French referendum on
Maastricht. It is a pivotal event. . .The Danish referendum has already
narrowly said No to the treaty. The combination of that and of a French
'Non' would be decisive. Without the consent of all 12 member states, the
Maastricht Treaty cannot proceed. It would be dead.
Even if, as I hope, the French vote Yes, the Danish difficulties must still
be overcome. And then, across Europe, national parliaments must approve the
treaty. In the United Kingdom it may have a bruising passage since -
uniquely in the Community - we in Britain will scrutinise the bill line by
line, clause by clause and vote on it in the same way. I believe myself that
this is a more effective scrutiny than referenda where many votes may be
cast on matters wholly unrelated to the treaty. In Britain we do not face a
referendum and, given our parliamentary procedure, I have no hesitation in
rejecting the concept.
The Maastricht Treaty is a product of compromises by 12 nations. A
hard-fought outcome. No one member state regarded it as ideal. But we all
regarded it as the right outcome for the development of Europe. . .
Overall, the treaty is good for Britain and good for Europe. However,
important as Maastricht is, we should not let this particular strand of
European development blind us to the other issues before us. Maastricht
deserves approval but it is by no means the whole agenda.
It is but part of a bigger agenda. We have also to:
Complete the single market by the end of the year;
Strengthen political co-operation, for example, over Yugoslavia;
Complete difficult negotiations over future financing;
Seek a successful Gatt outcome;
Show that justice/home affairs co-operation is alive and well;
Strengthen links with eastern and central Europe;
Prepare for enlargement. Efta first, then eastern Europe.
What lies at the heart of the Community is one very simple idea. . . by
binding together the nations of Europe in a common economic framework, it
would be possible to build an inextricable network of shared interests that
would render war between former enemies impossible.
The idea has worked. The Community has been the answer to the destructive
side of nationalism in western Europe. . .
But there are concerns about how it develops that European governments must
address. Many European citizens fear for national self-identity. Will it be
lost? Will their domestic interests be subordinated? Will they forever face
frustrating restrictions? You could sense that debate in Denmark. It is
alive in France. It is an everyday currency in the German Lander. It
flourishes in the UK. . .
The Community must show that these fears are phantoms. To do so it must
recognise and build on national identity and national pride, not appear to
ride roughshod over them. For the reality is that no nation's identity will
ever be lost. Whatever happens in the Community, the French will be no less
French, the Germans no less German, the Danes no less Danish and the British
no less British. . .
At the core of the Treaty of Rome lies the notion of democratic consent. Its
opening words are these: 'Determined to lay the foundations of an
ever-closer union among the peoples of Europe'. Not ever closer union among
governments or bureaucracies but among people. Not federation but
conciliation and consent.
For many countries in the Community, the idea of a common defence lies at
the heart of political union. There is a tension between those member states
who believe that we must make progress towards a common defence between the
countries of the European Community and those, like Britain, who believe
that we have a common defence of Europe and that that common defence is
called Nato. Maastricht does not resolve the argument for all time. It does,
however, preserve the benefits of what we already have. It maintains the
primacy of Nato while building up the European role within Nato. . .
What has happened in the former Yugoslavia illustrates both the strength of
nationalism and the need to harness it. Not repress it. But channel it.
None of us can foresee accurately the world in which we will be living in 20
years' time. But what we can see now is that the American presence on our
continent is essential, both for our defence and for European stability.
The Maastricht Treaty enshrines two very important ideas. The first is that
the Community should only do those things which cannot be better done at the
level of member states. That implies scrapping some existing, overbearing
legislation, as well as avoiding new, unnecessary regulation. The second is
that we can act together in unison without necessarily acting within the
framework of Community law. This is a revolutionary change. In foreign
policy and in matters of interior affairs and justice we shall work together
as 12 within a treaty framework, but that framework will be distinct from
the Treaty of Rome.
In this respect the Maastricht Treaty showed a mature Community coming of
age. It can develop outside the Treaty of Rome as current events are
showing. Indeed, it must if the Community is to develop collectively. We
need not be confined into centralism.
It is the key to progress. The lesson of Maastricht is that we do need to
work together, but we do not on every issue need Community law to make us
work together.
In other words, the very centralising tendency that many are so worried
about was addressed and corrected at Maastricht. Maastricht is not the
complete answer, but it is the first vitally important step in a new
direction.
So what would be the position if the Maastricht Treaty was not ratified by
all the member states and could not be implemented? Would all those gains be
lost? The fact is that you could not set aside the results of a hard-fought
negotiation and expect to keep all the gains. I believe that what we won at
Maastricht is worth preserving. If the Maastricht Treaty is not ratified,
the arguments within the Community will not go away. They will have to be
gone through again.
Up to now we have decided on our pattern of development and growth from
within. For nearly 50 years the shape of our continent was frozen under
communism. But, now, even if it wanted to, the EC could not ignore the rest
of Europe. It does not want to. All of us have decided it is essential to
embrace the democracies to the east. To the countries of eastern Europe the
Community has been a source of hope and inspiration through decades of
Communist tyranny. Now they are free and the Community must underpin both
their economic development and their democratic stability.
So, over the next 10 years, what happens outside the present borders of the
European Community will be as important to our development as what happens
inside the existing Community. The Community will be joined by countries who
have rediscovered their nationhood.
As I intimated earlier, no treaty is ever perfect: they are all the outcome
of a hard negotiation and therefore a compromise. That is true of
Maastricht. But if Maastricht did not enter into force, the alternative
would not be the status quo ante. The real issues which affect the Community
 -our economic development, enlargement, our response to international
events and crisis - all require a response. To be effective that needs to be
a response agreed among all of the member states. Maastricht gives us the
means of doing just that.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4347</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAAKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / The French Referendum: Business leaders united behind
Maastricht - almost / Chairmen of France's two biggest private-sector
companies vote No
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By WILLIAM DAWKINS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE heads of France's top companies today launch their campaign for a Yes
vote in the September 20 referendum on European union, marred by divisions
in their top ranks.
They will issue a manifesto signed by 115 industrial leaders belonging to
the Institut de l'Entreprise, an influential think-tank of top managers.
They including such heavy hitters as Mr Antoine Riboud, chairman of the BSN
foods group, Mr Raymond Levy, the recently retired chairman of Renault, and
Mr Jean-Louis Beffa, head of glass and pipes maker Saint-Gobain.
However, the list will be notable for the absence of the chairmen of
France's two largest private-sector companies, the deeply anti-Maastricht Mr
Jacques Calvet, at the Peugeot car group, and Mr Pierre Suard of Alcatel
Alsthom, the engineering and telecommunications giant, a recent arrival in
the No camp.
Critics of Mr Calvet and Mr Suard claim the pair, both close to the
right-wing political opposition, are mavericks. Yet they do represent an
important minority in France's business community.
As evidence of the split among France's company directors, a mid-August poll
of senior managers by Louis-Harris showed only 59 per cent in favour of
Maastricht. Mr Francois Perigot, president of the Patronat employers'
association, was revealingly cautious on the treaty last week, saying that
he would vote in favour, but he would give no orders to company directors.
This split may come as a surprise to some of their competitors, who feel
French industry should have nothing to lose from Maastricht since France is
one of the only two European economies - the other is Luxembourg - able to
fulfil the stringent criteria for monetary union.
So what are the arguments? Both Mr Suard and Mr Calvet fear that the
treaty's free-market policies will throw Europe open to their industrial
competitors without obtaining anything in return, possibly killing some
struggling strategic sectors. They are not alone, for the need to defend
some kind of industrial policy still runs strong on both sides of politics,
even though state interventionism has broadly been on the retreat in France
for the past decade.
'In some sectors, like electronic components, it is too late. The
Community's free market policy is suicidal, notably in the face of the
Japanese,' explained Mr Suard in a survey of top managers' voting
intentions. Mr Calvet - who, ironically, was once an adviser to the
pro-European former French President Valery Giscard d'Estaing - believes
unbridled competition from outside Europe, coupled with the budgetary
rigours imposed on some governments, would drive unemployment even higher.
Mr Calvet, who also warns of domination by the Brussels bureaucracy, traces
the growth of liberal economic policies in the EC to Britain's entry into
the community in 1973. He voted against British entry at the time and sees
it as 'the beginning of the disappearance of the EC in favour of a vast,
neutered, free exchange zone', which will be reinforced by the treaty.
Among Yes voters in France's boardrooms, currency stability is the most
commonly cited advantage seen in the Maastricht plan. 'This will place us on
an equal footing with the Americans and give us the world's top currency,'
predicts Mr Jerome Monod, chairman of Lyonnaise-des-Eaux-Dumez, the water
distribution-to-construction conglomerate. Economic and monetary
independence is no longer possible, he argues, as shown by France's own
failed attempt at a go-it-alone economic relaunch in 1981, followed by a
decade's convergence of interest and inflation rates towards those of
Germany.
Mr Jean-Rene Fourtou, chairman of Rhone-Poulenc, the state-owned chemicals
giant, adds that Maastricht 'is also the creation of a monetary union
founded on especially healthy principles: the fight against inflation, a
limit on budget deficits and mastering state debts. For Rhone-Poulenc, these
signify. . . better clarity in management.'
However, Mr Fourtou is being careful not to campaign among his employees,
for fear of inflaming the No vote. 'As in public opinion, the discrediting
of (official) power worries company heads,' he says.
The treaty's main shortcoming is a 'blind submission to monetary ideology',
says another business leader in the Yes camp, Mr Bertrand Collomb, chairman
of cement maker Lafarge Coppee.
But he nevertheless supports monetary union because 'no company can make
long-term plans in an integrated economic area unless the risk of exchange
rate variations between countries is finally got rid of.'
The European Monetary System, as it is now, does not guarantee such
stability. Once the single market is in place, Mr Collomb believes EC
governments should seek a 'more subtle' economic policy than the market
liberalism in the treaty.
Despite the rifts at the top, the impression that French voters will be
offered today is that the business establishment is on balance in favour of
monetary and political union, for simple economic self-interest. This
no-nonsense message could help bolster the fragile majority in favour of
European union, given that much of the French public's hesitation over
Maastricht appears to be rooted in distrust of the political establishment,
which has taken the lead in the Yes campaign.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4348</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAAJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / The French Referendum: Interest rate rise pushes lira higher
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT GRAHAM
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   ROME
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE Italian lira recovered slightly yesterday in response to the raising of
the discount rate by 1.75 points to 15 per cent by the Bank of Italy on
Friday.
But the price of this defensive measure, raising the discount rate to its
highest since 1985, was a sharp fall on the Milan bourse. Share prices
retreated an average 3.02 per cent as analysts worried about the impact of
higher interest rates on a wide swathe of quoted companies. Since the
beginning of the year, but especially in the past two months, share prices
have fallen 30 per cent on the Milan bourse.
Yesterday, the commercial banks emphasised the high cost of credit by
following the discount rate rise. Most commercial banks raised their prime
rates in line by 1.75 points and the upper limit of rates now charged to
customers moved as high as 23 per cent.
The lira was fixed yesterday at 763.40 against the D-Mark, compared with
Friday's 765.40, the floor level permitted within the European Monetary
System.
The lira has been under particular pressure during the past 10 days since
the first polls in France showed a majority would vote against the
Maastricht treaty in the referendum on September 20.
A no result would profoundly affect Italy which has a huge public sector
deficit, high indebtedness, above average inflation and a weak currency.
Foreign currency dealers said the lira remained vulnerable even though the
authorities have made clear their determination to defend the existing
parity and the Bank of Italy can call on unlimited credit from its stronger
EC partners.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4349</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAAIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Stock &amp; Currency Markets
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
 --------------------------------------------------------
STOCK MARKET INDICES
 --------------------------------------------------------
FT-SE 100: 2,372.2 (+10.0)
Yield 5.10
FT-SE Eurotrack 100 1,032.28 (+3.01)
FT-A All-Share 1,120.50 (+0.4%)
FT-A World Index 143.94 (-0.3%)
Nikkei 18,440.18 (-115.21)
 --------------------------------------------------------
LONDON MONEY
 --------------------------------------------------------
3-mo Interbank 10 5/16% (10 3/8%)
Liffe long gilt future: Sep 97 15/32 (Sep 97 17/32)
 --------------------------------------------------------
NORTH SEA OIL (Argus)
 --------------------------------------------------------
Brent 15-day (Oct) Dollars 20.275 (20.15)
The New York markets were closed yesterday
 --------------------------------------------------------
GOLD
 --------------------------------------------------------
London Dollars 343.15 (341.5)
 --------------------------------------------------------
STERLING
 --------------------------------------------------------
London:
Dollars 1.993 (1.9955)
DM 2.795 (2.8)
FFr 9.5075 (9.5275)
SFr 2.4925 (2.4975)
Y 246.25 (245.75)
Pounds Index 92.4 (same)
Tokyo close Y 123.45
 --------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4350</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAAHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / World News In Brief: Gower out and Gatting in for India tour
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
David Gower, record England run scorer, and Allan Lamb have not been
included in the England cricket squad which is to tour India this winter.
Mike Gatting (left) and
John Emburey, who were banned after the 'rebel' tour to South Africa, have
been recalled.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4351</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAAGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Pretoria talks threatened after 24 killed in Ciskei
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PATTI WALDMEIR
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   JOHANNESBURG
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
TROOPS from the nominally independent black 'homeland' of Ciskei yesterday
shot dead at least 24 demonstrators and wounded nearly 200, putting the
future of South African constitutional negotiations into serious jeopardy.
The shooting was condemned by the African National Congress as 'unprovoked
killing of unarmed demonstrators', but the South African government accused
the ANC of deliberately provoking the attack.
Witnesses said Ciskei troops opened fire on some 50,000 ANC demonstrators
who crossed the border from South Africa.
The Pretoria government last night threatened to halt talks with the ANC
about the country's future. 'They knew people would be shot, they wanted
people to be shot,' said Mr Pik Botha, the foreign minister.
'It's impossible to negotiate with these people because they don't stick to
agreements,' he said.
'We must study if we can continue negotiating with the ANC/SACP (South
African Communist Party) alliance,' Mr Botha added.
Mr Cyril Ramaphosa, the ANC secretary general, said the future of
negotiations on a new constitution, suspended since June, was further
threatened. 'We cannot just continue as if flies have died,' he said. 'We do
not intend to respond meekly to this latest atrocity.'
Pretoria said it would send troops to Ciskei at the request of the
homeland's government to guard important installations against any
retaliatory attacks.
Although no South African government forces were involved in the shooting,
the ANC blames Pretoria, which provides financial, security and political
support to Ciskei. The ANC put the death toll at up to 28.
The march, part of the ANC's strategy of mass action to force political
concessions from Pretoria, was called to protest at restrictions on
political activity in Ciskei. The ANC had legal permission to lead a march
only as far as a sports stadium just inside the Ciskei border, but ANC
leaders made clear that their aim was to occupy the capital, Bisho, in an
attempt to topple Ciskei's military ruler, Brig Oupa Gqozo.
The incident was part of a continuing struggle between the ANC and
conservative homeland governments for political support in the 10 homelands
created under apartheid.
The ANC claimed the government of President FW de Klerk failed to restrain
Brig Gqozo, who could not continue to rule without Pretoria's support.
Mr de Klerk meanwhile was chairing a conference of other homeland leaders in
Pretoria to discuss constitutional issues.
While only Ciskei troops were involved in the shooting, there was a
substantial South African security presence deployed near the Ciskei border.
Mr Hernus Kriel, law and order minister, said the incident could have been
avoided if conditions imposed on the marchers by a local magistrate had been
respected.
Apartheid's rural ghettoes Page 6
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4352</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAAFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / UK loses chance of Pounds 1bn tank exports
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID WHITE, Defence Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
VICKERS of the UK has lost the chance of a Pounds 1bn Swedish export deal
because it is unable to send one of its new Challenger 2 tanks for field
trials.
Sir Colin Chandler, chief executive of the group, said the Ministry of
Defence refused to release one of the eight prototypes being tested for the
British army.
It is understood the decision was taken at a senior level of the MoD's
procurement executive.
Mr Anders Bjorck, Swedish defence minister, said yesterday the Challenger 2
had been ruled out of a competition to supply 200 battle tanks to the
Swedish army. He expressed astonishment that the UK had turned down a
request to take part in field trials starting in Sweden on October 1.
The Swedish government made a second request, thinking there had been a
misunderstanding. 'The answer was very clearly 'We can't' and so we skipped
it,' Mr Bjorck said.
The competition would now be between the German Leopard 2, the US M1A2
Abrams and the French Leclerc tank, he said. A contract was due early in
1994.
Last year, Vickers won a fiercely fought UK contest for 130 tanks in a deal
worth more than Pounds 400m. Export prospects was one of the arguments used
in support of its bid against its three main western rivals.
One of the nine Challenger 2 prototypes is in Saudi Arabia, following recent
trials in Kuwait. Further trials aimed at securing contracts are due to be
conducted in the United Arab Emirates and Oman.
Mr Bjorck said the UK plainly considered the Middle East to be more
important than Sweden.
Vickers had pinned hopes on Sweden as its biggest western export prospect in
the near future. Sir Colin said that he hoped Vickers would be able to
rejoin the contest: 'We are hoping common sense will prevail between the two
governments.'
If Vickers had unilaterally removed one of its tanks from the UK test
programme it would have been in breach of its contractual commitment, he
said.
The Swedish minister, who was attending the Farnborough Air Show, was due to
meet Mr Malcolm Rifkind, the defence secretary, last night.
Farnborough air show, Page 8
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4353</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAAEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Kohl seeks 'solidarity pact' to finance German unification
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By QUENTIN PEEL
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BONN
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
GERMANY'S chancellor Helmut Kohl, facing accusations of indecision and weak
leadership, yesterday summoned a roundtable meeting of industry, trade
unions, government and opposition, to negotiate a 'solidarity pact' to
finance the growing cost of unification.
He rejected calls for a 'grand coalition' with the opposition Social
Democrats to tackle the country's gathering economic crisis. At the same
time, his right-hand man and parliamentary leader, Mr Wolfgang Schauble,
denied that he was plotting to take over from the chancellor.
Mr Kohl's move amounts to a belated recognition that budget stringency
cannot alone finance the massive transfers required to revive the east
German economy - currently around a net DM150bn (Pounds 54bn) a year.
His adoption of the roundtable formula to negotiate a consensus is also a
political retreat. The proposal was first made by the five leading German
economic institutes almost a year ago and was spurned by the government.
The move was welcomed by the opposition SPD, which said it was ready for
talks on the problems of east Germany. There was no immediate reaction from
the trade unions.
Mr Kohl will undoubtedly be looking for a commitment on wage restraint from
the unions, increased contributions by industry to eastern investment, and
further efforts to curb government spending and subsidies in the west.
Mr Dieter Vogel, the government spokesman, said the object of the talks,
against the background of 'an increasingly difficult world economic
situation', would be to ensure the competitiveness of Germany as an
investment location in the 1990s, and the rebuilding of the east German
economy and administration. It should also finalise agreement on the
financial burden-sharing between the central government, the federal states,
and local authorities.
Talks between officials at 'expert level' would begin in the chancellor's
office next week, he said. One unanswered question last night was whether
the Bundesbank would be given a seat at the table in an effort to
co-ordinate monetary policy with the economic needs of the east.
The call for a 'solidarity pact' from all sides of the German economy
followed the chancellor's failure to persuade an emergency meeting of the
three ruling coalition partners on Sunday to agree on new ways of financing
the east German recovery.
Budget debate Page 3
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4354</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAADFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / PM hits at Euro-critics and rejects referendum
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP STEPHENS, Political Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MR JOHN MAJOR confronted his Euro-sceptic critics in the Tory party
yesterday with a strong defence of the Maastricht treaty and a blunt
rejection of their calls for a British referendum.
The prime minister's support for a Yes vote in the French referendum on
September 20 came as the British EC presidency started work on a list of
options to persuade the Danish electorate to reverse its rejection of the
agreement on European Union.
Those options may include a British-style escape clause from monetary union
and qualification of the treaty's defence and social provisions, as well as
attempts to define closely the powers of Brussels through the concept of
'subsidiarity' - devolving decisions back to national level.
In a speech to a London conference billed as a centrepiece of the British
presidency, Mr Major said the path for Europe mapped out by the Maastricht
treaty would not submerge the national identities of member states.
His comments brought an angry reaction from Tory Euro-sceptics, who renewed
their demand for a referendum, but won praise from Mr Paddy Ashdown, leader
of the strongly pro-European Liberal Democrats.
Mr William Cash, a leading sceptic on the Tory backbenches, said it was a
'disgrace' that there would be no British referendum. Mr Michael Spicer,
another anti-Maastricht campaigner, accused Mr Major of becoming
'increasingly out of touch with what the people want on this matter'.
Recognising that the British bill to ratify Maastricht would have a
'bruising passage' through the House of Commons, Mr Major acknowledged the
anxieties of those who feared that the EC would 'ride roughshod' over
national identities. But he dismissed the 'phantom' of a centralised
superstate conjured up by Euro-sceptics. He said: 'The reality is that no
nation's identity will ever be lost. Whatever happens in the Community, the
French will be no less French, the Germans no less German, the Danes no less
Danish and - I promise you - the British no less British.' Maastricht was
part of a larger EC agenda which included completion of the single market,
enlargement and closer political co-operation in responding to crises such
as that in the former Yugoslavia. Nor was the treaty - the result of a
series of tough compromises - perfect.
But in setting out a vision of Europe designed to undercut the arguments of
Lady Thatcher, his predecessor, Mr Major declared that the treaty
represented a 'vitally important step in a new direction for the Community'.
Its provision for intergovernmental co-operation outside the Treaty of Rome
had reversed the centralism of previous agreements: 'It is the key to
progress . . . . a turning point'.
If France or Denmark could not ratify the treaty it would be dead.
But the pressures for closer co-operation would not go away: 'We shall work
in ever closer union not because the Treaty of Rome tells us to but because
the Treaty of Rome describes what it is in our interests to do'.
If the French vote Yes, Mr Major plans to meet Mr Poul Schluter, the Danish
prime minister, in London at the end of the month.
Page 2
UK Euro-sceptics step up referendum calls
'Good for Britain and good for Europe'
Business leaders united - almost
Lira recovers Page 22
Editorial Comment
Joe Rogaly
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4355</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAACFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Pound slips against DM
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JAMES BLITZ
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
STERLING closed half a pfennig weaker against the D-Mark in London yesterday
in spite of attempts by EC finance ministers at the weekend to inject some
calm into the foreign exchange markets.
Currency trading was thin because of the Labor Day holiday in the US. But
investment in D-Marks continued, pushing the pound down to a close of
DM2.7950, less than 2 pfennigs above its floor in the European exchange rate
mechanism.
The dollar also traded weakly, closing unchanged at DM1.4030.
Editorial Comment, Page 22
Currencies, Page 33
World Stocks, Page 39
London Shares, Page 42
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4356</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAABFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / World News in Brief: Faster rail link
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Faster rail link: France and Switzerland are to consider building a
high-speed rail line between Geneva and Macon, north of Lyon, which would
cut the 3 1/2 -hour journey between Paris and Geneva to two hours.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4357</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIHBQAAAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Consumer credit rises for July: Increase of Pounds 78m
suggests slight recovery in high street
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER NORMAN and JOHN THORNHILL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BRITISH CONSUMERS unexpectedly increased their buying on credit in July,
adding strength to anecdotal evidence that a slight recovery may be under
way in the high street.
The Central Statistical Office reported yesterday that lending to consumers
by finance houses and other specialist credit companies, building societies
and on bank credit cards under the Visa and Mastercard systems increased by
a net seasonally adjusted Pounds 78m in July. This compared with City
expectations of a Pounds 50m net repayment of consumer credit in July and a
repayment in June of Pounds 55m.
The amount of new credit advanced in July was Pounds 4.25bn, up from Pounds
4.16bn in June and the highest figure since Pounds 4.29bn in July last year.
Several retailers have reported a slight easing of trading conditions in
recent weeks but few are confident enough to declare a sustained
improvement.
Mr Derek Hunt, chairman of the MFI furniture chain, said yesterday: 'Over
the past 18 months there have been many ebbs and flows in demand. Although
we are up a bit at the moment there is no evidence on the table that
anything will really improve this side of Christmas.'
The upturn in consumer borrowing was welcomed by the Treasury and City,
although analysts said it could have been helped by special factors.
There was a modest rush to complete house purchases in July before the
expiry in August of the suspension of stamp duty on housing transactions.
This probably triggered increased buying of household items and furniture on
hire purchase.
Consumers may also have arranged credit agreements to finance new car
purchases after the August 1 introduction of the 'K' registration numbers.
Also, recent wet weather seems to have brought forward purchases of autumn
and winter clothes.
Net lending by finance houses and other credit companies increased by Pounds
56m in July after four months of net repayments. There was also an increase
of Pounds 29m in net lending on Visa and Mastercard credit cards against
Pounds 2m repayment the month before.
The Treasury said the return to net lending in July after June's net
repayment was a 'positive' sign. Mr George Hodgson, market strategist of SG
Warburg Securities said yesterday's figures were good news, but merited 'one
and a half rather than three cheers'.
Company failures, Page 12
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4358</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIIBPAFRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920908
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  08 SEP 92 / Italian union chief accepts pleas to return to the fray
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT GRAHAM
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   ROME
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
MR Bruno Trentin, leader of the CGIL, Italy's largest trade union
confederation, has proved a well-worn maxim of Italian political life -
resignations must never be taken at face value.
Scarcely was the ink dry on the historic agreement signed on July 31 between
the government, employers and the unions ending indexed wages when Mr
Trentin handed in his resignation.
It was a puzzling gesture from the country's most prestigious and
intellectually gifted union figure, especially when his charisma was needed
most by the CGIL as well as the government and employers. Ever since then he
has been under pressure to reconsider.
This he did at a special three-day meeting of the CGIL's 250 senior
officials last week. The meeting turned into a virtual re-election of him in
his four-year post as secretary general, to which he was elected last
October. Despite objections from a hardline minority, the CGIL leadership
also endorsed the July agreement ending the 47-year-old scala mobile system
of indexed wages.
It will be replaced with a limited system of compensating wages for
inflation through to 1994. As of January 1993, workers will receive an extra
L20,000 (Pounds 9.30) per month for 13 months. This is well below the
inflation rate of 3.5 per cent projected for 1993 and does not compensate
for this year's wages falling behind consumer prices.
The government has agreed to freeze public sector tariffs and is offering
the possibility of tax breaks to offset unexpected rises in inflation -
issues tackled yesterday in the first government-union talks since the
summer recess.
Mr Trentin's acceptance of the deal was bitterly criticised by many in the
rank and file who claimed that hard-won union gains had been traded for
token concessions. However, last week he told his critics that his
acceptance had been determined by reasons of state: this was not the moment
to sign inflationary wage deals.
He also threw light on the reasons behind his resignation. He knew the
agreement was controversial and considered his resignation the best way to
focus discussion.
Behind such noble sentiments, he let slip another consideration: he was fed
up presiding over a federation torn by political rivalries.
The two elements of the former Italian Communist party - the Party of the
Democratic Left (PDS) and Reconstructed Communism - have shamelessly used
the CGIL as an arena to pursue vendettas arising from the collapse of
communism.
Beyond these manoeuvrings lies the unresolved issue of the role of a
hitherto powerful trade union movement in what is now a rich and
increasingly market-orientated country.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
International Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4359</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIGBWABIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920907
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  07 SEP 92 / Accountants must recognise public dissatisfaction
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
ACCOUNTANTS must recognise public dissatisfaction with professional
standards and act to repair the damage it has wrought, Mr Allan Denholm,
president of the Institute of Chartered Accountants of Scotland, said at the
weekend.
He told the institute's annual conference in St Andrews that accountants
should not be defensive and 'have no time for the rotten applies in their
professional barrel'.
He added, however, that the failures that brought accountancy into disrepute
were 'very much the exception'.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4360</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIGBWABCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920907
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  07 SEP 92 / Merger is predicted for GMB: Edmonds signals TGWU link
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL SMITH, Labour Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE LEADER of the GMB general workers' union yesterday predicted a merger
with the TGWU general union as he announced plans for a closer relationship
between the two organisations.
Asked about the possibility of a merger, Mr John Edmonds, GMB general
secretary, said: 'We are keen to move along this path carefully and slowly.
Not many people believe there will be two large general unions in Britain by
the end of the century.'
Mr Edmonds' comments follow months of speculation about an amalgamation.
They will add poignancy to today's debate at the annual conference of the
Trades Union Congress about the future role of the TUC.
A growing number of union leaders believes the trend towards a smaller
number of larger unions through amalgamations adds to the pressure for
changes at the TUC.
Mr Edmonds' merger comments yesterday would unlikely to have been made
unless he was confident that Mr Bill Morris, TGWU general secretary, was
also keen to explore an amalgamation.
Some TGWU officials believe Mr Morris will make proposals about changing the
GMB relationship - possibly setting out the consequences of merger - when
his union's executive meets later this month.
GMB leaders meeting in Blackpool yesterday decided to strengthen links with
the TGWU by proposing a series of joint conferences on industrial issues,
and joint servicing arrangements in some areas and industries.
Mr Edmonds said that in future the TUC should concentrate less on lobbying
the government on the economy and more on making its influence felt in
Europe where social partnership values prevailed.
He added that the TUC should campaign better on issues such as employment
rights for individuals, including those that affect pensions.
Mr Gavin Laird, general secretary of the Amalgamated Engineering and
Electrical Union, speaking after his union's TUC delegation had met, also
backed the case for reforming the TUC. unions.'
Observer, Page 17
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4361</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIGBWAEHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920907
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  07 SEP 92 / UK airline passengers to clear US immigration in London
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By TIM BURT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ALL AIRLINE passengers flying to the US from London's two main airports will
clear American immigration before leaving Britain following a UK-US
agreement to ease border controls, the US Immigration and Naturalisation
Service said at the weekend.
The move, backed by the airports operator BAA and involving all scheduled
airlines flying from Heathrow or Gatwick to the US, follows a separate UK
commitment last week to relax border controls for European Community
nationals.
Under the scheme, due to be launched early next year, US officials will
check passports at departure gates so that passengers will be officially
'admitted' to the US while still in London.
Negotiations are continuing in London between INS officials, the Home Office
and BAA to iron out any difficulties after 'pre-inspection' tests last year.
BAA officials said they welcomed any move to ease congestion but were
anxious to avoid importing the problems of US immigration queues to London.
Minimum standards for immigration control, meanwhile, have been introduced
at Heathrow. 'EC nationals should queue for no more than three minutes and
non-EC nationals for no more than 10 minutes,' BAA said.
BAA is seeking flexibility in staffing to increase the number of immigration
officers on duty at peak times. Fixed shifts for airport security staff have
been abandoned but similar moves for Home Office employees could encounter
union opposition.
The INS is recruiting non-union immigration officers to oversee introduction
of the US scheme, which it hopes will be fully operational by spring 1993.
The costs of the scheme are expected to be passed on to airline passengers,
who will pay a Dollars 5 (Pounds 2.50) ticket surcharge.
American executives have called for reciprocal arrangements at US airports.
The Home Office said it would consider such proposals.
Travel without hindrance, Page 7
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4362</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIGBWAEGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920907
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  07 SEP 92 / Letter: Pitfalls in pursuit of quality standard
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr MAGNUS ROBERTSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, Charles Batchelor points out the need to 'devise a means to allow 96
per cent of UK businesses which employ fewer than 20 people to share the
benefits of higher quality standards'.
Obviously not all companies have the ability or motivation to take the DIY
route. Alternatively, they may be unwilling to pay the full cost of hiring a
consultant. There is, however, another way that is beginning to gain
recognition among smaller companies - the group workshop approach.
A number of group workshops is currently in progress involving typically six
to 10 companies drawn from diverse business areas. Not only is that
considerably cheaper than hiring a consultant - in fact, less than Pounds
3,000, or less than half the cost - there is also a considerable advantage
in group members sharing problems and generating better solutions.
One of these groups has completed the workshop stage and we now have the
first company to gain BS5750 in this manner. Magnus Robertson,
director,
Agenda - the Centre for Management Training and Business Development,
NAC Stoneleigh,
Warwickshire CV8 2LG
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 17
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4363</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIGBWAEFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920907
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  07 SEP 92 / Letter: Pitfalls in pursuit of quality standard
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr PETER EDWARDS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, A large proportion of the work of this consultancy is with clients who
have achieved BS5750 accreditation - and little else besides.
Unless the opportunity is taken to implement a culture change at the same
time, then the exercise is likely to produce only a manual.
It is not just a 'management exercise', and few companies take the trouble
actively to involve the sharp end who actually make the quality. Finance and
administration departments are only marginally involved.
Measurement is also lacking - how do you know you are getting better unless
you know where you are and where you are going? Any company rejecting
suppliers only because they do not have accreditation needs to reassess
their purchasing strategy.
Peter Edwards,
Peter Edwards Consultancy,
55 Beverley Road,
Royal Leamington Spa
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 17
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4364</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIGBWAEEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920907
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  07 SEP 92 / Why Hayek speaks for everyone
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL PROWSE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Mr Jack Kemp, the leading conservative in President George Bush's cabinet,
once remarked that his political outlook had been transformed by reading
Friedrich Hayek, the Austrian-born economist. In Britain, Lord Joseph and
many others have paid similar tributes. Hayek's close association with
rightwing politicians is understandable but in some ways unfortunate. He
never saw himself as a conservative, and his books are not the exclusive
property of rightwingers.
Hayek, who died this summer, ought to have broad appeal. He articulated a
compelling vision of the way society (a term he hated) works. In an ever
more specialised age, his intellectual breadth enabled him to make valuable
connections between different disciplines, including economics, psychology,
politics and biology. You can gain insights from him without having to
endorse his more extreme conclusions. As a bonus, he is great fun to read -
if you like rigour and don't object to crankiness now and again.
The easiest way into Hayek is through his last book, The Fatal Conceit
(Routledge, 1988). This is not a substitute for earlier classics such as The
Constitution of Liberty (1960), but it provides a highly readable summary of
many of his central themes. One was the parallel he drew between economic
and biological evolution. People once thought the complexity of the natural
world proved the existence of a creator. Darwin showed how complex creatures
could evolve from simpler organisms.
Hayek saw himself performing the same role in social science. He spent much
of his life explaining that the 'extended order of human co-operation' - his
phrase for the complex of rules and institutions underlying capitalism -
evolved spontaneously. As in biology, order was achieved without a central
guiding authority.
The hostility of many intellectuals to capitalism, Hayek believed, reflected
a misconception of its character. Academics learn to construct solutions to
problems. If you believe the existing (obviously flawed) economic and social
system was consciously created, your natural response is to try to improve
on it.
In Hayek's view, the failure of new constructs such as socialism was
inevitable because no group of people had ever possessed the knowledge
needed consciously to design the existing system, let alone improve on it.
The 'extended order' existed only because societies that happened to have
adopted rules that allowed markets to flourish grew wealthier and more
populous than those that did not.
Hayek also strove to explain why free markets are sometimes seen as immoral.
His answer was that mankind developed not as sovereign individuals but as
members of clans. In the search for food and shelter, solidarity and
altruism were crucial virtues; individuals survived by putting the group
first.
Today, people contribute mainly through their specialised functions in
labour markets and by respecting abstract rules, such as property and wage
contracts. If we all tried to treat our neighbours as ourselves, the system
would break down. The trouble is that caring people find abstract rules
unsatisfying. Hence many 'good' people instinctively dislike capitalism
despite its proven ability to raise living standards. Of course, those who
don't empathise with others (and would have been a menace in pre-industrial
clans) have no such reservations.
Opposition to the extended order, Hayek believed, also reflected a
misunderstanding of the nature of freedom. Behind socialism lay the Romantic
belief (originating in the writing of Rousseau) that man has to throw off
social shackles, including institutions such as property, if he is to be
properly free. Hayek saw more clearly than most that freedom is a matter of
choosing the right kind of constraints. There are only two options: abstract
laws which constrain everybody equally or arbitrary coercion by some group
of one's fellows. He felt abstract rules were preferable because they
created a 'personal space' - a realm in which one could act without fear of
sanction.
All of these insights are important and will probably be quite
uncontroversial within a few decades. But they leave plenty of space for
disagreement. For example, suppose we concede that Hayek is right to
characterise capitalism as a spontaneous self-ordering process. This does
not mean that 19th century capitalism has not been improved by the ad hoc
evolutionary development of welfare states. Germany has moved further in
this direction than the US and many would say it has gained thereby.
Suppose we agree to abstract laws; that does not prevent supposedly
independent judges subverting them. And Hayek should not be allowed to imply
that an ingenious explanation of why we find markets heartless can absolve
us of our responsibility to help the less fortunate. I can see no objection,
even on Hayek's principles, to abstract rules mandating that the wealthy pay
higher taxes than the poor. A left-of-centre Hayekian is not a contradiction
in terms.
I have only scratched Hayek's surface. I have not discussed his prescience
in the 1940s and 1950s, in identifying the flaws in communism and also in
predicting the stagflationary woes of the western democracies. He was a cold
but brilliant fish. If you have postponed reading him because you regard him
as a political extremist, my advice is to think again. There are few more
challenging 20th-century thinkers.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 38
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4365</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIGBWAEDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920907
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  07 SEP 92 / Trouble for the treaty
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By IAN DAVIDSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
With only two weeks to go before the French referendum, it is clear that the
Maastricht treaty is in serious, possibly terminal, trouble. When the day
arrives, perhaps France will vote Yes. But the recent collapse in popular
support for the treaty suggests the result could go either way.
This possibility is so seismic that we need to rethink the political
implications of the treaty, and what is required to give it operational
credibility. If the French vote No, the treaty is dead; but if they vote Yes
by only a narrow margin, the treaty will still be in trouble, both in France
and in the rest of Europe, because French support will be in doubt.
It is not really useful to try to explain the shift in French sentiment
mainly in terms of national factors. Obviously, there are such factors. But
we are probably facing a general and systemic problem, which goes beyond the
unpopularity of President Francois Mitterrand, let alone the convergent
agitations of the National Front, the Communists and the unreconstructed
Gaullists.
When the Danes voted No to Maastricht, the experts were astonished, but they
quickly ran up a Danish explanation: the Danes have never been really
European. When victorious ('game, set and match') John Major started running
away from the treaty, the experts were again stunned, but they soon came up
with a British explanation: the British have never been really European.
But in France the polls have for many years shown a large majority of
general support for Europe. So if aversion to Maastricht has started
spreading to France (not to mention to Germany as well), we are compelled to
suspect that the problem is general, not specific.
Some people cite an unfavourable constellation of events in Europe. The
Community has yet to make any beneficial impact on the Yugoslav civil war,
the disintegration of the ex-Soviet Union, the cost of German unification,
high rates of interest, low rates of economic growth, and high and rising
levels of unemployment. It is not surprising, perhaps, that the Community
and its future ambitions fail to inspire confidence.
This kind of explanation implies a deep frivolity on the part of the
governments which negotiated the Maastricht treaty. It is obviously more
difficult to launch monetary union in the depths of a recession; did they
think it would ever be easy? Did they think they could have monetary union
without confronting the issue of economic growth? Did they think they could
sign up for a liberal-market economic policy without taking the political
consequences?
Nationalists say that Europe's record in Yugoslavia is proof positive that
there can be no common European foreign policy. Not so; it is proof positive
that a common foreign policy does not come cheap, let alone free; it does
not prove that there is any alternative. The British government is
manifestly determined that there shall be no common foreign policy; the
Danish government has no desire for a common defence policy; yet they both
signed the treaty, and have no alternatives.
The heart of the matter is that there is a deep mismatch between the
far-reaching policy ambitions of the Maastricht treaty and the absence of
corresponding reforms of national democratic political processes. Maastricht
calls for colossal poolings of sovereignty in economic and monetary policy,
as well as in foreign and defence policy. Those poolings of sovereignty
simply cannot be counted on to be effective without the continuous and
whole-hearted support of the electorate. But governments have largely
disregarded the voters.
This problem is usually called the Community's 'democratic deficit', meaning
that there should be more powers for the European Parliament. This is just
Euro-cant. The reality is that the EC is a community of democratic nation
states. All significant strategic choices in this community will have to be
mediated through the democratic systems of these nation states for many
years to come; and every extra pooling of national sovereignty must be
worked through the national democratic processes.
Yet most of the 12 governments appear to think they can put the treaty into
practice without further reference to the voters; all of them appear to
think they can dispense with reform of their domestic democratic
arrangements.
Moreover, a Maastricht-type programme requires the kind of cross-party
consent which would survive electoral swings. The Danes voted No by a little
more than 50 per cent; does anyone think they could have implemented
Maastricht with an equally narrow Yes vote? Mr Jacques Chirac, Gaullist
leader, has at last committed himself to a Yes; but half his party is
hostile to Maastricht, and it is likely to lead a conservative victory in
March's parliamentary elections.
The most acute internal contradiction is in Britain, of course. Mr Major has
made 'subsidiarity' his hobby horse, but there are just two problems.
In Europe, subsidiarity implies mutual trust, but the British do not trust
foreigners; at home, subsidiarity implies local democracy, but Mr Major
rejects any democratic reform of Britain's monolithic centralised state.
Whatever happens in France, the arithmetic of the Commons will make it very
difficult for Mr Major to ratify the Maastricht treaty; the conflict between
the political requirements of the treaty and the nature of the British state
will make it impossible for him to implement it.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 38
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4366</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIGBWAECFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920907
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  07 SEP 92 / Monday Interview: Second fiddle's new tune - Shimon Peres,
the Israeli foreign minister, talks to Hugh Carnegy
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By HUGH CARNEGY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Shimon Peres, once an ebullient prime minister but now forced to play second
fiddle to his old rival, Yitzhak Rabin, wears a rather stern face in public
these days.
But as he talks in his office in the barrack-like foreign ministry in
Jerusalem, the subdued tone suddenly gives way to a smile, as he hits on a
metaphor to explain his objection to Palestinian demands at the Middle East
peace talks in Washington.
The Palestinian delegation is demanding that self-government arrangements in
the West Bank and Gaza currently under discussion amount as nearly as
possible to full independence. 'They want a child without a pregnancy,' he
declares. 'That's a little hard to achieve.'
The smile evaporates at the suggestion that, as far as the Palestinians are
concerned Israel seems intent on ensuring they do not even manage to
conceive.
'Look, we are doing things which are tangible and real. They can see by the
criticism and opposition that exists in Israel that we are serious.'
If the foreign minister is irritated, it is probably because the Labour-led
coalition has been somewhat disappointed by the Palestinians at the
Washington talks. Just as the Palestinians had hoped for greater concessions
from Mr Rabin's government, which ousted the unyielding Likud administration
of Yitzhak Shamir in June's Israeli elections, so the new coalition had
thought the Palestinians would be rather more co-operative than they have
proved.
Still, Mr Peres himself expressed some satisfaction with the way the peace
talks were progressing when they broke up last week for a 10-day recess. A
breakthrough, both with the Palestinians and with Israel's other great foe,
Syria, may yet materialise over the coming months.
The real reason Shimon Peres appears a little morose, his friends say, is
that he has not fully come to terms with being number two in the government.
For Mr Peres, Labour's general election victory - which banished the Likud
into opposition for the first time in 15 years - had a bitter taste.
A few months before, Mr Rabin had been elected party leader, ousting Mr
Peres from the position he had held since 1977. The man who for so long led
the fight against the Likud found himself out of the spotlight when victory
finally came.
But Mr Peres is a resilient politician. Close associates say he has not
given up hope of recapturing the party leadership. So he campaigned
energetically for Rabin during the election. He also swallowed his pride
when taking the foreign minister's post, accepting that Mr Rabin would run
the core of the peace talks - the bilateral negotiations with the
Palestinians, Jordan, Syria and Lebanon.
Mr Peres is in charge of the multilateral talks between the various parties
covering arms control, economic co-operation, water, the environment and
refugees. Nevertheless, Mr Peres has backed the prime minister fully over
the proposals made to the Palestinians in Washington for the self-government
arrangements.
These arrangements would have effect for five years while negotiations are
held on a final agreement on the West Bank and Gaza. Israel cannot at this
stage agree to the legislative powers sought by the Palestinians because, Mr
Peres says, this would pre-empt the negotiations for a final settlement
which are not due to start until three years after the 'interim' stage takes
effect.
Neither he nor Mr Rabin has ever conceded the idea of a fully independent
Palestinian state in the occupied territories. They talk in terms of some
sort of federation with Jordan. But from Mr Peres's viewpoint, Labour's
commitment to a permanent settlement based on ceding territory - the 'land
for peace' formula enshrined in UN resolutions 242 and 338 which underpin
the peace talks - means that Palestinian suspicions of a hidden Israeli
agenda are unfounded.
A longstanding Palestinian fear is that the Israelis intend to make the
interim agreement the basis of a final settlement. This Mr Peres denies. 'It
doesn't have a permanent nature. This should be a sort of trial period which
will give all of us time to reach a permanent solution.'
No doubt Mr Peres will be pressed on these issues when he meets British and
French leaders this week. He will in turn urge them to press the Arab side
to be more flexible in Washington. But Mr Peres says European countries -
both individually and collectively through the EC - can play their most
active role in the multilateral rather than the bilateral negotiations.
Mr Peres acknowledges that progress in the five strands of multilateral
talks - due to resume this month - will depend largely on progress in the
bilateral talks. But he believes it is in the multilateral sphere that 'a
different Middle East' can really be shaped.
It is appropriate that Shimon Peres should head Israel's effort in the
multilateral negotiations. He has long had a vision of how, given a measure
of peace, the Middle East as a whole might prosper through building regional
co-operation in vital areas such as arms control, water and trade.
He looks to Europe, with its experience of building the Common Market, for
help by giving advice on the development and financing of the necessary
institutions. In return, he is prepared to let the EC play an enhanced role
in the various multilateral forums - for example on arms control. Mr Shamir
rejected a greater European role on the grounds that the community was
biased towards the Arabs.
Arms control is very difficult and Mr Peres has no illusions. It will have
to be done 'gradually, in small steps', he says. But he has an altogether
more expansive vision when it comes to regional economic co-operation and
sharing resources such as water.
'We are united by the lack of water. We have to organise the assembly, the
distribution and the production of water because, as you know, the rains do
not pass through customs and the rivers do not follow frontiers.'
Peres advocates a Benelux-like economic union between Israel, Jordan and the
Palestinians and, beyond that, regional arrangements for open trade. The
benefits to Israel, with its strength in technology, of being able to trade
with its hitherto inaccessible Arab neighbours would be great.
But Mr Peres says there would be advantages for all sides. 'The whole region
of the Middle East is not such a big market, not for the Arabs, not for us.
We think by organising a real market with open borders and free commerce the
Arabs stand a chance to raise their standard of living.'
For Mr Peres, this is in Israel's interests. 'I believe the economic
standard of living decides the political standard of behaviour. When people
are poor they are hostile and desperate. There is no answer to (Islamic)
fundamentalism by writing a new Koran. You can do it by enabling people to
read it differently.'
This kind of vision of a Middle East transformed is alluring, but it seems a
distant dream. 'We can go very far, because we start from a very low point,'
responds Mr Peres.
He acknowledges that his government's motive for peace is also driven by a
more chilling vision in a region which spends Dollars 50bn a year on arms.
Since coming to power, Mr Rabin has frequently stated that the disappearance
of Soviet backing for Israel's Arab enemies and Iraq's defeat in the Gulf
war have opened a 'window of opportunity' for peace in the region. But he
also says that within a few years circumstances could easily change as
countries such as Iran and Syria - and perhaps once more Iraq - acquire big
arsenals of advanced non-conventional weaponry.
Israel, which already possesses nuclear arms, is itself honing its weapons
capability. But it fears it will find it difficult to maintain its
technological lead. It is this which is seen by Mr Rabin and Mr Peres as the
long-term threat to Israel's existence, not the dispute with the
Palestinians.
They do not share the Likud's ideological commitment to keeping the West
Bank and Gaza. And so to them, the Palestinian issue, so often regarded as
the core of the conflict in the Middle East, has come to be seen as an
awkward obstacle which must be resolved in order to help defuse a much
greater threat.
'Today the heart of the conflict is the attempt to nuclearise the Middle
East,' says Mr Peres. 'How to save the Middle East from that conflict is the
major issue. We have to have peace before the skies are filled with
non-conventional missiles which threaten us all.'
PERSONAL FILE
1923 Born Shimon Persky, Vishneva, Poland.
1934 Immigrated to British Mandatory Palestine. Education included Harvard
University.
1952 Director-general, Ministry of Defence.
1959 Deputy defence minister.
1974 Defence minister.
1977-92 Labour party leader.
1984 Prime minister.
1986 Foreign minister.
1988-90 Finance minister.
1992 Foreign minister.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 38
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4367</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIGBWAEBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920907
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  07 SEP 92 / Survey of Reinsurance (5): The big become bigger - Valerie
Denney takes an overall look at the market place
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By VALERIE DENNEY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
OVERCAPACITY, shrinking profit margins and ruthlessly regular catastrophe
losses - these are difficult times for the international reinsurance
industry.
There have, of course, been the inevitable bail-outs such as Cigna Re UK,
Yasuda Europe, Stockholm Re UK and Scan Re, to name but a few London
examples. Indeed, even Swedish insurance group, Skandia, among the top five
reinsurers during the late Eighties, is now paring down its reinsurance
activities worldwide. However, other reinsurers have seen sizeable growth.
The Germans have been particularly aggressive. According to the latest
Reactions/Standard and Poor's ranking of the top 100 reinsurers, Hannover Re
and Eisen &amp; Stahl Re, (both subsidiaries of industrial insurer
Haftpfichtverband der Deutschen Industrie Group, which work in close
co-operation) saw their net premiums rise by 15.1 per cent in 1990 to
Dollars 1664.4m, moving up one place to become the world's sixth largest
reinsurance group. This increase was mainly due to Hannover Re's acquisition
of a substantial portion of Hamburg International Re's portfolio.
Cologne Re, which is owned by France's Groupe de Suez, also moved up one
place to number five as its premiums rose from Dollars 1,428.2m to Dollars
1,879.3m. Net premiums at Gerling, an ambitious group which owns a majority
stake in Frankona, rose from Dollars 1,139.1m in 1989 to Dollars 1,391.9m
(excluding Frankona), leaving the reinsurer at biting point in terms of
world ranking. Both companies attribute their growth to new business and
increased rates, particularly in non-proportional lines.
Dutch company Netherland Reinsurance Group (NRG) and French reinsurer, Scor,
have shown the most notable growth, however, following aggressive
acquisition programmes. NRG's 1990 figures, which included the acquisition
of the UK reinsurer Victory Re, saw net premiums rise by 87.8 per cent to
Dollars 1,205.5m, catapulting NRG from 19th position in world ranking to
12th.
Scor, which merged with French neighbour UAP Re in 1989 and acquired
Vittoria Re of Italy in 1988, Deutsche Kontinentale of Germany in 1989 and
the Unity Group of the US in 1990, is renowned as one of the most aggressive
players in the reinsurance market today. Net premiums in 1990 increased by
40.3 per cent to Dollars 1,629.4m, moving Scor's world ranking from 12th
place to 7th. It is generally believed that Scor is now looking to acquire
another European reinsurer.
In the US, General Re which saw a 14.9 per cent increase to Dollars 2,065m
in 1990, is also rumoured to be circling possible European prey after its
ill-fated attempt to buy UK reinsurer Royal Re. With only 5 per cent of its
income derived from outside the US, General Re is looking to build a more
international portfolio.
Such activity is symptomatic of a shifting market. With all its problems the
present cycle also offers opportunities for the larger, better capitalised
company. As Julianne Jessup of insurance consultants De Lisle Jessup Scott
points out, 'the strength and quality of the underlying asset base of
reinsurers is becoming increasingly important as insurers focus on the
solvency and potential longevity of their protection'.
Moreover, as more reinsurance business, particularly in the
property/catastrophe area, has to be retained net, it is only the large
companies with a large spread of risks and considerable capital accumulation
which can afford significant aggregate loss exposure.
And as the big become bigger, so too does their grip on the market. In 1990
the top 10 reinsurers accounted for 53 per cent of the total net premiums of
the top 100, while the top 20 accounted for 69.3 per cent. Both figures
represented an increase on the previous year's 52.3 per cent and 68 per cent
respectively.
Meanwhile, small companies entrenched in niche positions are still well
placed. It is widely believed that those who can build on a long-standing
relationship with the cedant and offer specialised services should be
guaranteed a stable future. This further fuels the 'polarisation' trend
which has been evident in recent years whereby the reinsurance market is
divided into large, multifaceted international companies at one end of the
scale and the small specialists at the other.
Given the combination of too many reinsurance players and a shrinking
trading base as cedants retain more business, the prospect of more drop-outs
and further concentration of reinsurance capacity is not in doubt. But it
will only be the brave few who take the acquisition route. Ms Jessup
stresses the difficulty of assessing long-term liabilities. She argues that
NRG's acquisition of Victory Re which was acquired for Pounds 122m but
shortly afterwards became technically insolvent has done little to encourage
acquisitive activity.
The Continental Europeans will continue to dominate, particularly the Swiss
and the Germans who are allowed to build up catastrophe reserves which can
be offset against tax, unlike their international counterparts. In a market
ever more concerned with security, this is an important marketing tool.
There is reason to suspect that US reinsurers, more willing than Europeans
to develop new, as yet untested, means of enhancing capital such as
financial reinsurance and therefore placing their longevity into question,
will remain a weak force outside American borders.
As for Japanese reinsurers, although capital rich and, as such, in a
position to become dominant reinsurance players, they have proved risk
averse, preferring to focus primarily on domestic business. Such a
temperament renders it unlikely that the Japanese will emerge as larger
players in the international market.
 --------------------------------------------------------------------
           STANDARD &amp; POOR'S TOP 20 GLOBAL REINSURERS
 --------------------------------------------------------------------
Rank                       Company              Net premium (1990)
                                                  (USDollars m)
 --------------------------------------------------------------------
1                     Munich Re, Germany              8245.0
2                    Swiss Re, Switzerland            5633.8
3                       Employers Re, US              2639.0
4                        General Re, US               2065.0
5                     Cologne Re, Germany             1879.3
6               Hannover Re/Eisen &amp; Stahl, Germany    1664.4
7                        Scor, France                 1629.4
8                      Generali, Italy                1540.6
9                      Gerling, Germany               1391.9
10                Mercantile &amp; General Re, UK         1371.3
11                      Skandia, Sweden               1211.4
12                     NRG, Netherlands               1205.5
13                    Frankona Re, Germany            1134.5
14                 Tokio Marine &amp; Fire, Japan          927.9
15                        American Re, US              921.5
16                Winterthur Group, Switzerland        682.7
17                   Lincoln National Re, US           646.9
18                   Toa Fire &amp; Marine, Japan          645.6
19                 Yasuda Fire &amp; Marine, Japan         645.6
20                   Unione  Italiana Re, Italy        621.3
 --------------------------------------------------------------------
Source: Reactions Survey: Standard &amp; Poor's Top 100 Global Reinsurers
 --------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 29
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4368</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIGBWAEAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920907
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  07 SEP 92 / Survey of Reinsurance (4): Cushioned against misfortunes -
US reinsurers have responded to shifting times
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By VALERIE DENNEY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
WHILE mid-year renewals saw rates for most classes of insurance begin to
rise worldwide, mainstream property and casualty rates in North America, the
largest insurance market in the world, remain inadequately low.
This is due to raging competition in the US reinsurance market. As more US
reinsurers subscribe to the view that at least Dollars 100m of capital and
surplus is required to be a serious player, so capital has poured into the
market without the premium base increasing in line.
US reinsurers' capital (measured by policyholders' surplus, which is the
excess of assets over liabilities) has rocketed by 63 per cent since 1987,
from Dollars 7.9bn to Dollars 12.9bn. This has had the effect of depressing
pricing levels, as more reinsurers chase the premium dollar to maximise
their capital usage.
In spite of the inevitable worsening of underwriting performance with a
market combined ratio (underwriting and claims expenses as a percentage of
premiums) of 103 per cent in 1987 rising to 107 per cent in 1991, investment
gains have more than offset underwriting losses. Market net income in 1991
amounted to Dollars 2bn compared to Dollars 100m the year before. This was
aided by around Dollars 600m of realised capital gains.
Moreover, because primary insurers are increasing their retention levels and
switching much of the residue risk from proportional treaty to excess of
loss covers, reinsurers have been cushioned to a large extent against the
abnormally long and brutal run of misfortunes primary insurers have had to
contend with in recent years.
Analysts reckon it will take a natural disaster involving at least a Dollars
2bn insured loss, or the insolvency of a leading insurer, to inflict enough
pain on US reinsurers to raise rates. Even the Los Angeles riots and the
Chicago floods have not produced losses large enough to make an impact.
If not through rate increases, reinsurers have taken some action against
soft and shifting times. Provoked by continuing overcapacity, reinsurers are
looking to the primary market as a means to generate new sources of
business. 'Reinsurers are looking at opportunities where they can issue
primary insurance policies for agents marketing specialty insurance and
niche programmes,' says Andrew Barile, president of Ambel Consultation
Services. This trend toward what Mr Barile calls 'vertical integration' is
bringing fresh capital into non-standard lines such as excess general
liability, errors and omissions and non-standard auto liability. Mr Barile
cites Phoenix Re, General Re and Nac Re as examples of leading reinsurers
who have set up their own primary companies to pursue such business.
Observers are unanimous that this trend will continue.
According to Standard &amp; Poor's, the US rating agency, US reinsurers managed
to increase net premium volume to Dollars 14.9bn (from Dollars 13.9bn in
1990). This growth, says S &amp; P, has been largely fuelled by an increased
number of financial reinsurance transactions, geared to provide surplus
relief and stabilise losses for insurers, which are replacing more
traditional forms of reinsurance coverage, and the re-claiming of business
from alternative markets such as self-insured municipalities and captive
insurers.
While reinsurers show willing to adapt underwriting practices, they are also
seeing their industry slimming down. Reinsurers' proclivity to increase
surplus, parent companies wanting to bail out of an increasingly complicated
business and a reduction in demand among cedants (the reinsurance buyers)
for the traditional reinsurance product have all conspired to contract the
lower tiers of the market. In the past year, New Zealand Re was purchased by
English &amp; American Insurance, MONY Re was acquired by Folksamerica and
American Union Re is now a reinsurance department of American States
Insurance, to mention but a few examples. This trend is set to continue.
It is the smaller and medium-sized reinsurers which are most vulnerable in
the competitive US market. Such companies are being generally excluded by
ceding company guidelines from writing casualty related risks. Desperately
seeking more market share, they have been forced to take on more property
business, some of which is of a catastrophe nature, while purchasing less
reinsurance protection due to the shortage of retrocessional capacity.
Underwriting results are therefore fatally weakened.
Nor is the prognosis good for the large players. Undoubtedly, they have
benefited from a 'flight to quality' with cedants ever more concerned with
size and continuity as financially troubled reinsurers such as Unione
Italiana Reinsurance of America have been driven out of business in recent
years. Indeed, the top 10 reinsurers accounted for 53 per cent of business
written in 1991. This compares with a 44 per cent market share in 1985.
No-one disputes that some of this increased market share has been at the
expense of smaller players.
But analysts point to three reasons why the top tier reinsurers are living
on borrowed time. First, US regulators are proposing risk-based capital
rules which should change the way in which security is measured and better
identify companies which are applying capital correctly in relation to their
resources. The rules will greatly reduce reinsurers' surplus, thereby
depriving companies of the investment cushion against deteriorating
underwriting results.
Second, Aetna's recent selling off of American Re, the third biggest US
reinsurer, has highlighted market reserve deficiencies. Last year, for
example, reinsurers raised their reserves by the lowest amount in 20 years.
Because of this, buy-out specialists Kohlberg, Kravis, Roberts and Co have
written a provision into the American Re deal which requires Aetna to add an
additional Dollars 500m to the reinsurer's reserves if deemed necessary.
According to S &amp; P, with a deteriorating market combined ratio and
continuing inadequate rates expected next year, reinsurers will need to make
loss reserve adjustments.
And third, the taking on of financial reinsurance, with all the regulatory
and accounting uncertainty that entails, and 'alternative market' business
is begging questions about the future stability of US reinsurance. As Steve
Bolland of broker Gill &amp; Roeser remarks, 'the final effect of this is
uncertain at present, but an educated guess would be that some reinsurers
are writing business in areas where they have no experience or statistics to
guide them. The results of this may not be apparent for some years.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 29
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4369</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIGBWAD9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920907
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  07 SEP 92 / International Company News: Thai Air director faces inquiry
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By VICTOR MALLET
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BANGKOK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE MAN chosen by Thailand's civilian government as the preferred next
president of Thai Airways International (Thai), the listed national airline
is facing an investigation for corruption and mismanagement, officials in
Bangkok announced at the weekend.
The allegations against Mr Chatrachai Bunya-Ananta, executive
vice-president, were interpreted as an attempt by air force officers to
discredit their rivals in the airline's management team and damage Mr
Chatrachai's chances.
The interim government has moved quickly to reduce military influence and
corruption in business since it was appointed in June, but its efforts to
change Thai Airways' articles of association (which give the air force
automatic control of the board) before the general election on September 13
have met stiff resistance.
The confrontation, focusing on the need for professional management of such
a large international company, is expected to come to a head today at an
extraordinary shareholders' meeting.
Mr Chatrachai will be investigated by the Counter-Corruption Commission
because the CCC received a 233-page document suggesting, among other
allegations, that he is involved with two transport companies which compete
with Thai Airways and has profited from ticket sales and a printing contract
for the in-flight magazine.
Mr Chatrachai, who has worked for Thai Airways for more than 20 years, said
he was innocent and welcomed the chance to clear his name. 'It's good
because we can settle the matter once and for all,' he was quoted as saying.
Thai Airways' shares have moved erratically recently with foreign and local
investors showing enthusiasm for the company when the civilian government
seemed to have the upper hand and pessimism when the air force appeared to
be winning. Last week, Thai Airways closed at baht 60.5 (Dollars 2.40), just
above its initial public offering price.
The finance ministry holds 93 per cent of the shares - only 7 per cent have
so far been sold to the public - but has found it difficult to impose the
government's will on the recalcitrant air force officers who have made the
company their fiefdom.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4370</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIGBWAD8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920907
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  07 SEP 92 / International Company News: Matsushita and Sony in accord
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By EMIKO TERAZONO
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TOKYO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
MATSUSHITA Electric Industrial, Japan's largest consumer electronics
company, and Sony, which brought the world the Walkman, have agreed to
simplify licensing procedures for their next-generation digital audio
products.
Matsushita will allow patents it holds of Sony's proposed Mini Disc, a
miniaturised version of the compact disc, to be offered by Sony.
In turn, Sony said its patents held on the Digital Compact Cassette (DCC)
will be available for licence to third parties through Matsushita.
The move follows an agreement reached last October between Sony and Philips
of the Netherlands, whereby Philips agreed to help licensing procedures for
the Mini Disc, and Sony in return agreed to sell tapes for DCC through its
music subsidiaries.
Matsushita said while there were no immediate plans to produce each other's
products, the move would simplify licensing procedures for audio hardware
makers looking to manufacture either product.
Patents which Matsushita currently holds on the Mini Disc, include
technology which searches for tunes, and disc technology. Sony holds patents
on error correction technology for the DCC.
Matsushita expects to introduce the DCC to Japanese consumers later this
month, and start marketing in Europe in the autumn. Sony said the Mini Disc
would be available to consumers in November.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4371</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIGBWAD7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920907
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  07 SEP 92 / Japanese Bonds: Pessimism on economic recovery grows
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By EMIKO TERAZONO
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
WHILE hopes of an imminent cut in Japan's official discount rate were dashed
by the Japanese government's package to stimulate growth, bond market
participants remain bullish after continuing weakness in the country's
economy.
Last month's announcement of a Y10,700bn fiscal spending package brought a
temporary halt to the bond market rally, and the yield on the 10-year
benchmark rose 15 basis points. However, the yield has since returned to the
4.9 per cent level, as pessimism towards an early economic recovery is
growing.
Downward earnings revisions by leading companies are reflecting underlying
weakness. Nissan Motor said it would post its first loss since 1946, and
suspended dividend payments for the interim period. NEC and Toshiba, the
electronics makers, also cut forecasts for the current year to next March
due to poor demand.
Corporate profits have been hit by the unexpected slump in economic
activity. Although the Japanese government initially expected firm consumer
spending to support the economy, consumer confidence has deteriorated during
the past few months. Nomura Research Institute, the research arm of Nomura
Securities, last week forecast a bigger than expected fall of 17.9 per cent
in company profits for this year.
Although the government has forecast that the fiscal package would boost
economic growth by 2.3 per cent during the next 12 months, NRI said the
announcement of the package had been delayed, and the effects of public
works spending would not be felt until next fiscal year.
For the bond market, additional spending is likely to mean financing through
additional issuance of bonds. Although details of the financing remain to be
seen, the government last week increased the amount of bonds auctioned from
the usual Y800bn to Y1,000bn.
Although an imminent credit easing has become unlikely due to the package,
anticipation towards a cut in the official discount rate within this year is
growing. 'The consensus seems to be a cut sometime in November or December,'
says Mr Robert Feldman, economist at Salomon Brothers in Tokyo.
In addition to hopes of monetary easing, investors have held on to their
bond holdings due to the lack of attractive investments elsewhere. Although
the size of the fiscal package and the surge in the stock market discouraged
some market participants, the cash bond market has remained relatively
stable. Instead, volatile movements were seen in the bond futures markets.
'Investors were heavily selling in the futures market to hedge their cash
positions,' explains Mr Marshall Gittler, analyst at Merrill Lynch in Tokyo.
Meanwhile, the government bond market has seen a change in its 10-year
benchmark. On August 27, the No 129 bond, which only had some eight years
until maturity, was replaced by the No 145 bond.
For the coming months, bond yields are expected to remain firm due to dim
prospects for the economy. This week, Bank of Japan will announce its tankan
 -quarterly survey of business sentiment - which is expected to indicate a
further decline in confidence among corporations.
However, the upside on bond prices seems limited, and a sharp jump is not
foreseen. Mr Feldman at Salomon Brothers predicts that the yield on the No
145 will rise to 4.75 per cent during the next few months.
Int'l Bonds Page 22
US Money &amp; Credit Page 24
UK Gilts Page 24
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4372</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIGBWAD6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920907
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  07 SEP 92 / International Company News: Countrywide Bank takeover near
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By TERRY HALL
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   WELLINGTON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE BANK of Scotland's takeover of Countrywide Bank, the fifth largest bank
in New Zealand, moved a step nearer after two institutions, which had
opposed the bid, reluctantly sold out last week. But the largest outside
shareholder said it would mount a legal challenge.
Both Norwich Union and CML, which between them hold 3 per cent of
Countrywide's capital, agreed to sell, apparently clearing the way for the
Scottish bank's offer to become final.
On their acceptance the Bank of Scotland said it had 91.2 per cent of
Countrywide's capital and intended to acquire the rest compulsorily.
However, the National Mutual, the pension fund, with 5 per cent of
Countrywide, said it would challenge the takeover.
A spokesman said it would not sell because the offer was 'too mean'. It was
disappointing that all the institutions fighting the bid had not stuck
together.
A Norwich Union spokesman criticised the way the Bank of Scotland had
treated minority holders. In deciding to sell, he had weighed up the risks
of remaining a minority shareholder, and the small likelihood of the
Scottish bank increasing its NZDollars 2.05 a share offer. He said there had
been unnecessarily harsh treatments in the company's accounts, and that
these and other actions showed the substantial level of control the Bank of
Scotland used within the company.
The CML, which held out until well after the Stock Exchange had closed, said
it was reluctantly accepting. 'There comes a time when you feel you've made
the best possible fight for minorities, and it is time to get on to the next
thing,' a spokesman stated.
The Bank of Scotland said it intends to compulsorily acquire the remaining
8.8 per cent of the capital. Companies listed on the New Zealand Stock
Exchange will face tougher reporting standards from October 1, to bring them
into line with Australian regulations.
The stock exchange said that the new rules would ensure that more
comprehensive financial reporting on public companies was available to
investors.
Under the changed reporting format for half and full-year results, companies
must provide: a full statement of assets, liabilities and shareholders'
equity; a full statement of cash flows; full details of equity accounted
associated companies and other material interests; and reports for industry
and geographical segments.
Previously, only stocks listed on both the Australian and New Zealand
exchanges had to provide such information for both reporting periods.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4373</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIGBWAD5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920907
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  07 SEP 92 / International Company News: Dickson Concepts plans venture
in Shanghai
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SIMON DAVIES
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   HONG KONG
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
DICKSON Concepts, the Hong Kong based luxury wholesaler and retailer, is to
invest in a USDollars 24m project to set up 'the most luxurious and
up-market shopping arcade in Shanghai'.
Dickson has formed a joint venture with the state-owned Jin Jiang group to
refurbish a centrally located property.
It will encompass the elegant style for which the city was famed before the
second world war.
The J. J. Dickson shopping arcade will have 100,000 sq ft of retail space,
with Dickson Concepts using the ground floor for setting up international
brand name boutiques, including its own.
The Chinese partner will provide land and property valued at Dollars 10m,
while Dickson will contribute Dollars 10m for the refurbishment. A further
Dollars 4m will be jointly injected for working capital.
Dickson has also signed an agreement to form an 80 per cent owned joint
venture in Guangzhou, for manufacturing, wholesaling and retailing products
for its brand names such as Charles Jourdan, Guy Laroche and S. T. Dupont.
Dickson announced in June that it intended to become the pioneer of brand
name development in China.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4374</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIGBWAD4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920907
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  07 SEP 92 / International Company News: Three join Yangpu project
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SIMON DAVIES
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
KUMAGAI GUMI (Hong Kong) has signed up Citic, the Bank of China and Mr Li
Ka-shing's Cheung Kong group, among its partners for the HKDollars 18bn
(USDollars 2.33bn) development of the Yangpu free port zone in Hainan
Island, China.
Kumagai, the Hong Kong listed arm of the Japanese construction company, was
earlier this year awarded the development rights for Yangpu, which will be a
30 km special concession area within the Special Economic Zone of Hainan.
Kumagai has formed a development company in which it owns a 30 per cent
stake and Cheung Kong has 10 per cent. The company has an initial share
capital of HKDollars 1bn.
The Chinese partners, which include three banks, will own 55 per cent of the
project which is to be completed over 15 years. The development company will
control the infra-structure and land sales within the area.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4375</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIGBWAD3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920907
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  07 SEP 92 / International Company News: Mediobanca advances to L262bn
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT GRAHAM
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   ROME
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
MEDIOBANCA, Italy's leading merchant bank, recorded a 20 per cent increase
in net profits to L262.1bn (Dollars 244m) in the year ended June 30, from
L220.4bn the previous year.
The bank is proposing the annual meeting on October 28 approve an unchanged
dividend of L200 per share on its 340m shares in circulation. It is also
proposing to set aside L193bn to reserves.
The profits came after a L153.1bn provision to cover loans at risk and
write-downs in the bank's share portfolio, compared with a total of L213.4bn
in the year 1990-91. Write-downs in the share portfolio accounted for L83bn
against L148.8bn last time.
Although the portfolio adjustment was considerably less than 1990-91, this
only covered stock market movements up to the end of June. Until then the
Milan bourse had fallen only 10 per cent; but since then it has fallen
sharply and by the weekend was down 30 per cent on the year.
Mediobanca shares have reflected this decline, being quoted below L9,000
against a February high of over L15,000. Apart from investor nervousness,
this has reflected the arrest and imprisonment on charges of alleged
corruption in connection with the Milan municipal scandal of Mr Salvatore
Ligresti, a Mediobanca board member and a leading construction entrepreneur.
The board decided on Friday to retain Mr Ligresti in his position, who is
also a shareholder, even though he has been in prison for two months, and
other changes were made.
New members co-opted on to the board were Mr Giuseppe Bruno, chief executive
of Credito Italiano, Mr Eugenio Coppola di Canzano, president of Generali,
Mr Pietro Marzotto, head of the family textile conglomerate of the same
name, and Mr Giampiero Pesenti, president of Italmobiliare, reflecting a
careful balance of Mediobanca's institutional and private shareholders.
Among those leaving the board were Mr Piero Barucci, formerly head of
Credito and now treasury minister, and Mr Carlo de Benedetti, the head of
Olivetti.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4376</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIGBWAD2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920907
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  07 SEP 92 / International Company News: Cross Border M&amp;A Deals
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BRIAN BOLLEN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
BIDDER/INVESTOR      TARGET       SECTOR      VALUE     COMMENT
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
Sarrio               Papirnica   Cardboard   Pounds 44m Privatisation
(Spain/Italy)       (Slovenia)                          deal
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
Artal (Belgium)       Unit of       Food     Pounds 37m  Unigate
                    Unigate (UK)                         continues
                                                         restructuring
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
HP Bulmer (UK)       Cidrerie      Drinks    Pounds 7.2m  European
                     Stassen                              bridgehead
                    (Belgium)
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
Bowthorpe (UK)       Odessa        Environ-  Pounds 7m    Strengthens
                 Engineering (US)  mental                 market
                                  monitoring              position
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
Cooper            Unit of Ifint  Auto parts  Pounds 305m  Agnelli
Industries (US)   (Luxembourg)                            family
                                                          selling
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
Peek (UK)         Gemo Elektro     Traffic   Pounds 0.4m  Continues
                   (Norway)        control                European
                                                          expansion
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
Alcoa (US)      Alutudos (Mexico)  Metals        n/a      Part of
                                 distribution             strategic
                                                          change
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
Credit Foncier  Capital Home       Banking       n/a      SocGen exits
(France)          Loans (UK)                              UK mortgages
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
Morgan Crucible Refractories and   Ceramics      n/a      Part of a
(UK)            Mineral Invest-  distribution             handful
                ments (Holland)
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
British Airways Transport Aerien   Airlines      n/a      Stake talks
(UK)             Transregional                           well advanced
                  (France)
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
Strategy and the single market were important factors in last week's new and
emerging international deals, writes Brian Bollen. UK companies featured
prominently, by volume if not value.
With its eyes very much on the imminent European single market, UK cider
maker HP Bulmer increased its continental presence by buying Cidrerie
Stassen of Belgium. British Airways' advanced talks on taking a stake in
French regional airline Transport Aerien Transregional form part of the
world's most acquisitive airline's strategy of taking stakes in smaller
carriers ahead of the single market.
Bowthorpe of the UK strengthened its position in the environmental
monitoring market with its purchase of Texas-based Odessa Engineering.
Traffic systems group Peek became the leading player in the sector in Norway
by buying Gemo elektro. Morgan Crucible demonstrated the benefits of being
well placed to take advantage of the lower prices on offer because of the
recession, announcing the completion of five separate acquisitions.
Food and transport group Unigate continued the restructuring of its
portfolio by agreeing to sell its US cheese businesses toa company
ultimately owned by Belgium's Artal. Proceeds will be used to reduce
borrowings still further.
France's Societe Generale joined the exodus from UK domestic mortgages, by
selling its 51 per cent of Capital Home Loans to Credit Foncier, its partner
in the venture.
Spanish carboard maker Sarrio's purchase of Papirnica Kolicevo was
noteworthy for being one of Slovenia's largest privatisation sales to date
as well as the biggest investment so far by a Spanish company in eastern
Europe.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4377</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIGBWAD1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920907
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  07 SEP 92 / International Company News: Towards a smaller but more
interesting Union - The progress of the restructuring in the Vestey empire
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROLAND RUDD
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
WHEN Mr Terry Robinson, the former Lonrho director, joined Union
International, the Vestey family's trading arm, as chief executive earlier
this year he was in for something of a surprise.
Net debt had grown from Pounds 269m at the end of 1990 to Pounds 420m, yet
no one at the group could offer a suitable explanation why. 'There were no
financial controls,' says Mr Robinson. 'No one knew why borrowings were
increasing because no one knew who was spending what.'
Subsidiaries, ranging from cattle ranching to food processing to the JH
Dewhurst butcher chains, set their own capital expenditure with little
direction from the centre. As a result, the group breached its banking
covenants last year.
The empire of the Vesteys, one of Britain's wealthiest families, had
expanded rapidly, buying land and assets in South America, Australia and
Europe. Union had acquired interests in ranching, food processing, canning,
fruit distribution, commercial property and butchers chains.
Mr Tim Vestey, at only 30, became the latest Vestey to take over the reins
of chief executive last November. In order to persuade the banks to continue
to fund Union he promised to bring in an outside professional to run the
company. The Vesteys' choice was Mr Robinson.
The situation was more serious than it may have at first appeared because
Union was no longer rich in assets. The net assets, after peaking at Pounds
215.4m in 1989, fell to Pounds 176.7m the following year.
A severe downturn in the property market will lead to the write-down of
Union's property value by more than Pounds 60m in the accounts for 1991,
expected to be published next month. Rationalisation of some of the
businesses is also likely to lead to a substantial additional write-down of
net assets. They will fall below Pounds 42m at the end of 1991 - less than a
quarter of 1990's value and less than half of the called up capital of
Pounds 83.7m.
One lead banker said the group was in a 'real shambles' when Mr Robinson
arrived.
To persuade the steering committee of nine banks, led by Lloyds, to agree to
extend repayment of their loans until the end of 1994, Mr Robinson had to
convince them that Union had taken more effective control of all its
businesses.
First, he introduced management meetings every Monday morning for detailed
financial planning for Union's diverse operations. Participants were also
expected to decide which businesses should be sold and which should be kept.
Each subsidiary was given a profit target and a cap on capital expenditure.
An incentive programme meant that up to a third of managers' salaries could
be generated by performance related pay.
Second, Mr Robinson recruited Mr Paul Taylor, a senior executive from
Lonrho, as his finance director to head up a new finance committee. This
would monitor the results of the managers' meetings by ensuring that
spending targets and profit forecasts were met.
By the end of July the group could offer the bankers some evidence that it
was taking effective control. Net debt had been reduced by Pounds 83m over
the year and was falling towards the Pounds 300m mark.
In addition to the effect of the financial controls, the debt had fallen
because of a number of selective disposals. The South African fruit and
bottling businesses were sold for Pounds 13m, the Australian ranching
interests for ADollars 45m (Pounds 16.6m) and some of its smaller food
companies went for Pounds 10m.
Mr Robinson says Union will now focus on being a food processing and
distribution group. All the other interests are up for sale. 'We will be a
much smaller company, but perhaps a more interesting one.'
Union has already earmarked further disposals. It is trying to sell Dewhurst
and Vestey Estate property, which include office developments in the City
Depending on how quickly it can reduce its debt, it may sell majority stakes
by way of flotation in many of its ranching and food processing companies in
South America.
Mr Robinson said: 'Pension funds increasingly believe they should hold a
small percentage of their funds in the less developed world. This is why
flotations of some of our businesses in the emerging stock markets of South
America looks a more attractive option today. We do not need to control 100
per cent of all our subsidiaries.'
In the event of the worst case scenario - were Union to find that it was not
reducing its debt as fast as expected - Mr Robinson says he would be
prepared to sell the Dewhurst butchers chain, which is being slimmed down
from 1,000 retail outlets to 600.
All of this is designed to reassure the bankers who are being asked to give
their approval to the Pounds 300m refinancing agreement including easier
banking covenants. Mr Robinson has agreement of the big nine, which include
Midland, Barclays and Standard Chartered. He now needs every one of the
other 70 to agree to stretch out their loans.
Bankers said they were not greatly surprised or disappointed by the details
of the refinancing The smaller ones may quibble with elements of the debt
rescheduling proposal. But they may, in the end, decide there is no
alternative to the restructuring proposal.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4378</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIGBWAD0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920907
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  07 SEP 92 / International Company News: Abdullahs acquire more shares in
Alexander Russell
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER JOHN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ALEXANDER Russell, the biggest sand and gravel company in Scotland, has once
again attracted takeover talk following the announcement that the group's
largest shareholder had increased its stake.
The shareholder, Royalty Finance, is a Swiss-registered Arab consortium. It
is a vehicle for Mr Raschid Abdullah and Mr Osman Abdullah, the brothers who
run the engineering and quarrying business Starmin.
It has boosted its stake in Alexander Russell by 250,000 shares and now
holds 15.67 per cent of the capital.
Starmin implied yesterday that, while the stakebuilding was merely
opportunistic, a full-scale bid had not been ruled out.
'There was one per cent available and Royalty bought it but it is not the
precursor of an immediate launch of a bid,' the company said.
Fears initially developed in January when Royalty acquired 14 per cent of
Alexander Russell's shares and asked the Glasgow-based company to provide a
copy of its shareholders' register, suggesting that it was preparing a
circular.
The Abdullah brothers came to prominence after they built up Evered (now
Evered Bardon) into one of the largest quarrying businesses in Britain. They
turned it from an engineering shell into one of the most aggressive and
expansionist mini conglomerates of the early 1980s.
In 1989 they were ousted following a boardroom conflict and bought into the
Guildford-based Starmin, which they used to purchase quarries and concrete
businesses in Scotland.
They have previously suggested co-operation agreements with Russell at least
twice over the past two years but nothing came of them.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4379</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIGBWADZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920907
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  07 SEP 92 / International Company News: Bennett &amp; Fountain Group
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Proceedings brought by Bennett &amp; Fountain Group and Bennett &amp; Fountain Ltd
on July 30 1992 against their former chairman and director Mr Phillip
Aginsky alleging fraudulent conduct, fraudulent misrepresentation and breach
of fiduciary duty against Mr Aginsky have been unreservedly withdrawn on
terms mutually satisfactory to all parties.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4380</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIGBWADYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920907
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  07 SEP 92 / International Company News: CrestaCare in Pounds 2.4m sale
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
CrestaCare, the nursing and retirement homes operator, has reached agreement
for the disposal of three Isle of Man commercial properties for Pounds 2.4m
phased over a period ending March 1994.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4381</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIGBWADXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920907
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  07 SEP 92 / International Company News: Whitbread in cash disposal
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Whitbread has sold its Pizza Hut business in Belgium and the Netherlands to
Pizza Hut International, its joint venture partner, for a cash
consideration.
Included in the sale were 21 outlets which were currently trading and two
sites in the Netherlands which were near to completion.
The value of the net assets disposed of was less than 5 per cent of
Whitbread's net assets at February 29.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4382</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIGBWADWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920907
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  07 SEP 92 / International Company News: Cranswick buys food company
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Cranswick, the USM-quoted pork products-based food company, is buying FT
Sutton &amp; Son (Rossendale), a Lancashire manufacturer and wholesaler of
cooked meats and fresh pork products.
Initial consideration is Pounds 1m with a further payment of up to Pounds
750,000 dependent on profits. The initial payment will be met via the issue
of 761,233 new shares and Pounds 22,500 cash.
For the year to June 27 1992 Sutton achieved a pre-tax profit of Pounds
227,880 on sales of Pounds 3.1m. Net assets at the period end totalled
Pounds 518,000.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4383</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIGBWADVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920907
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  07 SEP 92 / International Company News: Cons Venture net assets fall
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Net asset value per ordinary share of Consolidated Venture Trust declined
from 275 1/2 p to 269 5/8 p over the 12 months ended July 31.
For the six months to July 31 the trust incurred a net loss of Pounds 8,000
compared with available revenue of Pounds 115,000 for the same period of
1991. Losses per share emerged at 0.075p (earnings 1.08p).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4384</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIGBWADUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920907
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  07 SEP 92 / International Company News: Sales ahead 9% so far at Menzies
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
SHAREHOLDERS at the annual meeting of John Menzies, the wholesale and retail
distributor, were told that sales in the first quarter had increased by 9
per cent over the same period last year although consumer demand in general
remained at a low level.
The company's cash position was healthy and the cost structure was under
tight control. Prospects for the full year depended as always on the
Christmas period.
The recent referral of the newspaper wholesaling industry to the Monopolies
and Mergers Commission would take up much management time, the meeting was
told.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4385</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIGBWADTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920907
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  07 SEP 92 / International Company News: GEC shows slight rise in current
year
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THE ANNUAL meeting of GEC was told that sales in the current year were
marginally down but profits were slightly higher compared with a year ago.
Lord Prior, chairman, said the principal businesses - electronics systems,
power systems and telecommunications - were maintaining high order books and
benefiting from the restructuring measures taken earlier.
However, in some other trading sectors 'we are not progressing as we would
wish; market conditions are not improving, and further action will be
taken.'
The policy of requiring profits to show in cash had led to increases in bank
balances with consequent higher interest income.
Last week Yarrow Shipbuilders, a subsidiary, announced that it was to cut
510 jobs because of a gap in its order book. Last year, GEC shed about 5,000
staff in a restructuring of its defence activities.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4386</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIGBWADSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920907
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  07 SEP 92 / The ERM and Maastricht: Bundesbank allows flicker of hope -
The Bath meeting may mark beginning of the end of Europe's high interest
rates
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER NORMAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
WITH any luck, the meeting last weekend of European Community finance
ministers in Bath will mark the beginning of the end of the present
protracted period of high interest rates in Europe.
Mr Norman Lamont, the UK chancellor, who chaired the meeting, altered the
nature of interest rate expectations on financial markets by obtaining the
Bundesbank's assent to a statement that it 'in present circumstances has no
intention to increase rates'.
Fears of an increase in the internationally important German Lombard rate
from its current 9.75 per cent level have preyed on financial markets ever
since the Bundesbank increased its discount rate by 0.75 percentage points
to 8.75 per cent in mid-July. By putting on record its intention not to
increase rates, the Bundesbank should ensure that expectations of future
German rate movements in Europe will be downwards.
Big question marks still hang over the timing of a relaxation in German
monetary policy. And the Bundesbank pledge does not exclude the possibility
of other nations having to raise rates in the event of external shocks such
as a further downwards spiral of the dollar or a French No vote in the
country's September 20 referendum on the Maastricht treaty.
But the UK chancellor, underlining it was 'the first time' the Bundesbank
had committed itself 'openly and publicly' not to raise rates, said he
regarded the promise as 'a significant outcome' of the talks. Mr Michel
Sapin, the French finance minister, said he detected 'a new spirit' in the
talks. 'The outlook is for lower interest rates. The Bundesbank is no longer
in a frame of mind to raise rates,' he said.
It was an unexpected result won only after some tough talking. The Bath
meeting, which opened under the cloud of serious dollar weakness and renewed
strains in the European exchange rate mechanism last Friday, was supposed to
give the 12 finance ministers and central bank governors a chance to discuss
such issues as the future work of the EC economic and finance ministers'
council; the state of negotiations in the Uruguay Round of trade
liberalisation talks, and monetary relations between non-ERM countries and
the EC member states in the run-up to European economic and monetary union.
These agenda items were scrapped and the talks, which overran their planned
duration by more than an hour, concentrated on the state of the European
economy and the strains in the ERM.
Instead, Germany came under 'colossal pressure' to cut interest rates,
according to Mr Anders Fogh Rasmussen, the Danish economy minister. The
pressure from the 11 countries was 'far more than I've ever experienced,' he
said.
The plan for Germany's EC partners to mount a strong campaign to persuade Mr
Theo Waigel, the German finance minister, and Mr Helmut Schlesinger, the
Bundesbank president, of the need for lower European interest rates at a
time of economic slowdown in Europe was hatched by Mr Lamont and UK
officials after an informal dinner for the ministers on Friday night.
Huddled before an open fire in a secluded back room of Bath's Royal Crescent
Hotel, the UK delegation decided to seek the support of France, Spain,
Italy, Ireland and Denmark for concerted pressure on Germany.
Little wonder Mr Waigel looked uncomfortable on Saturday as he protested he
was not going to be 'put in the dock' over Germany's interest rate policy.
As usual, Mr Waigel put up a spirited defence. of Germany's position. People
should remember how they profited from the boom after German unification, he
said. Criticism of Germany's fiscal policy was unwarranted. His budget
proposals for 1993 would be the most stringent of any in the EC, he
promised.
After the meeting there was disappointment Germany had not promised to lower
interest rates. But such a pledge was never in the realm of realistic
expectation. Setting interest rate policy is the prerogative of the
independent Bundesbank's decision-making central council, in which Mr
Schlesinger sits only as a primus inter pares. He therefore anticipates its
decisions at his peril.
The Bundesbank president was able to indicate that German interest rates had
peaked because that was one of the conclusions the council reached last
Thursday in its regular fortnightly meeting.
Although Mr Lamont's statement, which said the Bundesbank would be 'watching
closely the further development of the economy' appeared to suggest the
German central bank could be poised to cut rates in the event of a serious
economic downturn in Germany, Mr Schlesinger was predictably guarded about
the interest rate outlook.
He insisted that there was no scope for a reduction in German short-term
interest rates as long as Germany's money supply continued to grow at its
current rapid pace and there was no clear easing in inflationary tensions.
But his willingness to agree to the 'no increase' statement marked something
of a change of heart at the top of the Bundesbank. Before the July discount
rate increase senior Bundesbank officials were complaining that the bank had
missed an opportunity to clamp down hard on inflation by not lifting the
Lombard rate above 10 per cent during the previous winter.
While Mr Schlesinger appeared to stifle hopes of an early German interest
rate cut, Mr Waigel was more receptive to the idea. Referring to his budget
plans and the need for Germany's wage negotiators to keep pay increases
down, the minister said: 'We will do what we can. . . to achieve scope for
reducing interest rates as soon as possible.'
Although Mr Waigel put on a show of public solidarity with the Bundesbank
president at a press conference after the talks, some of his officials gave
the impression that the Bonn finance ministry sympathised with other EC
countries in wanting German rates to fall sooner rather than later.
However, as Mr Lamont pointed out, Mr Waigel has his share of responsibility
for Germany's high rates. The policy mix in Germany was 'a matter of some
concern and some discussion', Mr Lamont said.
Specifically, the chancellor is worried large-scale granting of subsidised
credits to eastern Germany is boosting German money supply growth and
helping to perpetuate high interest rates. Despite Mr Waigel's protestations
of fiscal rectitude, Mr Lamont and other EC finance ministers are also
concerned that the government can increase its borrowings through state
organisations such as the Treuhand and the German post office without such
fund-raising counting as part of the German public sector borrowing
requirement.
While the Bath meeting offered some hope of lower interest rates, there are
many hurdles before that prospect becomes reality. In the meantime, Mr
Waigel can expect to find himself 'in the dock' at international meetings.
Economic Indicators, Page 6
UK officials hatched a plan as they huddled before an open fire
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4387</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIGBWADRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920907
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  07 SEP 92 / The ERM and Maastricht: Italians' vessel risks capsize in
choppy water - Rome is linking ratification of the Maastricht treaty with
financial reform
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT GRAHAM
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE COUNTDOWN to the September 20 referendum on the Maastricht treaty in
France has become a nightmare for the Italian government.
Mr Giuliano Amato, the prime minister, and his colleagues know full well the
uncertainties over the future of the European Community in the wake of a No
vote would profoundly affect a member like Italy with a huge public sector
deficit, high indebtedness, above average inflation and a weak currency.
The judgment of the financial markets was brutally clear last week. The lira
was pushed to its floor level within the Exchange Rate Mechanism against the
D-Mark on Thursday and Friday. The Bank of Italy on Friday was forced to
raise the discount rate by 1.75 points to 15 per cent and to resort to
European Monetary System credit facilities enabling it to borrow unlimited
amounts of strong currencies for up to 2 1/2 months to defend the lira's
parity.
It is only the third time in 30 years Italy has had to force such a steep
jump in the discount rate to defend its currency. Despite this and the
reassurance of the EC finance ministers' commitment to existing parties
within the EMS over the weekend at Bath, the government recognises each day
in the markets will have to be treated on its merits until the French
referendum result is known.
The weapons with which Italy can protect the lira are limited and drastic
measures such as the discount rate rise risk being self-defeating as they
squeeze industry in recession and add to the burden of state debt which in
turn complicates the reduction of the overall budget deficit.
'We may be in the same boat as the rest of our (EC) partners but we are
having to row twice as hard now and are the ones taking in the water,' said
a senior official.
Over the weekend Mr Cesare Romiti, chief executive of the Fiat group, called
on the government to speed up privatisation with some concrete measures 'to
give a signal to the markets that there really is a will to do something'.
But the government has its hands tied by parliamentary procedures and the
complex process of preparing the 1993 budget.
The central feature of the 1993 budget will be structural reforms of four
key areas - Italy's generous pensions system, the inefficient civil service,
overspending public health and regional administration. The government is
seeking special 'delegated authority' from parliament to carry out these
reforms. This means both houses of parliament need merely approve the broad
outline of the reforms.
If this authority is denied, then all budget calculations are undermined -
at least their timescale. But equally a traditionally leisurely parliament
has to debate in committee and full session - a process repeated in each
house - in record time. The budget has to be presented before September 30
by law.
At the same time parliament has to process Italy's own ratification of the
Maastricht treaty. This should be comparatively easy and ratification could
be through the Senate before the French vote on September 20. Only one of
the 16 parties in parliament, Reconstructed Communism, has shown
reservations about Maastricht in that it links Italy too closely with the
disciplines of a market economy.
A real debate about Europe has never taken place. Italian politicians have
always assumed Italy formed an integral part of Europe, have never
questioned loss of sovereignty and have seen the EC as an essentially
beneficial institution. This still seems true today even though painful
obligations such as defending the lira have supplanted the old privileges.
Yet it also means Italy is wholly unprepared for any alteration in the
direction of the EC given a No vote in France.
The Italian government's confidence about parliament's pro-Europe leanings
is such that it is using ratification in arguments for the politicians to
endorse its financial reform package. Last week in the Senate introducing
the issue of ratifying Maastricht, Mr Emilio Colombo, the foreign minister,
said: 'The ratification of the treaty will be credible if the Senate
approves textually the law delegating authority (to the government) for the
reform of the country's finances.'
In other words parliament is being told it would be inconsistent to be
pro-European and ratify Maastricht while rejecting fundamental financial
reforms which are essential for Italy to be part of the Europe conceived by
Maastricht.
But the real pressure will continue to come from the markets which will
almost certainly demonstrate that, whether or not the French referendum
endorses Maastricht, Italy will be expected to put its house in order along
the lines of the treaty.
Editorial comment, Page 16
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4388</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIGBWADQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920907
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  07 SEP 92 / The ERM and Maastricht: Militant farmers sow discord -
French smallholders fear for livelihood
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By WILLIAM DAWKINS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MR Jacques Laigneau, a cereal producer in south-western France, is typical
of the thousands of French farmers who believe their livelihood will be
wrecked by the Maastricht treaty on European union.
For Mr Laigneau, 58, Maastricht will bring 'US food, Chinese clothes,
Japanese cars and French unemployment'. It will turn France into a 'dustbin
for cheap US cattlefeed', he claims, spreading his meaty hands in despair.
Just why Mr Laigneau believes this is so illustrates an important point in
France's agonising over its European future in the run-up to the September
20 referendum.
For, like many No voters, his objections are complex and wide-ranging; only
partly based on the details of the Maastricht plan itself.
Mr Laigneau admits to being motivated by a general fear of being trampled in
a Europe ruled by free-market forces, in which national governments will
have little power to help victims of open competition.
Mr Laigneau represents one of the toughest layers in the bedrock of
anti-Maastricht opinion in France. He is president and a founder member of
Coordination Rurale, the extreme splinter group of 10,000 mainly small
farmers. The group, which represents a tiny minority of French farmers, was
formed last December in protest against mainstream agricultural unions'
acceptance of the principle of European Community agriculture policy
reforms.
Coordination Rurale achieved notoriety early this summer when it organised
tractor road blocks across motorways in protest against EC price cuts and
cheap imports from Eastern Europe. This was the predecessor of the much more
damaging nationwide blockade later imposed by the truckers, another group in
which anti-EC feeling runs strong.
Over the next fortnight, Coordination Rurale will continue its campaign.
Tractors will crawl towards Paris at snail's pace on busy roads from seven
corners of France, towing dustbins loaded with copies of the treaty. The
group is also planning to send several hundred farmers to distribute
anti-Maastricht tracts and to lobby in the streets of the capital in the
final week before the referendum.
Mr Laigneau enumerates his concrete objections to the treaty as he perches
on a plywood chair in the dingy warehouse that forms the Coordination
Rurale's headquarters west of Toulouse.
He accepts that Coordination Rurale's main aim - to try to overturn the
cereals and meat price cuts agreed by EC member states earlier this year -
has no direct link with the Maastricht treaty.
However, Mr Laigneau knows the treaty well and points to the clauses
pledging to work towards open European markets and free competition. These
will only reinforce agriculture policy reforms and spell the death of
'European preference', by which Mr Laigneau means European consumers'
obligation to buy European agriculture produce, even at production prices
well above world levels. French farmers need this protection because they
cannot compete on equal terms against the cheapest world producers.
'Competition against other Europeans is OK, because we are competing against
people with a similar culture and standard of living,' he explains.
Coordination Rurale also shares other Maastricht opponents' fears of
perceived domination by the Brussels bureacracy and German influence, he
adds.
'It is like the prospect of marriage. If you say Yes, it is irreversible,
but if you say No, you can still rethink. And you don't marry a woman who
makes you frightened,' he says.
Many members of the mainstream agriculture unions, like the FNSEA, share the
Coordination Rurale's general fears of European union.
Like the Coordination Rurale, the FNSEA comes mainly from the right wing,
where sensitivity about loss of sovereignty is strong.
But the FNSEA believes the Coordination Rurale's opposition to the price
cuts is unrealistic and that French agriculture must face up to a measure of
international competition - a theme implicit in the treaty.
Mr Laigneau has no time for this argument, nor for the recent reminder by Mr
Jacques Delors, president of the European Commission, that French farming
would in the long term suffer even more without the reforms.
The Coordination Rurale represents those farms hardest hit by the reduction
in EC price support, so it can be expected to take a hard line, says Mr
Laigneau. It is no accident that the movement was born in the south-west, a
region dotted with poor smallholders, in contrast to the large farms of the
fertile Paris basin, where the FNSEA is strong.
Take his own case. Mr Laigneau is well off by the standards of most of his
members, with a cereals farm of 105 hectares. Yet he has seen his annual net
income dwindle from FFr200,000 (Pounds 21,000) to a mere FFr50,000 (Pounds
5,250) over the past three years, thanks to a halving in prices and steep
rise in costs over the period. He expects to be out of business in another
two years if the trend continues.
Many of his neighbours have tried to diversify into quality farm goods like
foie gras or melons, but have found the price competition as tough there as
as on their original production. 'Diversification is a trap,' says Mr
Laigneau. Faced with that problem, it is understandable that Coordination
Rurale's members feel cornered.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4389</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIGBWADPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920907
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  07 SEP 92 / The ERM and Maastricht: EC joins in loan for Baltic states
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW HILL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE European Community intends to provide a Dollars 300m (Pounds 150.7m)
medium-term loan to help the three Baltic republics reduce their balance of
payments deficit.
The EC loan will make up half of a Dollars 600m package of loans to Latvia,
Lithuania and Estonia from the Group of 24 industrialised nations.
So far some Dollars 260m of loans have been committed by other G24 nations,
with members of the European Free Trade Association shouldering a large part
of the burden. Most of the remaining Dollars 40m should come from the US.
EC finance ministers agreed provisionally to go ahead with their half of the
loan package during their weekend meeting in Bath. The Community should give
its formal approval to the Baltic loan at a formal meeting this autumn.
A year ago, in advance of the first EC mission to the Baltic states,
Brussels officials estimated that the three republics would require between
Dollars 2bn and Dollars 3bn annually in the form of emergency and technical
assistance, project loans and balance of payments aid.
Since then the economic situation has deteriorated still further. An IMF
study published in April forecast a 30 per cent drop in Latvian GDP this
year and a 15 to 30 per cent decline in Lithuanian output.
The Dollars 600m G24 loan is supposed to apply to this year, and Mr Henning
Christophersen, the EC finance commissioner, said after the Bath meeting
that he expected a quick decision on the EC half of the loan within the next
few weeks.
Discussion of the EC economy and the need to calm foreign exchange markets
swept most other items off the Bath agenda, but ministers did have time over
lunch to hear from Mr Jacques Attali, president of the European Bank for
Reconstruction and Development.
Mr Attali urged ministers to improve the flow of trade between the Community
and eastern Europe.
Mr Norman Lamont, the chancellor of the exchequer, who chaired the meeting,
later reiterated the EC's intention to move to 'a more liberal trading
position with eastern Europe'. He invited Mr Attali to address finance
ministers later during the British presidency of the EC.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4390</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIGBWADOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920907
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  07 SEP 92 / The ERM and Maastricht: Le Pen attacks 'treason'
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID BUCHAN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   REIMS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
MR Jean-Marie Le Pen, leader of the far-right French National Front,
yesterday stepped up his call for his countrymen to mobilise against the
'felons' in their government who had committed 'treason' by signing the
Maastricht treaty on European union, writes David Buchan in Reims.
In the heart of the champagne country he held his rally against the historic
backdrop of Reims cathedral, site of the baptism of Clovis, King of the
Franks, in the 5th century and of the coronation of subsequent French kings.
The archbishop cancelled Sunday morning services to keep the Front out of
the cathedral itself.
Hammering home calls for 'judgment and punishment' in the September 20
referendum, Mr Le Pen suggested that he and others in the No camp would have
handled President Francois Mitterrand far more toughly in last Thursday's TV
debate than the lacklustre neo-Gaullist, Mr Philippe Seguin. The president's
choice of Mr Seguin as sparring partner, Mr Le Pen told 2,000 supporters,
was all part of the 'manipulation' of French public opinion by its political
establishment.
Judging by the Reims crowd, Mr Le Pen is not succeeding in using Maastricht
to recruit many anti-EC rejectionists from other parties, which all have
their own No candidates.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4391</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIGBWADNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920907
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  07 SEP 92 / The ERM and Maastricht: Athens wins praise for narrowing gap
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW HILL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
GREECE was given a gentle pat on the back by the European Commission at the
weekend for its attempts to narrow the economic gap with the rest of the
European Community.
EC finance ministers meeting in Bath - preoccupied with the tension in the
European monetary system - were able only to glance at a report on the Greek
economy.
But Mr Henning Christophersen, the EC commissioner for economic affairs,
said afterwards that the Community had seen 'clear progress during the last
few months' as Greece laboured to meet economic convergence targets set by
the Maastricht treaty. Mr Christophersen said he expected Greece's
convergence programme to be discussed by finance ministers at a formal
meeting in October or November.
The Commission's comments are particularly heartening for Greece coming just
two days after a critical report on the country's economy by the Paris-based
Organisation for Economic Co-operation and Development. The OECD said Greece
would have to apply its economic adjustment programme much more rigorously
to curb tax evasion and improve efficiency in the public sector.
Mr Stefanos Manos, the Greek finance minister, said at the weekend that
Greece had been 'working very hard' to recover from the economic problems of
the 1980s.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4392</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIGBWADMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920907
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  07 SEP 92 / The ERM and Maastricht: 'Governors stand ready to intervene'
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
AT the conclusion of the meeting on September 5 of ministers and central
bank governors, Mr Norman Lamont, the chancellor of the exchequer, said in a
statement:
'In the face of the tensions in the exchange markets the following decisions
have been taken.
I. The August 28 agreement not to proceed to a realignment in the European
Monetary System has been confirmed.
II. The governors stand ready to intervene in the exchange markets to
counter tensions in those markets, exploiting as fully as necessary the
means and instruments provided under the EMS for member states.
III. The ministers and governors have also examined the present economic
situation in the Community and in this context they emphasised the
importance of early and full implementation of strict convergence
programmes, in particular to consolidate fiscal positions and to keep under
control wage and other cost pressures. They particularly welcomed the recent
policy decisions by the Italian government, and its firm commitment to
achieve a substantial primary budget surplus in 1993.
IV. In the light of a slowing of the growth prospects of their economies,
and insofar as the disinflationary process allows it, they have decided to
take advantage of any opportunity to reduce interest rates. They welcomed
the fact that the Bundesbank in present circumstances has no intention to
increase rates and is watching the further development of the economy.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4393</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIGBWADLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920907
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  07 SEP 92 / Foreign Exchanges and Money Markets: Dollar under strain
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JAMES BLITZ
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE DOLLAR could set a new record low against the D-Mark this week after the
release of last Friday's employment report for August, writes James Blitz.
The plunge in the US non-farm payrolls by 83,000 seriously undermined
investors' confidence in the American economy, and is certain to hang over
the market for the next few trading days.
The cut in the US fed funds rate on Friday, by 0.25 percentage points to 3
per cent, is also certain to intensify speculation of more cuts in US
interest rates. This will widen the differential between US and German rates
which is driving the D-Mark upwards and the dollar downwards.
The question on investors' minds is whether a further decline in the dollar
will trigger new tensions in the European exchange rate mechanism.
Sterling's problems appeared to have eased after the UK government announced
its ingenious plan to borrow Pounds 7.27bn in D-Marks from the banking
system, and buy the pound with them.
According to Mr Paul Chertkow, global currency strategist at UBS Phillips
and Drew in London, sterling's fate appears to be inextricably
interconnected with the dollar's, whatever support scheme the UK authorities
may come up with. Both currencies rose and fell in tandem last week and may
do so again.
The sum of money that the UK Treasury is borrowing may seem small as trading
picks up after the summer. Last month, Britain's underlying gold and
currency reserves fell by Pounds 639m, reflecting heavy intervention by the
Bank. But this money was used in the tranquil conditions prevailing in
August. As trading goes into full swing, the Bank may pay heavily to support
the currency.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 35
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4394</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIGBWADKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920907
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  07 SEP 92 / Survey of Reinsurance (7): Storm warning for insurers /
Examining the rising trend in catastrophe losses
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SIMON REYNOLDS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
KLAUS CONRAD, a member of Munich Re's board of management, advises insurers:
'Beware of a catastrophe reinsurer who asks no questions . . . who does not
ask to be paid a fair price for his goods and services; they may turn out to
be worthless.' This is sound advice: many reinsurers who did not ask
questions or a fair price have in recent years been hit by the rising trend
in catastrophe losses.
The compact but intense Hurricane Andrew, the first big storm of the 1992
Atlantic hurricane season, is one more example of nature's destructive
potential. In its recent review of 1991 catastrophe losses the large
international reinsurer Swiss Re argues that 'the last five years have shown
a loss burden above the long-term trend, both in the natural catastrophe and
major man-made loss sectors. If this development continues, the world
insurance system will face a huge challenge.'
A similar review of natural catastrophes from Munich Re, the world's largest
reinsurer, 'confirms a continuation in 1991 of the trend that has been
observed for more than 30 years: natural disasters are becoming more and
more costly,' in terms of overall economic loss and insured loss.
Since the mid-1980s insured damage from natural catastrophes have far
outstripped significant man-made losses. Typhoon Mireille which swept Japan
for two days in September 1991 caused insured damage of Dollars 5.2bn - the
largest insured loss from a single storm. For the third year a wind storm
produced a Dollars 4bn plus loss, following Hurricane Hugo in September
1989, and the storm Daria in western Europe in January 1990. Insured wind
storm damage throughout North America totalled more than Dollars 3bn in
1991, while a bush fire in California in October 1991 caused an insured loss
of Dollars 1.2bn.
Looking at man-made catastrophe losses the trend is similar: more losses
costing more money. Swiss Re's survey argues that in totalling more than
Dollars 3.2bn in 1991 'man-made insured damage is still clearly above the
long-term average'. The biggest losses in this category were the sinking of
the Sleipner A gas platform while still in Grandafjord off Stavanger, Norway
(insured loss Dollars 334.5m), and the fire during construction of the
London Underwriting Centre (Dollars 290m). The latter highlighted the
increasing risk of construction site losses developed countries.
According to Munich Re, insurers' real claims burdens from natural disasters
in the decade to 1991 were eight times heavier than during the 1960s.
Figures from Swiss Re, show that total insured damage from natural disasters
and large man-made losses together bounced around between Dollars 2bn and
Dollars 6bn (at 1991 prices) between 1970 and 1985. Since then the yearly
totals have been sharply higher: reaching Dollars 14bn in 1889, Dollars 18bn
in 1990, Dollars 15bn in 1991.
These figures are small in comparison with the overall Dollars 1,200bn taken
in premiums each year by insurers world-wide. However, the recent trend in
frequency and value of catastrophe losses is of concern because of its
uncertainty. Is the trend going to be the norm for future years? And how far
will the figures rise?
Piper Alpha was an old platform (169 people died in the 1988 disaster and
the insured loss was Dollars 1.4bn) - the newer North Sea platforms are
multi-billion dollar structures. Insurance market estimates of possible
future natural catastrophe incidents make grim reading. A large earthquake
in Tokyo or San Francisco could lead to a Dollars 50-Dollars 100bn dollar
loss. If a Hugo-intensity storm had landed farther north up the US east
coast in New York, the loss could have been twice that actually suffered.
According to Andrew Dlugolecki, chief manager operations at General
Accident, there are many factors driving these trends of rising cost and
frequency. One significant factor may be that the weather trends of the
1950s, 1960s and 1970s were milder than the long-term trend, and recent
storm developments are a return towards that longer-term trend. Other
factors raising catastrophe losses include:
Increasing concentration of values: industries have tended to build
increasingly expensive plant, of higher output, with greater product
inventory on site.
Increasing business interruption (B/I): more businesses are buying B/I
insurance cover, and B/I insured losses are rising at a faster rate than
property losses. Larger, higher output plant take longer to rebuild in the
event of a disaster.
New business practices: the development of just-in-time (jit) techniques is
one facet of increasing dependencies between suppliers and customers. In
recognition of this more supplier/customer B/I extensions to cover are being
purchased.
New construction techniques: fast track and unitary methods mean a higher
percentage of high value finished fixtures and fittings are on site during
earlier stages of building construction, possibly a time of raised risk from
fire. Increasing population density: cities are becoming larger and, on
average, richer. If a natural disaster hits, losses are increased. Much of
the loss from a large wind storm is accounted for by many, relatively small
claims from householders. New geographical areas: both industry and
populations are moving into increasingly risky areas, especially coastal
regions more susceptible to storms, storm surges, tsunamis (huge sea waves).
Increasing insurance density: greater demand from customers has led to more
insurance purchasing. It was easy to sell wind storm cover in Europe after
the 1987 and 1990 storms. A corresponding push from insurers selling cheaply
in a soft market added to the trend.
Changes in climate: natural variation in climate alters the propensity for
climatic events. The jury is still out on global warming, but scientists
argue that if the troposphere is warming, the earth's weather system will
contain more energy leading to greater intensity of climatic events.
What is to be done? Mr Conrad argues that 'private fortunes gathered over
generations, were lost by Lloyd's names, reinsurers mobilised their
emergency reserves, retrocessionaires started selling their nest eggs.
(Premiums) apparently had been too low, otherwise one would not have lost in
five years, what it had taken 50 to collect'. His solution is simple: a
return to insurance basics; premiums rates commensurate with risk,
appropriate levels of deductibles, proper calculation of probable and
possible catastrophe scenarios, proper loss prevention, loss mitigation, and
accumulation control.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4395</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIGBWADJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920907
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  07 SEP 92 / Survey of Reinsurance (6): Skills transcend disaster /
Assessing the changing role of Lloyd's
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LEE COPPACK
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THERE IS a continuing and growing demand for reinsurance, particularly
catastrophe protection. Insured values increase and maximum potential
exposures rise, but this type of business is inevitably volatile. Lloyd's is
the second or third largest reinsurer in the world, and reinsurance of all
types represents more than half its premium income.
As a consequence of the type of business they write, reinsurers have carried
the brunt of catastrophes which coincided with a period of exceptional
over-capacity and low premium rates. Lloyd's was never likely to escape the
claims its competitors have suffered, and its entrepreneurial nature and
constraints on its reserving capability exacerbated the losses and their
effects.
The next few years will show to what level individuals are prepared to be
sources of risk capital to bear this volatility, particularly if they cannot
build up reserves for the purpose of mitigating the worst effects.
The Rowland task force examining Lloyd's put it this way: 'Lloyd's
underwriting skills and appetite for risk enable it to compete effectively
to provide high-level catastrophe insurance and reinsurance. However, its
capital structure is not well matched to this business of volatile profit
streams. Full pay-out of profits from an 'annual venture' will inevitably
result in highly volatile returns.'
In spite of the disadvantages and an at least temporary reduction in market
capacity, there is little doubt there is a continuing and growing role for
Lloyd's as a source of reinsurance capacity. Richard Hazell, deputy chairman
and a reinsurance underwriter, said: 'There is no question about it. The
pure reinsurance market is not large enough to service the needs of the
industry.'
Lloyd's exercises its greatest influence in reinsurance as well as direct
business in the marine market where it has always been a world leader.
Lloyd's controls about 30 to 35 per cent of the marine reinsurance market.
In non-marine, its share is perhaps 1.5 or 2 per cent, though syndicates
often lead business which is substantially placed elsewhere.
Excess of loss business is by a substantial margin the largest type of
reinsurance that the market writes. It peaked as a proportion of the
market's total income in 1990 with the collapse of the spiral of excess of
loss retrocessions, but in 1991, excess of loss business was still
responsible for 36.2 per cent of the market's premium income.
Alan Grant is the underwriter for syndicate 991, one of only three new
syndicates in Lloyd's this year. The syndicate has a capacity of just over
Pounds 15m and it is expected to rise to about Pounds 25m for 1993. He
writes various types of reinsurance including long tail business. He
describes the exercise of getting the capacity as one of convincing names
'that it was the right time in the underwriting cycle to start a new
syndicate even if it was a difficult time in the capital supply cycle.'
He stressed the importance of not confusing excess of loss business, a
mechanism no different from buying motor insurance above a deductible, from
retrocessions of excess of loss where the risks may pass around the same
market several times. 'What we sold to the membership is that we are
bringing fresh business into the market; we are not recycling business from
the market.'
Potential catastrophe exposures have exploded. The largest North Sea
platforms have insured values of between Dollars 2bn and Dollars 3bn.
According to Munich Re, natural disasters are becoming ever more costly. It
says that the burden of claims from natural disasters was eight times higher
in real terms in the 1980s than the 1960s.
Typhoon Mireille in Japan in September 1991 was the most costly wind storm
loss in insurance history. Insured claims reached Dollars 5.2bn, though, for
once, Lloyd's has not suffered heavily. In 1990 losses from natural
disasters reached the record total of Dollars 15.3bn.
Said Munich Re: 'This trend is primarily the consequence of increasing
population density, especially in conurbations, and the simultaneous
increase in the concentration of values, as well as the phenomenon of people
and industry settling in coastal areas and other regions that are
particularly exposed to natural hazards.'
The volatility of catastrophe risks and the Lloyd's system of reconstituting
each syndicate every year would be less significant if names were better
able to offset good years against bad. Neither names nor syndicates are
allowed tax deductions for equalisation reserves, deductions in good years
which can be brought back into the underwriting account to soften the blow
of a serious loss.
The task force concluded that Lloyd's should be able to continue to write
catastrophe business but that to do so competitively, names needed to be
able to build up equalisation reserves. It said: 'Lloyd's is at a severe
competitive disadvantage since its principal European competitors enjoy
advantageous tax treatment on reserves for both past and future losses.'
Talks are still taking place with the Inland Revenue over the possible
creation of a form of equalisation reserves which could be used to provide
cover for large variations in underwriting performance. 'Reserving has
become an issue of acute concern within the market,' commented the task
force.
Seeing themselves as providers of capital for the insurance industry, the
reinsurance industry is now telling direct insurers what the cost for that
capital is now. It is not just taking the form of higher prices,
particularly in the marine market where retrocession capacity has contracted
most sharply, but also in requiring direct companies to carry more of the
risk themselves. Richard Hazell said: 'The reinsurance market really decided
it had lost enough money.
When Hurricane Andrew hit the southern states of the US in August, the
effect of these increased retentions emerged. Lloyd's was not expecting to
face serious claims until insured damages reached around Dollars 3bn. Terry
Hayday, chief executive of the insurance division of underwriting agent
Sturge Holdings, commented: 'Had the same loss occurred three years ago, the
situation would have been different.'
Perhaps the biggest single excess of loss contract in Lloyd's covers the
shipowners' liability insurers, the International Group of P &amp; I Clubs. The
clubs this year have to retain Dollars 15m of each loss instead of Dollars
12m in 1991. The top limit has dropped from Dollars 1.25bn to Dollars 1bn,
and the premiums have increased between 91 per cent and 144 per cent
depending on the type of ship insured.
The clubs as a group are co-insuring 7 per cent of the bottom layer of the
excess, and because of a shortage of capacity in Lloyd's, the brokers used
the Bermuda-based XL, a company set up with capital from industrial
policyholders during the liability insurance crisis of the 1980s, to
complete the slip.
In spite of these encouraging signs, losses from the most recent years are
leading to resignations, and many remaining names are wary of increasing
their underwriting limits, Lloyd's capacity is expected to drop by 20 to 25
per cent.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4396</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIGBWADIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920907
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  07 SEP 92 / Survey of Reinsurance (2): Flexibility attracts doubters -
The growing popularity of financial reinsurance
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By TREVOR PETCH
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
AS RECENTLY as two years ago, 'financial reinsurance' was viewed askance by
many in the reinsurance industry, but the collapse of the secondary
reinsurance market in the wake of the LMX spiral has created a change of
mind. At last year's Monte Carlo rendezvous, 'Have you considered financial
reinsurance?' had become a routine part of some participants' coffee-table
discussions.
Further evidence that financial reinsurance is a concept with which time has
caught up was provided this summer by the UK Department of Trade and
Industry. Guidelines on the recognition by insurers in their statutory
returns of liabilities to financial reinsurers under spread loss and
prospective aggregate covers demonstrated their use has become more
widespread.
Regulators have had other reasons for looking closely at financial
reinsurance. An attraction for the buyer is flexibility enabling the shape
of either the balance sheet or the profit and loss account to be altered if
not at will, certainly at a price.
One early use of financial reinsurance contracts was for so-called 'surplus
relief', effectively an exercise by which primarily US insurers unable to
meet statutory solvency requirements could do so, or do so by a greater
margin. Such transactions did not contribute positively to the image of the
new products, and led to court actions by some liquidators alleging that
financial reinsurers had conspired to conceal insolvency or delay its
discovery.
Bermuda was home to most of the leading innovators in the business, such as
Belvedere, Centre Re, Forum Re, Pinnacle Re and Scandinavian Re, because a
tax-free domicile is essential for maximising return on capital employed. In
this small and specialised world, a momentous event was the insolvency last
year of Bermuda-based Forum Re, illustrating that although all reinsurance
policies are only as good as the security behind them, particular care is
required by buyers of new products where the line between profitability and
bankruptcy may depend on very fine financial calculations.
The market leader is Centre Re, majority-owned by the AAA-rated Zurich
Insurance Group, which last year bought Pinnacle Re from its original
owners, London broker CE Heath. Pinnacle specialised in providing 'Time &amp;
Distance' policies or T Ds to Lloyd's syndicates. T &amp; Ds are not reinsurance
policies, since they merely provide a flow of income on a predetermined
basis in return for an initial payment. Buyers take a current credit equal
to the full indemnity value of the contract, but since the premium is
discounted, an accounting profit is created.
Financial reinsurance contracts develop this basic idea, which relies for
its operation on the time value of money, and therefore requires a
long-tailed account. The reinsurer guarantees a payment to an agreed limit -
hence Centre Re's preferred term for its operations as 'finite risk
reinsurance' - but also accepts the timing risk involved that claims may
crystallise faster than anticipated.
Such contracts may be used to cover a book of current business (prospective
aggregate covers, PACs, or spread loss covers) and portfolios on which
claims are already developing (loss portfolio transfers or LPTs). In either
case, the buyer is seeking to reduce the impact of the volatility of the
risks insured on its balance sheet.
Traditional reinsurance plays a similar role, but financial reinsurance
focuses more directly on the financial rather than on the risk variables.
The traditional judgment of the underwriter in assessing a risk is replaced
by the joint efforts of a team of non-life actuaries who analyse likely
claims development and investment managers with international banking or
similar experience whose task is to ensure the income flow.
As a result, new entrants to the financial reinsurance market reflect the
insurance and banking sectors. Two of the most important also reflect
increasing European interest. The French reinsurer SCOR now has a dedicated
financial reinsurer in Bermuda, while Bankers Trust has one in Jersey, a
much more convenient location for European customers. Centre Re's response
will be to establish in Dublin's new International Finance Centre.
The involvement of banks reflects the fact that they are one of the broader
range of channels through which business finds its way to financial
reinsurers in addition to the traditional broker. The latter are still
important - Bankers Trust partners London broker Sedgwick's energy division
in a programme for leading petrochemical companies, and financial
reinsurance was specifically mentioned as a source of business growth when
the broker announced its interims last month - but clients may also be
introduced by lawyers, accountants or management consultants.
One advantage is that since it is by definition long-term, multi-year
coverage reduces distribution cost over time. In difficult market
conditions, another frequent use for such products is for the proceeds of
commutations from the increasing number of insolvent traditional insurers.
For the strong professional reinsurer which also provides traditional
risk-transfer cover, there is a different advantage.
Where the cedant's underwriting performance is such that reinsurance will
not be offered on terms which it can accept, financial reinsurance in effect
allows the reinsurer to take control of part of its investment portfolio.
Part of the price paid by the financial reinsurance buyer is the loss of the
investment income it would itself have made with the premium.
This issue is of particular sensitivity for Lloyd's syndicates, which must
ensure equity between past, present and future names. T &amp; Ds distort the
traditional relationship between current and future names in reinsurance to
close (ROTC). Some syndicates are also taking out more sophisticated covers.
Most notable was the purchase of an aggregate excess of loss policy from
Centre Re by three syndicates managed by the Merrett agency which have
substantial exposure to old US liability business, with the aim of managing
the certain tail on its ROTC.
There are doubts in the market, however, whether all financial reinsurance
products may be properly bought at Lloyd's. Multi-year covers, for example,
may suffer restrictions because of the legal one-year life span of
syndicates.
This can create other difficulties. A feature of all financial reinsurance
contracts is a mechanism for sharing any profits should predicted losses not
reach the expected level. This may be by profit commission, or extension of
cover. Lloyd's syndicates which buy a financial reinsurance will not legally
exist to share the benefit, however.
Captive insurers owned by industrial and other concerns were among the first
to appreciate the benefits of the new products. Traditional and financial
reinsurance will provide a stabilisation of results, but a financial cover
such as a multi-year stop loss policy will establish a band of protection
which may be drawn on as required, with a loss ratio which can be fixed each
year, and also to build up a fund.
While traditional cover may not be available in any year, or available at a
volatile price, financial reinsurance will enable smooth, if not absolutely
predictable, income performance. This is likely to benefit the buyer in the
equity market and facilitate the raising of capital.
These advantages are equally attractive to the parent of a captive, and as a
result the line between financial reinsurance and financial insurance - the
tailoring of individual funding programmes for corporate entities - is
increasingly becoming blurred. Centre Re, for example, may provide one level
of protection while the special risks department of Zurich provides another.
ACE Ltd, the Bermuda private insurer established by leading chemical
companies to cover liability risks, recently took a stake in Centre Re , and
there is potential for further such synergies. The author is editor of the
newsletter Financial Times World Insurance Report.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 28
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4397</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIGBWADHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920907
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  07 SEP 92 / Survey of Reinsurance (3): Shake-out not yet over - Lee
Coppack says life for brokers looks likely to remain challenging
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LEE COPPACK
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE collapse of the retrocession market and resulting shortage of
catastrophe reinsurance capacity is adding to the pressure many London
brokers already feel from the problems of a soft insurance market in the US,
the weak dollar and generally lower interests rates.
Traditionally reinsurance business has produced good returns for London
brokers, particularly in London market excess of loss reinsurance and
retrocessions of that reinsurance or LMX business, where the average
commission was 10 per cent, but the expenses modest. According to Allan
Nichols of stockbroker James Capel, other types of reinsurance outside the
US are still producing a good if not spectacular income.
And not everyone is losing money on excess of loss business; the
privately-owned Lloyd's broker Benfield Group made a profit of Pounds 20m
with 68 employees in the year to June 1991, and this year is likely to show
further improvement.
One of the biggest changes prompted by the present climate in the market is
the re-organisation of the reinsurance business of C T Bowring, London
subsidiary of the US broker Marsh &amp; McLennan. From October 1, Bowring's two
principal London reinsurance broking operations, C T Bowring Reinsurance and
Winchester Bowring will trade together under the name of Carpenter Bowring
Ltd.
The name, which will also be used in Melbourne and Sydney, also incorporates
that of Marsh's principal reinsurance broking subsidiary, Guy Carpenter and
Co. Carpenter is a dominating force in the US market with a strong position
with the leading US insurance companies. Bowring Reinsurance has a North
American and international divisions and London market specialist Winchester
Bowring.
Last year Marsh reported Dollars 269m revenues from reinsurance broking. It
began its integration of group reinsurance activities two years ago. A New
York operating group deals with North American business from the US and
London, and a London operating group looks after the rest of the world. Hady
Wakefield, chairman of Bowring Reinsurance, said that the latest development
is a continuation of the co-operation and cohesion that the group has been
building.
Winchester Bowring has found its once highly profitable LMX business is no
longer so successful, but it is far from alone. With the near disappearance
of retrocession covers, catastrophe capacity has contracted sharply, and
some programmes cannot be placed at all. For example, Steel Burrill Jones
reported last year that although rates were up in its specialist class of
marine excess of loss business, certain risks, particularly retrocessional
contracts or programmes where the results had been poor, just could not be
placed at any price.
The largest UK broker Sedgwick has suffered a downturn in its reinsurance
broking this year. At the half year Sedgwick's reinsurance subsidiary E W
Payne reported a 7 per cent drop, 8 per cent excluding currency factors,
Pounds 43.1m to Pounds 40.1m during the same period of 1991 in operating
income.
Mr Nichols said that US domestic companies could not buy all the cover they
wanted: 'A lot of US companies have a reinsurance programme which looks like
a string vest.'
In a move that echoes the reaction of brokers to the liability insurance
crisis of the mid-1980s, Bowring parent Marsh &amp; McLennan and leading US bank
J P Morgan plan to raise Dollars 300m in capital for a new joint venture
property catastrophe reinsurer based in Bermuda. The company, to be called
Mid-Ocean, would write catastrophe excess of loss and retrocession business.
Sedgwick's nearest rival in size, Willis Corroon also suffered a gloomy
first half with pre-tax profits down 22 per cent to Pounds 54.1m, but
reinsurance was less of a problem. Although active in the LMX market, Willis
did not have a major LMX broker. Business from the US into London was also
down, but revenue from companies outside the US and UK was strong during the
first half, increasing more than 20 per cent.
David Rainbow, executive director of Willis Faber &amp; Dumas and in charge of
reinsurance operations in France and Benelux, commented: 'We are not so
opportunistic, so we have been relatively less affected by the change in the
market than some of our competitors.'
Willis has a long tradition in the market, and its activities have grown
partly by organic growth but also through its acquisitions of Stewart
Wrightson, specialist reinsurance broker Carter Wilkes and Fane, and Corroon
&amp; Black.
Within the last year, all its reinsurance activities have been brought
together in two divisions, international reinsurance and UK and North
American reinsurance, plus the former Corroon subsidiary G L Hudson. All
come under the board of the group's main broking company Willis Faber &amp;
Dumas.
Robert Gayner, managing director of the European division, believes Willis
has a size, quality and spread in its international reinsurance portfolio
that give it a competitive advantage.
Once a pure marine excess of loss broker, Steel Burrill Jones had a
substantial proportion of its business in retrocession, classic LMX business
which has just about disappeared, according to finance director Tony Keys.
Since 1987 the group has been diversifying into different lines, mainly in
direct classes. Although reinsurance broking represented just over 40 per
cent of the group's turnover in 1991, retail broking and consultancy
business may well overtake its contribution to the group's revenues this
year.
However, the Benfield Group, which is owned by its directors and staff, is
thriving in the excess of loss business. Its chairman Matthew Harding says:
'We do not look for business. We want customers who are good enough to pay a
proper price for proper reinsurance.'
He challenges the orthodox doctrine that brokers need to make a substantial
proportion of their profits on the investment income on premiums and claims
in transit. Benfield believes in getting the premium to the underwriter
within a fortnight and the claim to the ceding company in the same period.
Brokers believe that evidence is emerging of greater stability in
catastrophe reinsurance. Mr Keys said that without a big disaster, rates
would probably prove profitable, so he did not expect to see substantial
further increases.
He felt the likely reduction in the number of Lloyd's names from 1993 could
lead to further contraction. The mergers of syndicates can result in
decrease of capacity as the new syndicate writes one large line that is not
as large as the predecessor syndicates together.
Mr Rainbow says the market appears to have reached a plateau; no new capital
is coming in but the contraction has stopped. The key has been a painful
process of forcing the direct insurers to retain more of the risks they
write. He says the reinsurer's view was: 'I will expose my capital if the
cedant will expose his.'
Life for reinsurance brokers looks likely to remain challenging for some
time. Where direct companies are retaining more business, competition among
the brokers is increasing for the remaining business. The market is becoming
more fragmented; the percentage of premiums placed in Lloyd's by the largest
broker has fallen from a peak of 17.8 per cent of the total in 1978 to just
under 10 per cent last year.
Robert Gayner at Willis Faber believes the shake-out from the collapse of
the LMX spiral and depressed rates is not over. 'The market which today has
survived is not necessarily in a strong position. We believe there will be
more reinsurance failures.'
The author is London editor of A Guide to the Leading Insurance Brokers in
Europe, published by L'Assurance Francaise.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 28
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4398</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIGBWADGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920907
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  07 SEP 92 / Survey of Reinsurance (1): Sailing into calmer seas -
Reinsurers meet in Monte Carlo this week with the damage caused by Hurricane
Andrew in America still fresh in their minds / A look at an industry that is
struggling to recover after several years of turmoil
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD LAPPER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ORDER OF A sort appears to be returning to the world's reinsurance markets
after several years of turmoil. Between 1987 and 1991, fierce rate
competition, over-capacity and a sharp increase in the number and cost of
catastrophes combined to depress the profits of larger companies and pushed
many smaller players out of business.
At this week's annual rendezvous in Monte Carlo, therefore, reinsurers -
their minds freshly concentrated by the damage wreaked by hurricane Andrew
in the southern US last month - are certain to be spelling out the same
message to reinsurance buyers: premium rates must be set at levels that take
into account the level of risk.
That is likely to mean a further hardening in the market when reinsurance
buyers renew their annual policies towards the end of this year.
The bargaining will be simplest in the proportional market, in which giant
companies such as Swiss Re and Germany's Munich Re reinsure an agreed
percentage of the potential liabilities in exchange for the same proportion
of the original premium, less a commission payment.
In the wake of poor results in 1990 and 1991, reinsurers may continue to
press direct insurers to increase rates and will seek reductions in the
commission paid to insurers to offset the costs of acquiring the original
business.
But it is in the non-proportional market, where reinsurers obtain cover
providing protection above a set level of claims, that the impact of the
recent losses is being felt most strongly.
After nearly a decade in which the brokers who buy reinsurance on behalf of
insurance companies have held the upper hand in setting rates, terms and
conditions, power is returning to the biggest and best capitalised
reinsurance companies in Europe and North America, including Munich Re, and
Swiss Re.
Mr Patrick Peugot, chief executive of SCOR, France's biggest reinsurer and
now the seventh biggest reinsurer in the world, says that the main groups
now have the oppor-tunity to enforce greater discipline in the market at a
time when the demand for catastrophe reinsurance is increasing.
'We should be able to set rates that will provide cover for the medium and
long-term not go up and down all the time. That is one of our aims - to
stabilise the market,' he says.
One of the critical factors in this shift in power has been the impact of
rate competition and catastrophe in London, the world's biggest reinsurance
market.
The effect has been particularly severe in an esoteric corner of the market
known as London Market Excess or LMX, a reinsurance of reinsurance, or
retrocession market, which has trad-itionally provided high level
catastrophe protection for the world's insurers and reinsurers.
During the 1980s several dozen syndicates and com-panies specialised in
reinsuring each others' reinsurance exposures.
By 1991 the market had been destroyed by a series of catastrophes, beginning
with the UK storms of October 1987.
Reinsurance companies such as Victory, now part of the Dutch group NRG, and
the UK's Mercantile and General Re have also suffered heavily from these and
other large losses sustained by the market between 1987 and 1991.
At Lloyd's of London the losses cut a swathe through the market, sending
dozens of syndicates, and thousands of the individual Names whose wealth
provides the market's capital base, spinning out of business.
In 1989, when the market was hit by hurricane Hugo, the Exxon Valdez oil
spill, the San Francisco earthquake and a Dollars 1bn plus explosion at a
petroleum plant in Texas, 401 Lloyd's syndicates sustained record losses of
Pounds 2.06bn, but nearly half that amount was borne by fewer than a dozen
syndicates, which specialised in retrocession business. Specialist
retrocession syndicates managed by Gooda Walker agency sustained losses of
nearly Pounds 500m, for example.
By 1992, the number of Lloyd's syndicates had fallen to 278. Between 1988
and 1992 nearly a third of Lloyd's Names resigned, reducing total membership
of the market from over 30,000 to 22,300.
As a result of the collapse of the retrocession market, companies and
syndicates specialising in non-proportional reinsurance have found much
greater difficulty in offsetting their own exposures.
Forced to retain more risk on their own books, reinsurers have had to
examine their exposures more carefully, increasing rates to more realistic
levels and often making cover available at much higher levels than hitherto.
Under these pressures many companies have retreated from the market.
Companies such as Yasuda have withdrawn from London, and many larger players
 -such as Skandia, Sweden's biggest insurer - are seeking to reduce their
involvement altogether.
Mr Peugot says that the inability of many smaller companies to meet
reinsurance claims has been an important factor in purging the market.
'Reinsurers, who - if I may say so - were playing reinsurance, didn't like
the play much and have with-drawn.'
Mr Alan Bedanes, managing director of Chase Manhattan's insurance unit in
London, says that the part of the reinsurance market dependent on
retrocession capacity is of 'diminishing relevance. In a way you could argue
the retro market didn't represent true capital.'
Mr Ron Iles, chairman of Alexander Howden Reinsurance Brokers, the
reinsurance broking arm of US brokers Alexander &amp; Alex-ander, believes that
capacity in the non-proportional market could fall by at least 30 per cent
this year, putting further upward pressure on rates. In the US market, where
rates have been softest, the impact of Hurricane Andrew will add to the
upward pressure.
Other reinsurers think rises will continue in the 1992 renewal season. UK
insurance companies which have drawn on their reinsurance contracts to pay
losses from storms in October 1987 and January 1990, paid increases of up to
400 per cent at the end of 1990 and further rises of 25 per cent at the end
of last year.
According to Mr John Wetherell, underwriter of syndicate 190, which
specialises in non-proportional catastrophe cover at Lloyd's, further
increases are on the cards this year. 'High level excess of loss covers will
see significant increases.'
The collapse of the London retrocession market, combined with the increased
emphasis on security, is leading many smaller insurers and reinsurers to buy
financial reinsurance, which contains elements of both finance and
reinsurance.
The financial reinsurer guarantees that a claim will be paid but assumes the
risk that over time the sum of premiums paid, plus investment income, will
not equal the size of of the agreed payout (the interest rate risk) and/or
that claims will emerge before the agreed payment date.
Lloyd's syndicates with exposure to long tail liabilities - in which claims
arise many years after the inception of policies - have been buying time and
distance policies, which are similar to financial reinsurance transactions,
for some time. But over the past 12 months the use of financial reinsurance
has become more common.
This is because, the collapse of the LMX market has exposed some of the
difficulties faced by syndicates, which are effectively one year joint
ventures, in building reserves to cover against the risk of disasters which
might occur once in every ten years.
Zurich Insurance, the giant Swiss company, is the world's leading financial
reinsurer and its Centre Re subsidiary has already been involved in two of
the biggest financial reinsurance deals with Lloyd's, reinsuring syndicates
190 and 417.
Last year Zurich bought Pinnacle, the Bermuda-based financial reinsurer,
which has underwritten dozens of time and distance policies for Lloyd's
syndicates.
In addition, Lloyd's syndicates have also been given clearance by the
market's authorities to make more use of traditional reinsurance.
Observers believe that net result is likely to further increase the power of
the larger European and North American reinsurers.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4399</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIGBWADFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920907
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  07 SEP 92 / Economics: Financial markets to dominate
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By EMMA TUCKER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
FINANCIAL market developments are likely to dominate the headlines further
this week in the run up to France's September 20 referendum on the
Maastricht Treaty and following last Friday's gloomy US employment report.
But some important inflation indicators will also be announced. In Britain,
last month's retail price inflation will be published on Friday. August
normally sees a rise in seasonal food prices and certain shop prices as
summer sales end. However, only a very courageous retailer would have raised
prices significantly last month when lack of consumer confidence continued
to keep people away from the high streets.
As a result, analysts expect only a modest month-on-month rise following the
0.4 per cent fall in the RPI in July, the sharpest monthly fall for 25
years.
US producer price inflation is expected to show a similarly subdued trend
after prices rose by just 0.1 per cent in July. With consumer confidence and
demand remaining low, US manufacturers are finding it difficult to raise
prices, a situation that is unlikely to change in the near future.
Other economic highlights of the week follow. The figures in brackets are
the median of economists forecasts, from MMS International.
Today: UK, July credit business (down Pounds 50m); housing starts and
completions; week long annual conference of Trades Union Congress begins in
Blackpool. Switzerland, Group of 10 central bank governors hold monthly
meeting in Basle. US, markets closed for Labour Day holiday.
Tomorrow: Switzerland, EC central bank governors meet in Basle. US, July
consumer credit (down Dollars 1bn). Germany, second quarter GNP for eastern
Germany.
Wednesday: US, July wholesale trade. Canada, August housing starts, July
motor vehicle sales, June wages and salaries.
Thursday: US, August monthly M1 (plus Dollars 11.9bn), M2 (plus Dollars
6.6bn), M3 (plus Dollars 8.7bn); Money supply for week ended Aug 31; initial
claims for week to Aug 29 (395,000); 1992 real capital spending. UK, CBI
distributive trades survey. Australia, August unemployment (11 per cent
seasonally adjusted), August employment (down 20,000 adjusted); July retail
sales (up 1 per cent).
Friday: UK, August retail prices index (up 0.3 per cent on month, 3.8 per
cent annually), excluding mortgage interest payments (up 4.2 per cent on
year); August usable steel production; second quarter construction output.
US, August producer prices (up 0.2 per cent on month), excluding food and
energy (up 0.2 per cent on month), July home completions.
During the week: Germany, July retail sales (down 4.5 per cent on year),
July capital and long term capital accounts. Netherlands, August consumer
prices (up 0.3 per cent on month, 3 per cent on year). Sweden, August
unemployment (5.4 per cent). Australia, July money supply, September
Westpac/MI consumer sentiment index.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 25
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT923-4400</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CIGBWADEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920907
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  07 SEP 92 / The Week Ahead
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
RESULTS DUE
GLAXO Holdings, the pharmaceuticals group, is likely to show on Thursday
pre-tax profits for the year to June 30 of Pounds 1.4bn-Pounds 1.46bn
(Pounds 1.28bn a year earlier) and a dividend of 16p-20p a share (14p).
Sales of Zantac, the ulcer drug, almost half its turnover, have been eroded
by Astra's competing Losec and other drugs in Europe. But Zantac's US and UK
sales have held up.
Fisons, the pharmaceuticals and scientific equipment company, is expected to
announce tomorrow interim pre-tax profits of Pounds 35m-Pounds 43m (Pounds
95.2m). Forecasts of the dividend range from a rise to 3.6p to a cut. The
wide range of estimates follow a company warning in June that first-half
profits would be less than half last year's figure.
Prudential Corporation, the insurance and financial services group, is
expected to post increased interim pre-tax profits on Wednesday to Pounds
225m-Pounds 240m (Pounds 170m). Life insurance profits are expected to
increase marginally. But its general insurance business should produce
sharply reduced losses.
Peninsular and Oriental Steam Navigation Company, the shipping and property
group, is expected to report on Wednesday interim pre-tax profits of Pounds
90-Pounds 95m, little changed from last time. The stock market will be
watching if the dividend, which is likely to be uncovered, is maintained.
BTR, the industrial conglomerate, is forecast to unveil on Thursday a slight
increase in interim pre-tax profits to about Pounds 440m from Pounds 428m.
News of economic recovery or the further rationalisation of Hawker Siddeley,
acquired last November, will be eagerly anticipated.
Cadbury Schweppes is expected to justify the same day its premium rating in
the food sector by reporting interim pre-tax profits of Pounds 115m-Pounds
120m (Pounds 111.5m). A modest dividend increase is also expected.
United Biscuits is expected to present a less happy picture with its
interims on Friday. Cost-cutting and improved efficiency have helped the
company limit the impact of the UK recession but fierce competition
continues for Keebler, its US biscuit and snacks subsidiary. Pre-tax profits
of Pounds 70m-Pounds 75m (Pounds 86.1m) are forecast.
Shell Transport and Trading is expected on Thursday to announce an increase
in its interim dividend to between 9.1p and 9.4p from 8.9p last year. Royal
Dutch is seen increasing its dividend to Fl 3.65 from Fl 3.45.
On Wednesday Hillsdown Holdings is expected to show only a small rise at the
pre-tax level from last year's Pounds 77.6m, but the interim dividend should
be safe. Operating profits will be down but the saving on interest after
last year's rights issue will offset that.
Thursday sees results from Booker, which has changed its reporting period.
On the new basis, profits should be up a touch on last time's Pounds 32.9m -
perhaps to Pounds 33.5m. But on the old basis including June, profits are
expected to be down.
UK COMPANIES
TODAY
COMPANY MEETINGS:
Bromsgrove Inds., National Motorcycle Museum, Coventry Road, Bickenhill, W.
Midlands, 12.00
Dalepak Foods, Fairfield Manor Hotel, Shipton Road, Skelton, York, 12.00
Siebe, The Dorchester, Park Lane, W, 12.00
Templeton Emerging Markets Inv. Trust, Templeton House, Atholl Crescent,
Edinburgh, 10.00
BOARD MEETINGS:
Finals:
Black (Peter)
Interims:
ASW
Brammer
British Vita
Burford
Calderburn
Claremont Garments
Fairey
Frost
Goodhead
Hewitt
Intrum Justitia
Kynoch
Pentland
Perkins Foods
Rugby
Scholl
Suter
WSP Hldgs.
TOMORROW
COMPANY MEETINGS:
Birse, The Brewery, Chiswell Street, EC, 12.00
Enterprise Computer, 4, Broadgate, EC, 3.00
Kalamazoo, Northfield, Birmingham, 11.30
Mansfield Brewery, Civic Centre, Mansfield, 12.00
Oceonics, Chartered Insurance Institute, 20, Aldermanbury, EC, 10.30
PowerGen, National Exhibition Centre, Birmingham, 2.30
Shield, 44, Worship Street, EC, 11.30
Southern Electric, Bournemouth Intl. Centre, Bournemouth, 2.30
BOARD MEETINGS:
Finals:
Adscene
Macro 4
Interims:
Baird (Wm.)
Bletchley Motor
Candover Inv. Trust
Croda Intl.
Fisons
Gaskell
Herring Baker Harris
Home Counties News.
IMI
Instem
Medeva
Nurdin &amp; Peacock
Peek
Plantsbrook
Record Hldgs.
Ropner
Wimpey (George)
WEDNESDAY SEPTEMBER 9
COMPANY MEETINGS:
ASDA Group, Pudsey Civic Hall, Dawsons Corner, Pudsey, Leeds, 2.30
Hadleigh Inds., Novotel, Ipswich, 2.00
In Shops, 55, Colmore Row, Birmingham, 12.00
Fleming Int. High Inc. Inv. Trust, 25, Copthall Avenue, EC, 12.00
Reject Shop, 20, Farringdon Road, EC, 12.00
South Wales Electricity, St. David's Hall, Cardiff, 1.00
Wagon Industrial, Park House Hotel, Shifnal, Shropshire, 12.30
BOARD MEETINGS:
Finals:
British Thornton
Interims:
Assoc. British Ports
Avonmore Foods
Avonside
Boddington
British-Borneo Petroleum
British Dredging
Burnfield
CU Enviromental Tst.
Caird
ECC
Evans Halshaw
Great Southern
Haden MacLellan
Hillsdown Hldgs.
Kleinwort Smaller Co's
MTM
P &amp; O
Pacific Assets Tst.
Portals
Prudential Corp.
Savoy Hotel
Sherwood Computer
Stat-Plus
Sunleigh
Taylor Woodrow
Wilson (Connolly)
THURSDAY SEPTEMBER 10
COMPANY MEETINGS:
Anglo St. James, Southgate Street, Winchester, Hants., 10.00
Dixons Group, Royal Garden Hotel, Kensington High Street, W, 11.30
London Merchant Securities, Carlton House, 33, Robert Adam Street, W, 12.00
Northern Electric, Northumbria Centre, Washington, Tyne &amp; Wear, 11.00
Stanley Leisure, Renshaw Street, Liverpool, 12.00
Triplex Lloyd, Birmingham Botanical Gardens, Westbourne Road, Edgbaston,
Birmingham, 12.00
BOARD MEETINGS:
Finals:
BZW Conv. Tst.
Glaxo
Sirdar
Interims:
AMEC
BTR
Beattie (James)
Blue Circle Inds.
British Mohair
Bunzl
Cadbury Schweppes
Coats Viyella
Commcl. Bank of London
Emess
Enterprise Oil
Erith
Ferrum Hldgs.
Gowrings
Hall Eng.
LWT
Laing (John)
Lloyds Smaller Co's Inv.
London Forfaiting
Matthews (Bernard)
Ocean Group
PCT
Parambe
Pendragon
RTZ
Rathbone Brothers
Reece
Sema
Severfield-Reeve
Shell Tansport &amp; Trading
TLS Range
FRIDAY SEPTEMBER 11
COMPANY MEETINGS:
FKI, Pennine Hilton National, Ainley Top, Huddersfield, W. Yorks., 12.00
Hampson Inds., Penns Hall Hotel, Penns Lane, Sutton Coldfield, Birmingham,
12.00
Property Security Inv. Trust, Butchers Hall, 87, Bartholomew Close, EC,
12.00
Radiant Metal Finishing, 69, Fairfield Road, Bow, E, 10.30
Sutcliffe Speakman, Greyhound Hotel, Leigh, 11.30
BOARD MEETINGS:
Finals:
Arcadian Intl.
Walker (Thomas)
Interims:
Berry Starquest
Elys (Wimbledon)
Evered Bardon
Utd. Biscuits
Company meetings are annual general meetings unless otherwise stated.
DIVIDEND &amp; INTEREST PAYMENTS TODAY
Bulmer (HP) 5.55p
Cardiff Property 0.85p
Electrocomponents 5.1p
Fleming Fledgeling Inv. 1p
Harris (Philip) 4.25p
Kembrey 0.15p
London County Freehold &amp; Leasehold Props. 6 1/4 pc Deb. 1986/95 Pounds 3.125
River &amp; Mercantile Extra Inc. Tst. 1.96875p
Sainsbury (J) 7 1/4 pc Deb. 1987/92 Pounds 3.625
3i Gtd. Fltg. Rate Nts. 1997 Pounds 266.46
TOMORROW
Barclays Overseas Inv. Gtd. Fltg. Rate Nts. 2004 Dollars 129.17
Boots ADR Dollars 0.384
British Gas Intl. Finance 8 3/8 pc Gtd. Fltg. Rate Nts. 1999 Dollars 83.75
Ensearch Dollars 0.20
Lex Service 4p
Lockheed Dollars 0.53
London County Freehold &amp; Leasehold Props. 7 1/4 pc Deb. 1991/95 Pounds 3.625
Natl. Australia Bank Sub. Var. Rate Nts. 2000 Pounds 267.70
Natl. Westminster Bank Var. Rate Cap. Nts. 2009 Pounds 260.79
Nationwide Bldg. Soc. Fltg. Rate Nts. 1995 Pounds 253.49
Ragby Fltg. Rate Nts. 1998 Dollars 28093.75
Rockwell Intl. Dollars 0.23
Sanwa Finance Gtd. Step-up Fltg. Rate Nts. 2002 Dollars 602
Svenska Intl. 12 3/4 pc Bds. 1992 Dollars 637.50
Tenneco Dollars 0.40
Treasury 10pc 2003 Pounds 5
WEDNESDAY SEPTEMBER 9
Anheuser-Busch Dollars 0.32
Bank Leumi (UK) 4.5p
Barclays Australia Intl. Finance 11 1/2 pc Gtd. Nts. 1994 ADollars 115
Blick 3p
Domino Printing Sciences 2.4p
Investors Capital Trust 1.275p
Irish Telecommunications Invs. IrPounds 4.625
Kalamazoo 0.875p
Local Authority Short-Dated Bonds 10 9/16 pc Bds. 9/9/92 Pounds 5.426
London County Freehold &amp; Leasehold Props. 7 3/4 pc Deb. 1992/96 Pounds 3.875
Mansfield Brewery 9.6p
Prism Leisure 3.95p
Renold 7 5/8 pc Deb. 1992/97 Pounds 3.8125
THURSDAY SEPTEMBER 10
Abbey National Treasury Services 9 3/8 % Nts 1993 Dollars 93.75
Allied-Signal Dollars 0.25
Carclo Eng. 6.1p
Chevron Dollars 0.825
Debenham Tewson &amp; Chinnocks 1.5p
Dun &amp; Bradstreet Dollars 0.57
Eksportfinans 7 5/8 % Nts. 1993 Dollars 381.25
Do. 10 5/8 % Sb. Nts. 1992 DK1062.50
Exxon Dollars 0.72
Gen. Motors Dollars 0.40
Grace (WR) Dollars 0.35
Houston Inds. Dollars 0.75
IBM Cap. Dollars 1.21
IBM Credit 8% Dual Currency Nts. 10/9/95 Y80000.0
JLI 3p
Kawasaki Steel 6% Bd. 1997 Y120000.0
Lilly (Eli) Dollars 0.55
Mobil Dollars 0.80
Nippon Paint 6.1% Bd. 1997 Y162666.0
Sun Co. Dollars 0.45
Texaco Dollars 0.80
Time Warner Dollars 0.28
Travelers Dollars 0.40
Utd. Technologies Dollars 0.45
USX-Marathon Dollars 0.35
Warner-Lambert Dollars 0.51
FRIDAY SEPTEMBER 11
Aegon DFL1.10
Carlton Comms. Dollars 0.3162
Chase Manhattan Fltg. Rate Sb. Nts. 2009 Dollars 134.17
Cons. Murchison R0.15
Elandsrand Gold Mining R0.25
Fleming Intl. High Inc. Inv 2.5675p
Greenfriar Inv. 2.1p
Grootvlei Prop. Mines R0.25
Hongkong &amp; Shanghai Banking Prim. Cap. Und. Fltg. Rate Nts. (Ser. 2) Dollars
63.89
Local Authority 10 1/4 % Bd. 17/3/93 Pounds 5.125
M &amp; G Recovery Inv. Inc 0.85p
Do. Geared Units 0.85p
Do. Package Units 0.85p
Monsanto Dollars 0.56
St. Helena Gold Mines R1
Southvaal R1.45
Svensk Exportkredit 12 3/4 % Bd. 11/9/92 Dollars 637.50Temple Court
Mortgages Class A1 Multi-Class Mtg. Bckd. Fltg. Rate Nts. 2031 Pounds 260.11
Do. Class A2 Pounds 263.88
Templeton Emerging Markets Inv. Tst. 1.8p
Vaal Reefs Exp. &amp; Mining R5
Western Deep Levels R1
Witan Inv. 2.7p
Woolwich Bldg. Society Fltg. Rate Nts. 1994 Pounds 252.15
SATURDAY SEPTEMBER 12
KG Int. Trade &amp; Fin. 7% Bds. 1995 Y525000.0
SUNDAY SEPTEMBER 13
Girozentrale und Bank der Osterreichische 12 1/4 % Sb. Bds. 1993 Pounds
122.50
GMAC Australia 15 1/8 % Nts. 13/9/93 ADollars 151.25
Hydro-Quebec 12 3/4 % Ln. 2015 Pounds 6.375
Trizec 9 1/4 % Senior Db. 13/9/95 Ecu92.50
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 25
</PAGE>
</DOC>
